<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-360</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: C &amp; G rate cut - At a glance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CHELTENHAM &amp; Gloucester is reducing the interest paid on its London Deposit
postal account from January 2. In October, C &amp; G promised to guarantee the
rate for three months. The new rates represent a drop of about 2 percentage
points. They will be 7 per cent gross annual interest on balances on Pounds
5,000-Pounds 9,999; 7.5 per cent on Pounds 10,000-Pounds 24,999 and 8 per
cent on sums over Pounds 25,000.
The Moneyfacts table 'Highest Rates for Your Money' will next appear in our
January 2 issue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-361</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: PEP discount - At a glance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SAVE &amp; Prosper is offering a discount to investors placing Pounds 4,000 or
more in its Personal Equity Plans during January. The initial fee of 1.5 per
cent is being waived on the Managed Portfolio Pep and the initial charge on
the group's unit trust Pep is being cut from 5.5 per cent to 3.5 per cent.
There is an annual 1.5 per cent annual management charge on the managed Pep
and dealing charges are also 1.5 per cent. The annual charge on the unit
trust is 1.25 per cent for UK income funds and 1.5 per cent on overseas
funds.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-362</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: USM threat - At a glance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Stock Exchange recommended this week that its junior tier, the Unlisted
Securities Market, should close at the end of 1995. The USM was founded in
1980 and, as the graph shows, enjoyed mixed fortunes in the early 1980s.
Then, in 1987, an economic boom coincided with a period when small company
shares were the darlings of the stock market; the USM index more than
doubled in months. Since the Crash, the recession and the illiquidity of
many small stocks have taken their toll.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-363</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Markets: Icing a rich cake - Wall Street
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS WALL Street's annus mirabilis drew near a close this week, the loudest
noise to be heard down among the tinsel-clad skyscrapers of lower Manhattan
was the rustle of traders, brokers and investment bankers gleefully counting
their bonuses for 1992.
And what a year it has been. The stock markets started brightly, ran into
problems mid-year, but finished strongly as the main share indices either
approached or set record highs.
Trading volume was the heaviest ever recorded as investors rushed out of
low-yielding short-term assets and into stocks. The New York Stock Exchange
broke its annual record of 47.8bn shares - set in 1987 - on December 8.
Since then, trading has been even busier. Only last week, the number of
shares traded on the Big Board soared to 371m, the highest total since the
mini-crash of October 1989.
New corporate stock and bonds were also issued in huge amounts during the
year, thanks to the lowest interest rates in three decades.
In the first nine months of this year alone, Dollars 668bn in new corporate
financing was raised on Wall Street. This outstripped by far the Dollars
586bn raised in all of 1991 - itself a record year.
With such favourable market conditions, the securities industry reaped
record profits from a boom that is about to enter its third year. Record
profits, of course, meant record bonuses.
All this, and a new president who speaks in sentences and knows what an
inverted yield curve looks like. Wall Street is hugging itself with joy.
The only cloud on the horizon is the certainty that taxes on the rich -
which means anyone who counts on Wall Street - will be going up next year.
This explains why all the big firms have been doling out the bonuses early.
The idea is that their hard-pressed employees can keep their money safe from
those dangerous socialists who will occupy the White House from next month.
Not that 1992 was all plain sailing, by any means. Just ask the senior
executives at International Business Machines, Boeing, General Motors, Sears
Roebuck, American Express and Westinghouse Electric.
All of them were forced to embrace structural change to address serious
strategic weaknesses in their businesses.
None had a more disastrous year than IBM - one that matched the royal
family's for its catalogue of horrors.
A series of restructurings and redundancy programmes failed to reverse IBM's
long-term decline as the dominant force in a fast-changing world computer
market, and did nothing to impress investors, who fled the stock in big
numbers.
From a high this year of just over Dollars 100, IBM shares have dropped to
around Dollars 50, wiping more than Dollars 28bn off the company's market
value.
That the markets fared so well despite the problems at IBM, and other
so-called 'blue-chip' corporations, testified to the resilience of investor
confidence in the longer term outlook for both the economy and stock prices.
On occasion, that confidence was sorely tested, most notably during the
summer and early autumn, when unemployment and consumer confidence continued
to move in opposite (and wrong) directions.
Some clever economist even coined a new term to describe the peculiar funk
the economy had found itself in - a 'growth recession'.
Although it sounded like a contradiction in terms (which it was), economists
insisted that 'growth recession' best described the conditions of the day -
an economy that was growing so slowly that it was unable to create new jobs
or lift incomes.
Despite the mid-year trough in market confidence, there was no mass
desertion of stocks by investors.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell only 8 per cent from its June peak of
3,413.21, and has regained almost all of that lost ground since then.
The Standard &amp; Poor's 500, a broader measure of market performance, never
dropped much more than 5 per cent from its early-year high - a peak it
eventually surpassed comfortably in mid-November.
This was because for every IBM, there was an Intel, for every GM, an
American Telephone &amp; Telegraph. Not only did a significant number of big
stocks have a good year but so did plenty of small-capitalisation growth
stocks.
As a group, these returned to favour in the latter half of 1992 after a
sticky period in the second and early third quarters.
Consequently, the Nasdaq composite index, which contains many small-cap
growth stocks, has had a splendid 1992, rising more than 12 per cent.
Yet what of 1993? As ever, Wall Street, home of short-term thinking, is
looking no further than its nose - a nose that is buried deep right now in a
trough of the finest champagne and the richest Christmas cake.
As they say in New York - Happy Holidays.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-364</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Markets: A year one would rather forget - London
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The Sun's leaked copy of the Queen's Christmas broadcast has led to some
rapid redrafting at Buckingham Palace. The revised speech goes like this:
LIKE many other families, we have lived through some difficult days
recently. As some of you may have heard me observe, it has indeed been a
sombre year. But Christmas is surely the right moment to try to put it
behind us and to find a moment to pray for those, wherever they are, who are
doing their best in all sorts of ways to make things better.
I am thinking especially of people like Mr George Soros, the international
investor. At great personal risk, he was able to achieve in September what
so many of us have hoped for, so devoutly, for so long: a U-turn in
government economic policy.
By selling the pound short on a huge scale, he made sterling's continued
membership of the ERM impossible. That, in turn, allowed a three-point
reduction in interest rates, which has added greatly to the well-being of
all of us who have, in our own modest way, some small holdings in the equity
market. From the moment that Mr Soros - and his fellow speculators - forced
the pound's departure from the ERM, the FT-SE 100 index has risen 20 per
cent.
In return for his selfless services, he has suffered vulgar intrusions into
his private affairs - something, alas, with which I am all too familiar -
and has been faced with some difficult decisions about what to do with his
Dollars 1bn in speculative profits. He has borne these burdens with
fortitude and cheerfulness.
Perhaps this shining example of what a human being can achieve will inspire
the rest of us. Such talents and indomitable spirit are not given to all of
us; but if we can sometimes lift our eyes from our own problems and focus on
those of others, it will be at least a step in the right direction.
Among those who have been suffering this year, I must single out a few
groups for special sympathy. The anguish of investors in property and
construction companies is especially great.
Last Christmas, you will recall, I asked your prayers for these particular
cases of distress, and many of you wrote offering sympathy and best wishes.
This year, once again, these unhappy people are mired in misery.
Property shares have halved since from their high point in 1989; this year,
they fell 20 per cent at a time when the FT-Actuaries All-Share index rose
13 per cent. Construction shares are down 17 per cent over the year.
Those of us who - anticipating events just that little bit more alertly -
had piled into water stocks, food retailers or banks have shown gains of
between 35 and 49 per cent this year. I hope we can find it in our hearts to
offer our sympathy and best wishes to those less fortunate than ourselves.
Misfortune has also struck some of the outstanding figures of our
generation, men like Mr Alan Sugar, Sir Nigel Broackes and Lord Hanson. Mr
Sugar failed in his attempt to take Amstrad private at 30p a share; since
then, the shares have dropped to 23p.
Sir Nigel lost his job at Trafalgar House after a disastrous slide in the
share price prompted the Keswick family to buy a minority stake and urge
management changes; the shares, which touched 156p in May in the wake of the
election, dropped as low as 39p, and are now back at 82p.
Lord Hanson pondered buying Canary Wharf from the Reichmanns, then thought
better of it; signalled the final abandonment of his ambitions of unbundling
ICI; and suffered the misfortune of losing out in the battle for Ranks Hovis
McDougall, the baker, to his former protege, Mr Greg Hutchings of Tomkins.
Hanson reported its first year-on-year decline in profits; its shares are
still below their level of two years ago.
For some of us to whom dividends are important it has been - to coin a
phrase - an annus horribilis. Companies like Hammerson, Wimpey, Taylor
Woodrow, Guardian Royal Exchange, Sedgwick, Pilkington, British Petroleum
and British Steel have cut their dividends.
Overall, however, dividends have been maintained at a surprisingly high
level. The stock market as a whole is yielding 4 1/3 per cent, handsomely
ahead of the rate of inflation.
The worst misfortunes have, of course, been suffered by those who have lost
their homes or their incomes. Some families have been struck with both these
misfortunes, though I do not wish to wallow in personal grief.
In the first nine months of the year, 100,000 homes were repossessed by
mortgage lenders. Unemployment has risen to 2.9m in the course of the year.
Some people have retained their jobs, despite all the odds: the chancellor
of the exchequer, for example. He embodies the message in those well- known
lines: 'Kindness in another's trouble, courage in one's own.'
The heroic scale of borrowing on which the Treasury has embarked surely
displays both sides of this adage: kindness to gilt-edged market-makers, in
reviving a business which seemed headed for extinction only a few years ago;
courage in facing up to the barrage of criticisms from City economists, who
fear that the markets will choke on such a huge amount of new debt.
In this and many other ways, 1993 will certainly bring new challenges. Let
us resolve to meet it with fresh hope in our hearts. May every one of you
have a happy Christmas. God bless you all.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-365</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Recession clouds the crystal ball -
Philip Coggan talks to leading fund managers and asks them what next year
holds in store for the private investor
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT HAS been a gloomy year for the UK economy but a reasonably profitable one
for stock market investors. As 1993 approaches, investing prospects are
clouded by hopes for recovery in the UK and the US, and fears of recession
in Europe and Japan.
To help private investors make their choices for the New Year, the Weekend
FT asked leading fund managers to look into their crystal balls and forecast
what would happen to the world's major markets.
Michael Hart, joint manager of Foreign &amp; Colonial Investment Trust says: 'I
am reasonably hopeful about all the major markets in 1993. German interest
rate policy will continue to be the dominating influence. The Bundesbank
will probably reduce interest rates later rather than sooner but reductions
are inevitable at some stage as the recession deepens in Germany.
'UK rates can probably be safely reduced another notch in the New Year and
further falls will be possible later as German rates come down. The UK
market should be encouraged by lower interest rates and a good corporate
profits outlook based on rationalisation benefits, devaluation and lower
financing costs.
'A target of 3000 for the FT-SE 100 Index seems within reach. Continental
markets should also respond to easier interest rates with France a prime
beneficiary.
'I am positive about Wall Street with a favourable profits outlook and
inflation staying low but the largest part of the return in 1993 will
probably come from a stronger dollar.
'Although I was proved completely wrong about Japan in 1992, I remain
hopeful in the coming year. The market is discounting a great deal of bad
news but the government will soon have to increase liquidity and implement
the supplementary budget. A 15 per cent rise to the 20,000 level could
easily occur.'
Recalling the old Chinese proverb, Martin Wooller, fixed income director of
Fidelity Investments in London, expects 'interesting times' in 1993. 'Global
equity, bonds and foreign exchange markets will continue to diverge widely
(and wildly),' he says.
'The cyclical trough has been seen for the US dollar and bonds. The currency
will appreciate by at least 10 per cent trade weighted (Dollars 1.30/Pounds
by end 1993) and the 30 year bond yield will rise to 8.5 per cent.
'In Europe, the implosion of the German economy will be the driving force
for markets. Eventually, even the Bundesbank will ease - but probably not
until March/April. When it does the speed and extent of the ease will
astound most observers. This will provide the backdrop to an eventual
valuation-driven recovery in European equities.
'The UK, struggling to re-ignite its economy, will follow the US approach -
cutting short rates to 4 per cent by June, embarking upon competitive
depreciation of the pound against the European partners (DM/Pounds at below
2.20) and steepening the yield curve until the long end of the sterling bond
market offers outrageous value to the non-resident. Expect long gilts to
reach near 10 per cent before they enjoy a brief, but sharp, rally in the
latter half of 1993.
'By late 1993, though, markets will be concerned about the government's
inability to control either the budget deficit (Pounds 55bn in 1993-94) or
its current account deficit (rising towards Pounds 17bn). There is thus the
significant risk of a 1976 IMF-style crisis during 1994.
'Finally, in Japan, recovery will come eventually - but probably not until
the second half of 1993 as a second reflationary package, involving direct
tax cuts is introduced.
'World growth in 1993 is likely to be anaemic', believes David Rosier,
chairman of Mercury Fund Managers. 'Currencies will continue to have a
significant impact on the relative performance of equity and bond markets.
We expect the US dollar to strengthen further against sterling.
'In the UK, the debt burden, the depressed housing market and rising
unemployment will restrain consumer confidence, leading only to a gentle
economic recovery. However, the equity market should make reasonable
progress as we now have a realistic exchange rate and lower interest rates,
which will help corporate profits to recover.
'Given our view that corporate growth will be uneven and patchy, we believe
that it is too early to overweight the highly cyclical recovery stocks and
we therefore continue to emphasise growth stocks. The market is not
outstandingly cheap for this point in the economic cycle but the rating is
sustainable given that we are emerging from recession, inflation is under
control and the real dividend yield is attractive.
'We expect that interest rates in Germany will decline in 1993, allowing
rates in other major European markets to do likewise. As a result, we
believe that the prospects for continental European markets are exciting,
with the exception of Germany, where the economy will continue to slow.
'The US market seems now to be discounting much of the anticipated stimulus
from Clinton's new administration but encouraging economic trends point to
an acceleration in economic growth in 1993. We expect the best performance
to come from the small and medium-sized companies. Japan remains expensive
and risky with little recovery expected from the current recession. In the
Pacific region, growth will remain strong but the progress of markets is
likely to be volatile and influenced by political factors.
'As in 1992, sluggish economic growth worldwide and low inflation should
also allow bonds to perform well, especially in Europe, given the outlook
for interest rates and we believe that there is unlikely to be a wide
divergence between the performance of bonds and equities. In an environment
of falling interest rates, cash is our least favoured asset.'
Alistair Haddow, investment director of Murray Johnstone Unit Trust
Management, says: 'We expect 1993 will be a year of low, but almost
non-inflationary, economic growth, suggesting a generally favourable
background for equities as well as bonds. However, with the major economic
blocs at different stages of the cycle, next year could be a story of two
halves.
'Although the UK and US stock markets have been pushing into new high
ground, it is in these areas that most of the corporate pain of
restructuring and cost reduction have already occurred and the potential for
a recovery in profits is therefore greatest. We would stay with these
markets but at some point, possibly mid year, the good news will be fully in
the price. Smaller companies may well keep running, as investors seek out
undervalued situations.
'Also at about mid-year, the bad economic and corporate news currently
unfolding in Japan and Europe will cease to shock and these markets will
pick up, not in an expected profits recovery but in falling interest rates.
From a UK perspective, the home market will be hard to beat over the full
year.'
'Global growth prospects are not synchronised,' argues Paul Manduca, who is
shortly to become deputy chief executive of the merged Henderson/Touche
Remnant group. 'While the US is now emerging from recession and should show
growth of 2 per cent during 1993, and the UK economy looks about to recover,
the Japanese economy will remain severely depressed during 1993 and is
likely to show zero growth. In addition, mainland Europe is on the point of
entering recession.
'This picture suggests that world inflation is likely to stay low in 1993
and that commodity prices generally will remain soft. Although budget
deficits are rising throughout the OECD for both cyclical and policy
reasons, private savings rates are also rising while investment, except in
the US, will remain further. This suggests that world interest rates will
decline a bit more in 1993. Against this background, selective investment in
bond markets could prove rewarding.
'Currencies are likely to reflect these economic cycles. The dollar should
be strong while the yen and DM blocks weaken. Sterling looks undervalued
against the DM but not against the dollar. The crucial test for sterling
will come when the underlying inflation rate breaches the chancellor's
current target, possibly in late 1993. Provided interest rates are raised at
that point, sterling should finish the year strongly.
'As far as share prices are concerned, the US market looks fairly fully
valued, although sterling investors may gain from dollar strength. The UK
market should have a good year as economic recovery takes hold and profit
prospects improve, particularly in the smaller companies sector. We remain
nervous about the Japanese market, although prospects may look better later
in the year. European stock markets hinge on lower German interest rates and
on this basis, we expect good returns from France and Germany by year end.
Finally, for high risk investors, we like Hong Kong and Australia, but would
avoid Italy.'
'Next year should see the start of a slow but sustainable recovery in the UK
economy, with low levels of inflation,' believes Dick Barfield, chief
investment manager of Standard Life. 'There are many similarities with the
recovery in the early 1980s, but one major difference. The amount of debt
which was built up in the late 1980s will dissuade people and companies from
borrowing much more for some time.
'The cost reductions which companies have undertaken, together with some
improvement in demand for their products and the lower level of sterling,
will cause company profits to jump by around 20 per cent in 1993. This,
together with the low level of inflation, should enable UK equities to
produce a return in excess of cash. Gilts should also show a good real
return.'
'Equity market returns should also be positive outside the UK. The recovery
in the US economy should continue. The US equity market is anticipating this
so returns will be low, but should be helped, for a UK holder, a strong
dollar.
'Japan is still suffering from its over-indulgence in the late 1980s when
too much money was lent and property prices went through the roof. Inflation
is very low there and interest rates should fall further in 1993. The equity
market is unlikely to move up until there are signs of economic recovery,
which may not be until later in 1993.'
'Germany is suffering from the costs of absorbing the East and its economy
is weakening quite sharply. Interest rates should continue to fall but
probably not very quickly. This will limit the opportunities for growth in
Europe outside Germany and will probably continue to cause pressures in the
Exchange Rate Mechanism. European equities might perform better late in the
year, once policy in Germany becomes clearer.'
'Overall, we are optimistic about the returns which can be achieved in
financial markets. Longer term returns will be lower than in the 1980s, but
should be higher than inflation.'
Peter Smith, managing director of AXA Equity &amp; Law Investment Managers,
says: 'Strength in the US economy will be essential to the well-being of all
other major markets during 1993. Although now trading close to record
levels, with equities largely fully priced, the US market will respond
positively to the emerging recovery under President Clinton. 'In the UK,
corporate profits will benefit from the combination of low interest rates,
stable inflation, currency devaluation and improved productivity. Coupled
with better consumer sentiment, this should provide a powerful kick to the
economy and hence to the equity market.
'Continental European investors will enter 1993 faced with numerous
uncertainties. Although tentative signs of monetary easing are detectable,
fiscal policy is still restrictive. The outlook for the ERM will continue to
cause volatility in currencies and thus in markets, until the Germans show
signs of reducing interest rates. We favour companies with an exposure to
the US economy.
'The outlook for Japanese equities remains difficult. Slow economic growth
will prevent a recovery in corporate profits. Given the high valuation of
the market, the upside on the Nikkei 225 index appears limited to 19,000,
but official support may prevent a fall below 14,000.
Finally, someone who is not a fund manager but who has featured regularly on
these pages as a pessimist about equities. David Kauders, a Taunton-based
investment consultant, says 'equity markets perceived the policy changes of
1992 as miracle cures. 1993 may be the year that the miracles run out of
steam.
'This recession is changing form; the squeeze hurts governments, which will
be less willing to bail out ever-growing social needs. Financial
institutions will also have less activity all around, and the combined
effect must drain equity enthusiasm.
'US Treasury bonds continue to be the only market where the odds favour
sterling investors. I see Dollars 1.50 as a pausing point on the way to
purchasing power parity at Dollars 1. Gilts remain a hold, but otherwise
most investments are too risky. My advice is stand aside and let others make
the mistakes.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-366</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Trade rags a rich read for the
anxious investor - Harry Hopkins discovers a mine of information in the
specialist papers
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ALL private investors will be familiar with those lengthy periods between
Annual General Meetings when the Chairman appears to have taken a vow of
silence, and the anxious questions pile up.
This could be the time to turn to the British trade press, that vast mine of
curious information, multiplying and flourishing as never before.
There can be few areas uncovered. The 'Hotels and Catering' section of
Willings Press Guide alone lists more than 27 titles.
Is the investor in Harry Ramsden's growing chain of fish and chip palaces -
which has now reached Hong Kong - beginning to feel anxious? To what better
quarter could he or she turn for pointers than to the weekly Fish Fryers
Gazette published for almost 70 years in Leeds.
For long-suffering shareholders hunting for signs of revival 'Building and
Contracting' offers choice of well over a hundred magazines, with four
competing on roofing alone.
The doyen, handsomely produced and wide-ranging, is Building, which under
its earlier name, The Builder, has been chronicling booms and slumps,
triumphs and disasters, for well over one and a half centuries. For the
diligent investor it will still yield its regular trawl of projects,
tenders, contracts and bankruptcies, but the premature optimist will receive
small comfort.
'Only the lobotomised are cheerful now,' began a recent editorial,
announcing 'more bad news'. The magazine's profile series was grimly titled
'Despatches from the Front' - all useful groundwork for those planning to
buy building shares for recovery.
It is this touch of the nitty-gritty which can make the trade press such an
excellent antidote to the more bland approach of financial analysts, to whom
all shares may look like statistical constructs.
In the pages of trade papers nothing emerges more clearly than the fact that
each industry has its own atmosphere and style, and that it could be
important to know this. Students of the UK travel trade gazette, for
instance, could hardly fail to see that what is being described here is a
battlefield, in which no quarter is given to hold the line of market share,
whatever the cost.
To navigate this vast and unfamiliar sea, the investor may turn for charts
to Willings Press Guide, stocked by public reference libraries of any size.
The classified index will lead to individual paper entries citing
circulation figures target audience and sometimes offering 'summary of
contents'. A big sale figure will often - but by no means always - indicate
the paper's usefulness.
For the browsing investor it might be worth making a distinction between
'wide focus' and the more narrowly targeted weeklies.
For instance Retail Week ranges over the business of the whole of the high
street from Dixons to Habitat by way of Boots, keeping shareholders in many
companies in touch with trends showing up there.
A moving panorama of social history, Super Marketing can offer the alert
investor many signs and portents. 'Small dogs take the lead', ran a headline
in the aftermath to the Rottweiler scares, pointing out that a Irish
wolfhound had been shown by research to eat 35 times more than a Yorkshire
terrier, which might seem a fact worth weighing by investors in pet food
companies.
However, confidence was restored when experts demonstrated how the position
was being restored with premium brands, 'life cycle' cans for puppy, adult,
mature, and 'senior' dogs, new flavours and niches - vegetarian, organic and
herbal.
More narrowly focused, though with three times the sale, is the old
established Grocer, organised by commodities, or the ebullient news-hungry
Motor Trader - 'Profiling the Recession Beaters' - with many forewarnings
for investors in this key sector.
More peripheral, yet giving out signals usefully further ahead, are papers
such as Campaign, anticipating advertising campaigns, PR Week, or Marketing,
a recent issue running a story about 'M &amp; S jumping on the discounting band
waggon' which might give pause to shareholders in Burton, C &amp; A, John Lewis
and others which the paper pointed out - 'had already played the discounting
card'.
Whereas brokers' analysts may pay the occasional planned visit to plants,
trade papers have the advantage of keeping their special fields under
continuous surveillance over the years.
Some have become the bibles of their trade. Thus, the weekly Pharmaceutical
Journal has been putting wonder drugs - and not so wonderful drugs - under
scrutiny across the counter ever since 1841 and commenting on the results in
its pages.
The trade daily, the Morning Advertiser, has been reflecting the licensed
victuallers trade from behind the pub counter since 1784, while, going back
another 50 years, trade paper Lloyds List International, possibly Britain's
oldest newspaper, is no longer confined to ship movements and sinkings, but
offers investors an up to date compendium of news of oil exploration, the
great insurance companies, shipbuilding and trade currents all over the
world, not to mention the vicissitudes of the newspaper industry.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-367</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Diary of a Private Investor for 1993: Difficult, but the
chances are there
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN GOLDSTEIN-JACKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   THE PRIVATE investor can look forward to an interesting
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
but challenging - year in 1993. Interest rates in the UK ought to fall a bit
further, so cash in the bank will lose some of its attractions. But what
else is there to buy?
The government is keen to raise money in order to help finance its spending
plans. So, it is likely to try to ensure it gets a good price when it sells
its remaining shareholding in British Telecom - which is worth more than
Pounds 5bn.
But who wants more BT shares? Surely the institutions have enough of them
already, and even foreign investors have had ample opportunity in the past
to buy. So what will induce them to acquire even more? The vast majority of
private investors have also, at one time or another, bought BT shares during
its privatisation.
The government will, therefore, have to try to show that the UK economy is
improving in order to attract foreign buyers to BT, and it will have to
offer considerable 'perks' to private investors in Britain if the issue is
to be a success. But can it deliver?
The best way to encourage wider share ownership, and promote renewed
interest in BT shares from private investors, is for chancellor Norman
Lamont to use his Budget next spring to give them the same tax advantages
that are available now to pension funds and some other types of
institutional investor.
An individual should not be forced to deal via a personal equity plan or
other fund manager in order to gain tax advantages: these should be
available automatically for anyone investing directly in shares. This would
save investors a large amount in fees.
In 1990, the government agreed that stamp duty on share transactions would
be abolished when the City's electronic share settlement system, Taurus,
began operating. Stamp duty ought to be ended in the Budget rather than
waiting for Taurus, which has been delayed already for far longer than most
people (except me) had anticipated.
The first securities are now supposed to be traded 'live' on Taurus towards
the end of 1993. I still have considerable doubts about this.
I feel the stock exchange would save everyone a lot of money if it aborted
Taurus now and developed, instead, a variation on the US system using
depository companies and retaining share certificates.
Investors might also consider the effects on the market if the Queen starts
to pay tax in April. Will the Queen have to reduce some of her shareholdings
in order to pay the tax?
If so, this could have some effect on the share prices of companies such as
RTZ in which, it is rumoured, the Queen has a large shareholding. A major
restructuring of her asset portfolio, to make it more tax-efficient, could
also have a modest impact on certain companies.
There will, however, be a considerable number of major influences on stock
market sentiment in 1993. Events in many of the countries that used to form
the USSR still give cause for concern.
The continuing integration of eastern Germany with the western half is
likely to provide increasing financial, political, racial and emotional
strains on that nation; this could easily cause problems elsewhere.
Meanwhile, new trouble spots emerge every year. Even 10 years ago, who could
have predicted the conflict now going on in Yugoslavia? And 1993 could well
see troubles breaking out in other unexpected places.
With share prices in the US and the UK trading at near-record levels,
changes in sentiment can have dramatic consequences. But what else is there
in which to invest money?
It looks as if British property in 1993 will remain in a gloomy state. The
new council tax will hit particularly hard in the south and south-east, and
unemployment is likely to remain high. There is also the problem of people
having 'negative equity' in their homes, where the outstanding mortgage is
greater than the value of the house.
At the top end of the market, the difficulties of 'names', who have pledged
their wealth to Lloyd's, the insurance institution, is likely to continue to
depress prices. Commercial property, too, is unlikely to rise significantly
because of the collapse of prices for empty offices and factories. And
people with endowment mortgages could face problems.
They may find that some insurance companies - hit by the effects of
relatively low inflation and poor investment performance - are having to
slash bonus rates so that the returns from endowment policies may not be
sufficient to pay off mortgages completely.
There are county council elections in May and, unless the government starts
giving counties a larger share of education and other grants immediately and
announces plans for major infrastructure improvements, then some
Conservative authorities could fall to the opposition.
This would hardly inspire confidence to invest in property. People do not
like uncertainty and want to be able to plan ahead, knowing what decisions
will be made which may affect the area in which they live and property
values.
Looking at other forms of investment, the recent problems with Lancashire &amp;
Yorkshire Assurance Society are likely to make people more wary of investing
with friendly societies.
My wife and I have policies with L&amp;Y which mature next year. Fortunately,
they were in a 'balanced portfolio' rather than the society's Capital Secure
fund, which has suffered from write-downs in property values. I should,
therefore, still make a profit. How much is something else.
I have a number of investments with life assurance companies, and one
10-year investment plan matures next year. It will be particularly
interesting to see if the proceeds match, or exceed, what an average
investor could have achieved by investing directly in shares.
There will be many pitfalls for private investors in 1993 - including
avoiding the shares of those ITV companies which have bid too high for their
franchises and will have to start paying for those bids. But I believe there
are still ways in which significant profits can be made.
These, however, will depend largely on selecting and monitoring shares in
small companies carefully, and in taking advantage of any further major
upheavals in currencies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-368</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Three easy ways to be charitable
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CHARITIES may perhaps come lower on the Christmas list than usual for many
people this year With economic problems mounting, families might feel that
charity begins at home.
It is at times like this, however, that charitable donations can make the
most difference. And the government has made it much easier to make them
effectively. Three schemes allow you to give generously at the taxman's
expense and all of them could be worth considering over Christmas.
Give As You Earn
Provided your employer operates the scheme, or can be persuaded to do so,
this is the easiest way to give. Donations up to a maximum total of Pounds
50 can be made each month and they are 'grossed up.'
In other words, they are treated as coming from your pre-tax income so,
effectively, 40 per cent taxpayers part with Pounds 30 for a Pounds 50
donation and 25 per cent taxpayers get away with Pounds 37.50.
It is possible to give to a range of charities this way, subject normally to
a minimum donation of Pounds 5 a month for any individual charity. Some
employers even will pay the costs of administration.
If you are bothered about payroll deductions, you can stop the scheme at any
time, although donors cannot reclaim money paid out already.
Gift Aid
This scheme is particularly useful for top-rate taxpayers who want to give
large donations.
If you go through the formalities, a gift to a charitable group can be
treated as net of basic-rate tax. In other words, a Pounds 400 donation is
viewed as if you had paid Pounds 533.33. The charity could then claim tax
relief at 25 per cent (Pounds 133.33).
This is great for top-rate taxpayers, who can then reclaim for themselves
the 15 per cent difference (Pounds 79.99) between basic and top rates. So, a
top-rate taxpayer could give Pounds 533.33 to charity for a net outlay of
Pounds 320.01.
The only snag is that Pounds 400 is the minimum donation, which could put it
out of the reach of some - although this is still lower than the original
limit of Pounds 600. But there is no point in giving a sum between Pounds
320.01 and Pounds 400 without going through the gift aid formalities.
The Charities Aid Foundation has a cunning scheme, the Charity Account, for
getting round this. The CAF is itself a registered charity, so you can make
a Pounds 400 donation to the foundation; it will then make payments to the
other charities of your choice. This service even comes with a chequebook to
make it easier to keep tabs on your giving.
Covenants
This is the oldest-established way of giving tax-efficiently, and requires
you to take out a long-term regular commitment. The tax advantages are
similar to Gift Aid - basic-rate tax relief can be reclaimed from the
Revenue by the charity, while top-rate taxpayers can reclaim an extra 15 per
cent for themselves. Donations must be in fixed and regular amounts, though,
with neither maximum nor minimum levels.
The law requires that the covenant is drafted to last for at least three
years, and the intervals at which donations are to be made - whether
monthly, quarterly or annually - must be set at the outset.
There is a complicated choice between gross or net donations. If, for
example, you choose to give Pounds 100 gross, the charity will always
receive Pounds 100 - but you will have to part with more if tax rates go
down, and with less if they increase. If you covenant a net sum, then the
charities will bear the brunt of tax changes.
The CAF allows its Charity Account to be funded via a covenant as well as
via a single Gift Aid donation.
The charities movement is rapidly becoming more commercially savvy; thus,
there are plenty of other novel ways to give painlessly and even
pleasurably. Christmas cards and novelty records allow you to give to
charity en passant.
A similarly harmless way to give small amounts comes with a number of
prettily decorated credit cards - 'affinity cards' - which allow you to make
donations each time you make a purchase with them. The amounts involved are
small, but they can add up.
The CAF has another appealing new option: charity vouchers. These work in
the same way as book or record tokens, but are not open to the charge that
they limit the recipient's choice without conferring any benefit. The CAF's
voucher allows a third party to give via Gift Aid (using the allowance of
the person who gave them the voucher) to the charity of their choice. The
CAF offers the vouchers in denominations of Pounds 10, Pounds 25 and Pounds
50.
All of these are matters for careful and considered private choice. You may
think that the purposes on which your tax is spent - social services,
education, defence and the rest - are more worthwhile than any charities.
But if there are causes you want to support, it is silly not to take
advantage of the government's own recent fit of generosity.
Charity vouchers are obtainable from: Charity Gift Voucher Department,
Charities Aid Foundation, 48 Pembury Road, Tonbridge, Kent TN9 2JD.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-369</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: The most innovative products of the
year - John Authers asks independent advisers for their choices - and
fixed-rate mortgages are both top and bottom of the list
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF YOU took out a fixed-rate mortgage at the beginning of this year, you
made a bad buy. Nobody is criticising the institutions who were offering
them - the rates were probably as cheap as it was possible to guarantee. But
the timing, we now know, was all wrong.
The UK's base rates, and their bizarre behaviour, made timing in 1992 even
harder than in most years and lay behind the success and failure of many
products. Truly good deals, when they were offered, needed to be accepted
with an indecent haste that few people care for when making far-reaching
financial decisions.
Double-digit fixed-rate mortgages are just one example of the products which
consumers might have regretted choosing in 1992. But what were the truly
innovative products of the year? We asked a panel of independent advisers to
pick products which made more of a mark, or aroused more controversy, than
most:
National Savings' FIRST Option Bond
This product was too good for the building societies or, ultimately, the
government to bear.
NS decided to invade the societies' traditional territory by offering a bond
on which basic-rate tax had been paid already, offering a fixed rate for one
year.
The rate NS chose, 10.34 per cent gross on July 7, was better than anything
else on the market, and it came underwritten by the government.
Understandably, there was a quick rush for it. On July 16, the Cheltenham &amp;
Gloucester raised its mortgage rate so it could offer a competitive savings
return.
Within days, the interest rate on FIRST had been cut and the product is now
not available, although it could return. With base rates now down to 7 per
cent, any basic-rate taxpayer who piled in at the start must feel very
happy.
An offer from National Savings which went on rather longer, and with
hindsight looks attractive, was the Fifth Issue Index-linked Certificate,
guaranteeing to beat inflation by 4.5 per cent over five years.
Providence Capitol Building Society Bond
Providence Capitol revolutionised the world of single-premium insurance
bonds with a scheme that made no front-end charge and allowed investors an
instant exit without penalty. For the many taxpayers who could benefit from
the peculiar tax advantages of the bond, it was an excellent new home for
their money. The bond shops around to find the best rate from building
societies, and avoids anything more risky.
Falls in savers' rates have harmed the product, according to Peter
Hargreaves, of Hargreaves Lansdown. To stay competitive, building societies
have been slow to follow base rates down for individual savers, but the
rates on offer to institutional savers such as Providence Capitol went down
straight away. So, for the time being, the product looks uncompetitive. But
the other savers' rates will come down in due course, and so Hargreaves
still names it his product of the year.
Hypo/F&amp;C Secure Growth Protected Capital Plus
This was arguably the most talked-about of the many new 'capital guaranteed'
products which used derivatives to guarantee investors that their capital
would not fall, while also offering them a share of any stock market upside.
These products are attractive for many investors, as the fear of capital
loss is the factor which inhibits most people from taking advantage of
long-term growth in equities.
But Hypo/F&amp;C's product has also provoked controversy. The bulk of the fund
is invested in deposits, to fund the guarantee, and the rest goes into
derivatives to buy exposure to the market. F&amp;C calculates that this allows
it to guarantee around 60 per cent of the rise in the index for each
three-month period.
After every three months, you are free to exit. The capital will not have
depreciated (unless one of the banks with which it is deposited has gone
under), even if the stock market has gone down.
If the fund has risen 10 per cent, then, so the theory goes, the investor's
money will have risen 10 per cent, and this will be frozen in to the value
of the investment. Richard Boyton, of Boyton Financial Services, names this
as his product of the year.
Hargreaves has doubts, though. He points out that falling interest rates
mean F&amp;C will have to put more money into deposits to back its guarantee.
That means buying less exposure to the market - Hargreaves believes it could
be as little as 30 per cent of any rise in the index.
He says: 'I personally believe that while the F&amp;C product was probably the
most innovative product of the year, it has probably been killed by the 3
percentage point base rate cut.'
BESSA Blue Chip and Johnson Fry Mortgage Express Flexible Growth Scheme
These products, launched at the end of August, changed the face of the
business expansion scheme and are likely to dominate the tax shelter market
from now until the abolition of the BES at the end of next year. John
Bridel, of Towry Law, rates these as the products of the year.
There were two new wrinkles which put them ahead of previous schemes. First,
they came underwritten by high street banks, offering as much security as
small investors could reasonably hope for. Second, they used non-recourse
loans to allow investors to realise a return within a year - or even, in the
case of BESSA Blue Chip, within six months.
This was done solely by relying on the tax relief for top-rate payers. After
a year, the banks agreed to make a loan of 76p for every Pounds 1 invested
(or, in other words, for every 60p after tax relief), translating into a
thumping annual return. The only security for the loans was the BES shares
themselves, so people who took the loans were at no risk of being pursued if
the investment turned sour.
James Capel's Footsie fund
The only 'special' thing about this offer is its simplicity. But this is why
Graham Hooper, of Chase De Vere, names it his product of the year.
Capel's unit trust was well marketed, and undertakes to track the
performance of the FT-SE 100 index, the most commonly quoted measure of the
UK stock market's performance. It will make no attempt to outperform, but
neither will it underperform.
As unit trusts tend to underperform their target indices, this fund has
every hope of doing better than most, and investors can find out how their
money is doing just by checking the latest level of the FT-SE. Indexation
has caught on during the year, and this could be the forebear of more
tracker funds.
Other products
More general products for which this was a good year include international
bond unit trusts - which, interestingly, were the flavour of the month with
fund managers in 1991; on this occasion, the industry appears to have got it
right.
That said, these funds were helped by the the huge boost they got from
sterling's devaluation in September. Average performance for the sector to
December 1 was 15.81 per cent, according to Micropal, while the leader, MGM
International Bond, achieved growth of 22.14 per cent.
What of the real investment 'dogs'? None of our experts thought any
individual products deserved to be singled out for this accolade. But
several investments proved to be a very bad idea.
Those who became Lloyd's 'names' in time to catch the underwriting year of
1989 have not done too well: total losses, payable this year, were Pounds
2.06bn. Gold also lost its glister, even though it is the traditional safe
haven in times of international tension and depression. At the start of the
year, it was worth Dollars 348.55 a fine ounce. By late December, following
some wide fluctuations, this had dwindled to Dollars 335.05.
John Cole, of Berry, Birch &amp; Noble, says this could be remembered as the
'with-profits year.' In January there was a strong fashion for with-profits
bonds, which were sold in some cases as a one-way bet alternative to
building societies. By the end of the year, Lautro had rapped several
companies for misleading advertising material.
Many bonds had been forced to apply market value adjusters (which meant that
investors came away with less money than they had invested), and a few
offices had withdrawn the bonds because they were putting too much strain on
their reserves. A lot of advisers believe this is not the end of the story
and that the bonds will prove themselves as long-term investments; but it
does not look good.
Cole also points out that this has been a bad year for pensions. Final
salary schemes are feeling the strain, and money purchase schemes are coming
under the dual pressure of indifferent fund performance and falling annuity
rates. Meanwhile, the expectation of further legislation - once the Goode
committee has reported and the government has decided how to equalise
pension ages - is not making the life of the retirement savings industry any
easier.
But back to fixed-rate mortgages. As we now know, January was a dreadful
time to borrow money. Fixed-rate mortgage offers then included 10.55 per
cent for three years from Abbey National, or 10.8 over five years. Leeds
Permanent offered 11.25 per cent for 20-25 years.
At the time, they looked good. But a first-time buyer borrowing at the end
of November could have a fixed rate of 6.99 per cent for three years from
the Abbey - a third less than was offered 10 months earlier. That offer was
worth accepting, and it was snapped up within weeks. Fixed rates are now
rising.
The other exceptional long-term mortgage offer came from the Halifax, which
capped mortgage payments at 9.29 per cent until the year 2000. That offer
has also sold out.
The smartest savers may be those who fixed their savings back in January.
According to Chase De Vere, the best rates for guaranteed income bonds came
on January 3: 9.3 per cent over one year from General Portfolio, and 9.35
per cent over five years from Providence Capitol. Anyone who opted for one
of those can afford to feel smug as 1993 nears.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-370</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Tessa turns three - but pays less
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TESSA enters her third year of existence from January 1, and those who
opened an account from that date in 1991 or this year will be able to
deposit a further Pounds 1,800.
Tax-exempt special savings accounts allow taxpayers to save a total of
Pounds 9,000 over five years totally tax-free. The maximum that can be
deposited in the first year is Pounds 3,000. Thereafter, the annual maximum
is Pounds 1,800 and the maximum in the final year is Pounds 600.
Depositors can top-up their Tessa only on the anniversary of opening it. Net
interest can be withdrawn during the five-year period, but drawing on the
capital means loss of the tax break.
When Tessas were introduced, base rates were close to historical highs at 14
per cent. They have since halved, but what has happened to the top-rate
Tessa rates paid by some banks and building societies?
The National Counties and Cheltenham &amp; Gloucester societies were paying over
15 per cent at launch (others, such as Robert Fleming/Save &amp; Prosper also
paid over 15 per cent, but this included a one-point bonus payable during
the first year). C&amp;G closed its Maxi-Tessa (which paid 15.3 per cent) for
new accounts in February 1991; it now pays 7.5 per cent, which is no longer
highly competitive.
National Counties, which launched its Tessa with a rate of 15.4 per cent, is
now paying 9.6, a reduction of only 5.8 percentage points compared with a
base rate reduction of 7 points. The only snag with the National Counties'
Tessa is that you have to open a separate feeder account - which must have
enough in it to transfer the maximum permissable to the Tessa on the
anniversary of the opening.
Those institutions paying 15 per cent on their Tessa at launch included
Cardiff's Julian Hodge bank, and the Cambridge, Tipton &amp; Coseley, Birmingham
Midshires, Universal, West Cumbria, Britannia (Platinum), Stroud &amp; Swindon
and Principality building societies.
Julian Hodge bank has maintained its competitive edge by paying 9 per cent
today. Tipton &amp; Coseley is paying 8.65 per cent, Stroud and Swindon is
paying 8.25 per cent while Cambridge has dropped its rate to 8 per cent. The
rest have all dropped below 8 per cent gross and have reduced rates by more
than the seven-point base rate cut.
Several societies were paying 14.5 per cent and over at the launch of their
Tessa. Those over were Yorkshire building society (14.8), Mansfield BS
(14.8) and Allied Trust Bank's Premier Tessa (14.7). Those on 14.5 were the
Woolwich, Manchester, Leeds &amp; Holbeck, Alliance &amp; Leicester, Tynemouth BS,
Haywards Heath, Scottish BS, Dudley BS, Hanley Economics BS, Confederation
Bank and Cheshire BS.
Yorkshire has dropped its rate nearly seven percentage points to 8 per cent
and Mansfield is now paying 7.75 Allied Trust Bank's Premier Tessa is
offering one of the highest rates at 9.49 - but this can be obtained only if
you produce the full Pounds 9,000 upfront by placing the maximum permitted
in the Tessa and the rest in a feeder account paying 7.23 per cent gross.
None of the institutions which paid 14.5 per cent has exceeded the
seven-point base rate cut but Haywards Heath, paying 8.75 per cent, has only
fallen by 5.75 points. This rate will be reduced to 8 per cent from December
31, though.
Three of the four top-rate Tessas today are from institutions which were
paying the highest rates at Tessa's launch, according to Moneyfacts. Others
have been overtaken. West Bromwich building society, with a Tessa rate of 9
per cent, is now paying more than those - apart from National Counties and
Allied Trust Bank - which offered the highest rates when Tessas began. West
Bromwich launched its Tessa with a rate of 14.25.
Despite the reduction in base rates, Tessas still represent a good
investment for taxpayers, particularly since providers are in general still
competing to maintain good rates.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-371</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Minding your own Business: Past imperfect, future tense -
The plight of small companies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES BATCHELOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT HAS been a difficult year for small businesses. Although they can respond
more flexibly to change than their larger counterparts, the relentless
pressure on finances, management time and morale exerted by the recession
has been hard to cope with.
More than 46,000 businesses - most of them small - failed in the first nine
months of the year, an increase of nearly 40 per cent on 1991, suggesting
the total for the year will be more than 60,000.
Increased failures are to be expected during a recession. Usually they are
matched by a healthy number of new start-ups. But there are signs that the
ability of the sector to regenerate itself has been weakened. Figures for
1992 will not be available for some time, but in 1991 the net number of
companies registering for VAT (new registrations minus de-registrations) was
just 3,000 compared with 55,000 the year before.
This slow-down need not be a serious cause for concern provided the numbers
recover in line with the economy. Britain's record in creating new
businesses over the past decade has been a good one - better than that of
most other developed countries. Where it has fallen down is in creating the
medium-sized companies which are the strength of the German economy.
Government policy-makers have accepted this argument and are adapting
programmes accordingly. The nation-wide network of business advice centres
known as one-stop shops - launched in July by Michael Heseltine, the trade
and industry secretary - is intended to target the established small and
medium-sized business, not start-ups.
The main problems facing the business owners themselves have been a lack of
customer demand, the cost of borrowing, sometimes prickly relations with
their bank managers, and the tardiness with which their customers settle
their bills.
Bank base rates have fallen during the year from 10.5 to 7 per cent but,
with inflation still going down, real interest rates remain at a high level
and businesses are pressing for further cuts. Small firms can expect to pay
several points above bank base, anyway.
Complaints about interest rates led to renewed accusations in the autumn
that the banks were not passing on base rate reductions in full. These were
denied, but they highlighted once again the fragility of the banks'
relationship with many of their small business customers.
The chief concern of small businesses has been the more restrictive attitude
the banks have taken to lending. Many firms have found overdraft and loan
facilities frozen or reduced. There are serious concerns that the banks will
be unwilling to finance small firms' increased demands for loan finance when
the upturn comes.
Business organisations are equally worried about a looming shortage of
equity capital. With the exception of an ambitious venture capital programme
launched by Midland Bank, and the launch of a handful of local venture
funds, there has been a further contraction of the venture capital industry.
This was compounded by the chancellor's announcement in his March Budget of
the abolition of the business expansion scheme at the end of 1993.
The late payment of debts has become an even more pressing problem over the
past year. There is very little pressure that small businesses can bring to
bear on large customers when they delay paying their bills.
The government announced in March that large companies would have to
disclose in their annual reports how quickly they paid their suppliers. It
also said it would insist that main contractors on government contracts paid
sub-contractors within 30 days. But there is considerable scepticism about
the value of these measures, although slightly more is expected from a
proposed simplification of court procedures for collecting debts, announced
at the same time. The government remains opposed to the introduction of an
automatic right to interest on unpaid invoices.
Small business complaints about 'red tape' produced a response earlier this
month when the governement announced a beefed-up campaign to root out
bureaucracy. An inventory of the challenges facing business revealed no
fewer than 6,000 pieces of legislation and 2,500 forms affecting business.
The past 12 months have been difficult enough but recovery, when it comes,
could exact an even heavier toll than the downturn. If previous upturns are
any guide, failure rates increase when businesses attempt to expand and
their finances become overstretched.
Amid the general gloom, however, there are companies which are doing well. A
combination of careful management, tight financial controls and luck has
allowed many businesses to swim against the economic tide. It might be
little consolation to those thathave not survived, but the fact that people
are now concerned about the plight of small businesses shows the extent to
which their contribution to the economy has, belatedly, been recognised.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-372</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Capital gains allowances
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE TABLE shows capital gains tax (CGT) allowances for assets sold in
November. To use it, multiply the original cost of the asset for the figure
shown for the month in which you bought it.
If you subtract the result from the proceeds of your sale, the result will
be your taxable gain or loss.
Suppose that you bought some shares for Pounds 8,000 in April 1986 and sold
them in November 1992 for Pounds 15,000. Multiplying the original cost by
the April 1986 figure of Pounds 1.430 gives a total of Pounds 11,440.
Subtracting that from the proceeds of Pounds 15,000 gives a capital gain of
Pounds 3,560, which is below the 1992-93 CGT allowance of Pounds 5,800. If
you realised no other gains during the year, the profits should be tax-free.
If you sell shares bought before April 6 1982, you should use the March 1982
figure.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
CGT INDEXATION ALLOWANCES: NOVEMBER
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Month         1982    1983    1984    1985    1986    1987
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
January          -   1.691   1.609   1.532   1.451   1.397
February         -   1.684   1.602   1.519   1.446   1.391
March        1.759   1.681   1.597   1.505   1.444   1.389
April        1.724   1.657   1.576   1.474   1.430   1.372
May          1.712   1.651   1.570   1.467   1.428   1.371
June         1.707   1.647   1.566   1.464   1.429   1.371
July         1.706   1.638   1.568   1.467   1.433   1.372
August       1.706   1.631   1.553   1.463   1.428   1.368
September    1.707   1.623   1.550   1.464   1.421   1.364
October      1.698   1.618   1.541   1.461   1.419   1.358
November     1.690   1.612   1.536   1.456   1.407   1.351
December     1.693   1.608   1.537   1.455   1.402   1.352
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Month         1988    1989    1990    1991    1992
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
January      1.352   1.259   1.169   1.073   1.030
February     1.347   1.250   1.162   1.067   1.025
March        1.342   1.244   1.151   1.063   1.022
April        1.320   1.222   1.117   1.050   1.006
May          1.315   1.215   1.107   1.046   1.003
June         1.311   1.211   1.103   1.042   1.003
July         1.309   1.210   1.102   1.044   1.006
August       1.295   1.206   1.091   1.042   1.006
September    1.289   1.198   1.080   1.038   1.002
October      1.276   1.189   1.072   1.034   1.000
November     1.270   1.179   1.075   1.030       -
December     1.267   1.176   1.075   1.029       -
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Inland Revenue
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-373</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Follow those directors / A look at
boardroom share deals in 1992
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By COLIN ROGERS, Directus Ltd
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARE DEALS by directors tend to be studied for the clues they give to the
prospects of the individual company concerned. But they can also be assessed
on a larger scale.
We can examine movements in the buy/sell ratio, produced by dividing the
total number of purchases by directors by the number of sales. In the US,
where this data has been collected for many years, the long-term average is
around two sales for every purchase.
Our experience is rather more limited - we started in May 1990 - but tells a
different story; the UK average is two purchases for every sale. The fact
that stock market conditions have been difficult over the past three years
might help to explain the difference. In happier times, the UK ratio would,
no doubt, move closer to that in the US.
The year started with just over two purchases for every sale. Between
February and April, the volume of selling rose, driving the ratio down to
its low point for the year - in May, we recorded just 1.26 purchases for
every sale.
Historically, directors' transactions have proved an accurate indicator of
market movements but, in this instance, political uncertainty caused even
traditionally resolute directors to take profits. The prospect of higher
personal taxation proved a distorting factor.
Thereafter, the buy/sell ratio resumed its role as a leading indicator. As
the market fell back in July and August, directors accumulated shares at a
prodigious rate so that, in August, the buy/sell ratio had soared to 4.87:1.
This volume of buying was far greater than anything seen since we began
monitoring directors' transactions. It also marked neatly the turning point
for the market. In November, the buy/sell ratio stood at 2.8:1, almost back
at the level it started the year.
At the individual company level, any scientific summary of performance is
well nigh impossible in a weekly column, but there is a mass of evidence
which lends credibility to the predictive ability of directors.
Some sectors achieved a high profile because of the greater propensity for
directors to deal, be it buying or selling. The buying sectors included
building materials, contracting and construction, oil and gas, stores and
property, while directors of insurance brokers and food retailers were
conspicuous sellers of stock.
Many companies in these sectors have featured regularly over the past year.
One such is Berkeley Group, the house-builder. Two directors bought shares
at 224p in July and six directors then bought more heavily a few weeks later
at the low point of the year, just 186p. Since then, the shares have
recovered strongly and now stand at around 300p.
The UK construction industry has endured what many would describe as its
worst recession since the war. But a bargain is still a bargain, so readers
should have noted purchases totalling 150,000 shares by three directors in
Taylor Woodrow in October. The price paid was around 36p; the price now is
close to 60p.
Directors of Tarmac have been accumulating stock off and on for most of the
year, but the most remarkable purchase was the 200,000 shares bought by Sir
Anthony Bamford at 70p at the end of July. He is already sitting on a profit
of more than 50 per cent.
Boardroom buying might have been most conspicuous among construction
companies but the prize for consistent purchases almost certainly lies with
Burton, the high street chain which includes Top Shop and Dorothy Perkins.
Over the year, we recorded a total of 10 purchases by eight different
directors. They averaged about 34p, just half the present price.
The purchase of shares by someone newly appointed to the board should be
studied carefully. If it is an internal appointment, then the share buying
should prove more instructive, but beware of token purchases by outsiders.
In August, Charles Allen was appointed to head Granada's television
operations and, at the same time, he bought 85,000 shares at 235p.
Three weeks later, Gerry Robinson, who had been appointed chief executive
earlier that year, acquired just under 300,000 shares at 247p. Recent
results revealed profits far in excess of brokers' forecasts and the shares
have soared to 331p, close to their high for the year.
Close scrutiny of the sales can be equally rewarding. Our vote for
best-timed sale of 1992 goes to Peter Linacre, chief executive of Caird
Group, the land-fill and waste treatment company. On March 27 1992, he sold
2,622,270 shares at 85p. He did not hang on to a single share. With the
price now languishing at 14p, he saved himself a cool Pounds 1.88m.
Sometimes, trends continue from one year to the next. In 1991, Paul
Hyde-Thompson sold well over 500,000 shares in Ibstock Johnsen, the brick
manufacturer, at prices around 93p. He sold a further 163,000 shares at much
the same price in May this year, since when the shares have been on the
slide. One of the few companies in that sector not to enjoy a
post-devaluation rally, they are stuck at their low point for the year -
just 36p.
While there have been instances of directors getting it wrong in 1992 -
Cyril Stein at Ladbroke is perhaps the best example - the evidence suggests
that they are still well worth following.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-374</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Reclaiming income tax
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I FOUND recently that I should have been reclaiming income tax deducted at
source over 17 years but have not done so. How many years can I reclaim for?
Provided you get your claim in by Monday, April 5, you can claim repayments
of tax for 1986-87 onwards. It would be possible to go further back if your
failure to claim at the right time had been the result of misinformation,
for example, from a tax office but, presumably, that is not what caused your
oversight.
Ask the local tax office for the free pamphlets IR80(1992) (Income tax and
married couples) and IR112(1991) (How to claim a repayment of income tax).
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-375</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: CGT for a shareholder
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A PRIVATE company was sold for cash in 1987. Capital gains tax was assessed
on the two minority shareholders and settled immediately. But the Revenue
has not settled with the majority shareholder, its argument being that it
disputes the 1982 value of the shares.
Having already agreed a value with the minority shareholders, is it entitled
to treat the majority shareholder differently?
Yes. An agreement between one taxpayer and his or her inspector is not
binding in relation to someone else. It could be, for example, that the
amount of tax at stake in the case of the minority shareholders was small
enough for the inspector to decide that it was not worth spending time
arguing over the precise value at March 31 1982. Some inspectors are more
pragmatic than others.
Ask your tax office for the free pamphlet IR120; You and the Inland Revenue.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-376</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: School fees and IHT
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
OUR SON is unable to meet the heavy cost of private schooling for his young
son. We have agreed to do so. Should we pay the school direct or make the
payments to our son (in which case inheritance tax rules may apply)?
There are certain provisions which enable a person to make a disposition in
favour of a child, but the exemption arises only if that person is not in
the care of a parent in accordance with section 11 IHTA 1984. Therefore, we
do not believe this exemption would apply.
Whether you make the payment to the child or directly to the school does not
appear to matter, as it would still be regarded as a transfer value because
your estate would be diminished by virtue of the disposition. Therefore, we
would expect the payment to be subject to inheritance tax.
You each have an annual exemption of Pounds 3,000 but, in addition to this,
Section 21 IHTA 1984 provides an exemption for normal spending out of
income. If it can be shown that the payment was made as part of your normal
spending; and that it was made out of income; and that, after allowing for
the transfer value, you were left with sufficient income to maintain your
normal standard of living, then this exemption might apply.
If your income after tax and normal spending is greater than the payment for
the private schooling, then this exemption might apply, especially if it has
an income nature in that it is a regular recurring item.
(Reply by Barry Stillerman of accountant Stoy Hayward).
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-377</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: A Crown servant's gilt complex
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I am a Crown servant employed overseas. As such, I am classed as
non-resident for capital gains tax and on the interest paid on exempt gilts.
What treatment is applied to income from exempt gilts in the tax year in
which I return to the UK and resume normal tax status? Is tax levied for the
entire tax year in question, or only after my return home?
The existing exemption ceases from the day upon which you are regarded as
having again become ordinarily resident in the UK. The position may be
different if the gilts are held on the National Savings register, because of
the quirky effects of the preceding-year basis (which is under review).
Ask your tax office or Public Departments (Technical Unit) Foreign Section,
Ty Glas, Llanishen, Cardiff, UK, CF4 5WN) for the free booklet IR20 -
Residents and Non-residents: Liability to tax in the UK.
The position could also be different if you hold 3 1/2 per cent War Loan
(not in bearer form), or if any holdings produce less than Pounds 2.51
interest each half-year.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-378</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: It pays to put your budgeting on
record - A look at programs to help with personal finances / Software
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JEAN MILES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TWO YEARS ago, I resolved to put our domestic finances on computer. Never
before has an effort at self-improvement had such long-lasting results.
Computer budgeting has, of course, proved what experience had strongly
suggested already: namely, that if it isn't one thing it's another. A nasty
noise from the clutch or a prime William Gear at Christie's - there is
rarely a month that doesn't involve a large and wholly unpredictable
expense.
But it really does help to have things in order. Doing the income tax
remains a chore but is no longer a nightmare. Decisions, large and small,
are much easier.
A newcomer called Quicken is undoubtedly the computer budget program to go
for. It is priced modestly, easy to use and full of useful features. Until
the end of January, purchasers of Quicken can receive (for less than half
price) a copy of Tax Reckoner, a sound piece of software which I recommended
in 1991.
It is distressing to think about income tax at all in these precious weeks
between the discharge of one's 1992 obligations and the arrival of the 1993
return form on the mat. But if you can bear to get to grips with Tax
Reckoner now, you will find it a powerful assistant later. Its authors can
supply an annual update to accommodate changes introduced in the Budget.
If you do not have a hard disk on your home computer, perhaps because it is
an old office model, consider an idiosyncratic budget program called
Personal Cashflow. The unusual thing about it is that you do not have to
call for a 'report' when you want to survey your finances. You type 'V' (for
View) and there it all is.
Quicken includes portfolio management among its many virtues. It lacks some
of the more sophisticated forms of graph, and share prices cannot be updated
automatically by telephone, but it includes all basic facilities and some
useful extras.
For instance, you can assign an 'investment goal' to a share or an asset,
according to your ambitions for it (income, capital growth, maximum safety,
or whatever), and monitor the subsequent performance of a group of shares
with a common goal.
There are great advantages in having your share portfolio and the rest of
your finances under one electronic roof. For that reason alone, for
portfolio management I would prefer Quicken to the nearest competitor,
Stockmarket 2 from Meridian Software. But, again, if you are using
somebody's cast-off computer, you might be grateful for a sound program,
priced reasonably, which can run from a single floppy disk. Stockmarket 2
meets the job description. It is simple and straightforward and the graphs
are excellent.
For more advanced portfolio management, I remain enthusiastic about
Fairshares from JSL Software. I have been using it for nearly a year now,
updating prices weekly and adding company results and dividend declarations
as they come in. I have learned a lot. I value the chance to store historic
information about turnover and earnings per share, and the program's ability
to convert old purchase prices into their modern, index-linked equivalents.
These features supplement and give further meaning to price graphs - and the
graphs themselves are wonderful.
High among my frivolous resolutions for 1993 is a face- to-face encounter
with double-entry bookkeeping. I do not understand debits and credits. To
me, the terminology seems wilfully perverse, but I am determined to master
it. To this end, I will use the computer-assisted course published by Ivy
Educational Publishing. I have worked successfully through other courses
offered by Ivy. They can teach me bookkeeping if anyone can.
Quicken costs Pounds 49.95 from Intuit Ltd, Manor Court, High Street,
Harmondsworth, West Drayton, Middlesex UB7 0AQ. Freephone 0800-585-058. Fax
081-759-2077. Until the end of January, Quicken and Vital Software's Tax
Reckoner are available as a package from Intuit for Pounds 99.
Personal Cashflow 2.1 costs Pounds 49 from Majengo Software Ltd, 3 Hatter's
Croft, Cockermouth, Cumbria CA13 9RJ. Tel. 0900-824-945. Fax 0900-828-532. A
demonstration disk is available.
Stockmarket 2 costs Pounds 49.95 from Meridian Software, Amberley House, The
Park, Sidcup, Kent, DA14 6AL. Tel. 081-309-5960.
Fairshares 6.5 costs Pounds 99 plus Pounds 10 for postage and packing from
JSL Software Ltd, Freepost 5 West Street, Epsom, Surrey KT18 7RL. Tel.
0372-741-969. Fax 0372 739883. Other versions of the program have more
features and cost more. A demonstration disk is available.
Write to Ivy Educational Publishing plc, Ivy House, 233/235 Roehampton Lane,
London SW15 4LB for a list of its computer-based financial courses. Tel.
081-780-1494. Fax 081-780-1420.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-379</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Cookery: How ideas sprout
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIPPA DAVENPORT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MOST COOKS have decided on, and ordered, their Christmas and New Year meats
by now. But what about the vegetables? In some households, roast potatoes,
chestnuts and Brussels sprouts are sacrosanct. Others think that roast
potatoes, if they are to be as crisp and crunchy as they should be, need a
higher oven temperature than will suit a goose or turkey. Besides, mashed
potatoes are much better than roast for sopping up good gravy.
Many consider roasting and peeling chestnuts too lengthy a task for
Christmas day - and frozen or canned chestnuts, although acceptable in
casseroles and puddings, are not good enough to partner the bird. As for the
sprouts, there are those who believe they are one of the worst things to
have come out of Brussels.
Here are some alternative vegetable suggestions for Christmas day and to
serve later with cold poultry or spiced beef, ham and tongue.
BRAISED FENNEL WITH WALNUTS
Trim 3lb fennel in the usual way. Cut each bulb into 6-8 wedges, slicing
vertically through the core to keep the wedges in good shape. Put them into
a shallow dish, buttered very thickly. Season, sprinkle with  1/2 teaspoon
or more crushed fennel seed, add a squeeze of lemon and dot with 1 1/2 oz
butter.
Bake at 375`F-400`F/190`C-200``C (gas mark 5-6) for 40-45 minutes, basting
the fennel at half-time. Then unveil the vegetables, baste again and cook
for 10 minutes more, adding a handful of chopped walnuts for the final five
minutes to toast the nuts nicely.
RED CABBAGE WITH PLUMS
Red cabbage is that rare and blessed thing: a vegetable dish that is almost
better re-heated than cooked freshly.
Grease a casserole with goose, duck or bacon fat or butter it well. Add
around 2 1/4 lb shredded red cabbage. Stone  1/4 lb prunes (no need to soak
them), chop them, and mix them into the cabbage together with 3 tablespoons
damson jam or jelly, 1 1/2 tablespoons red wine vinegar, some salt, pepper
and bruised caraway seed ( 1/2 -1 teaspoon depending on your fondness for
the spice). Cumin and coriander seed make good alternatives.
Cover tightly and cook at 300`F-330`F/150`C-170`C (gas mark 2-3 1/2 ) for 2
1/2 hours, stirring occasionally.
SALSIFY GRATIN
Scorzonera is equally suitable for this treatment and all the preparations
can be done ahead.
Choose long, thick roots with undamaged skins and a little stalk attached.
Scrub 1 1/2 lb of them and cook them whole in salted water until just tender
(10-20 minutes). Plunge in cold water to arrest cooking, peel, chop into
short lengths and lay the roots in a gratin dish with a scattering of
parsley. Pour over them a bechamel sauce made with 2 tablespoons each butter
and flour,  1/2 pt milk or stock,  1/4 pt thick cream and a seasoning of
pepper and grated Parmesan, or anchovy essence and lemon juice.
To re-heat for serving, slip the covered dish into an oven heated to
400`F/200`C (gas mark 6) for around 15 minutes until bubbling. Scatter with
toasted or fried crumbs just before bringing the dish to table.
CARROTS NIVERNAISE
Chop 2 large onions. Cook them in 1 1/2 oz butter until soft and beginning
to colour. Add 2 lb carrots which have been sliced, or cut into sticks and
blanched briefly in fast-boiling water. Stir to anoint the carrots with fat.
Pour on a little stock. Bring to the boil, add a pinch of sugar, cover and
simmer very gently, shaking the pan every now and then to encourage even
cooking.
When the carrots are cooked to your liking, add a knob of butter, a few
spoonfuls of chopped parsley, a little salt and some pepper. Turn up the
heat and drive off surplus liquid so that the carrots end up coated lightly
with a syrupy sauce.
CHICORY A LA CREME
Cut 1 1/2 lb chicory lengthways into quarters or one-sixths depending on the
girth of the chicons. Lay them in a shallow, buttered dish that will take
the whole lot in two layers, and sprinkle with a little sea salt and plenty
of pepper.
Pour on 7-8 fl oz thick cream and put the dish onto the bottom shelf of a
cold oven, placing on the shelf immediately above it some other foods to be
cooked or, failing that, a baking tray.
The idea is to allow some evaporation of the vegetable juices, yet to offer
some protection against a fierce downblast of heat from the roof of the
oven.
Turn the oven on to 375`F/190`C (gas mark 5) and bake for 60-70 minutes
until the chicory is tender, basting now and then. Stir a heaped teaspoon of
mustard into the creamy sauce and scatter an ounce or two of grated or
finely slivered St Paulin or Morbier cheese over the chicory.
Turn off the heat and return the dish to the oven for 5-10 minutes until the
cheese is molten. This rich dish goes well with cold roast turkey or ham.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-380</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Food and Drink: A pre-prandial pep talk - Jancis Robinson
knows how to impress a Frenchman
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANCIS ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SUPPOSE you had to entertain a top Frenchman to a meal, as an increasing
number of British readers of the Financial Times surely will next year. The
first thing you must do is dispense with any feelings of inferiority when it
comes to wine. Believe me, the average Frenchman knows next to nothing about
the subject, he just acts as though he does.
French wine producers of my acquaintance are unanimous in their admiration
of the British wine drinker. It was to Colchester, in Essex, for instance,
that the producer of the world's most expensive wine, Domaine de la
Romanee-Conti burgundy, came the other day to present 13 wines at an
unprecedented tasting and dinner for 180 Lay &amp; Wheeler customers (few of
them typical Essex Men, however). Such an event would be quite unthinkable
in France, he told me.
Chatelains, vignerons and recoltants alike agree that Britain is the
toughest market in the world, where consumers are assailed and therefore
educated by the best that the world's wine producers can offer them.
And it has long been so, with only a short post-war lull in imports to knock
our confidence in the nation's connoisseurship, before wine consumption
became a much more democratic habit. We have been major customers for the
world's wines since the early Middle Ages when only wool was traded more
than wine by English merchants.
Thanks to our expertise as vintners, and to England's increasingly
impressive domestic wine industry, it would be perfectly possible to wine
(and of course dine) a visiting Frenchman in an entirely British fashion -
and impress him to boot.
Malt WHISKY is the obvious trump card, and you could choose to play it first
and/or last. As the aperitif the French regard as most chic of all, 'un
malt' could tactfully be offered first of all so as to meet your French
guest halfway - in a cross-channel duty-free shop, as it were. Oddbins have
some particularly special ones but your Frenchman would probably be thrilled
by any malt (although avoid Aberlour; it's owned by Pernod Ricard).
My own inclination would be to hit him between the eyeballs with the
razor-sharp tang of a good SHERRY, a wine designed since the 14th century
for the English. This ancient Andalucian fortified wine is known in France,
just, as xeres, but the only place I have ever encountered a bottle of
decent quality on French soil is at the Parisian wine bar Juveniles - run by
expatriate Brits. (Tio Pepe, incidentally, is one of the few wines it makes
sense to buy at duty free on the way to France.)
It might be wiser, however, to lull your French guest initially with the
Scots' great gift to the world before offering him a light, dry manzanilla
or fino with a fishy first course. But if it is smoked salmon, which it
probably should be as ours is so much better than that commonly available in
France, sherry somehow will not do.
This is the moment to play the joker, a fruity but seeringly crisp ENGLISH
WINE - preferably made from the hybrid grape Seyval Blanc that EC (for which
read French) authorities will not allow as capable of producing the
carelessly named 'quality wine'. Breaky Bottom's (Pounds 6.95 from The
Hermitage, London N10 081-365-2122) made near Glyndebourne by the son of a
Frenchwoman, should demonstrate otherwise.
When it comes to a red wine, you could seek out a mutually flattering old
BRITISH-BOTTLED example of a fine French wine (at The Butlers Wine Cellar of
Brighton 0273-698724, Reid Wines of Hallatrow near Bristol 0761-52645 or La
Vigneronne of London SW7 071-589-6113) but there is one more obvious choice.
CHATEAU LATOUR, the world-famous Bordeaux first-growth is, as I write
anyway, owned by the British in the somewhat corpulent form of Allied-Lyons.
What a compliment to both host and guest]
The only snag of course is that a wine as good as this is expensive, and
difficult to buy by the single bottle. More modestly priced, much faster
maturing and almost identically labelled (if you get my meaning) is Latour's
'second wine', LES FORTS DE LATOUR, another extremely well-regarded claret.
Vintages to drink now are the ripely scented 1985 (Pounds 19.75 Waitrose,
Pounds 19.80 Harveys of Bristol 0272-268882, but Pounds 26.49 top Tesco
stores), perfectly respectable 1984 (Pounds 11.95 Harveys), gorgeously rich
and youthful 1982 (Pounds 20.91 Harveys), aromatic 1978 (Pounds 25.30
Harveys, Pounds 27.50 Oddbins) or even the beautifully mature 1970 (Pounds
39.38 a bottle, Pounds 80.10 a magnum from Harveys) - but this last would
probably confirm the French national conviction that we Brits are wine
necrophiliacs.
If, however, after a bottle of Les Forts, your guest does not feel like
giving you a million pound order/relocating to your new town/slashing 15 per
cent off his selling price, then you may have to play the heavweight card of
VINTAGE PORT. The French import vast quantities of 'porto', more even than
we do, and yet most of it is light, young ruby of the sort you would not
dream of offering a guest of any nationality.
'Le vint-age' is at long last becoming a bit of a cult among French wine
connoisseurs, however, so you could profitably offer your guest a bottle of
good vintage port, just so long as you choose one of the many that sport
good, solid British names. Graham, Taylor, Smith Woodhouse come to mind, as
does the newest port shipper Churchil Graham - a name to resonate in French
ears, I would have thought.
And when he drools over this magic wine, quite unparalleled by anything
produced in France, make sure you tell him that port was devised by and is
known as 'the Englishman's wine'. Rather like bordeaux, really.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-381</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Property: Notable sales disguise a lean year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL HANSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALTHOUGH most estate agents agree that we are at the bottom of the
recession, the overhang of unsold properties means prices are unlikely to
soar next year, although some could rise as buyers compete for better
properties.
'It has been as difficult a year as I can remember, with very few buyers
around,' says James Laing of Strutt &amp; Parker.
In spite of this, Laing was involved in two of the most notable sales of the
year, both in Hampshire: the 2,000-acre Conholt Park estate, for which the
Dutch businessman Paul van Vlissingen paid Pounds 5.7m, and the 1,850-acre
West Tisted Manor estate, bought for more than Pounds 5m by a local family.
In spite of the Conservative election victory, it took Britain's departure
from the exchange rate mechanism to draw foreign buyers back to Britain, as
was demonstrated by three recent sales by Knight Frank &amp; Rutley. The
406-acre Sarsden House estate in Oxfordshire was sold to Mercedes-Benz heir
Mick Flick for more than Pounds 5m.
Grove House, a Nash villa in Regent's Park exquisitely restored by the
Australian businessman, the late Robert Holmes a Court, was sold for about
Pounds 12m to the Sultan of Oman.
Aberconway House in Mayfair, which failed to sell for Pounds 12.5m as
offices two years ago, was bought by the Emir of Qatar for about Pounds 5m.
'I think we are at the bottom of the recession,' says Patrick Ramsay, of
Knight Frank &amp; Rutley. 'I am optimistic about the market next year. There is
no good financial reason for potential purchasers to wait any longer.'
Geoffrey van Cutsem, of Savills, adds: 'The only way is up, but it will be a
desperately slow recovery. If anything, prices are too low now, and we may
see some gazumping as buyers who have been sitting on the sidelines decide
to come back into the market.'
This year, properties on the market frequently had only one serious bidder,
but when Humberts sold Knoyle Place, at East Knoyle, Wiltshire, this summer
six people were willing to pay more than the asking price of Pounds 1m.  The
18th century house incorporates a 17th-century rectory in which Christopher
Wren spent the first three years of his life. A sale was concluded at about
Pounds 1.2m.
That was also the price paid for the Lycett-Green's 200-acre Manor Farm at
Huish, on the edge of the Wiltshire Downs. When Savills put this property on
the market in September, inviting offers of more than Pounds 1m, it
attracted seven serious bidders who were invited to a private auction.
The only stately home sold this year was Brympton d'Evercy, the Grade I
listed Tudor house near Yeovil, Somerset, which had been in Charles
Clive-Ponsonby-Fane's family since 1731. Realistically priced when it was
placed on the market in June with 25 acres, it attracted considerable
interest and was sold for more than Pounds 850,000.
As the year draws to an end, Strutt &amp; Parker is expecting to announce the
sale of the late Jim Joel's Childwick Bury Stud in Hertfordshire and the
historic Herstmonceaux Castle estate in Sussex, where it is acting for the
receivers of James Developments.
Savills expects to announce thesale of Chandlings Manor, an Oxfordshire
farmhouse extended at a cost of several millions by a Lebanese businessman,
Farid Wakim, who has since died, into a property that Leisure Investments
had agreed to buy for Pounds 5.4m when it went into liquidation in 1990.
Sold by the receivers in 1991 for Pounds 2.5m, it came back on the market
three months ago priced at Pounds 1.95m.
A sale appropriate for the season was made by Viscount Esher, former
president of the Royal Institute of British Architects. He sold Christmas
Common Tower, the four-storey house he built 25 years ago in Old Deer Park,
Watlington, Oxfordshire, for Pounds 350,000 through Knight Frank &amp; Rutley
and Hamptons. It had been on the market for about six months.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-382</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Property: Black Wednesday still casts a long shadow - John
Authers finds the industry unconvinced that a recent burst of activity
represents an upturn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NOT FOR the first time in the past three years, there is a feeling abroad
that the UK's doom-laden residential property market may at last have
turned. But as with so much else in 1992, Black Wednesday and its effect on
confidence continue to cast a long shadow.
Belief in imminent recovery is by no means irrational - it is founded on
secure logical tenets of economics. But unfortunately some fundamental
economic tenets have been turned on their head in the past few years.
A consortium of life insurance companies that joined forces with the Henley
Forecasting Centre last year to model the housing market proved this all too
conclusively. It took all factors, such as unemployment, house prices,
interest rates and demographics into account and was back-tested to show
that it could successfully predict house prices for all periods from 1960.
But the model has consistently predicted a rise in house prices for the past
24 months, and instead they have fallen steadily.
According to David Badcock, of GA Life, a new factor must have emerged. He
believes this is that infuriatingly insubstantial concept, 'confidence'.
People who once would have been sufficiently happy with their finances to
buy, are now too scared to do so.
Away from the broader macroeconomic models, the housing market is so diverse
that it is possible for anyone to find evidence for any theory.
So why the optimism? Some of the buoyant emotions of the past few weeks come
from a sudden resurgence in activity and transactions. Abbey National
reported that it had done more gross lending in December, traditionally a
bad month for house-buying, than in the usual peak month of August. December
was heaviest in special fixed-rate deals, which are more popular than ever.
Estate agents also reported a sudden pick-up in deals in the last two weeks
of November and the first two weeks of December. Woolwich Property Services,
an estate agency based predominantly in London and the South-East, enjoyed
its highest volume of business for three years during this period while GA
Property Services saw a 35 per cent increase in transactions on its usual
figure for the period.
Norman Lamont's autumn statement also injected life into the market by
providing housing associations with extra cash to buy repossessed
properties. This has stimulated private developers into action and Barnard
Marcus, the auctioneers, reports that prices on auctioned London properties
are beginning to increase. Repossession prices may, therefore, have bottomed
out.
The first swallows of spring? Senior figures within the housing industry
remain unconvinced. Adrian Coles, of the Council of Mortgage Lenders, says:
'I'm not putting any weight on it yet. Mortgage lending will show a very
slight increase, but it's still not back to where it was.'
Michael Goodsell, of Royal Estates, reports that optimism is appearing at
the grass roots of his estate agents' offices. 'I suppose they have to be
optimistic because that's in the nature of their job. Let's hope it's
justified.'
The recent pick-up in activity does not yet outweigh the sharp downturn in
activity following Black Wednesday, when the UK left the exchange rate
mechanism and base rates briefly reached 15 per cent. This had a devastating
effect on confidence and Goodsell reports that sales levels dropped 35 per
cent in the following weeks - at a time when they might normally have been
expected to stay buoyant.
Many would-be buyers simply pulled the plug on well-advanced deals and the
current upswing may be caused by these deals going through at last.
But so many second-time buyers have been withholding their property from the
market as prices fall and so many potential first-time buyers have been
sheltering in rented accommodation that everyone seems confident the market
will speed up next year.
Precise estimates vary. Martin Ellis of the Woolwich building society is
predicting a rise of 12 per cent in transactions for next year, while John
Wriglesworth, housing market analyst for UBS Phillips &amp; Drew, expects a rise
of 15 per cent. Derek Taylor, of Halifax Property Services, is expecting a
rise of 10 per cent, but points out that this is no reason for celebration,
given this year's fall of 15 per cent.
A pick-up in demand for houses such as this would normally stimulate prices.
But the UK's over-supply of property lies at the heart of disagreement over
the course prices will take.
Wriglesworth is predicting 'more pain before gain', and expects the overhang
of supply to mean another 5 per cent fall in house prices before a modest
recovery at the end of next year.
A more common view, however, is that cheap mortgages and the changed cost of
renting versus buying should be enough to keep the market stable for the
next 12 months, with a possible slight recovery in nominal house prices at
the end of the year.
Few expect house prices to outstrip inflation, so in real terms most
analysts believe houses will become slightly cheaper over the next year.
Coles is more optimistic than most and points out that statistics are not
available to show how much of the supply overhang is on the market already
and how much is being rented. For example, he suspects that much of the
overhang from inherited houses is being rented. Coles believes Wriglesworth
may therefore have overestimated the effect that the supply overhang will
have on the market.
Affordability is the point sustaining the optimists. As house prices and
mortgage rates fall while average earnings rise, so the argument goes, a
house becomes easier to afford. This has traditionally been regarded as the
crucial factor driving the property market - and houses had become extremely
expensive by 1990.
But affordability had already returned to a level in line with the historic
trend by September. Black Wednesday, followed by a fall of 3 percentage
points in base rates should have seen the market take off. Instead, house
prices fell by around 3 per cent, according to the indices published by the
Halifax and Nationwide building societies.
The damage Black Wednesday inflicted on confidence was even greater than the
good it did for housing affordability. A serious recovery in prices must
await a recovery in the confidence in the management of the UK economy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-383</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Sport: What is the Italian for silly mid-on? - Cricket
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERESA MCLEAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'HAIL Cricket] glorious, manly, British game] First of all Sports] be first
alike in fame] . . .' The opening lines of James Love's epic poem about
Kent's defeat of All England in a cricket match in 1744. The poem extends to
more than 300 lines, not one tarnished by the thought that the 'First of all
Sports' might one day be played in foreign pastures such as continental
Europe. Love would have been chastened to hear of cricket being played from
Scandinavia to Greece, from Portugal to Albania.
European cricket is a minor sport which is, in the words of Italian
cricket's ambassador in England, Ian Massey, 'short on skill but big on
spirit.' Its two most obvious turns of spirit are the wild, passionate,
romantic one, in countries such as Italy and Greece, and the cool, calm one,
in countries such as Denmark and the Netherlands.
Often players are most strongly united in their mood of play when faced with
the most alien opposition, as was shown in a recent game between a Greek and
an English team. Greek cricket is pretty well limited to Corfu, where it was
introduced by British sailors in the 19th. century. There is only one
cricket ground in Corfu, fringed with cafes. There are four teams, unique
among European cricket teams in being entirely home-grown. Byron,
Gymnasticos, Phaex and Ergaticos use only Corfiot players, all of them
tremendous hitters.
In September 1991, Ergaticos were playing a Combined XI of Bethlehem Royal
Hospital and Pinner Victorians. When they found they had only ten players, a
tiny man of 67 called Lakis Kosteletos, a leading figure of Corfiot cricket,
was persuaded to come out of retirement and have a go at the Anglo-Saxons.
With his team's score at 70, Kosteletos was the seventh to be out, sat down
by the scorer, collapsed and died.
In the Netherlands and Denmark the climate is cooler. The Dutch have played
cricket for a long time, the standard is high and there is a well organised
league system. One only has to look at this year's Somerset squad to see how
efficiently the Dutch encourage young players. Adrianus van Troost,
Taunton's new, occasional, huge, fast bowler was born in the Dutch gin town
of Schiedam 20 years ago and spotted for Somerset two years ago by Jack
Birkenshaw, then Somerset's manager, in a youth cricket tournament at Radley
College. He made his county debut in 1991, the year Taunton's other
Dutchman, Roland Phillipe Lefebvre, from Rotterdam, won his county cap and
his sizzling nick-names: Tulip and Clogsy.
The North Sea end of European cricket is not glamorous. Nor does it seek to
be. One would be unwise to pursue a silky image when one's National Cricket
Association has an AGM called the Dansk Cricket Forbunds
Repraesentantskabsmodet. The Danes take their cricket seriously. Last year
the AGM spent cold, December days in Jutland organising Denmark's cricket
into 'talent centres', to coach talented cricketers and teach talented
coaches.
In Germany, cricket is deeply unsure of itself. The game's negative points
are that it is whimsical and eccentric, the result is unpredictable,
whatever the state of play, and the whole thing started in England. Its
great positive point is that it has a delicious and ever-growing abundance
of rules. Anything with lots of rules is, says Rolf Schwiete, chairman of
the Deutsche Cricket Bund, 'ideally suited to the German temperament.'
This was confirmed by Alf and George Powley, identical twins, overseas
training and liaison officers for the Association of Cricket Umpires. They
have umpired on many cricket expeditions - six to Italy, two to France and
one each to Germany, Luxembourg, Austria, Belgium and Israel.
In Germany, the Powleys gave one of their umpiring seminars, which was
gratifyingly well attended. Everyone understood English, give or take the
odd beamer and bouncer. Everyone lapped up cricket's rules. Everyone wanted
to do umpiring exams. 'We Germans love examinations,' chuckled one
candidate, setting himself loose on his question paper.
Evidently the written answer suits Germans better than the field of play.
Native German cricketers are few on the ground, which last is a problem in
itself, looked after as it is by suspicious, often antipathetic German
groundsmen, cautious mowers to a man.
But German cricket's main problem is the one which is the scourge of all
European cricket: its tendency to be dominated by ex-patriots, from Britain
and, increasingly, from India, Pakistan and Sri Lanka. Cricket has been
popular for years with the British forces in Germany, but few young Germans
are interested in it.
There was not one German in the German team that won this summer's European
Cricketer Cup, sponsored by The European and organised by The Cricketer. (In
conjunction with MCC). Germany won because their batting was too strong for
the other teams: Austria, Switzerland, France, Italy, Malta, Belgium,
Greece, Spain and Portugal.
Germany's opener, Aamer Jung, nephew of the magnificent Nawab of Pataudi,
demolished France in the final with his 99. His fellow opener, Gary Stevens,
one-time bastion of Surrey's Malden Wanderers, was quieter. The team
included a fast bowler from Barbados, eligible for Germany because he served
in the US airforce on the Rhine for three years; a battery of Asians working
in Germany and the captain, a biologist from Sydney. One supporter of Italy,
whose team always has at least seven Italian players, said with battered
pride after watching his team lose all four of their Cup matches that he
would rather see them lose with honour than win without any Italians.
This year's European Cup was played at Worksop College last July. According
to one cricket journalist, 'Although the competition was quite bonkers for
its structure, ten teams playing only four games out of seven and no-one
knowing how the matches were picked or located, this was a joyous week of
cricket.'
There was sunshine over north Nottinghamshire and European flags were
flying. The adverts in the programme included one for 'French Cricket au
Difference'. There is a whiff of panache about French cricket. In the south
it is a social game for English on the Dordogne. In Paris it is a university
and Asian game, with Pakistani, Sri Lankan and Tamil teams. In the north it
is Largely a French game.
At Chauny, in north-east France, the local paper gave a willing but
uncertain report of an umpiring weekend at Victor Hugo College, in October
1990 by 'Half et Georges Powley, anciens arbitres internationaux.' The
French captain, Simon Hewitt, who has a French grand-mother and an Oxford
blue and plays for the Paris Universities Club, translated the Powleys'
seminar into the grandiose French which distinguishes cross-channel cricket.
One does not break the wicket in France; one achieves 'la destruction totale
du wicket.' At the same time, some phrases capture the game's finesse. To
spin bowl in French is 'donner de l'effet a la balle.' Perfect.
Simone Gambino, founder-president of the Italian Cricket Association and the
European Cricket Federation, makes mammoth efforts on behalf of cricket.
This noble character is at once the driving force and the Attila the Hun of
Italian cricket, sweeping all opposition before him. He wages a constant
battle in search of the cricketing balance between Italian passion, with its
night-time, floodlit cricket, batsman making huge swipes at every ball, and
English reticence, with its afternoon tea and Test Match Special.
The answer, it seems, is style. 'You always get the glitterati attached to
Italian cricket,' said the Powleys. 'In Italy, cricket is fashionable.'
Italian papers cannot get enough of Italy's tiny quota of impeccably dressed
cricket teams, leaning on their bats, driving the ball past mezzo-accesso
stupido (silly mid-on) and doffing their caps to the umpires (30 per cent of
Italian umpires are female) when given out. Appeals are operatic, with much
rolling about on the ground and howling to the full moon. Fielding is keen.
Batting is whole-hearted, across the line. Bowling is ambitious, appalling,
wide. A slow delivery would be as ignoble as leaving a wide unhit; wides are
all chased, however far, to be hit for six.
A recent hero of Italian cricket, Manlio De Amicis of Lazio, was described
by an Italian commentator in 1988 as 'el gladiatore' of Italian cricket.
That is the style the public like. Italians find one-day cricket a bit long.
They like it to be short, sharp and swashbuckling, as with the gladiator's 2
for 35 against the Pizza Express team in Brentwood. What matters is that he
came to England on tour. There are only about 20 Italian clubs and their
cricket is bad, but they are starting to play further afield and get more
experience. Gambino has managed to find sponsors for Italian cricket. He
helped make a Cricket World Cup broadcast to Italy and persuaded Martin
Crowe to spend two months as Italy's national coach last summer. Everything
is unlikely. Anything is possible. Anywhere in Europe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-384</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Sport: Taking the risk out of victory - Sport Insurance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEITH WHEATLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DO NOT be surprised to read in the near future about a generous sponsor
offering the England soccer team a multi-million pound bonus for winning the
1994 World Cup. The only thing remaining to be settled is the exact cost of
the benefactor's premium on the insured risk of having to pay out on such a
surprise victory.
'We have already quoted on this one,' agreed Mark Chapman, one of four
directors of Tyser Special Risks. All over international professional sport
huge bonuses are beginning to replace enormous fees and retainers. The
reason is simple. Sponsors can insure against the possibility of a pay-out
(however large) but not the certainty of a salary.
Racing driver Nelson Piquet drove in Formula One without a salary -
preferring instead to be given a bonus per Grand Prix point by sponsors
Bennetton. They in turn, said Tyser, were almost certainly insured in the
Lloyds market for whatever they eventually paid the Brazilian driver.
This subject is one that many sports fans find slightly dubious, without
being able quite to explain why. Perhaps it is the notion that one normally
insures against calamities rather than the attainment of ambitions.
Certainly soccer teams prefer to keep quiet about their policy of insuring
against a promotion they have fought for all season. Financially such a
tactic makes sense for them because reaching the Premier League, say, can
cost a fortune in mandatory ground improvements and staff expansion.
Millwall Football Club covered the expenses of their promotion with such a
policy. Stockport's hapless chairman admitted the existence of a similar
policy - which was promptly cancelled by the underwriter as a breach of the
confidentiality clause.
At its most sophisticated this strategy enables small companies to compete
with the big boys. How, for example, did the tiny shoe company ASICS manage
to compete with the likes of Reebok and Nike, the latter paying athletes
tens of millions of dollars to employ its footwear? Insuring at Lloyds is
the answer.
'The only way to get successful in that game is to put your shoes on
well-known feet,' said Chapman's colleague Richard Woods. Leroy Burrell, Liz
McColgan and Olympic gold-medal hurdler Kevin Young have all worn ASICS.
Each will have a personal schedule of bonuses to be paid out if certain
targets ranging from world records to medals are achieved.
Golf is another sport for contract bonus / prize indemnity, as it is known
in the London insurance business. Want to promise Nick Faldo a squillion
dollars for wearing your sweaters and winning two Majors in 1993? Tyser will
quote you a rate - after enough research.
'We study form and then quote the odds essentially. Everything from the
player's past statistics to the state of his marriage is relevant. The
difference between laying off the risk with a bookmaker and insuring is that
a betting slip is not acceptable to the company auditors,' said Chapman.
Some sports risks relate not to the performance of a well-known professional
but to the achievement of an against-all-odds target by an amateur. A
hole-in-one is the classic example. Recently a competitor at a pro-am in the
US won an uninsured Dollars 1m prize for potting his tee-shot at a par
three. It sent shudders round every promoter and did wonders for Tyser.
But Chapman and company will not just write a policy based on actuarial
averages for that hole. Sometimes they will want to walk the course, feel
the green. The phenomenon of the 'bowl green' is not unknown where the ball
travels down towards a hold cut at the exact centre of a shallow depression.
Promoters of angling contests in the US sometimes offer huge cash prizes for
fish that break a world weight record. They provide a 'moral hazard',
according to Woods. Before Tyser will authorise a pay-out it demands that
the fisherman take a polygraph test and that the fish be gutted before
expert witnesses. They sometimes turn out to have had an extraordinary
appetite for lead shot.
Almost the only sport untouched by Tyser and its competitors is the noble
art. 'Boxing? That's not one for us thank you,' said Chapman. 'Definitely a
major moral hazard.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-385</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Motoring: Adieu to glorious relic of a vanished France -
Production of the Renault 4 is ending. Stuart Marshall mourns the passing of
an old friend
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STUART MARSHALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS WHAT the French mean by fin de siecle. Citroen knocked the 2CV deux
chevaux on the head a couple of years ago. Now, it is the Renault 4's turn
to enter motoring history.
The France for which they were created, and in which they multiplied, has
almost gone, too. It was a country that seemed to be populated by peasant
farmers needing cheap, utilitarian cars that would not break when overloaded
cruelly and driven hard on dreadful roads.
A France, in fact, with an ambience which used to be termed 'the three Gs' -
garlic, Gauloises (or Gitanes) and the gents. On driving off the ferry, they
were all present.
Happily, the aroma of garlic still perfumes the kind of restaurants I
patronise, but the pungent pong of caporal tobacco has gone. And a
revolution in plumbing technology has been sanitising and deodorising the
traditional gamey, gurgling French loo. Even modest hotels now have gleaming
bathrooms with fittings so high-tech that a degree in physics is helpful in
making the shower work.
And what about the bidet? When the deux chevaux and quatr'elle (shorthand
for Renault 4, because it was first known as the 4L) were created, even the
cheapest French hotel room had a bidet. Many British visitors wondered what
they were used for. One innocently asked a French woman if it was for
washing the baby in. 'Mais non]' she replied. 'It is for washing the baby
out]'
Now the bidet, too, is disappearing from hotels. Changing attitudes to
contraception - and cost-cutting accountants - are to blame.
But back to the Renault 4. We had two of them in the 1960s and early '70s.
They were ungainly and tinny, extraordinarily comfortable, and cost next to
nothing to run. In nine years, neither ever failed at the roadside, although
I had to drive one home clutchless after the cable broke.
They crossed fields, forded streams, took us to France on holidays and
carried absurd cargoes - like the chesterfield sofa we brought home from an
auction. It squeezed through the 4's immense tailgate opening but overhung
the load floor, making the car look like a pike trying to swallow a carp of
twice its weight. To appreciate fully the 4's carrying capacity, just try
putting a sofa in a trendy modern estate car.
Our first one was an early import, with a three-speed gearbox and six-volt
electrics. It cost me about Pounds 500 new in 1964. We parked it at Heathrow
for a fortnight one bitter winter. When we got back, the rubber door seals
had frozen to the body, but I managed to get in by forcing the tailgate
open. It started instantly.
As we drove off, grander people on the same flight were calling for jump
leads to start frost bound Granadas and Jaguars.
Renault 4s rolled on corners like flat-bottomed boats in a beam sea, but
they got round somehow and never fell over. Hurrying to catch a boat in my
second R4, I saw the needle of the semi-circular speedometer disappear from
sight at a clamorous 75 mph (120 kmh) - I was, of course, going downhill. At
80 mph (130 kmh), the effect was remarkable. It was as if I had entered the
eye of a typhoon. All the noise just stopped and I still don't know where it
went.
The push-pull gear lever jutting from the fascia frightened off many
potential British buyers but was simplicity itself to use. And it allowed
the driver to slide across easily to step straight out on the footpath. The
seats were the kind one sank into, softly. There was enough head-room to
drive wearing a bowler hat.
Friends bought Renault 4s on my recommendation. A Sussex farmer replaced his
aged Land Rover with one. He filled it with sheep and straw, horse nuts and
bits of broken-down machinery and reckoned it was the best car he ever had.
It looked like a mobile midden and died ignobly when a drunken employee
smashed it into a stone barn. The farmer, of course, bought another.
The Renault 4 still lives on in one or two Francophone third world
countries, but failure to meet crash safety and emission laws sealed its
fate in Europe.
What will replace it? Years ago, Renault thought it would be succeeded by
the slightly bigger but basically similar R6, just as Citroen thought its
Dyane would take over from the deux chevaux. Both R4 and 2CV outlived the
upstarts.
Perhaps the Renault Twingo, sensation of the recent Paris motor show, will
take up the banner of cheap and practical motoring carried by the Renault 4
for 30 years. The Twingo, a brilliantly original one-box baby car, has a
hint of the Renault Espace's shape. It goes on sale in France next March.
At first, Renault said the Twingo would never be made with right-hand drive;
but so rapturous was its reception that top management is, by all accounts,
having second thoughts. Thousands of Britons will not forgive Renault if
they do not get the chance to buy the cleverest small car to appear in
years. I hope someone is listening over there in Paris.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-386</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Television and Radio: Music, movies, many happy reruns -
Christopher Dunkley picks the plums over four days of holiday viewing and
listening
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CHRISTMAS EVE
IF YOU took away all the music and movies, the airwaves would remain
virtually silent for much of the Christmas period. The pick of today's
movies begins (or for many readers, no doubt, began) at 9.30 this morning
with the first and one of the best musicals made by the Fred Astaire /
Ginger Rogers team, Flying Down To Rio (BBC2). Fans of the partnership who
have already missed this absurdly early offering can take heart since more
of their films are spread through the holiday. Most are screened even
earlier in the morning, so it looks like a job for the video recorder.
The music begins in earnest after lunch at 1.05 when Radio 3 offers a 1970
recording of Beethoven's only opera, Fidelio. The late Leonard Bernstein
conducted the Vienna Philharmonic and Vienna State Opera Chorus with a
starry cast: Gwyneth Jones as Leonore, Walter Berry as Don Pizzaro, Lucia
Popp as Marzeline and James King as Florestan.
If you prefer modern dance and have the afternoon free, BBC2 screens Alvin
Ailey American Dance Theatre at 2.50 with the famous American company
performing Ailey's own ballet 'Memoria'.
For many, the day's most important broadcasting fixture is the Festival Of
Nine Lessons And Carols from King's College Chapel which begins at 3.00 on
Radio 4. This has a comparatively high proportion of modern and foreign
songs. Another version on BBC2 at 6.15 is more traditional with 'The Holly
And The Ivy', 'Silent Night', and 'Oh Little Town Of Bethlehem'.
The day's most unusual music and dance programme promises to be Everybody
Dance Now (8.00 C4) which looks to the pop video as the chief source of
popular contemporary dance once provided by the Hollywood musical. Exponents
seen in the programme include Madonna, Michael Jackson, Paula Abdul and M C
Hammer. ITV provides a Midnight Service from Ely Cathedral (11.50).
Other notable movies include Sea Of Love (9.45 BBC1), a 1989 mixture of
police thriller and steamy romance which is getting its first showing on
terrestrial television. Al Pacino plays the detective and Ellen Barkin is
the suspect with whom he begins a passionate affair. Dear old Auntie BBC has
censored the language.
Women On The Verge Of A Nervous Breakdown is also having its first
terrestrial airing. This was made in 1988 by the biggest name in Spanish
cinema since Bunuel: Pedro Almodovar, darling of the film festivals. His
work is sexy, funny, eccentric, stylish and brilliantly coloured.
The best of the oldies is Arsenic And Old Lace (12.35 BBC1), Frank Capra's
hilarious wartime adaptation of a popular stage farce with Cary Grant
playing the man whose aunts take to poisoning.
There are just three non-musical programmes I want to catch. First, Fanny
And The Plastic Saints (5.30 pm Radio 4) because Piers Plowright's radio
documentaries are very special; this one is about actress Fanny Carby who
had a part-time job 50 years ago painting and gold-leafing saints and
martyrs. She now goes in search of them.
Second, BBC2's account of the 1992 re-run by vintage cars of the 1955 Mille
Miglia race, How About A Lift Old Boy? (7.30 pm BBC2) because Ian Wooldridge
who navigates for Stirling Moss is a particularly good and funny reporter.
Third, Harry Enfield's Festive Television Programme because the ghastly disc
jockeys, Smashie and Nicey, are two of the funniest characters on television
(9.20 pm BBC2).
CHRISTMAS DAY
THE PICK of the day on Christmas Day is the Queen's Speech: 9 am Radio 4, 10
am Radio 5, 11 am Radio 2, 1 pm Radio 1, 3 pm Radio 4, BBC1 and ITV 6.25 pm
and 8.30 pm BBC2 and C4 (both have sub-titles &amp; sign language).
You will also be well served if you like music - especially religious music
 -and movies - especially old ones. The first notable offering comes bright
early at 7.30 in the morning when BBC2 shows Rio Bravo, a Western which,
although slow and predictable, is peculiarly enjoyable. John Wayne plays a
sheriff determined to hold a prisoner, although he has only a drunk (Dean
Martin), a boy (Vicky Nelson) and a one-legged veteran (Walter Brennan) to
help him.
The best thing to do this morning is steal enough time for a leisurely bath
and listen to either Down Your Ear (10.30) or Desert Island Discs (11.00)
both on Radio 4. The first is a recycling of the events of 1992 by Armando
Ianucci who has been responsible for some of the funniest of recent radio
programmes, notably 'On The Hour'. In the second - an extended edition - the
castaway is the Cambridge physicist Stephen Hawking.
If the middle of your day is free you can watch, and more to the point
listen to, a repeat of The Messiah on C4 starting at 11.30. This was a
performance in Dublin marking the 250th anniversary of its first performance
in that city in April 1742. An impressive list of soloists includes Sylvia
McNair and Anne Sofie von Otter. That goes on until 1.55.
Instead you could listen to Radio 2 at 1.00 for Comedy Hour which begins
with a repeat of a 1958 Christmas edition of 'Take It From Here' devoted
entirely to The Glums. While playing sardines, Ron gets locked in the
cupboard under the stairs with the buxom barmaid fancied by Mr Glum . . .
For anyone who has still never seen it, or those of us wanting to watch for
the 27th time, at 1.15 BBC2 again shows Top Hat, just about the best musical
ever made by Astaire and Rogers. The numbers include 'Isn't This A Lovely
Day', 'Cheek To Cheek' and 'White Tie And Tails' and the dance sequences are
among the best ever to come out of Hollywood. Of course the story is
ludicrous, but that is part of the charm of the thing. The supporting cast
is splendid, especially Eric Blore.
Otherwise the most tempting movies of the day are Dangerous Liaisons (9 pm
BBC2), the cinema version of Christopher Hampton's hugely successful
dramatisation of the epistolary novel by Laclos in which aristocratic French
lovers plot the seduction of a young woman. This is the first showing on
terrestrial television, as is the screening of Shirley Valentine on BBC1
(9.50). This is another filmed version of a stage play, but a far more
sentimental one. Pauline Collins plays the uncherished suburban wife who
finds fulfilment in a Greek holiday romance. Tom Conti plays the Greek.
The most interesting of television's own programmes (there are far fewer
than on a normal day) may well include Saint Mugg: The Making Of A TV Saint
(7 pm C4). This considers the transformation of Malcolm Muggeridge from wit
and humorist in middle life to religious zealot and crashing bore in old
age.
Centre of BBC1's evening, and therefore candidate for one of the largest
audiences of the year, is Victoria Wood's All Day Breakfast (9 pm). Where
her contemporaries tend to be described as 'among the top female performers
on television,' Wood is so good that her sex does not have to be taken into
account. She is simply one of the funniest and most talented people on
television.
BOXING DAY
CONSIDERING the well known availability of the audience on Boxing Day, this
year's schedules look surprisingly ordinary, even lacklustre, some may
think. One reason, presumably, is that, as the years have passed,
broadcasters have learnt that Christmas editions of their own normal
programmes win ratings at least as big as those for expensive galas or new
movies. Hence the succession of familiar titles on ITV and BBC1 early in the
evening.
Also, fewer special music offerings are on offer than you might expect; just
two of note. The Mikado (7.30 BBC2) is the new D'Oyly Carte production,
marking the 150th anniversary of the birth of Arthur Sullivan, recorded at
the Buxton Opera House under conductor John Owen Edwards. Since the
copyright lapsed, there have been several modern and unconventional
productions of Gilbert &amp; Sullivan operas, but the D'Oyly Carte company
sticks pretty much to the established Savoy Theatre traditions. Deryck Hamon
sings the Mikado, Jill Pert is Katisha, and Julian Jensen plays Nanki-Poo.
Altogether darker and more serious is Channel 4's main programme of the
evening: Salome (8.10). This is the Peter Hall production of the Richard
Strauss opera, mounted at Covent Garden with Edward Downes conducting. The
title role is taken by Maria Ewing who was formerly married to Hall. Ewing,
happily, is a good example of the modern requirement that sopranos playing
seductively gorgeous man-killers should no longer be allowed to weigh 18
stone and to waddle around the stage, but must actually look the part.
Watching Ewing in the dance of the seven veils you can well believe she
would achieve her purpose.
Of the 21 movies on offer from the four main networks, four seem worthy of
mention. The Sword In The Stone (3.15 ITV) made in 1963 is not one of
Disney's best cartoons, nor even among the best of the studio's modern
works, but it has never before been shown on terrestrial television. It is
adapted, of course, from T. H. White's splendid King Arthur story.
For those who have still not managed to catch it, BBC2 is repeating Claude
Berri's poignant two-part saga of French rural life beginning today with
Jean de Florette (4.35). The stars are Gerard Depardieu and Yves Montand.
'Manon des Sources' is screened tomorrow.
When Harry Met Sally (BBC1 10.05) is a modern American comedy romance
containing the famous scene where Meg Ryan proves in a crowded restaurant
that a woman can, indeed, realistically fake orgasm. And ITV is showing
Parts 1 and 2 of The Godfather starting today at 11.20 pm. This Mafia epic,
beginning with Marlon Brando as the head of the family and Al Pacino as his
heir, runs to a total of six and a quarter hours (and that is excluding the
inferior 'Godfather 3'). But it is much the best thing Coppola has ever
directed, the acting is outstanding, and the photography superb, so it is
worth the time.
For traditionalists there is Racing from Kempton Park (12.30 C4), and, for
skating fans, highlights of Torvill and Dean's ice spectacular in Simply The
Best (4.05 BBC1). Anyone who missed the most recent 'behind the scenes'
documentary about the Queen, Elizabeth R can see a repeat on BBC2 (2.45).
There are just two new television programmes which I particularly want to
catch. God On The Box (7.10 C4) sounds as though it might have been
specially made for television critics: it tells the story of the 'God Slot'
which began in the days of the 'toddlers' truce' when television
transmitters were switched off in the early evenings so that mothers could
put their children, un-tempted, to bed. This is about to end with the coming
of the new ultra-competitive ITV. Most of the programmes in this slot were,
as the makers of this programme admit, 'curdlingly sanctimonious'.
Bookmark (9.50 pm BBC2) promises Maureen Lipman as Enid Blyton in a
programme which mixes drama, animation and documentary. Blyton was one of
the earlist victims of political correctness, falling foul of librarians who
felt her work was much too middle class and enjoyable, and banned her books
because - they said - Noddy was a racist. Time for reinstatement.
CHRISTMAS SUNDAY
FOR ANYONE who takes an interest in television scheduling, the crucial
moment tonight occurs at 7.15 when BBC1 and ITV both finish a dose of what
passes for religion on television (jolly songs and fat men with sad smiles).
ITV then starts a two-hour Ruth Rendell Mystery Movie starring John Duttine
and Mel Martin, and BBC1 offers More Auntie's Bloomers with Terry Wogan
trying desperately to seem as funny as the out-takes - journalists' fluffs
and actors' pratfalls - he has to present.
That is followed at 8.05 on BBC1 by Miss Marple: The Mirror Crack'd with the
matchless Joan Hickson starring for the last time as Agatha Christie's
famous little old lady detective. Such a contest will inevitably split the
audience and destroy anybody's chances of record ratings. But my guess is
that, in spite of the big figures achieved by ITV with its 'Ruth Rendell'
productions in the past few years, the BBC's combination of out-takes and
Miss Marple will win hands down.
The notable movies mostly carry over from yesterday. Manon des Sources (4.25
BBC2) certainly can be watched as a self-contained piece of work, but the
story of water rights and the wild child growing up in a remote farming
region of Provence will be even more impressive if you saw 'Jean de
Florette' yesterday.
The Godfather II (11.30 pm ITV) is still more firmly hitched on to
yesterday's opening section of this gripping story of the New York Mafia and
its Sicilian connections.
Best movie offer of the day is BBC2's first terrestrial showing of the 1989
bittersweet comedy / romance The Fabulous Baker Boys (10 pm). Brothers Jeff
and Beau Bridges star as the drooping piano-bar entertainers who are
returned to tumescence by the arrival of an electrifying singer. Michelle
Pfeiffer plays Susie Diamond with such wonderful oomph that she won a Golden
Globe award and was nominated for an Oscar.
The two musical productions which look particularly interesting are both on
BBC2. In The Maestro And The Diva (3.25) Kiri Te Kanawa sings Richard
Strauss's Four Last Songs (which have become extraordinarily popular as
concert pieces in the past three or four years) with Georg Solti conducting
the BBC Philharmonic.
At 6.25 the channel offers La Cenerentola, an opera version of Cinderella
written by Rossini whose birth in 1792 we have been celebrating this year.
This production, directed by Michael Hampe for the Salzburg Festival, has
Riccardo Chailly conducting the Vienna State Opera Chorus and the Vienna
Philharmonic and the singers include Francisco Araiza, Walter Berry and Ann
Murray as Cinderella.
As ever, radio has some tempting programmes. Chris Wines has made what
promises to be a remarkable curio for Radio 4: 33 ypm which stands for '33
years per minute'. In one hour from 7 pm the programme undertakes to cover
2,000 years of history.
Radio 3's Hamlet (7.30) is a repeat of the Kenneth Branagh production with
himself in the title role, Derek Jacobi as Claudius, Judi Dench as Gertrude
and Richard Briers as Polonius.
Most compelling of all, since it is one of the earliest events I can
remember vividly, is David Perry's half hour on The London Smog Of 1952 (11
pm Radio 4).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-387</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Books: Arabia re-visited - Children's Book of the Month
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL GLOVER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ARABIAN NIGHTS
by Brian Alderson,
illustrated by Michael Foreman
Victor Gollancz Pounds 14.99, 192 pages
IT COULD be argued that the book known as The Arabian Nights, that
fascinating oriental patchwork of tales, jests and moral instances, is as
much a fabrication of the 18th century as Percy's Reliques or any of those
other attempts that were made during that century of so-called Enlightenment
to 'rescue from oblivion' collections of old ballads and the like.
In fact, the primary source for what came to be known as The Arabian Nights
was Antoine Galland's French translation of 1704, which led very quickly to
an English version. Galland had consulted a range of Arabian manuscripts but
these sources did not include versions of some of the most famous tales in
the collection, Aladdin and Ali Baba.
According to Brian Alderson, the historian of children's literature who has
produced this splendid new edition of the book, Galland heard these tales
from the mouth of a Maronite storyteller who happened to be wandering the
streets of Europe.
The fictional narrator Sheherazade was, of course, a woman of quite
awe-inspiring stamina when it came to telling stories - such are the lengths
to which a human being is prepared to go when threatened with decapitation -
and Alderson's offering of a mere 192 pages is less than 10 per cent of what
the most complete version might be. Earlier abridged editions of The Arabian
Nights often have left her out altogether because of the delays that must
occur inevitably when morning comes and the tale-telling is interrupted; but
the truth is that her presence is an enriching element, making certain tales
more poignant or more suspenseful.
What Alderson has sought to do in his rendering of the book is to re-create
the sense of exoticism that the idea of The Arabian Nights evokes in the
reader. So, he has resorted in his prose to what he himself describes
accurately as a 'richly upholstered Victorian' style, which serves his
purpose well. Not being an Arabic scholar, he has leant heavily upon both
Sir Richard Burton's great 16-volume Nights and Supplemental Nights of
1885-1888, so beloved of Somerset Maugham, and John Payne's translation,
also of the 19th century.
What is perhaps most interesting about The Arabian Nights is the extent to
which so many of the tales, fables and moral instances have found their way
into European folklore and fable. Motifs appear that find a parallel in
Grimm or Andersen. On one occasion - the delightful tale of a faithful
parrot that is embedded in a larger sequence entitled 'The Fisherman and the
Jinni' - the story finds an echo, according to Alderson, in a similar
anecdote recorded in England as late as 1914 when a parrot was called a liar
because it 'talked about the day it rained beans and bacon after the cook
had thrown the dinner at it.'
This is the oral tradition at work again, burrowing underground like a
colony of moles, moving in many directions at once. And no one is quite sure
where they will appear next.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-388</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Books: Altar-wise in hindsight
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICIA MORISON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE STRIPPING OF THE ALTARS
by Eamon Duffy Yale
University Press Pounds 29.95, 740pg
WHAT IF Queen Mary I - 'Bloody Mary' - had lived to be a septuagenarian like
her sister, Elizabeth, instead of dying at 42? Would there have been no King
James' Bible, no empty niches in our churches . . . and no women priests?
For some Anglicans, this is a more than usually poignant moment to be
asking: 'What if . . .' The conventional view, of course, is that the
English Reformation was unstoppable and Mary's bishops were hopeless
obscurantists. But not according to Eamon Duffy in The Stripping of the
Altars: Traditional Religion in England 1400-1580.
We are still, Duffy argues, prisoners of a Protestant triumphalist viewpoint
which teaches that the forces behind religious reform had been gathering so
long that, by Mary's accession in 1553, they blew with hurricane force. On
the eve of the cleansing Reformation, the Catholic Church resembled a
pedlar's cart piled with the detritus of centuries: mass books, candles,
vestments, indulgences, holy images and charms. From Wycliffe to More,
historians are spoilt for choice looking for denunciations of a tawdry
religion distasteful to many of the elite and also to an increasingly
literate lower laity.
Duffy hardly bothers to target the scholars ranged on the other side save
for Sir Keith Thomas whose Religion and the Decline of Magic, published 20
years ago, is one of the most influential books on English history this
century. Its discussion of Catholic belief concentrated on 'popular
religion,' the prodigious variety of 'parasitic' pagan and magical
practices. For Thomas, orthodox religion in 1500 had only 'a weak hold upon
the English.' In his view, resentful churchgoers were interested in the
Eucharist principally as something they smuggled home to improve the milk
yield.
The Stripping of the Altars portrays a devout majority sharing in the body
of Christ. Far from late-medieval religion being increasingly 'privatised,'
corporate piety was more evident than ever: in congregations on Good Fridays
creeping painfully to the Cross, in guild plays celebrating the novel
devotion to the Feast of Corpus Christi. Duffy is not the first historian to
reject the term 'popular religion,' but none has argued with greater finesse
against the view that the Church was split into one religion for the rich
and cultivated, another for the common man and woman.
Duffy shows what it meant to be pious; to put a faggot on the burning pyre
beneath a heretic in order to win an indulgence, or to pray 'The Fifteen Oes
of St Bridget.' Thomas mentions these widely used prayers on the Wounds of
Christ (each beginning 'Oh . . .') only in passing as an example of how
popular Catholicism had confused prayers with magic. For Duffy, on the other
hand, these prayers reveal a theological sophistication and wealth of vivid
imagery which makes nonsense of the idea of a 'spiritual elite.'
Charting the radicals' assault on the fabric of traditional religion means
Duffy must explain why his devout parishioners acquiesced in whitewashing
walls and unpicking vestments. Out of pragmatism and fear, he suggests,
convincingly. In any age, martyrdom is a minority taste and, besides, the
imposed changes had to be paid for.
Yet, conformity must not be confused with Protestantism, as is shown by the
memorable experience of Morebath on Exmoor. Under Edward, the priest and his
devout congregation hid the vestments and shifted the candles. Then, to
their dismay, altars, candlesticks and the rest had to go. Mary's reign
meant the great cope could be redeemed from the pawnbroker, and the youth of
the parish subscribed to repaint the ceiling. Nor were the Morebathers
peculiarly pious: 'In the majority of English villages . . . men breathed
easier for the accession of a Catholic queen.'
The closing pages present a gripping account of Elizabeth's commissioners
rooting out the externals of Catholic religion with horrid meticulousness.
They were right; a sacring-bell hung round a sheep's neck did not seem the
same. By the '70s and '80s, reformed religion had triumphed. The Stripping
of the Altars is a magnificent scholarly achievement, a compelling read, and
not a page too long to defend a thesis which will provoke passionate debate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-389</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Books: The potter who became a legend - JH Plumb enters the
world of Josiah Wedgwood; manufacturer, inventor, and letter-writer supreme
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By J. H. PLUMB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JOSIAH WEDGWOOD
by Robin Reilly
Macmillan Pounds 20.00, 412 pages
JOSIAH Wedgwood was not only at ease with himself and captivated by his job
in life - to make and sell pots - but also confident of his destiny and
certain of his success. He relished his wife, delighted in her pregnancies,
and viewed his growing brood with immense satisfaction. He knew how to make
friends as well as pots: Richard Bentley, Joseph Wright, Joseph Priestley,
John Flaxman, Erasmus Darwin, Matthew Boulton, Tom Byerly, and many more.
Of course, he did not escape blows of fate: the terrible trouble with his
leg, which had to be amputated; the terrifying fear of bankruptcy which,
from time to time, haunted the early years of capital-intensive expansion;
the perplexing dilemmas of the revolt of the American colonies and the
French Revolution; and, in old age, the growing certainty that his children
were unlikely to live up to his expectations. They became ladies and
gentlemen, not potters.
Yet, even at the worst of times Wedgwood glowed with optimism; his eupeptic
charactor reasserted itself with ease and hope was his second nature.
Combined with his exuberant character were exceptional skills - he was an
administrator of originality, a dedicated and persistent inventor, an
advertiser of genius, and an incomparable letter-writer. He enjoyed so
seductive a personality that he burst through the constraints of class as
easily as Dr Johnson.
Surely there can be few better subjects for a biographer? He found no
Boswell during his life, no GO Trevelyan as did Macaulay - only Eliza
Meteyard. Her two volumes in 1865-6 were lengthy and just short of
verbosity, adulatory almost to the point of absurdity, and partially blind
to the world in which Wedgwood succeeded. Nevertheless, her work remains
Wedgwood's major biography.
Oddly enough, Wedgwood created a difficult biographical problem. His letters
to Richard Bentley, his invaluable partner and his key to the world of
fashion and sophistication, are as splendid in their way as Boswell's or
Horace Walpole's. They are as good as those of any 18th century writer,
glowing with a rare intensity because Wedgwood was keenly aware of his own
ignorance and just as keen to abolish it.
Bentley gave him a sense of security and of a world beyond his ken. Bentley
guided him in religion, politics and the aims of society. At the same time,
Bentley was a man of considerable taste, at home in the arts but with a
sharp sense of what might sell. Indeed, they fitted each other like a lock
and key. Letters such as Wedgwood's to Bentley are very rare - indeed,
almost non-existent: articulate manufacturers are far rarer than four-leaf
clovers. So, there is always a problem for any would-be biographer: to avoid
relying too much on them. To some extent, Reilly avoids this trap, but not
entirely: the 11 years of Bentley's friendship dominate his book.
Wedgwood's life cannot, of course, be written in strict chronological order
if one is to evaluate properly his influence on England's developing economy
or to assess how revolutionary or not were his methods and inventions. How
far was he a pioneer of consumerism? Did his concern with technology, from
canals to thermometers, energise by their example the Industrial Revolution?
Reilly's solution of the problem is to interweave themes and chronology
sensibly enough, although sometimes it makes the book very uneven.
Except when dealing with purely ceramic matters, and the relationship
between Wedgwood and other Staffordshire potters or family matters, Reilly
is insecure. His better chapters - like that on Competition and the Market,
or The Lunatics and Other Enlightened Friends - are depend fundamentally on
others.
For the first, he draws heavily on Neil McKendrick's work of 25 years ago
although, given half a chance, he will rap McKendrick's knuckles for factual
errors from which he himself is far from immune. He is more generous to
Robert Schofield, whose work on the Lunar Society is the basis of the other.
Some chapters are very thin.
Unfortunately, too, Reilly does not possess a facile pen; his style is
wooden and his prose leaden. Nevertheless, I recommend you to read this
book. In it, you will recognise so much of a world you might have thought
alien to our own.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-390</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Books: Scrolls that put flesh on history
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GERALD CADOGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DEAD SEA SCROLLS UNCOVERED
by Robert Eisenman and Michael Wise
Element (Shaftesbury, Dorset) Pounds 14.94, 286 pages
THE FIRST scrolls the Bedouin found in the desert caves above the Dead Sea
at Qumran, on the West Bank, appeared 45 years ago during the troubled time
of the birth of Israel. In the 1950s more were found, and the Bedouin still
seek them.
From the start, it was obvious that these fragmentary religious texts would
give an alternative, contemporary picture of life and thought at the time of
Jesus, and of how Christianity grew from its start in Bethlehem 1,992 years
ago.
Quick publication of such finds was essential. Did it happen? No. It is
still not done. The scholars have bickered about their 'rights to publish'
and the region's politics have not helped.
Outsiders have no chance of understanding the long-running disputes, nor of
deciding whether Robert Eisenman and Michael Wise were scholarly bounders
when they rushed to publish a large number of unknown texts in this book.
But, for the public, these new scrolls are welcome.
Their value is that they echo many attitudes in the Gospels and confirm that
Jesus was truly part of his time, when the Romans were hated imperialists
and Palestine abounded with sectarian leaders all claiming unique divine
authority - so like the Middle East today. Some scrolls identify true
prophets and smear the false ones.
Several fragments interpret the Old Testament, partly to answer the vital
question of which OT books were sacred. A precis of Genesis selects Noah,
Abraham, Gomorrah, and Reuben's insult to his father by sleeping with his
concubine; stories of Jews at the Persian court parallel Daniel's adventures
with those capricious kings. The dying leader's farewell message, 'Do not
put the man with a covetous eye in charge of Riches,' sounds like an OT
proverb. 'In the Meekness of Righteousness, bring forth your words' could be
the Sermon on the Mount.
Making sacrifices in the Temple for the Gentile Romans was wicked and - as
in the Christian concept of the pure life - violence, fornication and lying
were out. But would Jesus have had time for the attitude that, on the
Sabbath, you should not pull an animal out of the mud but could throw a
person a garment and haul him out?
The texts about the Messiah and the New Jerusalem are astonishingly close to
the Gospels. 'The Lord will visit the Pious and the Righteous will He call
by name,' they say. 'He shall release the captives, make the blind see . . .
heal the sick, resurrect the dead.'
And who is the Messiah, 'the Leader of the Community?' He is 'the Branch of
David, a staff from the root of Jesse.' And his fate? 'Put to death' at the
orders of the high priest and the 'Kittim' (Romans). This was not
Christianity, but it was very close to it. The Dead Sea Scrolls are just
fragments, but they add depth to the picture of Palestine at the time. The
ideology of the Qumran community, like that of the first Christians, had
firm roots in the traditions of Judaism.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-391</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Books: Literary competitions
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A HUGE number of clerihews on musicians, and obituaries of fictional
characters, has been received.
These are now being sorted and appraised carefully by the judges.
Results and a full report will appear in the next edition of the Weekend FT
on January 2.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-392</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Books: A treasure trove of carols old and new - Sixty-four
years on, a definitive reference work has been replaced. Anthony Curtis
applauds the result
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY CURTIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NEW OXFORD BOOK OF CAROLS
edited by Hugh Keyte and Andrew Parrott
Oxford Pounds 60.00 (Pounds 75.00 after January 1), 702 pages
RALPH Vaughan Williams collaborated in 1928 with Martin Shaw and Percy
Dearmer to compile The Oxford Book of Carols. The work has served its
purpose for a long time but, as the editors of this replacement volume point
out: 'Musical knowledge has increased enormously in the 60 or so years that
have elapsed since its publication, and attitudes (as well as the
circumstances in which carols are performed) are no longer the same.'
They believe that the present book - an omnium gatherum of carols in many
different languages, from medieval Latin to 19th century Basque - 'has the
potential to revitalise what has, in many respects, become an enfeebled and
inward-looking tradition.' Here is not merely a source book for carol-party
organisers - a shorter version at a more affordable price is planned to
appear soon - but also an historical anthology giving ample testimony of an
enormously widespread and persistent musical tradition.
In the view of Keyte (a music don at Bristol University) and Parrott (a
conductor of international repute and founder of the Taverner Players), the
essential features of a carol are that 'the content must be narrative,
contemplative or celebratory, the spirit must be simple, the form normally
strophic.'
There are carols in celebration of many of the events of the Christian
calendar, but the authors have restricted themselves in the main to carols
'for Christmas and most of its associated feasts and seasons, ranging from
Advent . . . to Candlemas (the feast of the Presentation of the Virgin in
the Temple . . . 40 days after Christmas). Carols of the Annunciation have
the status of honorary Christmas carols, having been sung at this season
from medieval times.' The carols are printed with musical setting alongside
the verbal text. If this is in a language other than English, it is also
given in translation.
For a scholarly history of the origins of the carol, the compilers refer us
to RL Greene's The Early English Carols (revised edition 1977), but they
themselves succeed here in imparting much valuable historical information in
the form of the copious footnotes to each carol. They make a broad
distinction between 'composed' carols and 'traditional' ones. Within the
first category, 'the order (they write in explanation of their scheme) is
roughly chronological, though with some geographical grouping leading to a
slightly zig-zag sequence; in the second, the carols are arranged purely by
country of origin. A carol's chronological position is determined by the
date at which music and words first appeared together: Ding] dong] merrily
on high is thus dated c. 1900, despite its 16th century tune. Composed and
traditional settings of the same text are placed separately in Parts I and
II: A Virgin unspotted, for example, appears in William Billings's setting
in part I, and in its folk setting in part II.'
The common European inheritance is emphasised by plainchant hymns and
medieval carols from many different countries, including a group known
chiefly from the Swedish-Finnish Piae Cantiones of 1582, deriving from much
earlier central European material. Monks were prolific writers of words for
carols in medieval times. Nearly all the noels in the French section are by
clerical poets working on existing melodies, and the texts of some of the
English medieval carols are by Franciscan friars doing the same job.
Yet, the editors conclude, 'as we write, we are aware of a loosening of
ideological restraints among younger composers so that simple, direct forms
of expression are no longer frowned upon. It could even be that those who
have written off the traditional carol as a dead form may once again prove
to have been too hasty with their requiems.' Anyone who dips into this
treasure trove of a book will surely want to ask if the long tradition could
be continued in a modern idiom.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-393</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Books: Hardly a case of mind over matter - Michael Horovitz
analyses a psychiatrist
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL HOROVITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN THE PSYCHIATRIST'S CHAIR
by Anthony Clare
Heinemann Pounds 16.99, 304 pages
THE NAME of 50-year-old Dubliner Anthony Clare has probably become known to
more people in Britain than that of any other living psychiatrist. Two
decades ago, the same probably was true of the Glaswegian RD Laing
(1927-89), but for different reasons and via different media.
Laing retained a high public profile from when when The Divided Self, his
first book, polarised the mental health establishment with its radically
human approach to schizophrenics - but he went on communicating mainly
through books, the experimental community houses he founded, and the private
practice of 'anti-psychiatry.'
Every summer since 1982, Radio 4 has broadcast In the Psychiatrist's Chair,
a series of interviews between Clare and sundry literary and arts
celebrities. There have been about 70 to date, of which 12 are transcribed
in Clare's book with his introductions and afterthoughts.
One of the more intellectually energetic of these turns out to be the
dialogue with Laing, who arrived at the studio drunk but gradually sobered
up in response to Clare's questions and gave an unsparingly lucid exposition
of his life and work. At one point, Clare suggested Laing might be 'too
sensitive to be a doctor.' The Scotsman admitted he had not bothered to keep
his sensitivity 'within a fairly formally ordered frame of conduct. I get
tossed and turned.'
The contrasts between the operations of these two shrinks underline, for me,
some distinctions between the counter-culture which Laing helped to define
in the 1960s and the more commercial, careerist and conformist
simplifications of the Thatcher years. Laing, though often apparently
self-indulgent, capricious and extreme, was committed intensely to his
diverse patients and controversial causes.
Clare, for the most part, endorses passively the vanities of his
collaborators: the extent to which you might relish the results will depend
on your reactions to the respective personalities being explored. No more
than a handful of moments in these published broadcasts feel at all
challenging psychologically. The chats with Ken Dodd, Peter Hall, Eartha
Kitt, Jimmy Savile and other showbiz pros are, patently, programmed by the
subjects, not the interviewer.
Clare's mask of clinical detachment did prompt novelist Tom Sharpe, agony
aunt Claire Rayner, tennis star Arthur Ashe, and actor Anthony Hopkins into
convincingly spontaneous examinations of their childhood, family and
love-hate vicissitudes. But most of these interviewees are content to spin
out their long-rehearsed and well-received yarns.
It seems a pity that the 'Top 12' mentality ruled out of this selection the
few dramatically revealing self-portraits induced by Clare's blandly
professional couch-side manner. For example, the most glaringly unpleasant
subject I remember from the broadcasts, David Irving (famed apologist for
and historian of Nazi Germany), provided the most staggering vindication I
have ever heard of Dr Johnson's view that 'No man was ever writ down but by
himself.' Perhaps future series and publications will yield more such
enlightening encounters.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-394</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / State of the Art: The verbiage of creativity that is. . mad,
bad and dangerous to use - Opera, it's all in the production / In plain
language, one might call stagings of opera that placate tradition-minded
audiences conservative, and those that outrage them radical
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAX LOPPERT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OPERA, in recent decades the growth-industry among the performing arts, has
over the period accrued its share of critical buzzwords - those
concept-adumbrating abstract nouns and adjectives, mad, bad, and dangerous
to use, which nevertheless sound with relentless frequency in current
discourse about and around the medium.
Before coming to grips with them, however, we need to pinpoint exactly which
branch of the operatic industry has caused greatest verbal proliferation. It
is certainly not the Arena Mega-Event, that newest diversion of the operatic
mainstream. Neither is it the regular arrival of new works guaranteed to
renew the opera-house repertory.
Such an arrival simply has not happened. As a result, new opera has been
marginalised in the post-Second World War era. Minimalism (a concept Andrew
Clements deals elsewhere on this page) is the single operatic neologism to
gain wide usage in recent times. This is exemplified principally by the
theatre-works of Philip Glass and John Adams. Needless to add, both Glass
and Adams are reputed to dislike the minimalist label greatly.
It is, rather, in response to developments in opera production that certain
words have been encouraged to assert themselves. They are employed in the
differentiation of production styles, and can be seen as essentially
variants on the age-old theme of the conservative-radical division. In plain
language, one might call those stagings of opera that placate
tradition-minded audiences conservative, and those that outrage them
radical. But of course, it all goes much further than that. Indeed, the
elucidation of such divisions via relevant catchwords could serve as a rough
guide to production styles in postwar opera.
On the one hand, there is the text-faithful or (in German) Werktreu
approach. It has found many and various forms: notably, Luchino Visconti's
fastidious re-evocation of grand Romantic opera-theatre (at its grandest in
Covent Garden's celebrated 1958 Don Carlos); Franco Zeffirelli's scenically
grandiose, intellectually unambitious developments of the Visconti line (the
New York Met's current Turandot, a hugely expensive, splashy operatic
spectacle, is perhaps its ne plus ultra); Peter Hall's physically restrained
but deeply scrutinised Glyndebourne Mozart stagings of the 1970s; and
recently, Peter Stein's physically mercurial harmonisations of words and
music for Welsh National Opera - Otello, Falstaff, Pelleas.
All these theatre-men have exhibited very different stylistic traits; the
link is a belief in that the score and libretto must be interpreted 'as is',
rather than dramatically re-worked or in some other way stood on its head.
On the other hand, there is the radical approach. The umbrella word
'interventionist' has proved particularly useful hereabouts, suggesting as
it does a producer's act of consciously interposing his interpretative ideas
and responses into the process of artistic reproduction and communication.
Operatic interventionism, a many-mansioned construction, can fairly be
reckoned to have its foundations in the struggles of postwar German opera
houses to cope with a tradition deeply damaged, if not entirely destroyed.
The first of these was at Bayreuth, where from 1951 onwards Wieland Wagner
staged his grandfather's operas in abstract form, stripped of almost all
stage property and Wagnerian stage direction; this amounted to a profoundly
significant purging of the Teutonic-Romantic trappings associated with the
Wagner festival in its Nazi heyday. This was, perhaps, the purest form of
postwar operatic modernism in production; in the former East Germany,
however, very different responses to the cultural crisis inherited from the
Nazis were being explored - and these were to have much longer-lasting
impact on the wider world of opera.
At the Komische Oper in East Berlin, Walter Felsenstein was developing his
concept of 'realistic music theatre', based on close-knit ensemble work long
rehearsed and minutely motivated. His heirs - Gotz Friedrich, Joachim Herz
and (though never a Felsenstein disciple) Harry Kupfer - took these
principles and meshed them with Brecht's theory of 'epic theatre', in
particular his discipline of the 'alienation effect' that disengages an
audience from 'culinary' pleasures in order to engage it on intellectual
argument.
As these three figures developed their careers in the West, in the early
1970s, so controversy began to attach itself to their neo-Brechtian
productions, often with a strong 'political' slant. Friedrich's 1976 Ring at
Covent Garden and Kupfer's 1981 Fidelio for WNO are key examples; so was the
1976 Bayreuth Ring of the Frenchman Patrice Chereau. A different sort of
interventionism has been practised by the former Brecht associate Ruth
Berghaus, whose mining of a libretto for psychological and political
associations has been couched in a theatrical language bordering on the
worlds of painterly surrealism and the Theatre of the Absurd equally.
It is in description of Berghaus's vision - she was the house-goddess of the
Frankfurt Opera from 1977 to 1987, and has worked widely in Europe (though
far too little in Britain) - that operatic criticism has often been tempted
to borrow the philosophical and/or literary terms 'post-structuralist' and
'deconstructionist', in a tentative attempt to pinpoint the creative
tensions, ironies, contradictions, discontinuities and textual
confrontations elicited by such a mode of opera production. Such terms have
also been used in reference to David Alden (the American noted for his
English National Opera stagings of Mazeppa, Boccanegra and Masked Ball) and
the Germans Hans Neuenfels and Alfred Kirchner.
The reaction to neo-Brechtian or Berghausian opera has got under way, though
it is by no means clear-cut or chronologically orderly. Again, a term
borrowed from other disciplines - 'postmodernism' - has been used to
describe it. If one offers Nicholas Hytner's famous ENO productions of
Rienzi (1983) and Xerxes (1985) as examples, or more recently those of Das
Rheingold and Die Walkure (Scottish Opera) by Richard Jones, it is because
they seem to exhibit similar artistic impulses.
Among them one may mention the profusion of cross-cultural references and
allusion, often of a highly witty and self-conscious manner, the
determination to escape the trappings of ideological didacticism, and the
use of the proscenium-arch frame as a space which can be filled in
surprising, funny, zany, whimsical ways, with objects and images gathered
magpie-fashion from anywhere and everywhere. Gilbert Adair's self-proclaimed
'snappy definition' in a recent Sunday Times - 'the postmodern is the
postmortem of the modern' - certainly seems apt to the Richard Jones view of
opera. But where that will lead, and what terms will be affixed to the
relevant critical signposts, is anyone's guess.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-395</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / State of the Art: The verbiage of creativity that is. .
.mad, bad and dangerous to use - New Music, the shock of the old
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW CLEMENTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE trouble started more than a century ago with Wagner. Those opening bars
of Tristan and Isolde, groping towards any feeling of a key, were unlocking
a Pandora's Box that within 40 years had led the composers of the Second
Viennese School, Schoenberg, Berg and Webern, towards music in which the
sense of key was totally abandoned. Debussy, Stravinsky and Bartok all added
their own threads to modernism and for almost all of the 20th century,
tonality has been under attack. It was a battle that it lost for almost 60
years; while atonalism and its progeny serialism reigned, only gifted
individualists such as Britten, Tippett and Shostakovich, were able to
demonstrate the continued power of tonality. But it is only in the last two
decades that tonal music has been able to come-out again, sheltering under a
banner that has been called post-modernism.
Now, though, there is freedom of choice: composers can select their own
label. They can choose to become neo-romantics, minimalists,
post-minimalists, neo-expressionists, or polystylisticists, and all of them,
inasmuch as they can be pinned down at all, can be shoved into the drawer of
musical history labelled post-modernism. The range of music produced under
these headings is already vast. but what it all has in common is a rejection
of the main evolutionary thread that can be traced through the music of this
century from Wagner through the Second Viennese School and the other
modernists, to the post-1945 avant-garde of Boulez, Stockhausen and Berio.
Some gifted composers articulate this urge to regress in impeccable
historical terms; Nicholas Maw, who started as a serial composer and now
falls more or less into the neo-romantic school, talks of remaking the link
with the late romantics, with Brahms, Wolf and Wagner, and recovering the
contact between composers and their public which he maintains was sundered
by Schoenberg and his followers. By returning to the harmonies of 100 years
ago Maw has fashioned for himself a highly expressive and individual
language.
But all these strands involved regressions or historical short-circuits,
even if the old is sometimes treated with the ironic detachment that often
seems the single unifying character of the 57 varieties of post-modernism.
There is even an argument for viewing later Stravinsky as one of the first
post-modern composers; in neoclassical works such as the opera The Rake's
Progress, the conventions of classical opera are appropriated and gently
subverted, traditional usages are contradicted, even if the irony is never
overtly humorous or satirical.
Stravinsky, though, was very special. As the 20th century starts to take
stock of itself his genius, along with that of Alban Berg, another composer
able to move forwards without ever rejecting his past, seem increasingly the
most vital and significant musical figures. The contemporary composers who
stand history on its head seem less reverential in their treatment of the
past, less certain of what it has to to teach them. Minimalism, the most
pernicious and self-serving of all recent trends, uses the simplest melodic
and rhythmic shapes and the most elementary harmonic contrasts to build
ramshackle musical structures; when used by a composer of genuine wit and
perception such as Steve Reich the results can be genuinely musical and
intriguing, but in the 1980s, a minimalist background became simply the
jumping-off for high-profile international careers. In their much hyped
operas Philip Glass and John Adams have both grafted old-fashioned rhetoric
onto this ill-defined musical stock so that the minimalist techniques now
just fill the gaps between the cliches; post-minimalism has been born.
However, the meditational music of Arvo Part is minimalist in a very
different way, disarms with its naive sincerity, while a piece such as John
Tavener's Protecting Veil, a huge commercial success on disc in Britain,
makes just as few intellectual demands; it is as reassuring as the cosiest
form of religion, a comfort blanket woven from uncomplicated melody and
sweet-toothed harmonies. If contemporary music seems too threatening then
listeners can bury their heads under the blanket with Tavener.
The appeal of Alfred Shnitke is harder to categorise. For Shnitke's use and
abuse of 'old-fashioned' material serves a genuinely ironic, authentically
post-modern, purpose; he aims at musical subversion of a sometimes
overwhelming kind, and any object is grist to that mill. Shnitke's
'polystylicisticism' - horrible word for music that can be inescapably
beautiful - is an uncertain thing. Perhaps that goes with the territory; the
musical risks have to be taken before the reward can be secured, but there
is no doubt that Shnitke's best music touches a chord with contemporary
audiences that few other living composers of comparable sophistication
manage to reach.
Which should indicate that not everything in the post-modern musical world
is commercially driven or meretricious. There are composers who have
exploited the expressive freedom of choice of the last quarter century for
the best possible musical ends. The German composer Wolfgang Rihm has
produced a stream of pieces hard to classify, yet pull the listener into
their world with great power. Judith Weir is another who can switch styles
and perspectives in a way that is at the same time identifiably post-modern
yet coherent and effective. For once then the musical world is mirroring the
real thing - still coming to terms with the new freedom and still feeling
lost without the old certainties, whether they were good or bad.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-396</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / State of the Art: The verbiage of creativity that is. .
.mad, bad and dangerous to use - Fine Art, on whose authority is it great? /
Patricia Morison explains why connoisseurship became a dirty word
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICIA MORISON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ART Appreciation at my junior school meant staring at black-and-white slides
of Great Works such as Constable's 'Hay Wain' or (more daringly) the 'Rokeby
Venus'. 'Appreciating' art was then seen as was a social accomplishment like
being able to sing in tune, only less useful. It would enable one to
tackleart galleries and exhibitions; without it, one would simply not
'understand'.
Modern children have been freed from that kind of aesthetic handbagging
because of the pervasive influence something called the New Art History. So
what is the New Art History, and how does it affect the ordinary art lover?
In 1973 TJ Clark published two celebrated books on Courbet, and 19th-century
French realist painting. Clark, a marxist art-historian at Leeds, challenged
the kind of certainties which, five years earlier, had shaped Lord Clark's
(no relation) Civilisation. Lord Clark set the popular image of the
art-historian as someone with an 'eye' who practiced what in the business is
known as connoisseurship. Beavering away in print-rooms and archives, the
art-historian defined artists' oeuvre. Through iconography, he (sic)
unlocked the meaning of difficult pictures. Above all, he defined the
hierarchy of greater and lesser artists, greater and lesser periods of
artistic achievement. He never considered trash or kitsch.
In the 1960s, other academic disciplines were invaded by marxism, feminism,
structuralism and psychoanalysis. But art history kept its purity into the
1970s because of the kind of people it had traditionally attracted.
Courtauld Institute graduates studying the Old Masters needed to be pleasing
house-guests for English dukes and Italian contessas. Left-wing ideology
hardly fitted the picture.
However, at the new universities and at art-schools, there was less
investment in the status quo particularly when the field of study was 19th
and 20th-century art which was more accessible and carried more ideological
baggage - namely, defining the impact of modernism. Connoisseurship became a
dirty word. So did the contemporary art market, where connoisseurship
bolsters price-tags.
A marxist-oriented approach to art rejects the notion of artistic genius as
vague, elitist tosh. The notion that there is an immutable canon of Great
Art appears equally fatuous. On whose authority is it great? What
intellectual basis is there for 'privileging' Rembrandt over his pupils?
High art is merely an aspect of 'the politics of culture'. A left-wing
approach looks instead at the production and the function of 'cultural
artefacts' within society. It asks questions about the relationship between
'high culture' (what the elite consumes) and 'popular culture' (medieval
woodblocks, Charles 'n' Di T-shirts, china ducks).
Far from all these questions were new, and there have always been
art-historians interested in the relationship between artists and society.
However, the shift was to look at society first, the art-work second.
Studying patronage, who commissioned or bought art, offered a lifeline for
graduates worried about how to position themselves in the bitter New v. Old
conflict. It substituted the notion of taste, which is relative, for the
outlawed concept of quality. Francis Haskell's fascinating research into of
the vicissitudes of artists' reputations, 'knocking down and putting up' as
he used to say in his Oxford lectures, has also been highly influential.
What they now teach on art-history degree courses may seem fairly
irrelevant. However, if you read rather than merely leaf through art-books
it is worth pointing out that books taking a NAH perspective tend to be far
more stimulating than old-fashioned monographs on individual artists.
However, more and more exhibitions bear the signs of NAH thinking. Perhaps
you saw Monet's 'Poplars' at the hugely popular Royal Academy show. The
catalogue devoted pages not to saying why these are beautiful, but to the
claim that Monet's choice of subject was intended to position his wares
within a discourse which included Anglo-French cultural rivalry,
anti-Japanese sentiment, the poplar as a signifier of liberty, and the
matchstick industry.
The millions who saw Monet would doubtless have little idea that the show
was shaped by the NAH orthodoxy unless they bought the catalogue. So,
ironically, the anti-elitist interpretation remains shut away in catalogues.
However, this year's admirable Manet exhibition at the National Gallery was
a middle-of-the road exercise in NAH 'contextualisation'. It focussed on an
artist's reaction to contemporary events and exhibited masterpieces adjacent
to (but not in the same room as) visiting-cards and photographs.
"Masterpiece' is a dynamite word; so is 'genius', 'creativity', and my
(ironic) assumption that the art historian is a 'he'. Much of the ferocity
behind the deconstruction of the canon comes from feminist art historians
protesting that art, and even more art history, are male constructs. The
19th-century hierarchy excluded 'Old Mistresses' even though feminist
scholars have shown that previously women were accepted as artists -
competent, even good, but not geniuses. Within our 'patriarchal,
phallocentric society', genius is defined as male.
Incontrovertibly, gender influences taste, and a gender-based reading of
paintings is often extremely interesting. However, feminist rhetoric is
guaranteed to upset (male) exhibition sponsors, so it will be a while before
a major UK gallery explores these questions. Most museums and art-galleries
are innately conservative because they collect or exhibit 'the best'.
Reactionary forces also tend to include art-critics whose art-historical
education predates or is hostile to, the NAH, and who feel they cannot
abnegate the role of pronouncing 'I find this beautiful, therefore it is.'
Here you may detect a classic feature of the post-modernist intellectual;
self-reflexive analysis. How does class, gender, race etc affect how you or
I write about or 'read' art? In the wee small hours, art historians
sometimes lament that years of 'reading' works of art as texts have
suppressed their enjoyment in the thing itself. Be that as it may, the
not-so-new art history does increasingly shape exhibitions and museums.
Badly done, it comes across as bossy and jargon-ridden. And yet, my feeling
is that 20 years of interpreting art as social history has made it for the
public a more provocative, exciting, and non-elitist affair than Lord Clark
could ever have imagined.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-397</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Letter From Tokyo: 'Tis the season to be thrifty - In Japan,
extravagance is a ghost of Christmas past
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A Japanese Christmas, not constrained by a Christian spiritual tradition,
lends itself to an annual redesign in much the same way as a car fender or a
skirt hem. What was fashionable last year now seems gawky and out-of-place,
and what is fashionable this year may have a shelf life of just one season.
Last year, Christmas Eve was supposed to be spent with that special person
in a four-star hotel on the fringe of Yokohama harbour. The couple had
already dined Italian, hired a karaoke room and gently sung Jingle Bells to
each other, while he had temporarily secured the relationship by presenting
her with a Tiffany pendant.
It was good, solid consumerism of the kind that justified the immense
corporate expense of turning Christmas Eve into the Most Romantic Night of
the year. But it was also the last hurrah of the 'bubble' era, when stock
prices defied gravity as easily as Santa's sleigh, and even the average
office worker had the financial confidence to insist on a suite at a
mountainside chalet in the quest for a white Christmas.
This year, chalets are definitely out. For those who insist on mountains,
tonight should be spent in a tent. Instead of desperate young men climbing
over each other to buy a Tiffany pendant, the US company's outlet in the
Ginza is now as sedate as jewellery stores in other countries. The emphasis
is on economy; there are few takers for the Y530,000 (Pounds 2,804)
diamond-encrusted platinum heart - as an idle sales assistant explained:
'The bubble has burst.'
Japanese youth magazines, quick to spot and dump a trend, have dubbed this
the 'hand-made' or 'have at home' Christmas. The truly romantic man will
have decked his small hall with tinsel, hidden his more lurid comic books,
and prepared a hearty stew which will be shared with the special friend.
Making Noel noodles by hand is 'in', as is a budget-priced box of Belgian
chocolates.
Having developed Christmas as a consumer festival in addition to the
country's traditional new year rites, Japanese and international companies
have discovered that this year's 'no-name', 'few frills' theme is inflicting
serious damage on meticulously cultivated images. Much of that damage is
blamed on the thriving discount shops which are doing the unthinkable - they
are discounting famous brands.
A whopping 35 per cent off Prada of Milan handbags, 20 per cent off Ralph
Lauren accessories, and 15 per cent and more off Chanel products.
Discounting during the new year sales season would have been frowned on, but
this is heavy discounting during the rush period. Rolex watches that were
Y2.35m can be bought for Y1.4m at Minax, a Tokyo bargain house, while the
price of a Versace windcheater has been reduced by 72 per cent - but only
during Christmas.
In the past, Japanese shoppers had to travel to Hong Kong to buy such brands
at such prices, but the opening of new supply routes and a glut of famous
brand goods during a recession have changed all that. Brand-consciousness
may be permanently altered.
Thankfully, Santa Claus is emerging from this commercial fray with his image
untarnished. There are a few Santas in Japanese stores, and they are
generally employed to sell things. But they are still venerable figures, and
regarded more as a source of wisdom than as a receptacle for children's
wish-lists. Mr Munehiro Soshi, trained as a tax accountant, is such a Santa.
Mr Soshi, 24 and a modest 78kg, sells gourmet ice-cream at a Yokohama
department store and, along with other prestige products, his sales have
suffered. But he knows that being Santa is more than just selling ice-cream,
and he answers questions from curious parents and children about the correct
way to conduct Christmas. What colour is a real Christmas cake? What
language does Santa speak?
'Some people tell me that Santa Claus is supposed to answer in English, but
then I can't speak English and I'm not sure if they would understand,' he
explained. Along with most Japanese, Mr Soshi will be working on Christmas
Day, which imposes its own time limit on Christmas Eve festivities. It means
that workers will have to take down that mountainside tent early tomorrow
morning if they intend to be in the office by 10am.
Even a Christmas at home poses problems for the flat-dwelling Tokyo reveller
determined to follow the advice of magazine columnists by inviting a few
friends over for a fancy dress party. To ensure a fun-filled evening, the
magazines describe the sometimes complex rules of party games which force
the most inhibited guests to mix. They also provide long menus of
post-bubble Christmas cuisine.
What the magazines don't provide is the space in which to have a party - in
Japan, a Christmas knees-up means somebody else's knee in your bowl of
noodles.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-398</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Leading Article: No room at Europe's inn
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NATIONS of western Europe should not be celebrating Christmas with too
much gusto this year. It is after all a Christian festival in which the
scenes of compassion and solidarity are traditionally emphasised. The story
being retold this week by Christians around the world depicts God in a state
of self-imposed human helplessness and homelessness - even as an infant
refugee fleeing the organised violence of a ruthless state and finding
hospitality in a foreign land.
It is a story all too topical in today's world, and this year it has become
especially so for Europe. Three years ago refugees were almost exclusively a
third world problem - people of the third world, most of whom stayed in the
third world. Few of them sought asylum in Europe. Even then, they did not
get a very Christian reception. More often than not they were accused of
being 'economic migrants' in disguise.
Now, however, the problem has become an internal one for Europe. War in the
former Yugoslavia has driven up to 3m people from their homes. Several
hundred thousand have already reached western Europe, by far the largest
number being in Germany - the EC country with the most liberal asylum policy
but also the most overtly ethnic citizenship laws, and perhaps a relatively
low threshold of social tolerance towards foreign residents. To be fair,
Germans are sympathetic to the Croat and Moslem victims of 'ethnic
cleansing', and there is no evidence that the xenophobia even of extremists
in Germany is directed specifically at these particular refugees. But the
sheer size of the latest wave of refugees adds to the pressures which
extremists are exploiting, and which have produced such an agonised debate
on the asylum issue.
Necessary distinction
All European governments seek to distinguish between economic and political
migrants - or, more strictly, between voluntary migrants and refugees who
are forced to leave their countries. This is a real and necessary
distinction. The right of asylum belongs to genuine refugees and should not
be undermined by being used as a cover for voluntary migration.
But governments are deluding themselves if they imagine that any procedure
for establishing this distinction, however miraculously fair and swift, will
by itself reduce the refugee problem to manageable proportions. That could
only be done by tackling the source of the problem, namely the conflicts in
the former Yugoslavia and those elsewhere in eastern Europe which have the
capacity to produce many more millions of refugees before the decade is out.
Having so badly mishandled the Yugoslav conflict up to this point,
governments must now face up to the probability that only military action in
Bosnia can put a stop to the ethnic cleansing there. That might at least
lend some credibility to the preventive diplomacy which may yet succeed
elsewhere, if it is undertaken with sufficient speed and vigour and backed
with significant resources - carrots, as well as sticks.
More generosity
Such action is needed to prevent the problem becoming completely
unmanageable. It will not make it vanish. European governments must also
face the fact that they already have on their hands by far the worst refugee
problem in Europe since the mid-1940s, and that for the next few years it is
virtually certain to get worse rather than better. They cannot hope to
manage it successfully if they stick to their present attitude, under which
every country seeks to minimise its exposure and push the refugees back to
their last port of call.
Most Europeans are rightly disgusted at the way 415 Palestinians have for a
week now been turned into a human ping pong ball between Israel and Lebanon.
But they themselves are doing something similar to much larger numbers of
people, against most of whom there is not even an accusation of involvement
in political violence such as Israel has made against the Palestinians.
Under the Dublin Convention, asylum applicants are regularly sent back to
the first EC country they arrived in; and under the resolution on 'host
third countries', adopted by EC immigration ministers last month, they are
to be sent back whenever possible to the country from which they arrived in
the EC, so long as it is not the one from which they were originally
fleeing.
In the case of refugees from Bosnia or Serbia, this 'host third country'
will most often be Albania, Croatia, Hungary, Macedonia or Slovenia, all of
which are far less equipped to cope with the influx than any EC state, and
are already desperately overloaded. Most likely this will contribute to a
breakdown of order in one or more of those states, and so to even larger
flows of refugees westwards.
Thus a more generous west European attitude and an agreement to share the
burden more equitably within the EC is not merely a matter of Christian
ethics. It is a requirement of enlightened self interest, essential if the
westward spread of chaos and violence is to be avoided.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-399</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Illumination on the sons of light: After 40 years, the
controversial Dead Sea Scrolls are finally available for public scrutiny
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBIN LANE FOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
After 40 years of extremely slow progress, the Dead Sea Scrolls have been
catapulted back into the news. This Christmas is the first one at which
ordinary readers can study almost all the texts in translation, and the new
openness has led to all manner of wild historical claims.
Until quite recently, there appeared to be a learned consensus. The scrolls
had been found at Qumran, the religious headquarters of a Jewish sect who
were almost certainly to be labelled as Essenes. Their scrolls had
originated at various dates between the second century BC and the middle of
the first century AD. Keen members of the community studied scriptures,
copied manuscripts and were probably expected to have nothing to do with
women, although a few female skeletons were found in the nearby cemetery.
There was a strict hierarchy, quite a lot of washing, endless praying and
denunciations of polygamy, a practice which was not uncommon among richer
Jews at this date. The administration included a chaplain, or priest, and
two positions whose titles could be rendered as bursar and warden.
'It is not clear whether the bursar was distinct from the warden or whether
one man dealt with both tasks,' according to Professor Geza Vermes, a
leading authority in the study of the scrolls and author of the soundest
books on them in English. The community described itself as the 'sons of
light', revered the wisdom of a founding 'teacher of righteousness' and
hated the memory of a 'wicked priest' in its history. They also believed
that they were fighting a holy war which was about to erupt in the final
drama of the end of the world.
In the early 1980s, there were times in my own Qumran of a library when I
idly felt that their life did not sound so very different from my Oxford
college, still all-male and confronted with the demonised Mrs Thatcher.
Since the mid-1980s almost every element in this picture has been attacked.
We have been told that the religious headquarters was really a fortress
(although its water-supply was exposed to attack) and that its scrolls are a
rag-bag from various groups and places (although the main batch have a
coherence which refutes this notion).
More radically, the residents have been seen as militant zealots, literally
bent on holy war (although their language was clearly metaphorical). Worst
of all, they have been equated with early Christians at a time when
Christians in Palestine were known as Nazarenes (supposedly derived from the
same root as one term for the sect in the scrolls). Their revered teacher of
righteousness could be Jesus himself and the wicked priest could be none
other than St. Paul, or at least Paul could have gone in his Jewish phase to
persecute this group in 'Damascus', a term which is loosely used in one of
their texts.
All these theories are untenable, especially the most recent Christian ones
which are absolute rubbish. However, they have arisen from, and have been
exacerbated by, impatience with the 'official' team of publishers who had
sat on the remaining scrolls for too long. Here, there has been a
breakthrough which is the public achievement of 1991-92.
It began when two Hebrew scholars in Cincinnati published their own
reconstruction of unpublished scrolls, ingeniously basing them on a
published dictionary of all words used in the Dead Sea texts. Their version
has turned out to be remarkably accurate. Among all the fuss, it then
emerged, sensationally, that the Huntington Library in California was
holding photographs of the unpublished texts and in the face of official
protests from Israel, the library went ahead and published the lot.
Meanwhile, a comparable bunch of facsimiles were rapidly made available from
Jerusalem for study in Oxford under the guidance of Prof Vermes. They are a
fitting tribute to his years of contribution to the texts' correct
interpretation. At last, the scrolls are where they should be, out in the
open under scholarly scrutiny. This year has also seen the first accessible
translation and commentary by Professors Robert Eisenmann and Michael Wise,
entitled The Dead Sea Scrolls Uncovered. Unfortunately, their own theories
on the texts' significance are not reliable.
Most readers may well wonder why this continuing battle matters, except to
specialists. It depends on who you are. Many people, but especially Jews,
are intrigued to discover yet more variety in the Judaism of the years from
c150 BC to 50 AD.
We cannot talk of orthodoxy or a single way, despite older textbooks on the
subject. The sect in the scrolls were neither Pharisees nor Sadducees. Its
members lived in bitter hatred of the existing temple's hierarchy, although
they sent offerings to the temple itself and hoped for a replacement. Their
calendar was eccentric; their view of history was lopsided; they studied
horoscopes and astrology and aspired to heavenly visions; they called fellow
Jews 'sons of darkness'. They also ruled that leaders must retire at 60
because God then enfeebled man's intelligence, and that no member should
deal with outsiders without charging a price.
Despite these sensible rulings, the keenest members probably led a life
quite like the routine of the first monks. They had a lively hope of the end
of the world and a sense that the spirit was among them.
Christians, of course, need to pay attention. Far too much polemic has been
wasted on the belief that the scrolls will somehow 'undermine' Christianity
or make it seem 'unoriginal'. If the texts really do call people 'sons of
God', so do bits of the Old Testament. Certainly, they allude to messiahs,
but we always knew that Jesus was not the only candidate; a recent claim
that one messiah in a scroll is said to have been 'pierced' in the side has
collapsed on scrutiny.
On a calm view, it is well-known (though some scholars, especially in
Germany, have sometimes forgotten) that the first Christians were Jews and
that their originality was simply that they believed the messiah had come as
Jesus and risen from the dead. Their impact did not lie in entirely new
titles or language. Parallels are to be expected, but the emphasis was
different.
The scrolls do add to the historical context in which early Christianity
also emerged. Among their sect, there was mention of a special meal of bread
and new wine, to be repeated in due course with the messiah; there was a new
covenant and a new 12 tribes of Israel; the end was imminent and a spirit
was active. There was no idea of redemption, and whatever their great
teacher of righteousness may have taught, he did not use parables or work
miracles or proclaim a kingdom.
As for the messiah, the scrolls seem to recognise two whose identities are
very obscure. Odd bits of the Christian epistle to the Hebrews do look less
odd when seen beside bits of these texts. It is also fun to wonder if wild
John the Baptist had an earlier connection with them, although that cannot
be known. The closest link with Christianity lies in the rather similar
imagery of early Christians - who were possibly celibate - in the first
Syriac texts surviving from the Middle East. Again, it is certainly not
known if some of the sectarians of the scrolls had simply converted to
Christianity.
For those who are neither Jews nor Christians, there is a reassuring moral.
Members of the sect believed that their doctrine was absolutely infallible,
that the world would shortly end with their triumph over everyone else, that
their history could be extracted from existing scriptures and that the end
would begin in 40 years. It is a point of the highest interest that their
texts of our Old Testament books are earlier, and often rather different, to
those printed in conventional Hebrew bibles. This discovery is extremely
significant for the textual history of the so-called word of God.
There is another conclusion, hardly less satisfying. Despite their
self-proclaimed infallibility they were wrong on every single point. The
scriptures did not refer to them at all; they mistook the end; they never
triumphed; they got it utterly wrong. After the war with Rome in 70 AD, they
and their history disappeared. Mercifully, the 'sons of darkness' won.
At dawn and dusk, every day, members of the sect would pray, supposedly in
the company of the angels whose singing they joined with their own. 'Hark,
the herald angels sing . . .' When I sing these Christian words each year as
an atheist, I also remember those singers in the Dead Sea wilderness,
convinced of the angelic presence, yet utterly mistaken in what they
believed to be infallibly known.
Further reading
G. Vermes, The Dead Sea Scrolls in English, 3rd ed. 1987 (Penguin). Pounds
7.99
G. Vermes, The Dead Sea Scrolls: Qumran in Perspective, 1982 (SCM Press).
Pounds 10.50
Robert Eisenman and Michael Wise, The Dead Sea Scrolls Uncovered, 1992
(Element). Pounds 14.95
Michael Baigent and Richard Leigh, The Dead Sea Scrolls Deception, 1991
(Corgi). Pounds 4.99
JA Fitzmyer, Responses to 101 Questions in the Dead Sea Scrolls, 1990 (G.
Chapman). Pounds 8.99
G. Vermes and M. Goodman, The Essenes According to the Classical Sources,
1992 (JSOT Press, Sheffield). Pounds 16.50
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-400</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Shop centres report last-minute boost
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL BUCKLEY, IAN HAMILTON FAZEY, CHRIS TIGHE and JAMES BUXTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SALES at the Bullring in Birmingham
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
one of Britain's biggest shoping centres - were expected yesterday to end
the Christmas period only about 2 per cent below last year. A surge in the
number of shoppers across the country provided an unexpected Christmas bonus
for retailers.
Bullring manager Mr Richard Cooke said that Christmas trading had got off to
a disappointing start in November and early December.
Many retailers said that more shoppers than normal had saved their buying
until the final week. In most parts, shops and shopping centres said they
expected results to be at worst similar to last year, and perhaps better.
Mr Grenville Peacock, chief executive of the Bentalls chain of stores in
south-east England, said large numbers of shoppers were out yesterday,
although average transactions might turn out to be down between 10 per cent
and 15 per cent compared with last year.
Central London was busier than it had been all year, although a series of
bomb scares closed Tube stations around Oxford Street.
Mr Andrew Bauer, manager of Whiteleys shopping centre in Bayswater, west
London, said there was 'a heck of a lot of last-minute buying going on. We
opened early today and thank goodness we did. People were waiting to get
in.'
He said shoppers were targeting their spending very carefully, having spent
weeks window-shopping.
Mr Alan Witkin, chairman of the tenants' association at Brent Cross shopping
centre in north London, said a 'Christmas finale' was under way, with car
parks and shops full.
In northern England, the news was even better. Mr Peter Hills, head of
marketing at Manchester Chamber of Commerce, said there had been a big surge
of business. Two days had been lost because of the IRA bombings in early
December, 'but there has been a tremendous recovery, with several record
days', he said.
Mr Bill Russell, assistant manager of Liverpool's Clayton Square shopping
centre, said trade was going well. 'Liverpool has had economic problems for
many years, but Merseyside people really enjoy Christmas and always go out
and spend on their children.'
Across the Pennines, Mr Peter Coles-Johnson, chief executive of Leeds
Chamber of Commerce, was more cautious. 'This year will be a record for
local spending, but then inflation usually ensures that such records are
broken year by year anyway,' he said. 'However, I think there will prove to
have been a genuine increase.'
Mr John Taylor, chief executive of Sheffield Chamber of Trade, said many
people had waited until Monday before starting Christmas shopping in
earnest. 'In the past, sales started picking up at least a week earlier.
Since then, sales have been increasing steadily in the city centre.'
A similar surge was reported in north-east England, although bomb scares
also damped trade in Newcastle. At Eldon Square, Europe's largest city
centre shopping centre, Mr Gordon Allanson, manager, said the surge meant
turnover this year might be slightly ahead of last, rather than between 1
per cent and 2 per cent behind, as he had predicted only 10 days ago.
At nearby Bainbridge, one of the largest department stores in the John Lewis
Partnership, managing director Mr Brian Forbes Turner said this year's trend
towards shoppers seeking value for money and selecting smaller purchases had
continued, but in greater volume in recent days.
Last week, the store finished 1 per cent down on the same week last year.
Saturday sales were well up, however, and this week was proving strong.
China, glassware, jewellery, leather goods, knitwear, lingerie and
computer-related items were all doing well.
At Gateshead's MetroCentre, Mr John Bryson, manager, said the late, strong
turnout of shoppers meant turnover was likely to be up on last year. 'The
British nation has gone on holiday, for a long holiday,' Mr Bryson said.
'They're spending to a surprising degree so close to Christmas. The way
things have gone in the first 2 1/2 days before Christmas has cheered
everybody up.'
Edinburgh stores have had a mixed Christmas because of the EC summit on
December 11 and 12, normally one of the busiest pre-Christmas shopping
weekends.
Mr Andrew Douglas Miller, general manager of Jenners, a privately-owned
department store in Prince's Street, said the summit cost the store business
it might never recoup. 'There was a massive police presence and people were
advised not to bring their cars into town, so many didn't go Christmas
shopping. Trade didn't pick up until about last Thursday. This week,
however, is a lot better than the equivalent week of last year.'
Clydesdale, Scotland's largest independent electrical retail chain, said it
had had a good Christmas in an economy where the effects of recession have
been less dire than in the south. 'We're doing remarkably well compared with
last year,' Mr John Downie, managing director, said.
House of Fraser, which operates eight stores in Scotland, said Christmas
turnover was 21 per cent up on last year. 'Christmas has arrived north of
the border. Our managers are wearing their broadest smiles in a long time.'
Reporting by Neil Buckley, Ian Hamilton Fazey, Chris Tighe and James Buxton
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-401</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Board shake-up at Welsh agency
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY MORETON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Welsh Office has announced a shake-up on the board of the heavily
criticised Welsh Development Agency.
After the decision of Dr Gwyn Jones, chairman since 1988, to resign in the
new year, Dr Roy Bichan, non-executive deputy chairman of Simon Robertson
and a consultant to Simon Engineering, has been appointed deputy chairman.
He replaces Sir Donald Walters, who will remain on the board.
Dr Bichan, 50, is chairman of the Welsh Industrial Development Advisory
Board and chairman of the north Wales branch of the CBI. He was chairman of
the Llandudno-based Robertson Group until its takeover by Simon.
The agency, founded in 1976, was severely criticised over financial
procedures by the Commons public accounts committee on December 14. MPs
queried redundancy payments to former employees, reimbursement of car and
petrol expenses to directors, a grant paid to the chairman and a pensions
payment.
Mr Robert Sheldon, Labour chairman of the committee, said there had been
'great laxity' in the agency's affairs.
Three other members of the board whose contracts expire at the end of this
year - Mr Colyn Gardner, former chairman of the DC Gardner group, Mr Tim
Rees, a senior partner in Cardiff with accountants Coopers and Lybrand, and
Mr David Roberts, former chairman of Pilkington Brothers' new business
division - are not being reappointed.
Mr David Hunt, Welsh secretary, said yesterday replacements would be made
after the appointment of a new chairman. 'Once this has been decided I will
wish to consult the chairman about two vacancies which remain."
Mr Hunt is thought likely to look hard at the possibility of appointing a
second woman to the board. Ms Pamela Kirby, managing director of Astra
Pharmaceuticals, the British end of a Swedish producer of ethical drugs, was
the first woman on the board when appointed in December 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-402</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Sales of new cars in December up nearly 30%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEW CAR sales soared by nearly 30 per cent in the first 20 days of this
month compared with last December. They provided much the firmest indication
so far that one of the steepest slides in the industry's post-war history
may be coming to an end.
As the month's sales reached the 60,000 mark - up from just over 46,000 in
the first 20 days of December 1991 - one of the industry's most respected
analysts said that conditions were emerging for a 'very much more rapid'
market recovery next year than virtually anyone in the industry had
bargained for.
Prof Garel Rhys, professor of motor industry economics at Cardiff Business
School, said sales might recover next year to 1.7m. That would compare with
1.59m in 1991 and what is expected to be an almost identical level this
year.
As recently as a month ago, some manufacturers and even the Society of Motor
Manufacturers and Traders had been predicting a further fall this year, to
1.55m units or fewer.
The society described the sales upsurge yesterday as 'exciting' and said it
seemed 'to confirm the trend established since the (October) motor show that
UK car sales are set on a recovery'. Prof Rhys, who is motor industry
adviser to the Commons trade and industry committee, emphasised that he was
not making a firm forecast that sales would rise above 1.7m. Much would
depend on a return of confidence in the economy.
'Last year, the so-called green shoots of recovery were subsequently killed
off by frost,' he said. 'But it does seem that the latest ones will survive.
All we need now is a change of sentiment. That should become apparent by the
second quarter and then the speed of the recovery could surprise us all.'
His calculations that the market might rise once more above 1.7m are based
on recovery rates from previous recessions and the growth in the total car
population.
In 1985, the 6 per cent sales increase was the highest recorded for a first
year of recovery, representing nearly 90,000 vehicles. That, though,
represented only a 0.43 per cent increase in the car population of 18m.
The car population has now grown to 23m. If the industry comes out of
recession with sales expanding on the same scale, Prof Rhys says, that would
mean a sales increase of 98,000 next year. Yet the 1985 recovery did not
begin until several months into the year.
'In addition,' Prof Rhys said, 'there is a huge amount of pent-up demand in
the form of overdue replacement of cars bought in the record sales year of
1989, when 2.3m cars were sold.' This month's surge follows a year-on-year
increase of 6.3 per cent in November. New car registrations have been higher
than a year ago in four of the past five months.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-403</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / The shows go on
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A STRIKE by theatre technicians that threatened to close theatres in
London's West End over the Christmas holiday was averted after a meeting at
the conciliation service Acas last night.
The Society of West End Theatre Producers agreed to raise its pay offer from
the previous sticking point of 2.5 per cent to an immediate 3 per cent and
then up to 4 per cent in six months' time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-404</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Water company price agreement
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
NORTH WEST Water yesterday reached agreement with Ofwat, the water industry
regulator, to hold back price increases for the years to March 1994 and
March 1995.
In September, Ofwat told 19 of the 33 water companies of England and Wales
that it wanted the benefit of falls in construction costs to be passed on to
customers. North West is the last of the 19 to reach agreement with Ofwat.
North West's water prices will rise in 1993-94 by 4.7 per cent above the
rate of inflation, compared with the annual rise of 5 per cent above the
rate of inflation set for the company at privatisation. In 1994-95 its
prices will rise by 4 per cent on top of inflation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-405</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Setback for fur trade opponents
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BANK accounts of Lynx, the animal rights group that campaigned against
fur farming, were yesterday ordered to be frozen by the High Court. The
order came after Lynx lost a libel case and was unable to pay damages and
costs.
A High Court jury decided that the group, in literature circulated to MPs,
had wrongly accused Swalesmoor fur farm, near Halifax, West Yorkshire.
Damages of Pounds 40,000 were awarded, along with costs put at over Pounds
100,000.
Mr Mark Glover, a founding director of Lynx, said it expected a winding-up
order to be sought against it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-406</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / OFT will 'look into' computer game costs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD DONKIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE OFFICE of Fair Trading yesterday confirmed that it was looking into
prices charged by the big video game manufacturers, but said it had not yet
decided whether to launch a formal investigation, Richard Donkin writes.
The OFT is under pressure from consumer groups concerned about the prices
charged for video games by Sega and Nintendo - which dominate the Pounds
400m-a-year UK video games market - at a time when video game sales are at
the forefront of the Christmas buying spree.
Check it Out, the Consumer Association's magazine for teenagers, said
concerns about video game prices dominated its mailbag.
Sega and Nintendo sell combinations of hardware and software retailing at
anything between Pounds 100 and Pounds 150.
Hardware prices have been falling in recent weeks, forcing down margins for
retailers, who have been prepared to take their main profits on the
accompanying software. Even software margins are running in the mid 20s per
cent in many stores, lower than on most toys.
One large UK retailer said it would welcome an investigation. It said
software prices were artificially high.
Mr Stanley Kalms, chairman of Dixons, the electrical retailer, said the toys
were 'a source of enormous amusement and entertainment and probably better
value than an awful lot of other toys that probably don't get through
Christmas day'.
Sega Europe and and Nintendo both said they had not been contacted by the
OFT and could not comment.
Sega added that it believed the outcome of any investigation would 'reassure
customers that the company is acting entirely properly in pricing as in
other matters'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-407</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Surprise rise in savings may threaten upturn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SHARP rise in personal savings reported yesterday has underlined the depth
of consumer resistance to substantial increases in spending, a development
that may hold back an overall economic upturn.
Britain's economic weakness was also underlined by the decline in wages and
salaries in the third quarter of this year compared with the previous three
months - the first time that those items have seen two successive
quarter-on-quarter drops since government records started in 1955.
Total personal disposable income saw a modest rise between the second and
third quarters. That was partly because of redundancy and dividend payments.
The Central Statistical Office said the savings ratio - personal savings as
a percentage of personal income, less income tax, social security
contributions and other financial transfers - climbed to 12.3 per cent in
the third quarter.
The seasonally adjusted figure was the highest since late 1984, and came
after savings ratios of 11.4 per cent in both the first and second quarters.
It surprised the City, which had expected a third-quarter savings ratio of
about 10 per cent.
Wages and salaries as measured in current prices, unadjusted for inflation,
fell by 0.2 per cent between the second and third quarters to Pounds
74.58bn. That was after a 0.7 per cent drop between the first and second
three-month periods.
The fall in wages and salaries was partly because of falling employment. It
may also have been a reflection of a high Pounds 75.29bn figure for wages
and salaries in the first quarter.
The drop between the second and third quarters in wages and salaries was
offset by an increase in non-wage income and reduced income tax
contributions. That led to personal disposal income growing between the
second and third quarters by 2.2 per cent to Pounds 110.66bn. After
adjusting for inflation, real personal disposable income grew between those
periods by 1.4 per cent. Compared with the corresponding period last year,
it increased in the third quarter by 2.5 per cent.
The CSO said companies' gross trading profits (after deducting stock
appreciation) came to Pounds 19.76bn in the third quarter, little changed on
the second quarter.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-408</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Leading figure in turbulent car industry: Obituary - Sir
George Turnbull
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SIR George Turnbull, who died on Tuesday aged 66, was a central figure in
the ambitious but unsuccessful attempt to re-organise and modernise the
British-owned car manufacturers in the 1960s and 1970s.
As managing director of the Austin Morris division of British Leyland from
1968 to 1973, he brought remarkable qualities of leadership, stamina and
determination to what was probably the most demanding job in British
industry. He began the much-needed reform of work practices and
manufacturing methods, but completion would have required more time, more
cash and more ruthlessness at the top of the parent company.
Turnbull was immersed in the Midlands motor industry from the age of 15,
when he joined Standard Motor Company (later Standard Triumph) as an
apprentice; under the company's sponsorship he took an engineering degree at
Birmingham University.
Standard was one of the weakest of the so-called Big Five, the others being
British Motor Corporation, Ford, Vauxhall and Rootes. After flirting with
several possible merger partners, Standard was acquired in 1961 by Leyland,
the commercial vehicle manufacturer, whose chairman, Sir Henry Spurrier,
wanted to expand out of his traditional markets and to offer his dealers, as
Daimler-Benz could, a full range from trucks to cars.
It was the start of a long and ultimately disastrous association between
Leyland and the car industry. It also marked the beginning of a close
relationship between Turnbull, soon to become general manager of Standard
Triumph, and Donald (later Lord) Stokes, the dynamic engineer-salesman who
became managing director of Leyland after Spurrier's death in 1963.
After absorbing Rover in 1966, Stokes made his boldest move two years later
when, with the strong encouragement of the Labour government, he merged
Leyland with BMC to form British Leyland Motor Corporation. For all his lack
of big-company experience, Turnbull was an obvious choice to run the largest
and weakest part of the group, volume car manufacturing.
His achievement in rehabilitating Standard Triumph had been impressive, but
the task at Austin Morris was of a different order. Outdated facilities,
anarchic labour relations and management inertia had led to shortcomings in
quality and reliability that became glaringly obvious as import competition
began to bite.
To tackle those troubles, Turnbull assembled an able team of executives. His
straightforward approach and skills as motivator and communicator won strong
staff support. Improvements were made in product quality and labour
relations.
Internal weaknesses at Austin Morris were compounded by uncertain direction
in the parent company. There was an unresolved debate between the
centralisers, who wanted to recast British Leyland as an integrated company
in the mould of Ford or General Motors, and the decentralisers, who felt the
culture of the group and its constituent businesses called for a small head
office delegating power to largely autonomous divisions.
Turnbull was in the latter school and it was the apparent victory of the
centralisers in 1973 that led to his resignation.
His skills were soon in demand outside the UK. Between 1974 and 1978 he
worked with Hyundai in Korea and Iran National Motor Company in Iran before
coming back to the UK as chairman of Talbot, the former Rootes business
which, after an unhappy period with Chrysler, had passed into the control of
Peugeot of France. Turnbull restored morale and saw through, with
characteristic courage and firmness, a drastic contraction of capacity
including the closure of the Linwood plant in Renfrewshire.
For his final career, from 1984 until his retirement through ill health last
year, he turned to a very different business, as managing director and then
chairman of Inchcape, the international trading group. His overseas
marketing experience and team-building skills proved well suited to the
transformation of Inchcape from its imperial traditions into a specialised
international services group.
With about 30 trading companies operating in 60 countries, selling products
as diverse as cars and tea, Inchcape daunted even the many predators who
sized it up for takeover at the end of the 1970s, attracted by its abysmal
financial performance. When Turnbull joined Inchcape, Sir David Orr was
chairman. But in 1986 the two men switched jobs to give Turnbull complete
authority to put his strategy for change into operation.
He found most of the Inchape companies were fundamentally good businesses
but in need of focus and control, and management required strengthening. In
one of the most dramatic and rapid of corporate rehabilitations, he gave
Inchcape a clear focus, reduced to 10 the number of businesses in which it
was involved, and expanded the group's European operations. He drove profits
to a record level and, two years after he joined, the Stock Exchange value
of Inchcape had doubled.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-409</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Animal rights group cash frozen
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BANK accounts of Lynx, the animal rights group that campaigned against
fur farming, were yesterday ordered to be frozen by the High Court, after it
lost a libel case and was unable to pay damages and costs.
A High Court jury decided that the group, in literature circulated to MPs,
had wrongly accused Swalesmoor fur farm, near Halifax, West Yorkshire.
Damages were awarded of Pounds 40,000, along with costs put at over Pounds
100,000.
Mr Mark Glover, a founding director of Lynx, said it was expecting a
winding-up order to be sought against it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-410</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Commerce creeps into the corporate card: Clay Harris reviews
the good, the bad and the jovial in seasonal greetings from a range of
companies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLAY HARRIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SENDERS and recipients of corporate Christmas cards, take note: all European
Community cards must be harmonised by 1997. That, anyway, is the message
distributed in the interest of seasonal cheer by the accounting firm
Blackstone Franks.
Judging by this year's crop of corporate cards, harmony is a long way off in
Britain alone, much less the rest of Europe. In choice of subject, and in
addressing the thorny issue of how commercial a card should be, there is a
healthy diversity.
On the eve of the single market, Europe is on the mind of many senders -
sometimes humorously, as with Blackstone Franks and the British Clothing
Industry Association's Euro Snowman which 'must not be taller than 1.8975
metres' - but often mundanely, with the 12 EC members' flags displayed as
tree ornaments or presents. Panasonic Europe plants the flags in a map that
shows almost all the world, except Japan, its home.
The Met Office, more originally, offers a weather map of north-west Europe
showing conditions on Christmas Day in 1892. More senders this year appear
to include a commercial message on their cards.
It can be blunt in the extreme. Opinion Leader Research and VandenBurg
Public Relations emblazon their name or initials on the front without a hint
of the festive season. Few in the motor industry forgo an opportunity to
plug cars (Citroen's card looks like last year's model).
Westland has Father Christmas in an EH101 helicopter. Seagram London
illustrates 'Get into the spirit of Christmas' with bottles of its brands
hanging on a Christmas tree, while Guinness, showing a pint, proclaims: 'Not
everyone's dreaming of a white Christmas.' For his own card, Sir Antony
Tennant, the company's retiring chairman, sent a painting of Hop Pickers
from the Guinness collection.
Perhaps campaigning organisations can be allowed some leeway. Through deft
editing of A Christmas Carol, the Maxwell/AGB Pension Schemes Contributors
Association lets Dickens make its point about the ghost that still haunts
the pensioners. Camra has a go at changes in the brewing industry, adding
wishes for 'a concentrated new year'.
But Northumbrian Environmental Management surely should have drawn the line
somewhere short of featuring Father Christmas delivering a sleigh-full of
parcels labelled 'liquid treatment', 'clinical incineration' and the like.
Its sibling company, Northumbrian Water, reproduced a sylvan view of the
Sunderland Bridge sewage works.
The London Docklands Development Corporation keeps up the thread of its
'Knocker' and 'Docker' ad campaign. The present-giving taste of the former,
of course, makes us shudder - 'five golden 'Eurovision greats' albums . . .
two turtle neck jumpers (nylon)' - while the latter is bang up-to-date, at
least to the late 1980s: 'five golden autumn leaves (pressed) . . . three
French hens (free range)'.
The Financial Times is in no position to condemn commercialism. Its card -
which has sparked a lively internal debate - shows a robin in snow that has
covered all but a pink corner of the FT.
Some of the most successful cards use subtle allusions to the sender's line
of business, literally in the case of Deutsche Bundesbahn's railway in the
snow (pictured). The tree-top fairy (also pictured) casting a familiar legal
shadow is an attractive, clever and distinctive card that does not overtly
push the name of the sender, solicitors Lewis Silkin.
A company as rich as De Beers has another solution. Its card features a
Raoul Dufy painting which the company commissioned for a 1951 advertising
campaign in the US.
An industrial process itself can be made into art. Outokumpu Zinc's card
features a photograph of zinc casting that could be a rushing stream in the
Arctic spring.
Thankfully, there are fewer cards from the fringes of blasphemy this year.
An unfortunate exception comes from the advertising agency Grey London. The
Immaculate Concept, a back-of-the-envelope sketch for an advert, concludes
with 'cut to pack shot' showing baby Jesus in cot. The best religious card
was the wood engraving (pictured) from the Design Council. But the US
investment bank Goldman Sachs shows how good a purely secular card without
any seasonal reference can be, reproducing a painting from its collection by
the British artist Keith Milow.
One way of making a card stand out from rows of cherubim is to give the
recipient something to do. This year one could connect the dots with
Phildrew Ventures, punch out a Christmas tree with ITV, make a turkey pop up
with the PR agency Paternoster Partnership, open the windows on an 'advert
calendar' to reveal names of FCA's clients or don red and green specs to
appreciate the 3-D Father Christmas bursting from a Mills &amp; Allen poster
hoarding.
Finland's paper industry association offers a flimsy disc which, when played
with a gramophone needle, offers 'compliments of the season to all Finnpap
customers wherever in the world you may be'.
Charity cards are now the rule, but PowerGen shows that its support of the
children's books collection at the National Library for the Blind is not
just a gesture. Its greeting is also printed in Braille.
Hartstone Group has it all ways. Its card promotes Happy Kids on the front,
notes inside that royalties on the sale of these products support the
National Association for the Prevention of Cruelty to Children and then says
it will send no further cards.
Beauty is in the eye of the beholder nowhere more than in Christmas cards.
But this beholder has had enough.
Enough Impressionists. Even Old Masters begin to pall unless they are
reproduced as large and sumptuously as those from commodity broker Brandeis
and management consultants Arthur D. Little.
Enough bad puns from public-relations companies.
And enough generic winter scenes of London, especially of Ludgate Hill with
the now-removed railway viaduct. But focusing on a particular corner, as
College Hill Associates does with its history of the City street in which
Dick Whittington is buried, can make a recipient turn again.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-411</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Five BR routes are set tougher Charter targets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD TOMKINS, Transport Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ONLY FIVE of British Rail's 45 groups of services
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
which it calls 'routes' - will be set higher standards under the Passenger's
Charter next year, BR announced yesterday.
That follows BR's poor performance in 1992, during which a quarter of its
routes performed badly enough for regular users to qualify for discounts on
renewal of their season tickets. All the routes facing tougher targets are
Network SouthEast services, some of which were set comparatively easy
standards this year and beat them by a comfortable margin.
The five routes are Chiltern, North London, West Anglia, Thames and the
London Tilbury &amp; Southend. All face targets demanding higher standards of
punctuality and Thames also faces more ambitious reliability targets.
BR's InterCity sector has fallen so far short of its targets in 1992 that it
has asked for easier ones next year. Its request has been rejected.
BR therefore enters the new year with the same standards as this year,
requiring it to run at least 99 per cent of scheduled trains and to get at
least 90 per cent of them to their destination on time.
Mr Chris Green, InterCity's managing director, said some routes were not
playing on a level pitch. 'The West Coast route needs the total renewal of
much of its ageing infrastructure before it can achieve these ideal
targets,' he explained.
Regional Railways, which has failed to meet its targets on five out of 23
routes this year, also starts the new year with targets unchanged.
Sir Bob Reid, BR chairman, said: 'The fact that we have not met all our
standards shows that they are demanding ones, particularly in some areas. We
aim to use the resources we have to secure continuous improvement.'
The Central Transport Consultative Committee, the rail users' watchdog, said
it was pleased to see some Network SouthEast targets moving upwards.
'However, the committee is concerned that some of the targets are still not
set at the right level,' it said.
Letters, Page 7
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-412</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Japan's economic woes compounded by political disarray:
Tokyo is playing to an overseas audience
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BEFORE THE Japanese government halved its growth forecast for this year,
most consumers knew something was definitely wrong with the economy - for
the past few weeks they have been flooded with retailers' catalogues
offering deep discounts well ahead of the traditional New Year sales.
The delay in cutting the growth estimate from 3.5 to 1.6 per cent partly
shows the government is playing to an international audience as much as to
Japanese consumers more inclined to believe retailers' promises than the
government's optimistic economic projections.
The US is pressing Japan to prove it is stimulating the domestic economy and
making a contribution to international recovery. Meanwhile, the Finance
Ministry, now making final adjustments to the 1993-1994 budget, confessed
spending would be limited by a fall in tax revenue, leaving the government's
forecast of 3.3 per cent growth next year open to mockery even from within
the ruling Liberal Democratic Party.
Mr Hiroshi Mitsuzuka, head of an LDP faction, suggested the forecasts were
made 'for another country, not our own'; the Association of Corporate
Executives said the growth target already seemed out of reach.
The budget draft calls for a 0.2 per cent increase in total spending, but a
4.8 per cent increase in public works outlays, which the Finance Ministry
hopes will encourage a recovery. But most private economists and Mr Kiichi
Miyazawa, the prime minister, believe another spending package and income
tax cuts are necessary.
Even so, the economy is unlikely to grow by the estimated 3.3 per cent next
year. Private growth forecasts range between 2.3 and 2.8 per cent, and a few
Japanese economists expect no more than 2 per cent, believing things will
get worse before getting better.
Personal consumption is especially weak and corporate fixed investment,
estimated to be down 3.8 per cent this year, is still falling. Department
store sales are about 5 per cent down on a year earlier and shipments of
personal computers in October were 29 per cent lower than in the same month
last year.
Another sign of the continuing slowdown was a 0.5 per cent contraction in
money supply growth last month, against a year earlier. The Bank of Japan
argues the decline was due more to a fall in demand for new lending than to
banks' inability to lend, but it is clear these institutions, burdened by an
ever larger pile of non-performing loans, have become extremely risk-averse.
The banks are scheduled to launch a loan and land buying agency next month,
but it will speed the write-off of bad loans rather than stimulating the
ailing property market, the prime cause of their problems. Mr Miyazawa has
hinted that public funds might eventually be used to support the banking
system, though that would require a decisiveness not seen in his first year
of rule.
Some of the confusion over economic policy follows this year's political
scandals. Finance Ministry officials have generally relied on the political
guidance of Mr Noboru Takeshita, the former prime minister, in drafting
budgets, but he has been sidelined by scandal. The influence of Mr Shin
Kanemaru, until recently the 'godfather' of Japanese politics, was
frequently sought in settling sensitive financial issues.
The LDP is still in disarray, with talk of new parties and the present
factions trying to poach new members, but the government will need to find a
new policy fixer. A forecast Dollars 135bn (Pounds 88.8bn) trade surplus
next year is likely to create problems with the US and EC, while squeezing
tax cuts past the Finance Ministry will need deft negotiation.
Having got this year's figures very wrong, the Economic Planning Agency has
declined to say when a recovery will begin. It admits no sudden upsurge will
occur in consumer demand or capital spending. The EPA insists Japanese
companies face a cyclical rather than a structural downturn; the agency
expects little rise in unemployment above the present 2.2 per cent.
But signs exist that Japanese manufacturers, with their third year of
declining profits, will lay off employees if demand keeps weakening. Car
makers have transferred office staff to production lines and reduced
part-time working, yet car sales keep falling. Production in November was
down 9.3 per cent on a year earlier. Over the next year, the government may
face not just lower-than-forecast growth, but also higher-than-imagined
jobless figures.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-413</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Boost for Maxwell pensioners
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TRUSTEES agreed yesterday to a mechanism that will release money to some of
the Maxwell pensioners from the Common Investment Fund, in which pensioners'
assets from the different companies in the empire were pooled.
Law Debenture Trust Corporation, trustee to the Maxwell Communication
pension plan, has been authorised to remove Pounds 460,000 from the CIF as
the first of a number of with-drawals.
The agreement does not affect some of the other Maxwell pension funds, which
have contested claims to the money held in the CIF, at present valued at
about Pounds 148m.
The action represents a breakthrough in negotiations when the liquid assets
available to the plan - known as the 'staff scheme' - were running out. It
will free the scheme from having to draw on the government's emergency fund,
created to help fill the Pounds 400m gap left by money taken from the
Maxwell pension funds.
Mr Patrick Harrex of Law Debenture confirmed that agreement in principle had
been reached with the other Maxwell pension trustees to allow the staff
scheme to withdraw money. About half of the initial amount will go to
pensioners and the rest towards professional fees.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-414</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Palestinian leader calls for someone to save peace talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Faisal Husseini, the senior Palestinian leader in the occupied
territories, yesterday appealed for 'someone to do something' to save Middle
East peace talks. He did so as Israeli troops shot dead two Palestinians and
wounded 42 in the Gaza Strip during protests against the deportation last
week of 415 alleged Islamic fundamentalist militants.
The Palestine Liberation Organisation will today call on Syria, Lebanon and
Jordan to join it in suspending negotiations with Israel until the deportees
are allowed to return - something which Israel has flatly refused to
consider - at a special meeting on the expulsions hosted by Egypt in Cairo.
Mr Husseini warned that the PLO would consider a renewed commitment to armed
struggle if Israel did not move to restore an atmosphere conducive to
'productive negotiations'. Mrs Hanan Ashrawi, the Palestinian spokeswoman,
repeated at a Jerusalem press conference that the deportations had dealt a
'death blow' to the talks.
But Mr Husseini made it clear his colleagues in the Palestinian delegation
were anxious not to see the 14-month-old negotiations collapse.
Mr Yitzhak Rabin, the prime minister, was urged by several ministers
yesterday to balance the deportations by opening a direct dialogue with the
PLO. At present, formal participation in negotiations by the PLO is barred
by Israel. Ministers quoted Mr Rabin as saying: 'There is no change in
Israeli's policies vis-a-vis the PLO.'
The despairing tone of local pro-PLO leaders was underscored by the death of
two brothers in Gaza, shot dead at their home in Khan Younis refugee camp.
Their deaths brought to 11 the number of Palestinians killed, including at
least two children, in protest riots since the expulsions, ordered last
Wednesday after a spate of violence by Islamic militants in which six
Israeli soldiers were killed.
Fierce clashes erupted in Gaza after it was opened to Israel for the first
time in more than two weeks.
The deportees said yesterday they were running short of food and water as
they remained trapped for the sixth day in freezing conditions in a Lebanese
no-man's land between Lebanese and Israeli forces where Israel dumped them
last Thursday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-415</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Major calls meeting on policy plans
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR has called a new year meeting of Downing Street policymakers
to relaunch the government's domestic agenda after the crisis management of
the past few months.
Members of the prime minister's policy unit have been asked to prepare a
series of broad-ranging policy papers covering plans for every Whitehall
department for a two-day 'seminar' at Chequers starting on January 10.
The talks will be attended by Sir Norman Fowler, the Conservative party
chairman, as well as by all Mr Major's principal advisers. They reflect an
acknowledgement that the September sterling crisis and the government's
subsequent preoccupation with Europe derailed its domestic agenda.
The aim will be to develop a range of new policies to give substance to Mr
Major's manifesto commitment to promote ownership, choice and opportunity.
The seminar will follow the prime minister's signal this week that he wants
the March Budget to focus on increased aid for industry, particularly to
encourage investment and exports.
Senior Whitehall officials acknowledge that there will be no scope in the
Budget to reduce personal taxes and that Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor,
may be forced to raise the tax burden by extending the scope of value added
tax.
That realisation has given added urgency to the search for popular but
inexpensive policy initiatives to demonstrate that the government has not
lost its way.
Downing Street advisers have so far been focusing on plans for new education
and training initiatives for young people aged 16 to 19; for greater
co-operation with manufacturing industry; for another burst of deregulation;
and for new Citizen's Charter initiatives.
The seminar will range across every Whitehall department, reviewing
short-term and medium-term plans for housing, social security, health and
transport as well as proposals for a radical overhaul of the police and
prison services.
The Chequers meeting will be followed in subsequent weeks with a series of
cabinet-level meetings to set out the programme.
Mr Major has already announced plans for a cabinet seminar to pave the way
for a new drive towards deregulation. Every senior minister has been asked
also to produce new proposals to give momentum to the Citizen's Charter.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-416</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Bethlehem Christians have little to celebrate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BETHLEHEM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A LARGE group of Christians from around the world will gather at midnight
tonight in Bethlehem to celebrate the birth of Jesus in the hilltop Judaean
town. But for the Christians for whom Bethlehem is home, there is not much
to celebrate - especially this Christmas.
The Palestinian Christian community is subject, like all local Arabs, to the
harsh strictures of Israel's 25-year control of the West Bank town, and over
recent years, their long-standing majority in the area has been upset by a
fast growing Moslem population.
Bethlehem's Christians - who form the bulk of the 50,000-60,000 Palestinian
Christians still left among the 2m Arabs of the West Bank, Gaza and
Jerusalem - have rarely felt their predicament more sharply than during the
row over Israel's deportation of 415 alleged Islamic fundamentalist
militants to Lebanon.
Publicly, Christian leaders, including long-time Bethlehem mayor, Mr Elias
Freij, declared solidarity with Hamas, the radical Moslem organisation that
is strong locally and which was the main target of Israel's action.
Palestinian Christians have no love for Israel or its repressive occupation.
But privately, many Christians in the area fear Hamas, which is dedicated to
establishing an Islamic state in Palestine in which Christians fear they
would be in jeopardy.
'We are afraid,' said Suha, a young Greek Orthodox woman (the Greek Orthodox
and Roman Catholics form the two biggest churches among Palestinian
Christians). 'The Moslems don't like the Christians and they are stronger.'
It is important not to overstate the case. Mayor Freij points out that,
historically, Christians have played an important part in the Palestinian
nationalist movement. Mrs Hanan Ashrawi, the Palestinian spokeswoman at the
peace talks, is, for example, from the tiny Palestinian Anglican community.
Mayor Freij says he does not fear subjugation by Moslems in an independent
Palestinian state.
But he does not conceal his anxiety about the long-term vitality of the
local Christian community. 'Of all the towns in the world, Bethlehem is the
capital of the Christians. It should always have a Christian character and
influence. How that can be realised, I don't know,' he says.
Until the middle of this century, Bethlehem was little more than a large
village of low stone houses dominated by the bulky Church of the Nativity,
built over the supposed site of Christ's birth.
The predominantly Christian population of those days of 10,000 has been
transformed, however. Waves of Palestinian refugees crowding into the town
since Israel's foundation in 1948 and a steady drain of Christian emigration
have resulted today in Christians making up only 35,000 of the 100,000
population of Bethlehem and its traditionally Christian neighbours, Beit
Sahour and Beit Jalla. Since 1967, much land has also been taken over by a
rash of Jewish settlements.
Mayor Freij says emigration - which began in the last century under the
Ottoman Empire - has led to a population of 300,000 in the Americas whose
roots are in the Bethlehem area - many in South America.
Hannah, a Catholic woman, says frankly that she and her family feel both
squeezed and neglected. Her son was arrested by Israeli soldiers a few weeks
ago from their home at midnight. He was severely beaten and held for a week
before being released. But she is also frightened by what she says is a wave
of violent robberies of Christian households by local - Moslem - thieves.
'Nobody helps the Christians,' she says. 'We are unhappy. We are afraid
because we are very few. I want very much to go to America.'
Mayor Freij says Christians all over the world should respond by giving aid
to the Christians of the town. 'I'm very distressed that we are just a
forgotten people. I think every Christian in the world has a moral
obligation towards Bethlehem.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-417</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / France is ordered to quit China consulate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By YVONNE PRESTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BEIJING
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CHINA has ordered France to close its consulate in Guangzhou in protest at
the sale of 60 Mirage fighter aircraft to Taiwan.
France, which refuses to confirm the sale, said it regretted the decision.
China claims sovereignty over Taiwan and has always denounced weapons sales
to Taipei, threatening the countries supplying them with reprisals.
Jiang Enzhu, China's vice-minister of foreign affairs, said the sale had
seriously worsened bilateral relations.
By insisting on it 'in disregard of the strong objection of the Chinese
side, the French government has seriously infringed upon China's sovereignty
and security, interfered in China's internal affairs and obstructed and
jeopardised China's efforts to achieve peaceful reunification,' Jiang said.
'This is absolutely unacceptable to the Chinese side.'
The consulate has been ordered to close within one month, a move which could
affect French business interests in the fastest-growing economic region in
the world.
French companies fear their business in the pipeline, including the supply
of Airbus aircraft to Chinese airlines, could be cancelled. The French
company with the most to lose is Framatome, now completing its second
nuclear power station at Daya Bay. Framatome has been involved in active
talks to build two more reactors and Guangdong province may need up to 12
more plants by the year 2010.
The value to the French company Dassault of supplying Taiwan with Mirage
fighters and over 1,000 missiles is put at Pounds 2.47bn.
China's move against French business interests raises questions about
whether it will now feel compelled to take steps against the US. To win
defence industry votes during the presidential election campaign, Mr George
Bush authorised the sale to Taiwan of 150 F-16 jet fighters.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-418</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Observer: Recycling centre
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Not only is London the capital of the world's foreign exchange markets and
Europe's cultural scene, but it is also an important entrepot centre for
Christmas cracker jokes, one of the few industries where Britain still
maintains a world-class position.
Unfortunately, early reports from this year's crop of crackers indicate that
it has not been a vintage season. In case you haven't heard them, a few of
the more memorable follow:
What's the first thing to take when you're run down?
The number of the car.
How do you stop a herd of elephants charging?
Take away their credit cards
What do you call a blind reindeer?
No idea.
What wears a coat all winter and pants in the summer?
The dog.
Why is honey so expensive in Rio de Janeiro?
Because there's only one 'B' in Brazil.
'Mummy, are we poisonous,' asked the baby snake.
'Yes, dear, why do you ask?'
'Cos, I've just bitten my tongue.'
Where does a 200lb gorilla sit?
Anywhere it wants.
Two flies on a cornflake packet. 'Why are we running so fast?' asked one.
'Because it says tear along the dotted line,' says its mate.
Which were the first animals out of the ark?
The ones closest to the door.
To err is human, to forgive is not company policy.
Due to financial conditions, the light at the end of the tunnel will be
turned off until further notice.
Let's hope this is one prediction that will be proved wrong.
Happy Christmas.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-419</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Observer: No expense
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Choosing between this year's best-selling Christmas toys is proving to be
exceptionally difficult. Two years ago, Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles,
modestly priced by current standards at Pounds 4.99 upwards, won hands down.
But this year Sega and Nintendo video games systems, both at a rather more
substantial Pounds 129.99, are battling it out for prime position on the
parental cheque book stub.
Hamleys of Regent Street reports that Sega's Sonic, the high-speed hedgehog,
was just beating Nintendo's Mario the Brooklyn plumber, but 'it's virtually
neck and neck'. However, Thunderbirds, boosted by recent reruns of the
classic puppet series, are still popular, partly because parents buy them
for nostalgic reasons and partly because they only cost Pounds 3.99. . . .
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-420</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Observer: Remembrance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Christmas spirit is unlikely to get out of hand at Durham jail, judging
from this season's card from the governor and staff. Printed in no-nonsense
black and white, it features a sketch of Durham cathedral - seen through
bars.
The card comes complete with telephone number and corporate logo - a pair of
handcuffs . . .
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-421</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Observer: Taxing affairs
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Norman Lamont's financial affairs may have slipped out of the headlines, but
there is still interest in the accountancy world of how he will fill in his
income tax return.
According to Observer's tax expert, the payment of the chancellor's Pounds
23,000 legal bill for evicting the sex therapist from his London flat, would
almost certainly qualify as income on which he is subject to tax. This
includes the Pounds 4,700 of solicitors' fees paid by the Treasury and the
Pounds 18,414 supplied through an anonymous donation to Conservative Central
Office.
In the opinion of one senior tax consultant, the legislation is clear cut on
the subject - it should be declared on the chancellor's form P-11D. The 1988
Income and Corporation Taxes Act states that expenses are taxable unless the
taxpayer is 'obliged to lay out and expend money wholly, exclusively and
necessarily in the performance of the duties in respect of which' the fees
are paid. That includes payments made from official emoluments.
While Mr Lamont might claim - as the Treasury did for the Pounds 4,700
payment - that the costs partly related to his official position, it would
be difficult to argue that the eviction did not provide some personal
benefit unrelated to his official duties.
It does not matter that the Pounds 18,414 gift towards eviction costs was
not paid for by Mr Lamont's employer. Income tax would apply on any money
paid on his behalf by reason of his employment. Only if this money was a
gift purely on personal grounds and unrelated to Lamont's status as
chancellor would it be considered non-taxable.
The Inland Revenue never comments on the details of any individual
taxpayer's affairs and the Treasury remains mum insisting it's an 'an
entirely private matter'. Presumably, the chancellor will have retained the
accountancy equivalent of Peter Carter-Ruck.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-422</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Observer: Seasonal advice
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
At every party there are two kinds of people - those who want to go home and
those who don't. The trouble is that they are almost always married to each
other.
US agony aunt Anne Landers' advice column.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-423</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Observer: Foggitt's lore
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Bill Foggitt, Thirsk's 79-year-old weather sage, is cautious about
forecasting a white Christmas but thinks it could be a close run thing.
He is not impressed by the standard criteria for a white Christmas. 'By that
definition a stray snow flake from Siberia could give us a white Christmas
yet if there is 12 inches of snow on the ground that fell the night before
it doesn't count.'
Using his own standard of snow on the ground he says the last white
Christmas was 1981. That followed a severe October just like this year.
White Christmases in 1923 and 1910 did likewise.
Foggitt thinks the snow will be too late for Christmas Day but forecasts
heavy snowfalls later. 'The heron arrived at our local beck much earlier
this year which means it will be a hard winter. Personally I hate the snow.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-424</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Observer: Carrying the can
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
It will be months before Britain's 5,000 private detectives can estimate the
damage done to their trade by this week's crown court ruling in Isleworth
where a Pounds 12,000-a-year gumshoe was fined Pounds 150 for stealing bags
of rubbish from outside the house of a senior Sunday Times' journalist.
The sums of money involved are petty, but the judgement has sent shivers
through some sections of the detective trade. If the judgement goes
unchallenged, the fear is that one of the most lucrative sources of raw
material for many investigations - the humble rubbish bag - will be off
limits. It is thought that this is the first time that a court has ruled
that stealing a rubbish bag from outside a house constitutes theft.
'You would be surprised how much information people throw away,' says Barry
Trigwell, group operations director of the Nationwide Investigation Group,
Britain's biggest private detective agency.
Encouraging bin men to drop off black bags of rubbish at the end of the
street, rather than into the corporation dustcart, is a well known trick of
the trade for many investigators. Trigwell is 'shocked' by the decision and
says it will make his job a lot harder.
By contrast, Peter Heims, a past president of the Association of British
Investigators, welcomes the Isleworth decision. He says that pinching a
person's rubbish has always been a rather grey area of the law and he's glad
that there has been a ruling. He recommends that his members sift through
the rubbish bag on site and copy down what they want to find out.
Now that sounds like really hard work, especially if it's raining.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-425</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Letter: All is not egalite in the EC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ERNEST G GOBERT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The Common Market is a sham to an ordinary chap like me who divides his
time between continental Europe and Britain.
I cannot access the FT index (your 0891 number) from the Continent - nor any
similar service the other way round.
I am not allowed to hold my shares in Deutsche Bank in my own name: they
have to be held by nominees in Frankfurt.
I cannot insure in Britain the French-registered car I keep in France.
I cannot buy a continental car with left-hand drive here: I am told it would
not be 'type-approved', although the identical model with right-hand drive
is so approved. The excuse is that you cannot see when overtaking. By that
token, continental visitors to Britain and British visitors to the Continent
will presently have to leave their cars at the port of entry and go on
without them. (Incidentally, in 1963 - before Britain joined the Common
Market - I bought a new left-hand drive Renault 4 in Britain for use in
France, simply because exchange control did not permit me to buy it in
France.)
I cannot use my portable telephone on the Continent, nor, for that matter,
any other British approved telephone.
And so on. . .
Liberte, oui. Fraternite, peut-etre. Egalite, non.
Ernest Gobert,
3 Beechwood Drive,
Marlow, Bucks SL7 2DH
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-426</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Letter: Case for control of NHS medicine prices distorted
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Dr JOHN GRIFFIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Your leading article, 'Drug pricing' (December 23), while recognising
the tremendous contribution made by the UK pharmaceutical industry to the
national economy, encourages the government to drive a 'hard bargain' over
National Health Service medicine prices.
In doing so your leader writer distorts his case by the sins of omission.
First, he confuses prices with costs.
The price index for NHS medicines increased by only 1.7 per cent last year -
well below the rate of inflation.
More importantly he failed to inform your readers that, in addition to
controlling NHS profits (and hence prices) through the pharmaceutical price
regulation scheme (PPRS), the government has a heavy influence on the demand
side. In April 1991 it introduced the indicative prescribing scheme to exert
downward pressure on doctors' prescribing.
In November this year it also announced an extension to the Limited List to
cover 10 more therapeutic categories - this is designed to cut the NHS
revenues of mainly research-based companies by up to Pounds 450m a year.
NHS patients wishing to continue to receive a 'blacklisted' medicine will,
of course, be able to pay for them on a private prescription but many will
not be able to afford to do so. The market for those blacklisted products
will, to all intents and purposes, be lost.
Regretfully, therefore, the PPRS, as a mechanism for controlling
expenditures on NHS medicines, cannot possibly be looked at in splendid
isolation as your leading article pretends it can.
Your case that the government can 'afford' to drive a hard bargain is
devalued by this false pretence.
John Griffin,
director,
Association of the
Pharmaceutical Industry,
12 Whitehall,
London SW1A 2DY
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-427</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Letter: Nothing heavenly about this
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr JEREMY SHARP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Re Observer's story, 'Tailspin' (December 23), the Japanese translation
for 'descent from heaven' is, in fact, 'amakudari', not 'amukadari'.
Depending on the characters used, the verb 'amu' can mean 'to edit', while
the verb 'daru' means 'to grow tired of'. I think you get my meaning.
Jeremy Sharp,
deputy manager,
Izumi Europe
Peek House,
20 Eastcheap,
London EC3M 1DR
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-428</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Letter: Central fund would offer answer to pensions
protection problem
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr PHILIP COCKBAIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Lex ('Pension funds', December 18) highlights the fact that the ability
of a pension fund to cover accrued benefits on winding-up by purchasing
annuity policies can be prejudiced by the high current cost of annuities and
by the difference between the investment policies appropriate for ongoing
and discontinued schemes. Lex states that 'the challenge is to find a
measure which safeguards minimum standards without putting potential
benefits at risk.'
We agree fully with this sentiment, and believe we have devised a potential
solution to the problem, which we have explained in some detail in our
submission to the Goode Committee.
In essence, we have proposed that a tax approved centralised Discontinuance
Fund should be established which would accept transfer payments from
occupational pension schemes when the sponsoring employer goes into
liquidation. The transfer terms would reflect the investment returns which
the Discontinuance Fund expected to achieve; the fund would adopt an equity
based investment strategy similar to that of an ongoing occupational pension
scheme which continued to enjoy financial support from the employer. The
terms on which it would accept liabilities would be compatible with the
funding and investment strategies adopted by ongoing schemes.
I would emphasise that under our proposal such a fund would only cover
liabilities for which appropriate transfer payments had been received from
the trustees of schemes which were winding up. There is, however, the
separate matter of some form of compensation scheme.
We share the reservations of many others about the equity and practicality
of any such arrangement. If, nevertheless, one were to be introduced, the
use of the Discontinuance Fund as a funding vehicle would minimise its
expected cost as a result of its equity-related investment policy.
Philip Cockbain,
R Watson &amp; Sons,
Watson House,
London Road,
Reigate, Surrey RH2 9PQ
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-429</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Letter: Support for BR projects essential
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ALAN R TITCHENER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The King's Cross and Thameslink projects are at an advanced state of
planning and almost ready for work to start - enabling target completion by
1999. They address acknowledged inadequacies and will do much to lead
Britain's rail network into the next century. Faster progress could be made
given increased borrowing powers (not grants) and there is evidence of
considerable positiveness from British Rail and - in spirit at least - from
the government.
The Channel tunnel itself will very soon be at the stage where it waits for
commissioning planning to commence and has been a remarkable physical
achievement for all concerned - demonstrating renewed faith and confidence
in those who strove for it for the last 200 years. We know that UK links
will not be in place when it opens but we do have every support for Sir Bob
Reid, the chairman (who has not always been allowed to do what he and his
board feel is right), and British Rail.
British Rail should be given both the necessary enablement and the moral,
financial and physical support to its projects. Britain led the world in
transport in the last two centuries - it can still do the same for the next
two.
Alan R Titchener,
chairman,
Channel Tunnel Association,
44 Westbourne Terrace,
Hyde Park,
London W2 3UH
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-430</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Inflation reaches six-month high in west Germany
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INFLATION in west Germany rose to its highest rate for six months in
December, further damping hopes of a rapid relaxation in the Bundesbank's
strict monetary policy.
Preliminary estimates of the December rate published yesterday by the
Federal Statistics Office put the price rise at 0.2 per cent against
November, and 3.8 per cent compared with December, 1991. The figure
contrasts with relative optimism expressed by Mr Helmut Schlesinger, the
president of the Bundesbank, on Tuesday, when he expressed confidence that
inflation would fall to around 3 per cent next year, compared with an
average of about 4 per cent in 1992.
However, he also insisted that the central bank's monetary policy would
remain tight until inflation was under control. The increase in inflation
comes in spite of declining import prices, thanks to the strong D-Mark, and
the continuing high interest rates maintained by the Bundesbank, to combat
the inflationary pressures in the economy.
Some economists had hoped for a reduction in the rate, reflecting the sharp
slowdown in economic activity in recent months, before an inevitable
increase next month.
There will be a one-point increase in the rate of value added tax, from 14
to 15 per cent, from January 1, which is expected to push the inflation rate
up above 4 per cent.
However, the German economy is expected to continue to contract for at least
the first two quarters of next year, and unemployment to grow steadily,
putting the trade unions under severe pressure to keep their pay demands
modest in the annual wage round.
That, and the effect of low import prices, are the main factors behind the
cautious optimism for a clear downward trend later in the year.
Mr Peter Stihl, head of the German Federation of Chambers of Commerce,
warned in a newspaper interview, however, that he saw the spectre of
stagflation - inflation and simultaneous economic stagnation - descending on
the German economy next year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-431</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Defence cuts high on Aspin's agenda
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Bill Clinton's choice of secretary of defence in his new administration
is far from being a 'stealth' nominee.
Congressman Les Aspin's thoughts on just about any aspect of defence policy
are copiously detailed in the pile of position papers and discussion
documents he has produced in 22 years representing Wisconsin's first
congressional district - the last eight of them as chairman of the House
armed services committee.
A rumpled, 54-year-old economics professor, Mr Aspin and his staff -
sometimes joined by his Republican colleagues - have in the last year alone
produced reports on post-cold war US force structure, the lessons of the
Gulf war, military procurement policy in an era of reduced defence budgets,
and when to use force in conflicts such as those in Bosnia and Somalia.
Pentagon and defence industry officials do not always agree with his
conclusions, but they have, for the most part, considerable respect for his
intelligence, his command of military issues and his understanding of their
relationship to budget questions.
Mr Aspin, along with Senator Sam Nunn, his Senate counterpart, has led the
fight to destroy the Democrats' reputation as soft on defence; and his
efforts in this direction have not always endeared him to his more dovish
colleagues in the party, such as Congressman Ron Dellums of California, who
is likely to take over the armed services chairmanship.
Military leaders are unlikely to be too worried by Mr Aspin's arguments for
bigger cuts in the US force structure than the 25 per cent put forward by
the current administration; most recognise that deeper cuts were likely to
be made even if President George Bush had been re-elected.
Greater potential conflicts may loom in Mr Aspin's criticism of what he
calls the 'all or nothing school', which fears another Vietnam or another
Beirut any time US forces are used.
Here too, however, many generals appear to recognise that Mr Aspin has a
point when he questions 'the willingness of the American people to pay
Dollars 250bn (Pounds 165bn) or even Dollars 200bn a year for a military
that is not very useful'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-432</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / EC states asked to lift border controls
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPEAN Community member states will be asked to lift border controls on
goods on January 1 even though national restrictions on a number of
sensitive imports and exports - currently checked at frontiers - are still
in place.
EC commissioners met yesterday for the last time before the barrier-free
market comes into force, but failed to come up with a temporary solution to
the single-market anomaly of continuing national quotas.
Advocates of the barrier-free internal market fear member states will try to
keep border controls on some goods such as textiles and footwear in order to
enforce national quotas.
EC foreign ministers failed on Monday to resolve a dispute which links the
strengthening of EC trade weapons to the scrapping or harmonisation of
national quotas on certain non-EC goods.
The Commission did decide yesterday to set up an emergency unit made up of
national single-market officials, who will consider any practical problems
arising in the first months of the new free trade area.
At Monday's meeting, ministers also failed to agree a definitive system for
monitoring the movement of 'dual-use' goods, which have military and
civilian applications. The lack of a definitive system raises fears that
arms traders may be able to get sensitive dual-use technology through the
EC's weakest external frontiers to areas of conflict.
In addition to dual-use goods, there will be no definitive system for
monitoring the movement of bananas until next July at the earliest, and
member states have not worked out how to regulate the import and export of
works of art in the absence of border controls.
Brussels is particularly concerned to ensure that border controls on goods
are lifted after January 1, because member states have singularly failed to
meet the deadline for abolishing checks on people.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-433</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Greece passes harsh budget
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KERIN HOPE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ATHENS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The Greek parliament early yesterday approved an austerity budget for 1993
after the opposition Panhellenic Socialist Movement withdrew one of its
deputies, letting the government retain its one-seat majority in the
300-member house, writes Kerin Hope in Athens.
Mr Andreas Papandreou, the Pasok leader, made the decision when an Athens
hospital refused to discharge Mr Eleftherios Papadimitriou, a deputy from
the ruling New Democracy party who was wounded in a terrorist attack.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-434</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Bouygues wins stadium deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Bouygues, the French company which is the world's largest construction
group, has won a FFr530m (Pounds 64m) contract to build a new stadium for
the Hong Kong football club and a new headquarters for the prestigious
Jockey Club, writes Alice Rawsthorn in Paris.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-435</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Toxic dam is shored up
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCES WILLIAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Efforts to strengthen the unstable Mojkovac dam in the Yugoslav republic of
Montenegro are progressing well, Mr Hans Zimmermann, co-ordinator for the
emergency repair work for the UN disaster relief agency in Geneva said
yesterday, writes Frances Williams. Floods in October damaged the dam,
threatening an ecologicial disaster if 7m tonnes of toxic waste pour into
the Danube.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-436</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Somalia mine kills American
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOGADISHU
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
An American civilian was killed and three others injured when their vehicle
hit a mine in Somalia yesterday, the first casualties among those working
for the US-led military relief effort, Reuter reports from Mogadishu.
The anti-tank mine exploded near the southern famine town of Bardere, where
1,000 US Marines are expected today.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-437</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Strong franc hits French exports
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FRANCE'S trade surplus fell sharply last month as the strength of the franc
since the September currency crisis led to a squeeze on exports.
The preliminary November trade figures published yesterday indicated a
surplus of FFr389m (Pounds 47m), far below October's FFr789m.
Exports slipped from FFr100.5bn in October to FFr100.2bn last month, while
imports rose slightly, despite the depressed state of consumer demand, from
FFr99.7bn to FFr99.8bn.
The November figures took the trading surplus for the first 11 months of
1992 to FFr23.9bn, against a deficit of FFr27.4bn in the same period last
year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-438</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Man to keep Clinton's name in lights: Jurek Martin analyses
the choice of Mr Warren Christopher as US secretary of state
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUREK MARTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Zbigniew Brzezinski's line on the international conference circuit has
been that President-elect Bill Clinton had the choice of two sorts of people
as his secretary of state - someone known for process, or for ideas. On the
hypothetical short list of President Carter's former national security
adviser, only one man seemed to combine both attributes - Mr Warren
Christopher, duly anointed by Mr Clinton on Tuesday.
On the other hand, Mr Richard Perle, assistant secretary of defence in the
Reagan administration and as hawkish as Mr Brzezinski, disagrees. While full
of compliments about Congressman Les Aspin at the defence department, Mr
James Woolsey at the CIA and even Mrs Madeleine Albright as ambassador to
the United Nations, he finds Mr Christopher's elevation 'puzzling'.
Partly this is because Mr Christopher served as number two to Mr Cyrus Vance
in the Carter state department ('not notably successful in foreign policy',
in Mr Perle's partisan view) and partly because the 'prince of
darkness'-turned-novelist confesses he has no idea what Mr Christopher's
world view is. Somebody has to be the source of policy ideas in the
government, he adds.
There can be a bitchiness among foreign policy experts exceeded only by
academics and economists, but Mr Perle has something of a point. Mr
Christopher, like Mr Vance, is the quintessential public servant who does
whatever job is handed to him, amply demonstrated by his efforts to secure
the release of US hostages in Tehran in 1980-81 and by his investigation of
the Los Angeles riots earlier this year. But he has never considered it
necessary to emblazon his thoughts in learned journals or on the conference
circuit.
But Mr Perle might be missing a larger point. This is that the next US
government will be the Clinton administration, with the president's name in
lights and in every corner of policy, domestic and foreign. He wants the
best advice - and is assembling an administration of diverse talents to
secure it - but he is not about to abdicate broad policy areas to anyone. Mr
Clinton has studied past presidencies with great care. He knows he beat Mr
George Bush because his opponent neglected the domestic economy. He senses
that one reason for Mr Carter's troubles was that he allowed competing
fiefdoms to run riot in foreign policy. He believes President Reagan was a
success because he had clear policy goals and the gift of being able to
communicate them.
Thus the Clinton team comprises those who know both the workings of
Washington and the country at large. He announced his economic and social
policy advisers first because of the symbolism of that act. He can tolerate
different points of view because he intends to be not only the arbiter
between them, but the principal communicator of whatever emerges.
The task might appear to be superhuman, even to a young president to whom
policy is mother's milk. Already the press is full of doom-laden articles
arguing that the world is so volatile that Mr Clinton's promised 'laser
beam' focus on the domestic side is misguided, and, alternatively, that he,
like every other president, is bound to find Moscow more fascinating than
Los Angeles and will inevitably leave things undone at home.
Mr Clinton does concede that he comes to the office with no record in the
international arena. He once said, in the flush of campaigning, that in a
fast changing world experience was not necessarily the greatest
qualification. Nobody disputes that he is the fastest of studiers, quicker
even than Mr Carter, who was no slouch.
But even he lacks institutional memory and that, in sum, is what Mr
Christopher, Mr Aspin, Mrs Albright, Mr Woolsey, and Messrs Anthony Lake and
Sandy Berger at the national security council, have been brought in to
provide. It matters less that all but Mr Aspin served in the Carter
administration than that they all know, certainly including Mr Aspin, where
the foreign bodies are buried.
In sum, it looks very collegiate and very experienced, which is precisely
what Mr Clinton, indisputably president of the college but lacking the
formal experience, needs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-439</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / EC clears agreement between Ford and VW
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The European Commission yesterday cleared an agreement between Ford and
Volkswagen to produce minivans in Setubal, Portugal, Reuter reports from
Brussels.
The only condition set by the Commission for the project, which is due to
receive Ecu547m (Pounds 442.5m) in state and EC aid, was that Ford and
Volkswagen must sell different versions of the multi-purpose vehicle and
must use separate sales networks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-440</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Brussels in anti-trust move: Guidelines for national courts
published
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Commission yesterday encouraged national courts to handle more
Community anti-trust cases, publishing guidelines about how the existing
responsibilities of national and central EC authorities could be split.
The initiative is part of the Commission's effort to decentralise
responsibilities, in the face of accusations that too much power is
conferred on the Brussels bureaucracy.
However, the Commission continues to exercise substantial powers in the area
of competition, as it demonstrated yesterday by publishing nearly 40
anti-trust and state aid decisions, including a hefty Ecu10.1m (Pounds
8.17m) fine on a Belgian-run shipping cartel.
The Commission, which will continue to supervise deals with Community-wide
significance, said anti-trust action through national courts would almost
certainly be quicker than at European level, and would enable successful
complainants to receive legal costs or damages, which Brussels cannot award.
But most national authorities will still have to consult Brussels before
making decisions, in case the rulings conflict with existing Commission
decisions.
Brussels will also help national authorities by offering advice on EC law
and statistical support.
The guidelines are part of wide-ranging procedural reforms put forward by
Sir Leon Brittan, who will step down as competition commissioner on January
6 when he takes over responsibility for external economic relations.
The Commission decided yesterday to fine the Associated Central West Africa
Lines shipping conference for allegedly restricting competition in the
shipping service between Europe and Zaire and Angola.
The bulk of the fine, amounting to some Ecu9.6m, was levied on the quoted
Belgian company, CMB, which was the principal member of the conference. CMB
will have four years to pay the fine.
Separately, the Commission has opened a four-month in-depth inquiry into
last month's decision by Siemens of Germany and Philips of the Netherlands
to bring their optical fibre and telecommunications cables activities under
the control of two new joint companies.
The Commission said it was worried about 'the narrow supply structure'
created by the deal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-441</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Four to be charged with breaking UN sanctions against
Serbia, Montenegro
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KERIN HOPE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ATHENS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A Greek shipowner and three captains are to be charged with breaking United
Nations sanctions against Serbia and Montenegro, following an investigation
by the prosecutor's office in Piraeus port, writes Kerin Hope in Athens.
The shipowner, Mr Theodoros Therapiotis, is accused of ordering three of his
vessels to unload banned cargoes at ports in Montenegro in October and early
November. The investigation was launched last month after the UN sanctions
committee in New York informed the Greek government that one of the ships,
the Theta Triton, was suspected of breaking the embargo.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-442</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UN still wrangling over Bosnia resolution
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MEMBERS of the United Nations Security Council are still at odds over a
resolution on the enforcement of the no-fly zone the UN has declared over
Bosnia, and diplomats do not expect a text to be agreed before Christmas.
Main points at issue are the length of the deadline to be given to Serbia,
and how much force to use to enforce the ban on military flights, as well as
the traditional UN argument over who should be in command.
The North Atlantic Treaty Organisation yesterday agreed to forward
enforcement options to the UN, including combat aircraft patrols to deter
Serbian aircraft from taking off, downing aircraft infringing the no-fly
zone, and bombing Serbian airfields.
Some US officials have argued for this last option as the most effective way
of enforcing the zone - especially as fighter patrols would have limited
effect on the hedge-hopping helicopters which are the principal violators of
the zone. The US also wants a short deadline, possibly as little as 15 days.
France and the UK, which both have troops in Bosnia, want only the minimum
necessary force to be used, and argue for a substantial delay before any
enforcement action is taken against Serbian aircraft.
They question whether action as drastic as bombing airstrips is necessary
when the number of violations of the no-fly zone is diminishing and when UN
relief flights are once again getting into Sarajevo.
However, Mr Boutros Boutros Ghali, UN secretary general, yesterday reported
that allied aircraft had last week spotted warplanes over Bosnia, whereas
the Serbs had previously been thought to be flying only supply aircraft into
the no-fly zone.
Complicating the debate is the question of sending UN peace-keepers into
Kosovo to head off any possible Serbian aggression there. Some diplomats
argue that it would be better to get these observers into Kosovo before
embarking on an open conflict with Serbia over the no-fly issue.
But these practical points, and the underlying concerns about the safety of
UN troops now on the ground in Bosnia, reflect a deeper philosophical debate
over the boundary between peace-keeping and peace-making.
Mr Boutros Ghali argues that if enforcement is to be undertaken the UN
peace-keepers must be withdrawn and the relief operation halted.
The UN's dilemma is that, barring voluntary compliance by the Serbs,
effective enforcement of the no-fly zone over Bosnia must go far beyond
simple policing and into military hostilities against Serbia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-443</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / The people who have no word for recession
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANS seem to be either unmoved by the threat of recession, or simply
unaware of what is going on, according to opinion polls just published.
While more than 65 per cent of the population say they are optimistic about
prospects in 1993, almost 40 per cent admit that they do not know the
meaning of the word 'scepticism'. The term is a new national favourite among
headline writers and glum newsreaders who daily are obliged to present
ever-blacker economic and political stories.
The discoveries were made by the respected Wickert opinion poll institute.
It asked more than 3,000 people how they felt about the new year because it
has put the same question for the past 40 years. It asked a similar number
if they understood what Skepsis was because the pollsters wanted to check
whether the word was suitable for inclusion in their mood-monitoring
exercises.
Around 65 per cent of west Germans got it right. But only 58 per cent of
easterners understood - perhaps understandably, since they have just emerged
from a regime under which such subversive notions were not allowed.
Misinterpretation was rife in both sides of the country. Those willing to
have a stab, rather than shrug, declared that scepticism was either a
sickness, a girl's name, a type of vegetable or, revealingly, 'an expression
for great hope, joy or confidence'. The less entertaining but equally
surprising results of the exploration of German expectations, showed the
optimism quotient well above the 40-year average of 60 per cent and only one
percentage point down on the result last year when most signs still pointed
to continuing economic well-being.
Even now, a good 40 per cent of the population apparently does not believe
the Bundesbank, the government, economists or the media which for the past
few months have warned almost daily of recession or, in the Bundesbank's
words, a slowdown. Nor does this carefree proportion seem to have been
affected by the job losses announced this year.
Some 15 per cent still believe the economy will grow more strongly than in
1992, while a further 30 per cent reckon on no change. However, the poll
also revealed that many have heard and accept the warnings of the Bundesbank
about pay. An optimistic 29 per cent expect their income to increase, 53 per
cent foresee no change, while the rest are braced for a pay cut.
According to Wickert's records, optimism last peaked in the poll taken in
December 1968, when 72 per cent said they were looking forward hopefully.
The mood proved justified. After 5.7 per cent real growth in the year of the
sample, the economy expanded by 7.5 per cent in 1969, the highest figure in
10 years.
Popular feelings were also a powerful indicator in 1981, when real growth
was only 0.1 per cent, and when only 41 per cent claimed to be optimistic.
The next year gross national product fell for the first time in seven years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-444</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: The Financial Times
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Financial Times will not be published tomorrow or on Saturday December
26 or Monday December 28. It will next appear on Tuesday December 29.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-445</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Sprinter banned
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Sprinter Jason Livingston was banned from athletics for four years after
being found guilty of taking drugs. Livingston, 21, was sent home from the
Barcelona Olympics after failing a random, pre-Games test.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-446</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Charged with murder
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Six people, all from the Moston area of Manchester, were charged with
murdering Suzanne Capper, who died last week after being found with severe
burns.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-447</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Queen's speech probe
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The BBC is investigating whether one of its employees leaked the Queen's
Christmas message to The Sun. Kelvin MacKenzie, the newspaper's editor, made
the allegation during a Radio 4 interview.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-448</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Christmas truce
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The IRA declared a Christmas truce in Northern Ireland but said nothing
about bombings in mainland Britain.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-449</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Stock and Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 ---------------------------------------------------------
STOCK MARKET INDICES
 ---------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100:  2,827.4 (-14.6)
Yield  4.29
FT-SE Eurotrack 100  1,073.60 (+0.68)
FT-A All-Share  1,354.50 (-0.4%)
FT-A World Index  141.66 (-0.3%)
Nikkei  Closed
New York: Dow Jones Ind Ave  3,313.54 (-7.56)
S&amp;P Composite  439.03 (-1.28)
 ---------------------------------------------------------
US CLOSING RATES
 ---------------------------------------------------------
Federal Funds:  6% (2 13/16%)
3-mo Treas Bills: Yld  3.23% (3.261%)
Long Bond  103 1/4 (103 7/16)
Yield  7.349% (7.334%)
 ---------------------------------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 ---------------------------------------------------------
3-mo Interbank  7 5/16% (7 1/4%)
Liffe long gilt future:  Dec 101 11/32 (Dec 100 13/16)
 ---------------------------------------------------------
NORTH SEA OIL (Argus)
 ---------------------------------------------------------
Brent 15-day  (Feb)  Dollars 18.625 (18.525)
Gold
New York Comex  (Dec)  Dollars 332.9 (332.2)
London  Dollars 332.85 (332.3)
 ---------------------------------------------------------
STERLING
 ---------------------------------------------------------
New York:
Dollars 1.5265 (1.5365)
London:
Dollars 1.5265 (1.539)
DM  2.435 (2.4425)
FFr  8.305 (8.33)
SFr  2.2 (2.2075)
Y  189 (190)
Pounds Index  79.5   (79.6)
 ---------------------------------------------------------
DOLLAR
 ---------------------------------------------------------
New York:
DM  1.59525 (1.5885)
FFr  5.442 (5.422)
SFr  1.444 (1.4405)
Y  123.8 (123.7)
London:
DM  1.5945 (1.5865)
FFr  5.44 (5.4125)
SFr  1.441 (1.434)
Y  123.8 (123.45)
Dollars Index 65.5 (65.3)
Tokyo  Closed
 ---------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-450</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Computer whizz-kids take on teacher's role in classroom
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN WILLMAN, Public Policy Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PARENTS worried about the baleful influence of Sonic the Hedgehog or Super
Mario on their children's intellectual development may be surprised to find
that computer whizz-kids are playing an important role in Britain's
classrooms.
Teachers are no less technologically challenged than the rest of the
population who find setting the timer on a videocassette recorder a daunting
task, according to a report published today by the schools inspectorate.
As in the home, teachers turn to the younger generation for help and advice
in using the increasingly sophisticated computer equipment.
Hours spent with Sega or Nintendo games have created a new generation of
'pupil experts' at ease with the fast-developing world of computers. Schools
are beginning to recognise that pupil experts can be great assets, helping
other children, backing up teachers and managing school computer networks.
'The all-pervading influence of the new technology in their everyday lives
has produced a generation of young people assured and relaxed in their
approach to information technology,' the inspectors say. 'Pupils turn to IT
without reticence or trepidation, unlike many of their elders.'
Many teachers were 'brought up in the days when the notion of a 'smart' or
intelligent machine would have been thought threatening', say the
inspectors.
They add: 'Girls are less likely than boys to be enthusiastic about
information technology and are likely to assume less active roles if working
with computers in mixed groups.'
Some schools tackle this issue with lunchtime sessions or computers reserved
for girls.
The inspectors might do better to raise the issue with the Japanese software
writers who tend to cast girls in passive roles. Princess Toadstool's only
role is to await rescue by Mario and Luigi. Step forward Sonia the Hedgehog
and Super Maria.
Information Technology in Secondary Schools. HMSO. Pounds 4.20.
Computer game costs, Page 4
Observer, Page 7
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-451</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Banks take control of Magnet in rescue move
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE MAIN bank lenders to Magnet yesterday took control of the fitted
kitchens retailer in a move they said would preserve the business and
protect the position of customers.
The banks' decision to put Airedale Holdings, Magnet's heavily indebted
holding company, into administrative receivership almost certainly means
subordinated creditors and shareholders involved in the controversial Pounds
700m management buy-out in 1989 will have to write off their investments.
Most of the investors and lenders have already partially done so.
Bankers said customers and trade creditors would be secure.
Mr John Foulkes, the Magnet chief executive who was brought in by the banks
three years ago, will remain in charge. He will still receive this month a
Pounds 2m bonus payment from Airedale, as agreed when he was appointed to
turn around the company.
GE Capital, a subsidiary of General Electric of the US, is the largest
subordinated creditor, with Pounds 70m outstanding. It is seeking to upgrade
its position through legal action.
Airedale Holdings, owed an estimated Pounds 450m by the Magnet holding
company, will also only retrieve a proportion of their outstanding loans.
They are Bankers Trust, Standard Chartered, Hill Samuel, Bank of Scotland,
Austria's Credit Anstalt, Bank of America, Continental Bank and the
Long-term Credit Bank of Japan.
The banks said their vehicle, Magnet Group, had purchased the Airedale
subsidiary which controls the Magnet business, from the receivers, BDO
Binder Hamlyn, for a sum believed to be in excess of Pounds 10m.
Insiders said about Pounds 25m of the senior debt had been swapped for
equity in the new vehicle. A spokesman for the Magnet Group stressed that
none of the banks had injected any new money.
The banks say they intend to float or sell Magnet Group within two to five
years. The proceeds will be paid as a deferred consideration to Airedale's
receiver, which will pay off its creditors in order of priority. The first
to be paid will be the eight banks which currently control Magnet Group.
Insiders said yesterday that it was highly unlikely that a sale or flotation
would recoup the full Pounds 450m outstanding to senior creditors.
The eight senior lenders to Isosceles safe until May, Page 8
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-452</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / German president urges easier citizenship laws
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Richard von Weizsacker, the German state president, yesterday criticised
attitudes in the country which, he said, condemned people 'born among us' to
remain 'forever foreign'.
In a moving Christmas address to the nation, he praised the contribution of
immigrants to the German economy, and urged that they be given the chance to
be German citizens, even with dual nationality.
Mr von Weizsacker said that the Turkish woman and two girls who died in a
neo-Nazi arson attack in the town of Molln in November should not sim-ply be
labelled 'three Turks'.
'Ten-year-old Yeliz Arslan, who died with her relations . . . was born among
us, and never lived anywhere else,' he said. 'Our media simply called them
three Turks.
'That expression, based solely on their passports, already suggests they
should remain forever foreign. Yet those three in Molln belonged to us]'
His address was issued as reports came of a new attack on Turkish migrant
workers, in which a 29-year-old woman and her 24-year-old brother-in-law
were injured when a firebomb, disguised as a parcel, exploded in their
faces.
Police said the parcel was left on the doorstep of the family home, in a
Cologne suburb, but there was no immediate evidence to link the attack with
extreme rightwing violence.
Mr von Weizsacker, who was pelted with eggs and other missiles by leftwing
radicals last month at a rally against racism in Berlin, used his
traditional Christmas message to make an outspoken appeal for a relaxation
of Germany's strict naturalisation laws. His plea marks the first time that
such a senior figure has identified Germany's narrow definition of
nationality - and not simply rightwing extremism and uncontrolled
immigration - as a contributing factor to xenophobia.
'Of course we want to feel at home in Germany,' he said. 'But are we clear
enough ourselves about just who is contributing to making sure that our home
works well?'
He cited the numbers of foreign workers in valuable jobs in the city of
Munich: 20 per cent in the hospitals, more than a third in restaurants,
almost 50 per cent of mechanics and metalworkers, and more than 70 per cent
of the city's street cleaners.
'We are very happy to take advantage of what foreign workers have been doing
here for decades,' he said. 'It would be both inhuman and stupid if we were
to try and exclude them from our society.
'If we were to make it easier for those who wish to acquire German
nationality, then we would be improving their situation. It is in our own,
German, interest.'
His appeal touches on an sensitive issue for Germans, who have maintained a
definition of nationality since 1913 based on blood. Outsiders applying for
naturalisation have to fulfil stringent requirements and renounce any other
nationality.
Germans appear unmoved by recession threat, Page 2
Inflation hits six-month high in Germany, Page 2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-453</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World News In Brief: Briton dead in crash
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A Briton was among the 158 people killed in Tuesday's air crash in Libya,
the Foreign Office said. Nor further details were given.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-454</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World News In Brief: Banco Santander
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Banco Santander has been accused by Spain's top monetary court judge of
inducing some clients to commit a huge tax fraud. The bank has been order to
post a Pta8.8bn (Pounds 50.3m) bond by Sunday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-455</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Practical Traveller: How to pick and choose a Kiwi trek
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGELA WIGGLESWORTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WALKERS in New Zealand are spoilt for choice. The country is criss-crossed
with over 40 well-marked treks and there are more than 1,000 mountain huts,
four to five hours' walk apart, for overnight stops.
The variety of landscape is remarkable: in one day you can walk through
forests with great fern trees, up mountains with peaks still covered in
summer snow, alongside lakes, rivers and waterfalls. If you are lucky, you
will see birds such as the fearless and inquisitive kea or the flightless
weka.
Which tramp - as New Zealanders call it - to choose? It is a question of
assessing your own walking ability, finding a trek to match, and deciding
whether to go independently or with a guide. Independent walkers carry their
own food, cooking utensils and sleeping bags and sleep in huts which have
bunks, mattresses, water supply, pit toilets and cooking facilities. Treks
on major routes must be pre-booked even for independent walkers. Hut fees
range from NZDollars 4 to NZDollars 14 a night depending on category, but
350 are free.
Guided walks are for those who do not want to be loaded down with food and
equipment or do their own cooking. These overnight huts are equipped with
hot showers, drying room, duvets, towels and hairdryers. Pack, bedsheet,
waterproof parka and trousers are usually supplied free.
Most of the well-known treks are on South Island. Some 8,000 people walk the
spectacular Milford track every year, undeterred by its average annual five
and a half metres of rain. But numbers are regulated, with only 40
independent and 42 guided trekkers allowed to set off each day from Lake
Anau (you start and finish by boat) to walk deep into Fiordland National
Park to Milford Sound. The price (excluding flights) for a guided trek,
including two nights' resort accommodation, is NZDollars 1,299.
Sir Edmund Hillary has called the Routeburn and Greenstone Valley treks 'two
of the most superb walking areas in the world'. Both are three- or four-day,
Queenstown-to-Queenstown treks. The Routeburn (rainforests, waterfalls,
lakes, alpine meadows full of flowers) crosses the Southern Alps in
Fiordland and Mount Aspiring National Parks, climbing to 1,277m. The price
is NZDollars 782.
The Greenstone Valley, a gentler walk along an ancient Maori trail, follows
the Greenstone river through beech forests. The price is NZDollars 670. Less
populated, but no less beautiful, are the Rees-Dart (four-five day round
trip), and the Hollyford (four-five days) with trout fishing, seal and
penguin colonies en route.
In the far north of South Island is the Abel Tasman coastal track. Open all
year, suitable for the less experienced, it is a trek beside the sea, with
sandy beaches and forested hills. The concession is held by the Wilson
family who have a five-generation association with the national park,
restrict their relaxed guided tours to 16 people, and have accommodation in
a beach-side lodge. The price is NZDollars 645.
Independent walkers using huts or camping areas need a pass which costs
NZDollars 4 a night from the department of conservation, Nelson. New
Zealand's highest guided trek, Ball Pass, in Mt Cook National Park, is a
magnificent two-three-day alpine crossing linking the Tasman and Hooker
valleys through snow-fields. Price, depending on size of group and number of
days, is NZDollars 275 to NZDollars 580.
For detailed information about trekking, contact the New Zealand Tourism
Board (London tel: 071-973-0360). The New Zealand Travel Information Service
(081-748-4455), from whom the above prices are quoted, has a range of treks.
Silver Fern Holidays (0602-40111) and HF Holidays offer the Routeburn trek
with a tour of South Islands national parks for Easter 1993. The price is
Pounds 1,990 (including flight), Pounds 990 (land only).
If you are in New Zealand and haven't booked a trek, give Outside Adventures
in Queenstown (03-442-7126) a call. They provide guided walks, adapted to
ability, plus B&amp;B accommodation.
Recommended reading: Tramping In New Zealand by Jim DuFresne, published by
Lonely Planet Publications, Pounds 6.95. It gives detailed descriptions and
maps of 40 treks, and the best time to go. Some of the high-altitude treks
are not open in NZ's winter months.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-456</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Travel: An encounter with the Sakuddai
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SEBASTIAN HOPE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WE HAD been walking three hours since leaving Matotonnan before we stopped
to eat. We were entering a labyrinth of steep hills and ridges obscured by
the primary rainforest that covers the centre of Siberut Island, off
Sumatra, in Indonesia. My dependence on Mang and Syolok, my guide and his
helper, was now almost total.
I was chewing on sago and the last of our dried fish when I noticed a leech
humping up my trouser leg. It was the first I had seen, and rather
disappointing - nothing like the creature that spooked Bogart in The African
Queen. It was small, thin (as yet) and brown as the mud. Disdainfully, I
finished my mid-morning snack before I took out my lighter.
Our plan was to cross the island by foot and dugout canoe, walk down the
west coast a stretch, go up one river, down another and return to Muara
Siberut by powered canoe round the southern cape. In between, we would stay
with two clans which still lived in traditional long-houses, the Sakuddai
and the Sabeleakek. A 14-day trek, all told, and on the third day we crossed
the east-west watershed and entered the territory of the Sakuddai.
It took us nine hours to walk from Matotonnan to the closest Sakuddai
foraging house. We were greeted by an old crone, her sunken breasts bared,
showing extensive tattooing. She had been looking after the children and was
now cooking a banana stew for the returning gatherers.
As I was washing in the river, a dugout appeared round the corner. In it
knelt Aman Uisa Kirei, the clan headman. He paddled over and shook my hand.
'Alelouita,' he said, and held on to me to steady himself in the current. He
wore his long white hair in a bun and a headband.
The only other thing he had on was a loin cloth, like a sumo wrestler's,
made from tree bark. His face, chest, arms, hands, thighs and ankles were
tattooed with indigo lines and geometric patterns. He looked at me for a
long time, smiling; then, with a nod, he said, 'Mekai' and paddled off
downstream. I felt I had met prehistory face-to-face.
Life in these parts is based on animism. Everything has a spirit and should
be treated with respect. If a taboo is broken, the naturally harmonious
relationship between spirits is disrupted, and disaster follows. Complex
ceremonies have evolved to influence the spirit world. Whether it is to
placate the spirit of a tree before it is felled, strengthen a house spirit
or drive evil spirits from the sick, a sakerai (master of ceremonies) must
be called in, and a pig killed. These requirements put a cultural check on
the rate of exploitation of the tribespeople's resources. Over the ages,
they have safeguarded their existence.
The Sakuddai follow these beliefs. Their environment has put them beyond the
reach of the modern world, whose influence, however, is spreading rapidly
along the coasts and navigable rivers. They are remarkably open and gentle
people.
When the others returned, I was interviewed by Aman Duman Kirei, the clan's
sakerai. It was a music hall act which made everyone laugh. 'Alelouita,' I
said. 'What?' he said, three times. He had come over all deaf. 'What's your
name?' he asked. 'What? Never mind. I've got a new one for you: Toroi Kirei,
the king of sightseers. So when I say 'Toroi Kirei', you say 'Oi'.' 'Toroi
Kirei,' he said. 'Oi,' I said. 'What?' he said, three times.
Supper was brought to us on large metal trays and we ate communally by the
light of oil lamps made from old mackerel tins. The meal was a monkey that
had been killed with poisoned arrows. I thought it was tough pork, till I
asked. With it came sago, boiled bananas, grated coconut and the water the
monkey had been cooked in. Afterwards, we bedded down on the porch's bamboo
floor, open to the night air and the call of bilou monkeys at dawn.
Next day, we moved downstream to the clan's long-house, built within the
last year (without nails) and proof of the strength of tradition for the
Sakuddai. It was 35 metres long, 15m wide and 10m high. It was raised more
than 1m off the ground on thick trunks, and the eaves of its thatched roof
sloped down almost to the level of the platform.
The Sakuddai are justifiably proud of their homes. I was invited to stay a
week, a month, a year. It was even suggested that I marry into the family,
but I left two days later. Aman Duman Kirei had tears in his eyes as he said
goodbye. It took us another three days to reach the Sabeleakek's long-house.
Although this clan lives in much the same way as the Sakuddai, they have had
more contact with the modern world. Their hair is cut short, as per local
regulations, and the young are not being tattooed any more. Moreover, they
are used to money. Trading in scented wood has made them rich.
They spend the money on chainsaws and outboards - watches, even, though they
never consult them. Yet they would not pay to send the wife of the headman
to the hospital in Taileleo. She had had abdominal pains for two weeks when
I arrived and an animist healing ceremony took place while I was there.
Leaves were selected from the jungle for their spiritual qualities and
ground to a paste with which to anoint the invalid's body. There were
incantations and muttered spells. One of the participants wore a crucifix.
The government's policy of resettling clans into permanent villages and
re-educating them puts intense pressure on local resources and removes
traditional checks on exploitation. The government has also sold timber
concessions covering the whole of Siberut and plans to settle 7,000 of
Java's poor on the island within the next two years. Perhaps the Sakuddai
built their long-house so large because they believe it will be their last.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-457</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Travel: Vienna; Sensuousness and coffee shops - Love of
socialising and the arts make the Austrian capital an outstanding city
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS WOODSWORTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE is something peculiar about walking through an old city in the dark,
late at night. Go there in the daytime and the eye and ear are instantly
claimed by the present - crowds, cars, clamour and movement keep the past
concealed and at bay. Go there very late, however, and - like some great
submarine beast emerging into emptiness and silence - history rises to the
surface. In a city such as Vienna, the past sits at the end of every echoing
street and catches the innocent wanderer unawares.
I arrived in Vienna late one evening and became lost the moment I set foot
in it. Dropping my bags at my hotel, I began an exploratory stroll  -
usually a few left turns, right turns and a little intuition will lead one
to a busy street, a crowded cafe. But my feet took me instead to a place of
dark-windowed palaces and baroque boulevards where not a soul stirred.
Entranced, I wandered along quiet passageways to empty courtyards, under
covered arcades to deserted squares and promenades. I passed silent
equestrians: bronze princes and emperors raised high in the dark on granite
plinths. There were long stone stairways, columned porticoes, classical
statuary, dim vistas of imperial architecture that receeded into the
distance.
Once, there was a clatter of hooves on cobblestones and a real horse went
by, pulling a rumbling fiacre containing a bowler-hatted horseman, a
laughing woman in a long gown and a man in evening wear. Seconds later,
there was nothing left but a lingering smell of cigar smoke. It was only a
late-night tourist jaunt, but it made me feel that a long-dead past had
infiltrated the city, spirited away its life and claimed it for its own.
By the time I found my way back to my hotel, I was feeling thoroughly
spooked. Even here, I lost my way in vast chandelliered reception rooms and
miles of vacant, mirrored, fin-de-siecle corridors. Where were the people,
the life, the sparkle that makes this one of the most engaging cities in
Europe? I found my room, pulled the curtains against the intrusions of the
past, and went to sleep.
In the morning, it all seemed different. This was no ghost-house but the
Hotel Imperial, the most elegant establishment in Vienna, and from its
windows I looked out on to a sunny, busy city, one of the great cultural
capitals of Europe. On my way down to breakfast, the marble nudes on the
staircase looked at me a little less coldly, the gilt-framed imperial
portraits on the wall a little less sternly. The whole city exuded
gemutlichkeit, that special brand of warmth, happiness and social ease for
which Vienna is re-knowned.
My first destination was the great complex of imperial buildings I had
wandered through the night before. No longer peopled solely by phantoms, the
grim, grey Hofburg, the winter palace of the Habsburg emperors, was now
enlivened by foreign visitors and weekending Austrians, and I joined them.
It is difficult to pack 640 years of Habsburg rule into a single morning,
and I did not try. Of the 2,000 rooms in the Hofburg, I visited only a few.
I toured two dozen sumptuous state rooms and private apartments last lived
in by Emperor Franz Joseph and his Empress Elizabeth.
I looked at Belgian tapestries, Bohemian crystal and countless baroque
decorative flourishes. In the treasury, I gazed at the 1,000-year-old crown
of the Holy Roman Empire, and, in the chapel, at the stalls from which the
Vienna Boys' Choir performs every Sunday.
Best of all, I spent an hour or so in the ballroom atmosphere of the Spanish
Riding School, watching a morning training session of the Lippizan
stallions. Here, under the tutelage of elegant riders in cocked hats and
tails, the dappled grey Lippizans execute dressage exercises of astounding
precision and beauty. Anyone looking for the stylisation and formality
generated by the Austro-Hungarian empire will find it, pushed to its limits,
in these horses.
But they will also find remnants of empire, in less extreme form, wherever
they go in Vienna. My impressions of the previous evening were, in the end,
not so far wrong. History is a concentrated and invasive element in Vienna.
For it is not just the city's history, but the history of much of Europe. It
was from Vienna that 55m people, a score of widely varied races and cultures
stretching from Spain to Transylvania, were administered. It was to Vienna
that some of the most accomplished figures of the age flocked. A city that
looks backwards rather than forward, Vienna remains a repository of all
these memories.
Nor is the Viennese past all one of enlightenment and gaiety. Reaction and
intolerance were the less admirable hallmarks of Habsburg domination, from
early times through to the heavy-handed, 68-year rule of Franz Joseph, a
reign that ended only with the first world war and the dismemberment of
empire. Products of a long, intense and sometimes tragic history, the
Viennese today remain obsessed with their past.
One consequence of this has been the maintainance of a highly conservative
Viennese society, the leftover of a political order long gone. Stratified
and hierarchical, easily impressed by titles and rank, Vienna lacks the
liberal, cosmopolitan atmosphere found in most European capitals. In its
place, this tightly-knit, status-conscious city puts great value on cliquish
sociability and gregariousness.
If Vienna's history has left it with a parochial outlook, it has also
stamped it with a genuine cultural and artistic interest not found in other
capitals.
If morning is the time to visit one of an astonishing number of palaces and
museums, the afternoon is a good moment to begin watching Vienna society at
play. The popular eating houses known as beisl and heurige, or wine taverns,
are both much favoured meeting places. But coffee houses have been
institutions in Vienna since retreating Turkish invaders left bags of coffee
beans behind; much of the city seems to spend its life chatting, doing
business, reading the papers and eating cream strudel in them. If I were
Viennese, I would as well.
I spent numerous afternoons trying different coffee shops. My favourite? I
liked the Cafe Landtmann, a spot preferred by politicians and writers, for
its intellectual flavour. But in the end, I would plump for Demel, a place
inhabited by sensualists and middle-aged gourmandes, for the flavour of its
plum cake. Demel makes the best pastries in Vienna, if not all Europe.
But the Austrian capital, in the end, is not baroque palaces, highly
schooled horses, art collections, cafe society or pastries. Its heart is its
live arts, its evenings of music by the composers - Mozart, Haydn,
Beethoven, Schubert, Strauss - who lived in Vienna and made it a musical
byword.
I did not know that I liked opera before; it seemed too much like work. But
I got myself into evening dress anyway, and sat in a box at the State Opera
for a performance of Mozart's Abduction from the Seraglio. It was as
sensuous as Demel's plum cake.
Nicholas Woodsworth was a guest of the Hotel Imperial, Kartner Ring 16,
A-1015 (Vienna tel: 222-501100; London bookings: 071-930-4147). The Imperial
offers weekend packages, based on double occupancy, at Pounds 187 per
person.
Information on short breaks in Vienna can be had from the Austrian National
Tourist Board, 30 St George St, London WIR OAL (071-629-0461). Other
numbers: City Travel Scene, for economy weekend packages (081-427-4445);
Austria Direct, for hotel reservations (0702-547580); Austria On Line, for
theatre and opera bookings (0345-581126).
Launched last month was new specialist operator Austrian Travel Service,
under the same management as sister company Swiss Travel Service. Prices
start from Pounds 249 per person for a one-week farmhouse or guesthouse
holiday in the Arlberg region. At the top end, there is a new Danube cruise
from Vienna (four countries, seven nights) starting at Pounds 610. Tel:
0920-487575.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-458</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Fashion: Undercover guide on what to buy her - Avril Groom
gives a brief guide to the type of lingerie women would really like to find
in their festive stockings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AVRIL GROOM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHAT should a man give to show his love and win a smile of intimate
complicity? A slip of silk, trimmed coquettishly with lace, or a wisp of
bedtime chiffon that only he should see? Maybe, gentlemen. But romantic
fantasies aside, what she would chose herself is often far less adventurous.
The large volume of unwanted lingerie which is returned to the shops in
January shows that seduction is often far from a woman's mind when she
choses items for herself.
The nightdress she buys must withstand the washing machine and be decent
enough for the milkman to see. And underwear? What she really wants is
something crisp, comfortable and practical - like her man's Y-fronts.
New York designer Calvin Klein recognised this plain truth years ago and
promptly converted his range of austere, white or grey interlock men's
underwear to a womanly form, raising a retailing storm.
Now that even top couture houses such as Chanel are putting women's Y-fronts
on the catwalk, this is obviously not a trend to be trifled with. The
original makers of the men's version, Jockey, have just introduced a women's
range and see their brand name, emblazoned on the outside, as a positive
selling point to women.
It suggests, they reason, those qualities of comfort and support which have
long made the brand popular with men and which are exactly the reasons why
women would choose them, too. The women's Jockey briefs and top (not a bra,
but with a supporting under-bust elastic trim) look more like exercise wear,
in the tradition of the sports bra pioneered by Berlei and Triumph.
They may fulfil the female wish for underwear so supremely comfortable that
the wearer is barely conscious of it, but it would take a brave man to buy
them as a Christmas present.
But rather than risk misinterpretation by today's super-sensitive males and
discord under the Christmas tree, women would probably prefer to be given
something equally practical but prettier, not to say romantic.
Here it is a matter of a little gentle education for the chaps, for whom the
words 'pretty and romantic' have somewhat different connotations. It may be
wise for present-buyers to steer away from the red, black, transparent and
lacy which the words may conjure up in the minds of menfolk.
A woman's choice would invariably be fine silk or fresh cotton with
trimmings and lace soft enough not to appear knubbly under close-fitting
clothes, and in white or pastels.
In recent years, many stores have introduced lingerie evenings for male
customers, where chaps who were once reduced to vaguely cupping their hands
in the air and muttering 'she's about this big' get a sympathetic hearing
from helpful assistants in less embarrassing conditions.
Apart from upping sales, the main aim of such evenings has been education
and it seems to be paying off. 'We don't get as many returns these days
because the style is wrong,' say Fenwick in London's Bond Street, 'but they
do sometimes mistake the size.'
Triumph's chief consultant, Yvonne Snell, agrees. 'Men are much more clued
up now. They ask their wife her size and often come in with a picture from a
magazine of something they think she will like.' She believes women's
attitudes are also softening in these post feminist days. 'There is so much
advice these days on how to keep a relationship alive that they will wear
glamorous but tasteful lingerie occasionally to add a little spice. And they
might not admit it, but most women are flattered by being given something
flippant and sexy.'
The only problem, she says, is stockings. 'All men like them but only
younger women, who see them as something new, do.' A survey carried out by
Gallup for lingerie company, Ballet International, showed this was right.
After interviewing 546 women and 505 men aged between 19 and 24 across the
country, only nine per cent said they were going to buy stockings or would
like to receive them.
Out of the one in three men buying their wives or girlfriends lingerie this
Christmas, only three per cent said they would be shopping
for a basque - and only
two per cent of women said they would like to receive one.
The most popular lingerie gift mentioned in the survey was French knickers
and matching camisole, with 18 per cent of women saying they would like to
receive them and 10 per cent of men planning to buy a set.
Cotton lingerie is second in popularity, with figure-hugging body suits the
third choice.
The survey also revealed that two in three men claim to know their partner's
statistics - although only a quarter of the women said the last lingerie
they received from their man was a perfect fit.
But with today's less austere styles, sizing is not the problem it once was.
Harrods buyer Louise Garner says: 'We gently try and steer men uncertain
about size towards something where it's not crucial, such as a camisole,
teddy or nightie. As long as they have a fair idea of the right dress size,
there is usually no problem.'
There are, says Garner, two distinct types of male customer. 'Some consult
the recipient or may even bring her in to look around and then come back and
buy. Others come in pre-Christmas for a surprise present and they really
haven't a clue. We try and guide them, by asking questions about the woman
to discover what she might like.
'But some are determined to choose what they want to see her in, which is
usually bright or dark colours and invariably involves a suspender belt. We
gently try and discourage that because neither we nor the customer wants the
inconvenience of bringing it back later.'
In a less rarefied sector of the market, at Knickerbox with its 57 high
street shops, managing director Stephen Schaffer also admits that returns
are a problem. 'Our male customers appear to have a very definite view of
what their partner should wear - whether she likes it or not,' he says.
'They tend to choose stereotyped items such as French knickers or suspender
belts, though if they consult our staff they discover that what women want
and select for themselves are comfortable, practical, cotton and Lycra mixes
that are attractive but not too fussy.
'Usually, our returns run at about nine per cent; after Christmas this
shoots up to 15 per cent, invariably brought back by the female recipients.'
Any men wanting last-minute guidance on buying lingerie could do worse than
follow Knickerbox's advice. Ignore scratchy red lace and bumpy black
suspenders. Look instead for pure cotton or silk, plus Lycra for
close-fitting stretch and Tactel for soft comfort.
Check that lace trims are soft to the touch (cotton-mix laces are best) and
that details such as bows will not make awkward bumps under sweaters or
clingy skirts.
Men could earn maximum Brownie points by choosing just about anything from
La Perla, the Rolls-Royce of lingerie which has a big new department in
Harrods and can manage to make long-line, control panties look sexy, in
silky stretch plus lots of lace, although they do cost Pounds 115. You could
also earn points with a pretty, lace-trimmed, all-in-one body - by far the
best thing for keeping out the winter chill.
For nightwear, the same principles apply. Women are generally happier with
cosy pyjamas, soft flower-prints or nostalgic embroidered white cotton such
as Damask's pretty range, than bright satin, split thigh-high. In winter,
styles with sleeves are welcome, though low necks and fine shoulder straps
are flattering.
But if all this sounds too worthy and unexciting, there is one area where
male fantasies can be indulged with full female approval, and it is
engineering rather than lingerie.
Every woman wants a Wonderbra, Gossard's best-selling design that remains
unchanged since 1968 and is constructed to give even the smallest chest a
cleavage. It is the one design that women buy for themselves in black, which
outsells white two to one.
The reason is that these days the Wonderbra is worn to be seen,
Madonna-style, at clubs and parties throughout Europe. It goes fearlessly
under low-buttoned jackets or see-through chiffon blouses because, though it
produces a lacy cleavage, it is sturdily constructed and perfectly decent.
So popular has the Wonderbra become that it has inspired even Marks and
Spencer, whose Christmas best-sellers include a lacy black bra and a black
net body with built-in bra.
For some alternative undies: Bras: Triumph Amarillo cotton jersey and lace
underwired in white, Pounds 12.99; Triumph Amourette soft white lace style,
Pounds 18.99; Knickerbox Americano top-stitched cotton jersey in cream,
Pounds 16.99; BHS flowered grey jersey and white lace longline, Pounds 8.99;
Lejaby cotton-jersey underwired, lattice trim in white Pounds 29.95.
Bodies: Dim cotton jersey and lace underwired in white, Pounds 29.50; Marks
and Spencer cream satin with wide straps, Pounds 16.99; Rosy stretch cream
satin, wide straps, longline, Pounds 49; Triumph Amarillo soft lace and
cotton jersey, underwired, Pounds 22.99.
On show: BHS black lace and jersey body, Pounds 14.99; Marks and Spencer
black lace underwired bra, wide straps, Pounds 14.99; Marks and Spencer
jersey and net body, built-in bra, Pounds 19.99; La Perla Marvel black
jersey strapless body, moulded cups, maribou trim, Pounds 124.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-459</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / How to Spend it: A shopping expedition down the old Silk
Road - The changing political complexion of Central Asia means the great
bazaars are open to the outside world again. Charlotte Eagar reports on the
bargains to be found
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLOTTE EAGAR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR 70 years, the People's Flag flew over the bazaars which lined the great
Silk Road. When Marco Polo went to Xanadu, he travelled this shopaholics'
highway, the ancient trade artery linking the mysterious East to the
sack-clad barbarians of Europe. Strung along its miles of arid dust, like so
many precious stones, were the desert oases where weary merchants refuelled.
Through these medieval Little Chefs - Bukhara, Khiva and Samarkand - passed
the luxuries that corrupted Rome: silk and porcelain, melon and saffron,
Persian carpets and Russian slaves.
Now the Red Flag flies at half-mast and the great bazaars of Central Asia
are open for business once more; the Soviet straitjacket could not stamp out
the central Asian's desire to sell. Even in the museums, they sell you
stuff; the curator can see you have an eye for culture, so he brings out a
little something he brought from home which his great grandfather used to
wear. Or are the exhibition cases looking a little empty?
A frenetic jumble of noise, colour and smell, the Samarkand bazaar hits
Soviet-dulled senses like a 10-ton truck. Stall after stall is piled with
lurid Tadjik silks, beach-striped cotton moire and bales of corduroy,
jostling old women sell hats, coats, shoes, tomato sauce, embroidered velvet
jackets, car tyres, paisley scarves and garlic - an eclectic mess of local
specialities and anything they can lay their hands on.
Dotted between their rickety trestles are men selling plates of steaming
plov, the fried rice and vegetables speciality of Central Asian, shashlik
(kebabs) and piping hot onion pasties, cooked as you watch in a waist-high
stone dome; fire at the bottom, the vendor bends in through a hole on the
oven's flattened top and sticks the raw pasties to the inner wall like
little bats.
Whatever your intentions in former Soviet Central Asia, it is impossible to
escape the shopping frenzy. Everything is so cheap. Silks in a myriad of
reds, yellows, greens and pink sell for 160 roubles a metre.
Why not buy 50? What matter if you do not know what to do with it, you will
never buy silk for that price again - at around 350 roubles to the dollar,
it works out at about 30 pence a metre. Anyway, the silk looks great as
curtains.
In the Khivan Karavanserai, a state department store located with rare taste
in an ancient inn, Uzbek pottery sells at 30 roubles a plate; bowls, vases,
butter dishes, teapots, sheets, pillows, mattresses, towels - you could
furnish a whole house.
Plus, of course, the ubiquitous yards of silk. Peter Jones is never
knowingly undersold but they have not heard about Khiva.
Beneath every honey-coloured dome, wizened old men in white embroidered,
black silk skull-caps and striped, padded coats sit and talk. In Bukhara,
the coats cost around 500 roubles. An English photographer bought six - a
dressing gown for every member of his family.
Central Asia has this effect, people stop shopping rationally and start just
buying. It is similar to an American supermarket race, except there is no
time limit and you can come back anytime.
For serious shoppers with real money, carpets are the greatest pull of
Central Asia; every Sunday is carpet day. Early in the morning in Ashkabad,
the rug bazaar gets going. The ruby sheen of the Turkmen carpets transcend
their hideous setting, a large concrete car park on the outskirts of town
fenced off from the desert by strands of chicken wire.
Here you can buy carpets from Bukhara, from Baku, old carpets, new carpets,
silk, wool and cotton. Crouched in the dust, carpet addicts count the knots
on the carpet back. At Dollars 100 or so a throw, these carpets are not
ridiculously cheap, but they are still a fraction of the price in the west.
Carpets are big business in Central Asia. In the lobby of the Hotel
Samarkand, an Afghan carpet manufacturer grabs the Intourist group as they
while away the time between guided tours. His carpets are nearly double the
cost of the bazaars but they are clean, it is inside and he sells all week
long.
Sitting out the fighting in the Hotel Tadjikistan in Dushanbe, his cousin
waits in the hope the chorus of visitors will return. Dushanbe is not
shopper-orientated but, despite the inconveniences, it has its rewards.
The origin of the stripey silk, Tadjikistan offers the widest choice of
colours; the locals make really interesting felt rugs which you cannot find
anywhere else; or you can wrestle with your conscience about buying old
jewellery from refugees (well, he says he needs the money to emigrate).
One problem: if you are going to shop in Tadjikistan, shop there first.
Neurotically obsessed with gun-running, Uzbek customs will not allow
vehicles over the border, and shoppers have to get out and walk.
Hauling 50 metres of silk, 24 Khivan plates, six Kirdiz hats, two Uzbek
coats, a butter dish and a carpet over half a mile of No Man's Land under a
Central Asian sun could be avoided with a little careful forward planning.
Sadly, the bazaars of Samarkand, Khiva and Bukhara are inside Uzbekistan.
One of the last great bastions of communism, Uzbekistan takes its visas
awfully seriously although the other Central Asian republics have relaxed
their rules. However, they love tourists. You need visas for every town you
want to visit but you can pick them up at Tashkent airport without great
difficulty.
Central Asia is the shoppers' paradise. The only problems are getting in and
out. Aeroflot flies to all major cities, except Dushanbe, where flights are
cancelled until further notice. Aeroflot is cheap if you can pay roubles
(either a local, or a journalist or student accredited in the CIS) but if
not, you have to pay in dollars.
Even so, it costs only a few hundred dollars to Tashkent, the capital of
Uzbekistan. The really cheap ride is the train. It costs about 1,500 roubles
from Moscow, unfortunately the journey takes five days. Alternatively, you
can fly Afghan Air from Kabul for Dollars 125.
Aeroflot has a maximum baggage allowance of 20 kilos, but nobody cares how
much you carry on to the plane; most CIS citizens travel with at least two
sacks of potatoes.
If the shopping frenzy takes too strong a hold and you buy so much you can
not lift it, then for Dollars 3,000 you can buy a Niva, a brand new Soviet
jeep. Load it up, point it west and drive the whole lot home.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-460</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / How to Spend it: Scenting success in the gift stakes - Which
of the profusion of after-shaves and toilet waters match those very
individual men in your life? Lucia van der Post gives her guide
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCIA VAN DER POST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONCE UPON a time, when Henry Cooper was busy splashing it about on page and
screen, Old Spice and Brut were about as exotic as men's fragrances ever
got. With today's varied choice, modern man faces almost as grave an
identity crisis as his female companion. Should he be a dynamic go-getter or
quietly traditional? Should he be gentle, caring, '90s man-about-town or a
country-lover at heart?
Take pity on him. Help him out. Decide for him. It is, after all, Christmas
Eve. And you still have not found anything for him. Like many others before
you, you head for the eau-de-toilette and the after-shave.
The desire to smell sweet and fragrant is not an exclusively female whim -
even the most emphatically masculine of chaps tends these days to have a
little hoard of lotions and potions that he dots and dabs about his person.
There they lie, rows and rows of them on the glittering counters of our most
glamorous stores and our most humble chains - alluring in their promise,
overwhelming in their profusion, contradictory in their messages. In one of
those packages lies perfect lotion for him. But which is to be?
If you know he has a favourite, all is simple - buy him the biggest flagon
you can afford. If in doubt, keep it subtle, mysterious, low-key.
So here, for those still with presents left to buy, is a last-minute guide
to which fragrance to give to whom.
He is tall and dark and a bit of a rogue. He drives a Porsche and eats at
San Lorenzo. His sport is polo, his drink champagne and his favourite
accessory is a long-limbed blonde. He is a bit of a show-off so make him
feel dashing and jet-set, international and swashbuckling and give him Pasha
de Cartier. He will not be ashamed to display its gleaming silver and gold
container on the bathroom shelf and it smells very dashing to boot. Pounds
49 for 100 ml spray.
He is a man of the '90s - gentle, caring, and, if the truth be told, a
little bit soppy. He dresses at The Gap, does his stint at the supermarket,
cycles to work and his favourite holiday is walking in the Lake District.
Ralph Lauren's new Polo Crest is just the thing - light, citrussy, natural,
Pounds 36 for 100 mls. Or think about Armani Homme (Pounds 36) or Dunhill
(Pounds 32).
He is your favourite great-uncle and one of the old school. He lives in the
country in a large but dilapidated house with lots and lots of land. His
deepest affections are reserved for his garden, his gun-dog and his cellar.
He only comes up to London for essential visits to his doctor, his
solicitor, his barber and his tailor. It is much too late in the day to
teach an old dog new tricks. Give him something deeply reassuring. Anything
from Geo F. Trumper, 9 Curzon Street, London W1 but possibly he would like
the classic Extract of Limes (Pounds 12.80 for 100 mls) best of all. If you
cannot get to Trumper, then consider Floris, also a name with substance and
a reassuring tradition behind it. Nothing new-fangled and fancy there. Give
him the most classic of all - No. 89 at Pounds 22.25 for 100 mls.
He is awfully big in the City and nothing but the best will do. Most weekday
lunchtimes find him at his regular table at The Connaught or The Savoy.
Weekdays are spent in town but Friday afternoons find him heading for his
manor house in Wiltshire. He likes nothing too loud, too obvious or too
avant-garde. Monsieur de Givenchy is discreet, refined and distinguished.
Just what our City friend would like, Pounds 19.25 for 60 mls. Another grand
old name to look out for is Chanel pour Monsieur at Pounds 31 for 100 mls
or, from the Penhaligon's, there is Blenheim Bouquet (Pounds 24 for 50 mls).
He is creative director of his own advertising company. He has a cool, white
flat in Docklands, wears Hugo Boss but also knows that a pair of Levi's and
an understated leather jacket will take him anywhere. He drives a Porsche
911, a Range Rover or, if he can run to it, an old classic, a Bentley for
preference. More than anybody he is conscious that everything - from his tie
to his after-shave - carries a message. When it comes to after-shave or
eau-de-toilette, he displays a surprisingly conservative streak - everything
olde and English is so a la mode. You would never, ever, scent him before
you see him. No. 88 from Czech &amp; Speake (125 Fulham Road, London SW3, 10,
Tunsgate, Guildford, Harrods, Selfridges and The Conran Shop, Pounds 36) is
just the kind of classy, understated smell he likes.
He is Graphic Man. He lives in a penthouse in Docklands. He is out of his
matt-black phase (so '80s) and his flat is now all cool, airy and white with
lots of rattan and strangely curved wrought-iron. Comfort does not, it
seems, come first. He eats at The Blueprint cafe, his glasses are
scaled-down tortoiseshell - very National Health to look at, very
un-National Health price tag. He is addicted to that
'just-run-over-by-a-bus' look. He wears button-down shirts and no tie, baggy
trousers and jackets that are at least two sizes too big. He never goes
anywhere without his state-of-the-art briefcase and his disposable pen. No
contest - Romeo by Romeo Gigli, this year's 'must have' designer fragrance.
It is not just the bottle - smooth, cool, with its oh-so-original
beer-bottle top opening - he actually likes the spicy, cinnamon smell. At
Pounds 32.50 for 100 mls.
He is healthy and hearty and tanned. He works out every day and plays squash
at weekends. He shops at Blazer, holidays in Greece (all those water
sports), drops into his local pub on Friday nights and drives a Golf GTI.
When it comes to girlfriends, he likes to have more than one on the go.
Nothing too fragrant, too floral or too heavy for our sporty outdoor type.
There are lots of brands aimed obviously at the sportsman  - surprise him,
give him Davidoff's Cool Water at Pounds 36 for 100 mls.
He is a bit of a young fogey. He wears his father's old Jermyn Street suits
or he shops at Hackett where he goes for the newly-fashionable, fusty,
tweedy look and comfortingly hairy suits remind him that there are a few
unchanging things in this uncertain world. He likes roast beef and Yorkshire
pudding and comforting nosh that reminds him of school. He likes to eat at
his club and is deeply convinced of the superiority of country life to town.
His girlfriends wear sweet little shirts with frilled collars, long brushed
cotton skirts, Alice bands and pumps. They are very, very nice, and so is
he. As Hackett is his spiritual home (their store is at 137-138 Sloane
Street, London SW1), you could always give him one of their straight classy
potions. If you fancy a designer name, give him Aramis Classic and you
cannot go wrong. (Pounds 30).
He is in his early forties, he is your husband and you love him dearly.
These days, he is looking a little tired and grey around the temples (even
the most solid of professions are proving less than solid these days) but,
though he may never set the world alight, he is always there when you need
him. For treats, he loves opera or an evening at the National and at
weekends nothing better than a good book at his own fireside. A new name
from a classic house should do him proud - Guerlain's Heritage (Pounds 19.50
for a 50ml spray) is just the thing. Armani Homme or Givenchy Gentlemen
would suit him, too.
All the fragrances except for those from Czech &amp; Speake, Floris, Geo F.
Trumper and Penhaligon's are available from Harvey Nichols and other big
department stores.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-461</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / The ERM murders: Fear stalks the world's markets as a serial
killer leaves his bloody trademark on the currencies of innnocent countries.
Young Poirot interviews the suspects
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'OFTEN, a crime requires a fortuitous opportunity as well as a pre-existing
motive,' observed Jacques Poirot.
FOR POIROT, chief of the internal investigations secretariat at the European
Commission, this was the denouement of perhaps his most remarkable case. It
was, he mused, one which his more famous uncle, Hercule, would have found
truly fascinating.
He looked around the room at his distinguished suspects. There was Jacques
Delors, the president of the European Commission himself, impatiently
fingering a large file labelled DANEMARK. Norman Lamont, the British
chancellor of the exchequer, was hurriedly putting a Thresher's Christmas
drinks price brochure back into his briefcase.
George Soros, the celebrated international speculator, seemed preoccupied
with a mobile paging device on which numbers were moving across a display.
Only Helmut Schlesinger, president of the Bundesbank, seemed fully at ease,
in the manner of a man who was content in the knowledge that he had done a
good job.
'I must apologise, messieurs, for detaining you so close to Christmas,'
Poirot said. 'But I believe it is vital to clear this matter up ahead of the
holidays, before the seasonal festivities have a negative effect on the
performance of the little grey cells.
'I am referring, of course, to what have become popularly known as the ERM
murders. It may be fanciful to talk about currencies as if they were people,
but consider the sequence of events. First, the vicious attack on the
Finnish markka. So small and so vulnerable, it posed no threat to anybody,
and yet it was ruthlessly gunned down by speculators. Then came the demise
of the Italian lira. Some argue that the lira deserved all it got. But the
circumstances were still disturbing.
'Next, the sterling pound. Perhaps it had behaved. . . how shall I say?. . .
somewhat provocatively. But did it merit such a fate? I think not. And so
on, with the peseta, the escudo and others, all cut down without mercy. Only
this month the Swedish krona succumbed after a long period on life support.
'In other words, an inexplicable series of exchange rate disasters which
surely cannot be random but must have a common connection. It may be
difficult, however, for many people to understand this here in Brussels,
where serial killings are normally associated with abuses of the Common
Agricultural Policy.'
If his stony-faced listeners understood the pun, they showed no signs of
doing so. 'Forgive me,' Poirot continued. 'You are right, this is indeed a
matter tres grave. I shall now come to the point.'
He walked down the table, and then stopped opposite Delors. 'I am afraid you
are not just here as an observer, as you were led to believe, monsieur. It
is difficult for me to make accusations against my own boss. But the logic
of the evidence is such that I must give voice to my suspicions.'
'Me, a suspect?' rasped Delors. 'This is intolerable. You were supposed to
find the guilty people in the markets, not make wild accusations against
your seniors. In any case, you must be quite mad. Nobody is more committed
than I am to the EMS, to the single market, to EMU and the European ideal. I
have proved it again and again, most recently by saving the Community from
the dreadful British presidency.'
'Peut-etre, mon President. But the remarkable feature of this case is that
the motives of the leading suspects are not at all what they seem] In your
own case, there is a conflict. It is no secret that you hope to become the
next president of France in 1995, perhaps sooner.'
Poirot nervously fingered his moustache. 'How much stronger your chance
might be if you could arrange that the franc should be the new core currency
of the European monetary system. Now, all rivals have been eliminated
except, of course, the D-Mark. Perhaps that will be your next target.'
'However, you are not my chief suspect.' Jacques Poirot shifted his gaze
further along the table. 'Herr Schlesinger, you were always a more plausible
perpetrator of this crime. You behaved aggressively in raising interest
rates, regardless of the position of your ERM partners. There were press
reports of interviews in which you apparently sought to undermine the
security of certain currencies.
Schlesinger snorted. 'Those accusations have all been completely answered,'
he snapped. 'I did not say those things, and if I did say them they were not
authorised to be printed. The Bundesbank has always been completely
committed to the ERM, so long as it is run in the way we require.'
'Exactement, monsieur,' responded Poirot. But I suggest that the signing of
the Maastricht treaty a year ago unleashed strong emotions in you. After
all, the very future of your beloved Bundesbank was threatened. It would be
replaced by a European central bank in the council of which the views of
countries such as Italy and Britain would become important. Just think how
inflationary that would be] Your anger could lead to a crime passionel]'
Poirot paused. 'Perhaps a plan for sabotage came into your mind. A hint of
conflict here, a failure to communicate a message there. If carried out with
skill and ruthlessness the whole ERM could be destroyed, Maastricht would be
discredited and the Bundesbank would survive]'
'You can prove nothing]' Schlesinger cried. 'I am but a public servant. I
carry out my duties according to the law. If other countries fail to listen
to what I say it is they who must accept the consequences.'
Poirot nodded. 'Indeed, I have come to the conclusion that you had the
motive but not the daring of the true criminal,' he observed. 'But you,
George Soros, have the reputation of being the executioner of the markets.
To destroy a currency would give you no pang in the conscience at all.'
Soros lifted his eyes briefly from his prices monitor. 'It is true that I am
a lifelong student of the financial markets,' he said. 'But as I explained
in my book on the theory of reflexivity, a speculator must respond to market
movements, not attempt to influence them. My activities may be embarrassing
for governments that follow unwise policies, but the money I make is not
wasted. Only last week I gave Dollars 50m to help the suffering people of
Bosnia.'
'Truly an assassin with a heart of gold]' murmured Poirot. 'But if you were
indeed an assassin, who hired you? In the course of my investigations I
began to think about the possibility of a conspiracy involving elements here
in the Brussels Commission itself. We have all heard the rumours, of
activists eager to expand the role of the Community, for instance in the
Yugoslav crisis, but baulked by member governments unwilling to cede
sovereignty or provide funds.
'No government has been more obstructive than that of Britain. So it would
surely have been tempting for the conspirators to arrange a trap for the
British government. This would be poetic justice] The British, so keen to
restrict their spending, would be lured into a situation in which they would
stupidly waste billions in a vain attempt to support sterling.'
Norman Lamont, silent until then, rose to his feet in protest. 'I say,
that's most unfair,' he protested. 'We had a very clear strategy, and in
fact we did not devalue sterling, it was just that it floated downwards.'
Poirot twirled his moustaches again. 'Bien sur,' he said. But the fact is
that British money is now pouring into Bosnia, and the British government
can do absolutely nothing to stop it] But now, if you will kindly sit down,
M Lamont, I will turn to your part in this unfortunate affaire.'
He paused for effect. 'You, of all people, surely had no motive for
finishing off European currencies, least of all your own. And yet there were
some curious inconsistencies in your behaviour that puzzled me. During the
summer, you repeatedly protested that maintaining the pound at a central
rate of DM2.95 was the only possible policy. The alternative, you said,
according to my recollection, would be a 'snip and run' policy leading to
inflation. For months you protested that you would never devalue. But in the
end you pulled out of the ERM almost without a fight. Did you protest a
little too much? My suspicions were aroused.
'And then, within the past few weeks, a possible explanation emerged. You
were involved in newspaper publicity concerning a tenant in your house, a
Miss Whiplash I believe. You evicted her, but it emerged, we know not from
where, that Pounds 4,700 of your legal costs were paid for by the Treasury.'
'There's nothing in it,' snapped Lamont. 'It was all officially approved and
totally above board. The costs all resulted from my official position as
chancellor of the exchequer.'
'Exactly so,' responded Jacques Poirot. 'And yet you knew you were not
popular within your party. There have been other criticisms. Permit me to
suggest that you received advance notice that this Miss Whiplash leak was
likely to occur. You thought it advisable to create a diversion. So the
sterling crisis came as an unexpected opportunity.
'Your improvised plan was simplicity itself. You would blame the sacrifice
of sterling on the Germans and on speculators. The premier and rest of the
party would be forced to support you because of their anti-European
policies. Then, when the matter of the legal costs became public, it would
seem to be a minor affair, and would present no further threat to your
position.'
Norman Lamont laughed. 'I came expecting an explanation of the attacks on
European currencies,' he said, 'but we have simply been given four ludicrous
theories, all totally unproveable.'
'Not quite unproveable,' replied Poirot. He pulled a small piece of paper
out of his pocket, with a flourish. 'You really should not have been so
careless as to write incriminating instructions on the back of your wine
merchants' sales slip. It says: 'Access restricted. 16.09 short. Tell
cellars.'
'Allow me to explain. The first two words plainly represent a security
classification. Then comes the explicit warning of the date of Black
Wednesday. Finally, there is an instruction to your friends in the markets,
although unfortunately your spelling is not very good. It confused me until
I realised you meant 'sellers'.'
Lamont rose and turned towards the exit. 'There is not a scintilla of doubt
about my innocence,' he said. 'My character will never be devalued. I am
tired of hearing quack solutions to these problems.' Jacques Poirot sighed.
It was as he had feared. 'Eh bien, the evidence is clear,' he murmured.
'They are all guilty.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-462</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Truth of the Matter: Preserving the sceptre on this isle -
The crown is still important, argues Hugh Dickinson, Dean of Salisbury
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH DICKINSON, Dean of Salisbury
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BULB was gone in the box room, so I had to clamber around in
semi-darkness to find the crown. Each year we dig it out from all the other
inherited junk which seems so useless and yet means so much. It was behind
the box with the seized-up vacuum cleaner and under the carton with the
Christmas tree lights. (Memo: test lights this year before entangling them
in spruce thicket.)
It is a tarnished hoop of filigree brass, part of a redundant electric
chandelier adapted many years ago for an epiphany procession. In fact, it is
far too wide for any human head, and slips down on to the shoulders of
anyone who tries to wear it. By candlelight on a velvet cushion carried by a
solemn child, it looks mysterious and majestic.
I sit at the kitchen table and get to work with the Brasso. My fingers grow
black but the brass begins to gleam like gold. I wonder if it is a magic
crown like Aladdin's lamp? If I rub hard enough will a smokey king
materialise from that empty 'O'? Would he be my royal servant, 'a brisk,
fond lackey to fetch and carry, a true free-hearted slave'? Or would I be
His Majesty's loyal and obedient servant? Risky. . .
Echoes of Shakespeare gather in the back of my memory. After all, this piece
is pure theatre. Shakespeare knew about royalty. Kings are countries; this
isle is sceptred. The monarch carries the land and its people in his soul.
'Upon the King] Let us our lives, our souls, our debts, our careful wives
lay on the King. He must bear all]'
The crown may give its wearer uneasy nights; death may keep his court there,
it encircles not only his head but his kingdom too and holds within its
hollow 'O' the hearts of all his subjects. Or hers, since that paragon of
absolute monarchy caught in the spotlight of Shakespeare's incandescent
imagination was Queen Elizabeth I.
But today, how much of all that heady chivalry and romantic royal ceremony
still holds the hearts and imaginations of the not so loyal subjects of E II
R, when chic hats are more in evidence than crowns? Much odious class
privilege and aristocratic arrogance is kept alive as a poisonous incubus
within the body politic with its tentacles around the not unsullied skirts
of the royal family. Should we sweep away all this royal farrago at the
beginning of a new millennium, admit that Tony Benn is right and elect Sir
Edward Heath the first president of the British Republic?
But something makes me pause. In spite of all the silly goings-on around the
palace, and in spite of the natural human frailty preyed on so pitilessly by
the carnivorous press, it may be that what we have is better than any
alternative purveyed by the republican faction. Inner and outer processes in
the personal and corporate psyche of our people are strangely entangled with
the crown and may contribute to the wholeness of the community in
subconscious but powerful ways. Is this a necessary part of our
self-identity? Was Shakespeare right?
People dream about the Queen. Not just a few, but, if the polls are right,
most people have significant encounters with their monarch. Jung or Freud
will no doubt tell us who she is standing in for in our unconscious world.
Whatever it is, there is some shared community of symbols, values and
longings deep down inside us which this particular ikon, the crown, serves
and represents.
Our society is rapidly losing the inheritance of shared symbols and values
which bind it together. That is - was - the function of religion. But now
'Things fall apart, the centre cannot hold'. The monarch is part of the
sacral centre, that mysterious system of rites and ceremonies which invests
a nation with continuity and without which chaos looms.
Can a president be that centre? Would we dream of Sir Ted? Of Nixon? Of
Amin? I think not (or only nightmares). We need the hollow 'O', a
non-political screen on to which the unconscious projections of a whole
people can be focused.
For that to happen, its wearer must have a certain simple integrity and be
not too clever, partisan or eloquent. Or divorced? Well, time has moved on.
The church might mutter but the public might see it as a sign of common
humanity. It is not just our corporate psyche which needs this outdated but
timeless ikon. Grotesquely the constitution needs it. This hollow 'O' is
constitutionally the precise equivalent of zero in mathematical
calculations.
To play solitaire, you need an empty space before any move can be made. Our
political system uses this empty 'O' as a space into which certain
transactions can be deposited to keep them free from political corruption.
Like the gold in Fort Knox, it legitimises the currency of power, although
it has no intrinsic value. We use a corporate myth to deposit in that sacral
vault the mandate for both our courts and our parliament.
The vulnerability of the Supreme Court in the US to political loading and
the corruption of the presidency should give us pause for thought. Be sure
to keep a hold of nurse for fear of getting something worse. Modernise, by
all means. Get out the Brasso. But pause before you wield the axe. Cromwell.
Remember?
Being British, of course, I think we will not make a decision to abolish the
monarchy. But deliberately or carelessly we may allow it to be eroded and
may not notice until too late what other parts of our heritage may be pulled
down with it when it falls.
I do not know whether the present heir to the throne will ever feel the
weight of this thing I am polishing up on his head, but I do know I feel a
profound moral shame to be part of a nation which can publicly dismember two
human beings and the naked gusto with which we have licked up their blood.
As one who has spent most of the past six years rescuing a priceless part of
our British identity from the effects of acid rain, my first instinct is to
start an appeal. But before that I must go over to the cathedral and
celebrate the arrival of three kings coming to lay their crowns at the feet
of the infant Christ. His was made of thorns. Remember?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-463</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Shops see late buying surge despite bomb scares
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL BUCKLEY and CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RETAILERS around the country were yesterday celebrating a last-minute surge
in shopping, in spite of a series of bomb scares which caused chaos in some
city centres.
Shops from Scotland to south-east England said a customer build-up which
began on Monday peaked yesterday. Many now expected final results for the
Christmas period to be at least as good as last year, and in some places
better - particularly in the north of England.
They emphasised that a late Christmas rush had been expected after
disappointing results in November and early December, and they saw few signs
of a wider recovery in consumer confidence.
Mr Andrew Bauer, manager of Whiteleys shopping centre in Bayswater, west
London, said shoppers had become more 'canny'. 'People have been
window-shopping for weeks, choosing exactly what they wanted. Now, having
got their December pay cheques, they are buying,' he said.
Central London was thronged with shoppers in spite of a series of bomb
scares which closed many mainline stations for part of the day and
underground stations around Oxford Street.
Other cities were also disrupted after a caller telephoned the Dublin
Evening Press newspaper warning of bombs in Newcastle, Manchester and Milton
Keynes. In Manchester, shoppers and office workers were evacuated from
buildings around four bus stations, and in Milton Keynes a shopping centre
was cleared while police conducted a search.
Newcastle was particularly hard hit: all 46 stations on Tyneside's Metro
rapid transit rail system were shut and Intercity trains on British Rail's
east coast line were delayed for up to 1 1/2 hours after the closure of
Newcastle Central Station.
But trading at Newcastle's Eldon Square, the largest city-centre shopping
centre in Europe, was little affected and the manager said shoppers were
'spending to a surprising degree'.
Last-minute boost, Page 4
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-464</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Serbia 'ready to hit back at UN': Yugoslav army chief warns
against intervention in Bosnia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER and GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BELGRADE, WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Yugoslav army yesterday threw down the gauntlet to the outside world,
warning that its forces may retaliate in the event of foreign military
intervention in Bosnia-Hercegovina.
General Zivota Panic, army chief-of-staff, said the army could not stand
aside 'if the biological survival of the Serbian people in Bosnia is brought
into question'.
His remarks, in an interview due to be published today in Borba, the
Belgrade daily, came as the United Nations Security Council was considering
a a resolution authorising the use of force to police a no-fly zone over
Bosnia imposed in October.
Gen Panic said: 'Although any foreign military intervention on the territory
of the former Yugoslavia would be completely illogical and would risk
spreading the flames of war throughout the European continent and beyond,
the Yugoslav army has been on alert for a long time. It is prepared to
respond with force to eventual aggression.'
His statement appeared to indicate a radical policy change in the top ranks
of the army. The Yugoslav army has so far maintained that it is only
responsible for defending the borders of the rump Yugoslav federation,
consisting solely of Serbia and Montenegro.
But General Panic yesterday made clear that despite the formal withdrawal of
the Yugoslav army from Bosnia in May, it plans to intervene to defend Serbs
outside of Yugoslavia in case of foreign military attack.
A western diplomat said yesterday: 'If Panic's statement means that Serbia
and Montenegro intend to become directly involved in a confrontation with
the Security Council, this will have profound effects for the Serbian
people.'
Nato yesterday sent the UN a list of military options for enforcing the
no-fly zone, ranging from combat fighter patrols to deter Serbian aircraft
from taking off to bombing Serbian airstrips.
The Nato allies remain at odds, however, on what degree of force to use to
ensure Serbia's compliance with the no-fly zone, and diplomats in the US are
not optimistic that they will be able to agree on a UN resolution
authorising enforcement before the end of the week.
While the US wants to give Serbia a 15-day deadline to comply with the ban
on flights over Bosnia, and to back up this ultimatum if necessary with
attacks on Serbian airfields, France and the UK, who have troops at risk in
Bosnia, want a substantial delay and a limited use of force.
Mr Radovan Karadzic, the Bosnian Serb leader, reiterated that UN forces on
the ground in Bosnia would not be safe in the event of western intervention.
He said troops belonging to Nato countries which have called for
intervention should be replaced.
Mr Karadzic said he had written to US president-elect Bill Clinton, saying
enforcement of the no-fly zone was unnecessary as there had been no combat
flights.
UN still wrangling over Bosnia resolution, Page 2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-465</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Depressed seaside resorts in rush to seek regional aid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DECLINING fortunes of traditional British seaside resorts have led to a
rush of applications to the government for regional aid that is more usually
reserved for depressed industrial regions.
Several coastal towns have applied for assisted area status in the hope of
winning regional grants, the Department of Trade and Industry has confirmed.
'It would be fair to call it a flood,' said Mr Dennis Artess, undersecretary
for leisure and tourism policy at the Association of District Councils.
The DTI will announce early next year the results of the review - the first
shake up of the assisted area map since 1984.
Among councils applying because of economic circumstances - in other
industries as well as tourism - are the resorts of Blackpool, Brighton,
Clacton, Great Yarmouth, Ilfracombe, Skegness, Torquay and Thanet. Tourist
areas have suffered from changing holiday patterns, with more long-stay
holiday-makers going overseas, while other parts of the UK, including urban
areas, are becoming increasingly successful in attracting day trippers.
The conference market is highly competitive while the recession has also hit
other industries, such as financial services in the south, on which economic
growth in resorts has depended. Unemployment rates in some tourist areas are
on a par with existing assisted areas.
The resorts could become knock-on casualties of the controversy over coal
pit closures. Mr Michael Heseltine, trade and industry secretary, has said
assisted area status will be used to help distressed mining regions.
That will almost certainly restrict the number of new areas which will
benefit when the final list is approved by the European Commission. 'If will
be a breakthrough to get a coastal area designated assisted area status,' Mr
Artess said.
Assisted area status gives access to the government's regional grants for
job creation and small business promotion. Criteria used in choosing regions
include unemployment levels and measures of social deprivation.
In its submission, Blackpool Borough Council said: 'Blackpool's image as a
holiday resort diverts attention from the assesment of its real economic
problems and the underlying weakness of its local economy and industrial
profile. Blackpool is a serious unemployment blackspot which remains
disadvantaged by the existing assisted area map.'
Brighton Borough Council says local manufacturing industry has been
'decimated', the area's role as an office centre has been hit by oversupply
in London and restructuring in financial services will hit 'a mainstay' of
the local economy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-466</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Britons' hopes of cheap French cigarettes stubbed out
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP RAWSTORNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH SMOKERS seeking bargain-priced cigarettes in the European single
market next year will have to travel further afield than Calais or Boulogne.
Savings on duty-paid cigarettes in France will be drastically reduced by the
French National Assembly's agreement this week to a 30 per cent increase in
tobacco prices within the next six months.
The present retail price in France of international brands such as Rothmans
or Marlboro is the equivalent of about Pounds 1.44p for 20, compared with
Pounds 2.27p in the UK; representing a saving of slightly more than Pounds
33 on the 800 cigarettes that cross-Channel shoppers will be allowed to
import for personal consumption.
That is still less than half the savings that will be available to British
holidaymakers on Spain's Costa Brava. With cigarettes priced at 42p for 20,
they will pay Pounds 74 less than the UK price of Pounds 91 for 800.
From January 18, however, French prices will be raised to Pounds 1.64 for
20, cutting the savings on 800 cigarettes to Pounds 25.20; a further price
increase in May to Pounds 1.90 will reduce the savings to a mere Pounds
14.80.
The French price increases, which have been welcomed by the country's health
authorities, will raise FFr4.5bn (Pounds 540m) and reduce the social
security budget deficit.
The CGT trade union estimates that tobacco consumption will fall by up to 20
per cent and fears further job cuts. Seita, the state-owned cigarette
manufacturer, has already announced the closure of three plants with the
loss of 443 jobs since the introduction of curbs on tobacco advertising and
smoking in public places.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-467</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Switzerland
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
There are some murky politics behind the row between Union Bank of
Switzerland and Mr Christoph Blocher, the director it is trying to sack. Mr
Blocher was an implacable opponent of Swiss membership of the European
Economic Area which UBS actively supported in the recent referendum. But
more than pride is at stake. The underlying issue is a fundamental one of
corporate governance: the right of shareholders to influence corporate
management.
Mr Blocher's chief ally is BK Vision, the investment trust which speaks for
4 per cent of UBS shares. It was set up by Mr Martin Ebner, share analyst
turned financier, who has already rattled the boards of such companies as
Zurich Insurance and Roche. In choosing to fight Mr Blocher on his supposed
attitude to regulation of mortgage rates and central bank independence, UBS
may have chosen issues on which it can win, hobbling Mr Ebner in the
process. Even so, a couple of years ago the dispute would have been
unthinkable. Swiss investors are flexing their muscles more effectively than
their German counterparts, who are only just beginning to clamour for
shareholder rights.
One reason may be Switzerland's stronger tradition of independent fund
management. But companies have also - sometimes reluctantly - realised that
they must become more friendly towards shareholders to attract investment
capital in today's global market. Hence the fashion for abolishing
non-voting participation certificates and more transparent financial
reporting. The theory is that, as Switzerland falls more closely into line
with international standards, its equity market could enjoy a revaluation.
If anything, the no vote in the recent referendum, which has left
Switzerland out in the cold, may even accelerate the process. Germany offers
scope for similar valuation gains, but the need for change is less marked.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-468</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Gardner Merchant
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
These are not easy times for leveraged buy-outs, but the omens are better
than most for Gardner Merchant, whose sale to a consortium led by CinVen was
authorised at an extraordinary meeting of Forte yesterday. Not only is
contract catering a highly cash-generative business but Gardner Merchant
starts out with a gearing of around 100 per cent, which is low for this type
of exercise. Since it has been able to hedge its interest exposure to give
single-digit rates for years ahead, debt service should be no problem.
Less certain is the rate of growth. Gardner's management has delivered
steady if unspectacular growth of 10 to 15 per cent for Forte over the
years. It believes it can continue to do so in a market where public sector
contracts, especially in the health service, are ripe for the plucking.
Perhaps the combination of independence and incentives attached to the
buyout will spur management to push up margins which are half those at
Compass, its main rival. The art will be to avoid losing the reputation for
service on which organic growth depends. If Gardner Merchant succeeds,
Forte, which has retained a 25 per cent stake, may yet wonder why it
disposed of a business that generated so much useful cash to fund its
hotels.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-469</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: US economy
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Yesterday's 0.2 per cent rise in US personal incomes may have disappointed
the equity market slightly, but special factors were at work. Most recent
economic data confirm that a modest but well-founded recovery is under way,
and the US economy is likely to grow by around 2.5 per cent in 1993. That
may well be enough to prevent President-elect Clinton from launching a large
fiscal recovery package. US Treasury bond yields, which have declined since
the election, may fall further as the prospect of increased supply fades.
However, economic growth may not be enough to cut unemployment much. With
wage pressures low and commodity prices weak, inflation is likely to remain
subdued. A background of growth, low inflation and falling bond yields is
tailor made for a bull market in equities. And while the narrowly-based Dow
Jones Industrials index has been held back by laggards like IBM, the broader
Standard &amp; Poors Composite index has made new highs in the past week.
The good run appears to have momentum, and there is evidence of small
investors moving money from bond to equity funds. Overseas fund managers may
also increase their low weightings in US stocks. But such flow-of-funds
arguments are slippery, and the market may be approaching a peak. Many
high-quality stocks are now on high ratings, and there is increasing
turnover in new issues. The S&amp;P now sells at 16 times the most optimistic
estimates of 1993 corporate earnings. In the absence of a boom, it is
unlikely to push much higher.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-470</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: In festive mood
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
This week's rally in UK equities feels like more than the seasonal
meandering of an inebriated market. Trading volumes have been unusually high
for the festive season. The best of the gains have been in second-tier
stocks, pushing the FT-SE 250 Index ahead. With no futures contract on that
index, the pernicious influence of pit traders can hardly be at work. That
the 250 is weighted towards the capital goods sectors only adds to the
impression that the market is rationally pricing in a cyclical recovery in
earnings.
Even so, a multiple of over 17 times last year's earnings is taking a lot on
trust. The market last reached a comparable multiple in the run up to the
1987 crash. There are powerful supports nonetheless, not least the dwindling
returns on cash. With long gilts yielding only 2.1 times more than the
market, equities are hardly out of line with bonds. Equally, the prospects
look bullish set against the grim economic outlook on continental Europe.
That should draw funds from overseas. Come the spring, though, the
government will be competing hard for funds.
If that means higher bond yields, equities will be swimming against the
tide. Companies may be tempted to make a dash for cash before the government
wades in. If recovery really is around the corner, corporate funding will be
required. Assuming some moderately good news on earnings, a rush of first
quarter rights issues is a real possibility. That would really test the
courage of the market's convictions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-471</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Weaker drug shares take shine
off Dow
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
US SHARE prices held steady in busy trading yesterday as financial markets
wound down for the Christmas holidays, writes Patrick Harverson in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was down 7.56 at 3,313.54, its
low for the day. The more broadly based Standard &amp; Poor's 500 finished 1.28
off at 439.03 but the Nasdaq composite added 2.12 at 662.96, a record high.
Trading volume on the New York SE amounted to 234m shares and rises narrowly
outpaced declines by 935 to 882.
Stocks opened slightly firmer, but struggled to hold on to the early modest
gains, primarily because pharmaceutical issues were mostly weaker following
downgrades by some Wall Street brokers.
The day's economic news was mixed. Personal income rose 0.2 per cent and
personal spending by 0.5 per cent last month, both signs of a healthier
economy. November durable goods orders, however, fell 1.9 per cent, an
unexpected decline after the previous month's strong gain of 4.6 per cent.
The durable goods orders figures are notoriously volatile, so most investors
ignored the data.
ADRs in Glaxo retreated Dollars 1 to Dollars 23 in volume of 6.9m shares,
making the stock the busiest of the day. Selling was prompted by news that
analysts at Wall Street broking houses Smith Barney and Lehman Brothers had
cut their ratings on the drug stock.
Other drug shares were notably weaker, even though most of their ratings
were left untouched by the broking houses. Pfizer dropped Dollars 3 1/8 to
Dollars 74 in turnover of 2.1m shares, Merck Dollars 1 3/4 to Dollars 45,
Johnson &amp; Johnson Dollars 1 5/8 to Dollars 51 5/8 and Schering-Plough
Dollars 2 5/8 to Dollars 65 1/2 .
Honeywell fell Dollars 1 3/8 to Dollars 32 1/8 in busy trading after Mr
Christopher Steffen, the company's chief financial officer, resigned
unexpectedly. The company has not yet found a successor.
Advanced Micro slipped Dollars  3/4 to Dollars 17 5/8 after Merrill Lynch
lowered its near-term rating on the stock from 'above average' to 'neutral'.
IBM weakened slightly, giving back some of the gain earned in Tuesday's
mini-rally. Market sentiment remains set against IBM, at least until the
uncertainty surrounding the dividend is removed. The stock shed Dollars  3/8
to Dollars 51 1/4 in volume of 4.2m shares.
On the Nasdaq market, Oracle Systems surged Dollars 8 1/2 , or 44 per cent,
to Dollars 27 7/8 in turnover of 5.7m shares after several analysts raised
their ratings for the stock after the company reported second-quarter net
income of 23 cents a share, up from a year-earlier 10 cents.
Canada
THE TORONTO market ended slightly stronger after slow, sleepy dealings as
recent interest rate cuts continued to prop up Canada's heavier-weighted
shares. The TSE 300 Index rose 9.6 to 3,323.1 and advances led falls by 348
to 216 after volume of 28.9m shares.
United Reef Petroleum, which announced a diamond find earlier this week, led
the actives list. The stock ended 36 cents ahead at a 52-week high of
CDollars 2.28 after turnover of 1.7m shares.
High-flying but volatile telecommunications stock Newbridge Networks forged
ahead CDollars 3 1/2 to CDollars 53 1/2 .
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-472</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CONTINUED demand for industrial and financial stocks propelled the market
higher but volume was thin ahead of Christmas. The all-share index rose 9 to
3,242 and industrials climbed 25 to 4,329, but golds fell 5 to 817.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-473</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Continental trade calms down
ahead of holidays
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TRADING calmed down ahead of Christmas but the underlying mood remained
positive, writes Our Markets Staff.
FRANKFURT went into the holiday period slightly firmer but activity was
subdued. The DAX index, which had earlier seen a day's low of 1,517.63,
recovered to close 3.38 higher at 1,526.95. Turnover fell to DM2.7bn from
DM4bn.
Corporate news was limited to a report that Allianz had taken a 10 per cent
stake in Veba: the insurer put on DM5 to DM1,960 and the utility rose 10 pfg
to DM361.10.
Among the banks, Deutsche rose DM6.70 to DM644.60 and Bayerische Vereinsbank
gained DM5.40 to DM419.40.
MILAN rose in the wake of Tuesday's cut in interest rates and the Comit
index put on 8.91 to 437.87. Turnover was estimated at well below Tuesday's
heavy L208bn as dealers were unwilling to open fresh positions ahead of the
Christmas holiday. The bourse reopens on Monday.
Fiat rose L150 to L3,930 and Montedison was up L51 to L1,133 but traders
noted a slight easing in prices of industrial shares after hours.
Insurers reinforced the gains made so far this week. Generali rose L1,105 to
L28,715.
After the close, Consob said that shares in Germany's Commerzbank will be
listed on the Milan bourse from Monday.
PARIS eased on profit-taking at the close of the December trading account
and the CAC 40 index lost 3.26 to 1,821.11 in turnover of FFr2.8bn.
Among active stocks, Alcatel eased FFr3 to FFr676 and Suez fell FFr4.30 to
FFr250.50. Lyonnaise des Eaux put on FFr14.10 or 3 per cent to FFr482.50.
AMSTERDAM's CBS Tendency index improved 1.0 to 106.6 and there were few
features in a quiet market. Among major stocks, Nedlloyd and Unilever both
gained Fl 1.10 to Fl 30.80 and Fl 191.80 respectively while Elsevier slipped
Fl 1 to Fl 120.50.
BRUSSELS closed weaker on profit-taking with the Bel-20 index down 5.91 at
1,135.65 in turnover of some BFr754bn.
SGB was the day's most active stock, falling BFr50 to BFr1,840 but Cie
Maritime Belge gained BFr60 or 4 per cent to BFr1,490 after the European
Commission imposed a smaller-than-expected anti-trust fine on the company.
ZURICH improved on interest in banks and insurers and the SMI index gained
4.9 to 2,061.4.
MADRID lost ground with the general index falling 1.68 to 218.14. Santander
lost Pta125 or 2.7 per cent to Pta4,520 on news that it might be prosecuted
for tax fraud.
STOCKHOLM closed higher but off its intraday highs, and the Affarsvarlden
general index put on 2.3 to 916.9.
The banking and financial sector bucked the trend by dropping 2.4 per cent
on worries about the fresh crisis in the banking sector. Late on Tuesday it
emerged that state-owned Nordbanken would need an additional SKr24bn in
state support.
VIENNA's ATX index rose 12.88 or 1.7 per cent to 752.31. Among actives, OMV
improved Sch18 or 3 per cent to Sch620.
ISTANBUL improved further with the 75-share index gaining 18.42 to 4,094.02
in turnover of some TL280bn.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE ACTUARIES SHARE INDICES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
December 23                                         THE EUROPEAN SERIES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes             Open      10.30      11.00      12.00
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100     1071.80    1073.68    1073.90    1074.01
FT-SE Eurotrack 200     1156.99    1156.54    1157.70    1158.21
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes            13.00      14.00      15.00      Close
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100     1074.29    1073.74    1073.25    1073.60
FT-SE Eurotrack 200     1157.89    1156.79    1154.62    1154.31
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                       Dec 22    Dec 21    Dec 18    Dec 17    Dec 16
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100   1072.92   1059.21   1050.25   1034.41   1036.62
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1157.60   1145.44   1136.56   1119.02   1117.67
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value  1000 (26/10/90)  High/day: 100 - 1074.74; 200 - 1159.28
Low/day: 100 - 1071.35  200 - 1153.99
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-474</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Taiwan loses 3.7% on
political worries
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WITH TOKYO closed for a public holiday, the region's markets concentrated on
domestic news.
TAIWAN fell sharply on rumours that voting fraud had been detected in one of
the districts where an opposition candidate had lost to the ruling
Nationalist party in last weekend's parliamentary elections.
The weighted index dropped 131.82, or 3.7 per cent, to 3,448.15. Turnover
doubled to TDollars 16.2bn from TDollars 8bn. Analysts said worries of
political instability had unnerved investors.
HONG KONG lost some of its early gains on profit-taking by domestic
institutions. The Hang Seng index, which had climbed 81.93 points to touch
an intraday high of 5,379.67, closed a net 24.64 up at 5,322.38.
Property shares were popular on hopes that the property loan ceiling would
soon be raised from the current 70 per cent. Cheung Kong climbed 20 cents to
HKDollars 18.10 and Sun Hung Kai Properties rose 50 cents to HKDollars
26.90.
Jardine Matheson improved 75 cents to HKDollars 42.25, after touching a
day's high of HKDollars 43.25.
SINGAPORE ended marginally lower in slack trading ahead of the holidays. The
Straits Times Industrial index lost 3.10 to 1,486.06 in volume of 65.8m
shares, compared with 68.5m on Wednesday.
The Japanese retailer Isetan, which reported disappointing results on
Wednesday, declined 10 cents to SDollars 3.92, but Singapore Press Foreign
advanced 70 cents to SDollars 15.70, DBS Foreign gained 40 cents to SDollars
14.10 and SIA Foreign put on 30 cents to SDollars 17.80.
SEOUL rallied, with many stocks closing limit-up. The composite index
finished 13.42 higher at 670.43. Large-capitalisation issues, including
bank, securities and large manufacturing shares, were generally better, but
Pohang Iron and Steel lost Won600 to Won26,200 on reports that the limit of
8 per cent foreign ownership had been reached.
MANILA featured selected blue chips and the composite index closed 16.51
ahead at 1,223.67, ending two days of declines. Combined turnover rose to
182.1m pesos from 126m pesos. PLDT moved forward 15 pesos to 830 pesos
following a good overnight performance in the US. PNB advanced 5 pesos to
223 pesos.
AUSTRALIA lost ground on profit-taking by institutions. The All Ordinaries
index shed 5.3 to 1,524.8 in turnover of ADollars 236.42m.
BHP came under selling pressure, losing 12 cents to ADollars 12.96, while
Woodside Petroleum, in which BHP has a stake, receded 19 cents to ADollars
3.49 after problems with the installation of a gas platform on the North
West Shelf.
Elsewhere, CRA jumped 26 cents to ADollars 13.36, while News Corp shed 20
cents to ADollars 29.70. Mayne Nickless slipped 8 cents to ADollars 6.17
after the loss of a satellite owned by Optus Communications, in which it has
a 49 per cent stake.
NEW ZEALAND saw lacklustre trading as the NZSE-40 index moved up just 0.9 to
1,535.0. Fletcher Challenge appreciated 5 cents to NZDollars 2.42, but
Carter Holt Harvey relinquished 6 cents to NZDollars 2.69.
BANGKOK was little changed on the day, the SET index losing 0.37 to 863.50
in turnover of Bt4.7bn. Declines slightly outnumbered advances by 108 to 93,
with 78 stocks unchanged.
Siam City Bank shed Bt0.50 to Bt14.25, while among property companies,
Krisda Mahanakorn retreated Bt3 to Bt126, Bangkok Land eased Bt2 to Bt96.50
and Tanayong lost Bt1.50 to Bt82.
Christiani &amp; Nielsen (Thai) Co, another property group, rose Bt15 to Bt170
on news recently that it had taken over its Danish parent company.
BOMBAY moved in a narrow range, with trading restricted to one hour instead
of the normal three hours. The BSE index ended 9.26 up at 2,571.36.
JAKARTA closed on a softer note, but Astra International strengthened,
ending Rp200 higher at Rp8,850 following the resignation on Tuesday of its
chairman, thereby clearing the way for a consortium to buy a 44.5 per cent
stake. The index eased 0.44 to 271.75.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-475</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Commodities (Week in the Markets): Prices volatile in thin
conditions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD MOONEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WIDE PRICE fluctuations in many commodity markets this week resulted from
relatively modest buying and selling orders in thin, pre-Christmas
conditions.
The sharpest movement was gold's Dollars 4.85-a-troy-ounce drop over Monday
and Tuesday, which traders said was initiated by selling from an individual
US trade house. As the price slid towards a support level at Dollars 332 an
ounce one dealer told the Reuter news agency that 'under normal
circumstances the volume traded would not have moved the market so much'.
The gold price was steadier yesterday, gaining 55 cents to Dollars 332.85 an
ounce, but was still Dollars 4.30 down on the week so far.
The platinum price followed a similar pattern, recovering Dollars 1.10 at
yesterday's afternoon fixing to reach Dollars 359.60 an ounce, Dollars 3.90
below last Friday's level, while cash silver was six cents down overall at
370.5 cents an ounce.
Most base metals markets at the London Metal Exchange presented a mirror
image of the movements in the gold market, slipping back a little yesterday
following strong gains earlier in the week.
Copper was a case in point. Modest Chinese buying and worries about copper
workers joining a Polish general strike were less influential than technical
factors in the three months delivery position's Pounds 54.50 rise to Pounds
1,489.25 a tonne over the first two days, dealers said.
Mr Ted Arnold, analyst at the Merrill Lynch financial services group,
pointed to the profound effect commodity funds, managing about Dollars 26bn,
were having on traded metals markets. 'These funds tend to work primarily on
technical analysis,' he said. 'While the data bases for these averages go
back for many years, the big weighting is put on the last two or three years
of performance. So a metal like copper tends to look very 'cheap' on a
moving average and technical basis when it gets down to 95 cents a lb.'
Sterling's decline against the dollar had also contributed to the advance
and yesterday it counteracted a modest retracement in dollar terms as most
of the buying interest dried up and light Japanese selling weighed copper
prices down. At the close the LME three months position was quoted at Pounds
1,490.50 a tonne, up Pounds 1.25 on the day and Pounds 55.75 on the week.
The movement on the day worked out at a fall of Dollars 16.50 in terms of
the US currency.
Other metals following this pattern were zinc, up Dollars 9 on balance for
three months delivery at Dollars 1,077.50 a tonne, after falling Dollars 2
yesterday; nickel, up a net Dollars 100 at Dollars 5,932.50 a tonne, after a
Dollars 20 retracement; aluminium, up Dollars 5.25 at Dollars 1,249.50 a
tonne, after a Dollars 10.25 fall; and lead, up Pounds 5 at Pounds 306.50 a
tonne, after being trimmed by Pounds 4.75.
The exception was tin, which continued upwards yesterday to close at Dollars
5,857.50 a tonne, up Dollars 116.50 from last Friday's level. Dealers
explained that yesterday's Dollars 55 rise followed a firm overnight
performance on the Kuala Lumpur market. They also noted that there had been
interest in purchasing 'call' (buying) options at strike prices Dollars 240
to Dollars 340 above the present level.
Signs of Christmas cheer on the London Futures and Options Exchange's coffee
market evaporated yesterday when the gains that had taken nearby prices to
20-month highs were virtually wiped out.
The March position closed on Tuesday at Dollars 1,081 a tonne, up Dollars 26
from last Friday, having been boosted by expectations of a lower crop in
Brazil and tightness in Colombian exports. But the price opened sharply
lower yesterday following a forecast by the US Department of Agriculture
that Brazil's 1993-94 crop would rise to 27m bags (60 kg each) from 24m bags
in 1992-93. As a wave of profit-taking was triggered further losses were
registered and the March price touched bottom at Dollars 1,052 a tonne
before support appeared. At the close the price was quoted at Dollars 1,060
a tonne, down Dollars 21 on the day but still Dollars 5 up on the week.
Dealers suggested, however, that industry buying interest had been evident
and should help to limit the scope for further losses. The overall uptrend
remained intact, they said, and the setback should prove fairly shortlived.
Some psychological support was expected at Dollars 1,050 but more
significant chart-based backing should emerge around Dollars 1,040.
Cocoa futures prices, which had started the week with a small decline,
rallied on Tuesday and yesterday to reach Pounds 693 a tonne for March
delivery, up Pounds 21 on balance. The main surge on Tuesday reflected
covering against short positions, rather than fresh buying orders, dealers
said. And they thought the scope for further gains would be limited by the
knowledge that producer selling was likely to be attracted if March cocoa
breached the Pounds 700-a-tonne mark.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-476</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: Cyclical stocks bear brunt of currency
turmoil - William Cochrane reviews the best and worst performers in the
FT-SE Eurotrack 100 in the second half
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM COCHRANE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The progressive departure of the cyclicals from the European share price
leader board, apparent after the first six months of 1992, has turned into a
rout in a second half marked by currency devaluation, or the lack of it.
Four big carmakers - Volkswagen, Fiat, Daimler and Peugeot - figure among
the bottom 10 performers in the FT-SE Eurotrack 100 index in the approximate
six-month period to December 21; Philips, the Dutch electricals giant, would
have joined them, but it has just been deleted from the Eurotrack; and just
outside the bottom 10 come BMW and tyremaker Pirelli SpA.
This is in distinct contrast to the position in early June, when there were
four consumer durables leaders among the top 10 performers - VW, Pirelli,
Volvo and Philips. In some cases, sentiment has switched from a mood of
euphoria to one of sickening gloom.
Mr Bob Barber, who heads the automotive and capital goods analysis team at
James Capel, notes that until the end of June the automotive sector was the
best performer in Europe, outperforming the broker's own European (ex-UK)
index by 13 per cent. In the second half, says Mr Barber, it has
underperformed by 26 per cent.
Prospects for German carmakers have gone from bad to worse recently.
Strengthening terms of trade against various other European currencies have
left German industrialists worried about dropping export margins, and
plummeting pro-fits on foreign production facilities.
Volkswagen secured its place near the bottom of the Europile with a
mid-December forecast of substantial fourth-quarter losses, effectively
confirm-ing it would cut the 1992 dividend and indicating that 1993 could be
a good deal worse.
Mr Dieter Ullsperger, VW's finance director, also forecast that the German
car market will shrink by 20 per cent in 1993, and that deliveries to Europe
will fall by 10 per cent.
Daimler-Benz, meanwhile, said on December 15 that short-time working would
cut its total 1992 output of cars to 529,000, compared with 578,000 in 1991,
and that profits would fall from DM1.9bn (Dollars 1.2bn) to around DM1.5bn.
The oil industry, too, went through a series of corporate setbacks in the
July to December period. BP, the UK giant, lost its chairman in mid-year and
halved its second-quarter dividend at the beginning of August; this was
accompanied by boardroom strife, and a slump in refining and petrochemical
operations at OMV, the state-controlled Austrian energy and petrochemicals
group.
OMV said early in November that it had returned to profits in the third
quarter. However, by then the bears had focused once, and were about to
focus again on Petrofina, Belgium's oil company, which said in mid-December
that it was halving its dividend and that 1993 would also be an extremely
difficult year.
The top 10 is headed by Credito Italiano and BCI. The Italian government is
planning a radical reduction in state control of the Italian banking and
financial system as the central feature of a far-reaching privatisation
programme submitted to parliament in mid-November. Privatisation fever
inflamed the Milan market from the end of October, cooling down a little by
December but with occasional eruptions from time to time.
In the same sector, but somewhat different in character, Kredietbank, of
Belgium, looks like one of the linchpin defensive stocks in the top 10.
Other defensive stocks in or near the top 10 are the pharmaceutical majors,
Astra, of Sweden, and Roche, of Switzerland, and the food group Nestle.
Merrill Lynch characterises Kredietbank as highly conservative, a local bank
with a strong domestic franchise: 'Kredietbank has not vied for expansion
abroad except in business areas related to the international and specialised
needs of its domestic client base, and this has left it in an enviable
position in terms of asset quality,' the broker says. It is also, of course,
trading in a hard currency.
Trading share prices in soft currencies means that the Eurotrack top five,
based in Italy and Sweden, have been apparently less profitable for the
foreign investor than for domestic punters - whereas numbers six to 10, in
Switzerland, Belgium and the Netherlands, have done better for the foreigner
than for investors at home.
Among the other leaders, Ericsson, the telecommunications group, was strong
in both halves. Before that, the B frees showed 18 months of severe
weakness, from mid-1990 to the end of 1991. In 1992, however, performance
has improved, with third-quarter results released in November demonstrating
outstanding cost control and coinciding with the floating of the Swedish
crown.
Merrill Lynch analysed the company at the time and estimated that, with half
of costs and revenue in 'soft' and half in 'hard' currency countries, the
overall effect of the Swedish currency's devaluation was only mildly
positive for the company, although good for business in the long run.
Of Astra, James Capel said on December 17 that while its R &amp; D presentation
meeting for analysts had disappointed the market's high new product
expectations, it had reaffirmed the strong growth trends of its most
important pharmaceutical products.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE EUROTRACK 100: WINNERS AND LOSERS, JUNE 30 - DECEMBER 21
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Top 10        Actual      Change*    Bottom 10      Actual      Change*
              change  relative to                   change  relative to
                   %    Eurotrack                        %    Eurotrack
                            100 %                                 100 %
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Cdt. Italiano  91.53        73.54    Volkswagen   (-35.19)     (-30.29)
BCI            56.31        41.62    OMV          (-33.98)     (-28.81)
Astra B        41.13        23.51    Daimler-Benz (-31.28)     (-26.08)
Ericsson B     33.33        16.68    Fiat         (-29.08)     (-35.75)
Ras            22.33        10.84    Petrofina    (-27.06)     (-21.62)
Roche certs    21.43        30.84    Ferruzzi Fin (-23.25)     (-30.46)
Kredietbank    20.21        29.17    Brown Boveri (-21.93)     (-15.88)
Nestle certs   19.15        28.38    Montedison   (-21.53)     (-28.90)
ABN-Amro       18.50        27.87    Union Fenosa (-21.17)     (-24.69)
UBS bearer     18.49        27.62    Peugeot      (-20.25)     (-15.67)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
* Actual changes are in local currencies; relative gains and losses are
affected by currency fluctuations.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-477</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Money Markets: UK futures rise sharply
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SLIGHTLY easier tone in European money markets continued yesterday, with
French and German futures all extending their recent rises, writes James
Blitz.
In the UK market, short-dated futures rose after the release of figures
showing increased savings by Britons in the third quarter. This clouded
hopes of a quick economic recovery led by consumer spending and raised new
hopes that the government might have to ease monetary policy further to
stimulate a recovery.
As the holiday approaches, the market continues to be swayed by the
Christmas cheer delivered on Tuesday by Mr Helmut Schlesinger, the
Bundesbank president. He said German inflation could be as low as 3 per cent
by the year-end.
However, Mr Schlesinger's forecast was slightly overshadowed yesterday by
poor preliminary figures for German inflation in December. The cost of
living rose 0.2 per cent in December from November, and was 3.8 per cent
higher compared to December 1991 levels.
There was, nevertheless, a rise in short-dated Euromark futures, with the
March contract up another 2 basis points to close at 92.22.
German call money rates retreated as the market found itself with sufficient
liquidity after the passing of a major tax deadline. Traders quoted call
money at 8.70-8.85 per cent, down from 8.80-8.90 per cent on Tuesday.
In the French cash market, three-month money dropped sharply from the 12 1/4
per cent level seen on Tuesday, partly because it is assumed that a
concerted attack on the French franc will not take place before the new
year. Three-month money fell to 11 1/2 per cent. The March French franc
futures contract advanced 7 basis points to a close of 90.71.
Yesterday's increase in the savings ratio, which measures the percentage of
disposable income that people save, partly explains the 6 basis-point rise
in the March short sterling contract, to a close of 93.35. Dealers believe
sluggish consumer spending could force the UK to reduce base rates again
soon.
Three-month money firmed slightly to 7 1/4 per cent, having hovered around 7
3/16 per cent for most of the week. The Bank of England forecast a shortage
of Pounds 1.2bn at the start of operations, with no late assistance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-478</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Dollar's mini-rally continues
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOLLAR continued its small pre-Christmas rally against the D-Mark
yesterday, rising above the DM1.59 level but failing to break through to
DM1.60, writes James Blitz.
Once again, foreign exchange trading was extremely thin in the run-up to
Christmas, and exchange rates were affected by the tiniest of flows.
Market sentiment continued to be dominated by Tuesday's comments from Mr
Helmut Schlesinger, the Bundesbank president, that German inflation would be
at 3 per cent by the end of next year.
The boost that this gave to the dollar on Tuesday was compounded yesterday
by data showing a 0.2 percentage-point rise in US personal income in
November, and a 0.5 percentage-point increase in spending in the same month.
Mr Neil MacKinnon, chief economist at Citibank in London, said both data
indicated that the US economic upturn, when it comes, will be consumer-led.
The dollar closed in London at DM1.5945, up 80 pfennigs on the day. It
finished New York trading at DM1.5952.
The D-Mark had a weaker tone against the French franc, but closed unchanged
at FFr3.411. Investors continue to think that the pressure on the French
currency will return in the new year.
Sterling was unable to profit from the easier tone to trading, partly due to
the latest UK savings ratio figure. This rose to 12.3 per cent in the third
quarter of 1992, against a revised 11.4 per cent in the second quarter,
suggesting that consumer spending was likely to remain limited, and that the
government might need to stimulate the economy further through more rate
cuts.
The pound slipped  3/4 pfennig to finish at DM2.4350. It was 1 1/4 cents
weaker in terms of the dollar at Dollars 1.5265, also the closing rate in
New York.
Movements in most currencies in the new year will depend on whether the
Bundesbank eases policy. Mr MacKinnon of Citibank believes the pressures on
the German central bank will soon be overwhelming. German GDP, in his view,
is set to fall next year by as much as 1 per cent, threatening the German
economy with depression.
Miss Alison Cottrell, an economist at Midland Global Markets in London,
agrees. In her view, this week's lower figure for German M3 money growth,
which showed an annualised 9.3 per cent rise in the year to November, is an
over-estimate of the real figure.
She believes that the amount of money in circulation in November will have
been boosted by the heavy liquidation of German assets into cash to avoid a
heavy tax on interest-bearing deposits due to be introduced next month.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-479</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Renewed pressure on ICI
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
STOCK market prospects for ICI shares continued to dwindle yesterday as even
the most enthusiastic analysts felt constrained to lower profit forecasts
for the chemicals and pharmaceuticals giant. The shares were down 24 at the
day's low but rallied to close 14 off at 1021p.
In spite of being a buyer of the stock, Mr Andrew Benson, BZW's chemicals
analyst, reduced his current year forecast by Pounds 140m to Pounds 560m and
shaved next year's estimate by Pounds 20m to Pounds 750m. The current year
figure brings BZW near the level of Smith New Court's, the superbear, which
has consistently led market forecasts downwards and which produced lower
predictions on Tuesday.
Mr Benson acknowledges the dragging effect of an uncompetitive pound and the
slowdown in the European chemicals industry. However, he still believes in
the fundamental value of the company and its scope for growth.
Although viewed as the classic stock to track the All-Share Index, ICI has
underperformed dramatically since the end of September, when the first
reassessments of the company's prospects began to appear.
Glaxo downgraded
An early rise for Glaxo was sharply reversed after analysts in the US and UK
cut their forecasts and ratings for the international drugs group.
Smith Barney, the US securities house, downgraded several pharmaceutical
stocks and removed Glaxo and SmithKline Beecham from its recommended list.
Analyst Ms Christina Heuer, traditionally one of the most enthusiastic
supporters of Glaxo, lowered her ratings on a number of stocks because of
concern over slowing sales growth, potential healthcare legislation and
earnings expansion.
In the UK, Lehman Brothers cut its earnings per share growth estimate to 13
per cent from 16 per cent and downgraded its rating on the stock. The moves
follow a sweeping reassessment of the sector by Goldman Sachs at the end of
last week. Glaxo was up 12 in early trading but ended a net 25 down at 756p.
SmithKline 'A' fell 21 to 504p and the Units 20 to 442p.
Reckitt &amp; Colman rallied 19 to 624p after weakness prompted by downgradings.
The two classes of HSBC shares were the pick of the bank sector, the
London-registered stock moving ahead 4 to 478p and the Hong Kong stock
closing 7 higher at 464p, after suggestions of buy notes from at least two
of the big London broking firms.
The boost to Standard Chartered's balance sheet from the sale of its Hong
Kong headquarters continued to sustain the shares, which gained 2 at 570p.
Shares in Kleinwort Benson, the merchant bank, maintained their upward
trend, settling a further 3 firmer at 322p with dealers noting good demand
for the stock from one of the market's leading broking houses and at least
two sizeable agency crosses executed at 320p a share.
Reports that Warburg Securities had recommended a switch from the composite
insurers into Prudential saw the latter move up 3 to 308p. Guardian Royal
was the worst of the composites, the shares sliding 9 to 173p on 1.8m
traded.
Worries about the impact of the current round of price cutting in the
package holiday business were generally shrugged aside and Airtours, rallied
well to close 3 ahead at 278p.
A number of second-line media and printing companies performed strongly as
investors looked for recovery stocks. BZW was highlighting the potential for
several, particularly advertising agency Gold Greenlees Trott. The bank's
media specialist Mr Vighnesh Padiachy believes the shares will outperform
the All-Share Index next year and says; 'They could quite easily double if
there is a UK recovery.' GGT improved 13 to 251p. Meanwhile, Abbot Mead
Vickers rose 20 to 402p, Watmough lifted 20 to 540p and Portals gained 10 to
475p.
Engineer Siebe dropped 6 to 438p as analysts questioned the recent strong
performance. Some have been saying that the group might be building up to a
bid which would necessitate a fairly heavy rights issue. One suggested that
Siebe was casting its eye over Midlands-based Glynwed International (off 3
at 357p).
Elsewhere in the sector, TI Group lost 13 at 308p as investors' interest in
the stock subsided. Concern that at about 4.5 per cent the yield does not
offer enough protection also affected the stock.
Wheway halved in price to 6p after announcing that it had called off merger
talks with McLeod Russel Holdings. Wheway also announced a full-year loss of
Pounds 3.5m after exceptionals and no dividend.
P &amp; O fell 16 to 500p on profit-taking moved in following the move by
European rating agency IBCA to downgrade P&amp;O's senior long term debt rating
to A from A plus.
The oil sector was one of the few areas of the market to register good
gains, with sentiment helped by a firm showing by the dollar and minor
progress by crude oil prices.
BP managed a 3 rise at 237 1/2 p on good turnover of 5.6m while Shell, with
its impressive balance sheet and dividend growth prospects, moved up 4 to
549p after above-average turnover of 6.1m shares. There was no shortage of
buyers for Lasmo, 2 up at 156p on 3.4m, after the oil flow from the well
drilled on 16/12a 18 in the South Birch field in the North Sea in which
Lasmo has a 58.85 per cent stake.
The latest exploration success off Burma by Premier Consolidated Oilfields
triggered another good performance by Premier shares which moved up to 25
1/2 p before settling a net  1/2 up at 24 1/2 p. Turnover jumped to over 4m
shares.
Cairn Energy was another to make good progress, the shares adding 2 more to
34p, for a two-day gain of 5. The recent surge was triggered by a strong buy
recommendation issued by Strauss Turnbull, highlighting the strong
Details of an oil discovery 23b in the North Sea by a consortium led by
Amerada Hess promoted a surge of buying interest in Pict Petroleum and Aran
Energy, both of which are involved in the discovery. Aran rose 1 1/2 to 18
1/2 p, while Pict edged up 3 to 101p.
The see-saw performance of recent newcomer Tadpole Technology continued. The
shares, raced up to 168p yesterday before easing to close a net 11 higher at
162p.
BICC, the cables to engineering group, moved up a further 4 to 336p,
responding to a positive note published by BZW. The broking house
highlighted BICC's improving cashflow and recovery profile.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (188).
BRITISH FUNDS (1) Treas. 8pc 2003, AMERICANS (25) BANKS (1) Abbey Natl.,
BREWERS (2) Scot. &amp; Newcastle, Whitbread, BUSINESS SERVS (4) Brit. Data,
Capita, Salvesen, Serco, CHEMICALS (6) Akzo, Allied Colloids, Euro Colour,
Laporte, Wardle Storeys, Wolstenholme Rink, CONGLOMERATES (2) Brierley,
Wassall, ELECTRICALS (3) Jones Stroud, Menvier-Swain, Toshiba, ELECTRICITY
(2) Norweb, Scot. Power, ELECTRONICS (8) Cray, Diploma, Eurotherm, Linx,
Micro Focus, Multitone, Telemetrix, Tunstall, ENG GEN (6) Carclo, Fairey,
Halma, Powerscreen, Protean, Rotork, FOOD MANUF (3) Assoc. Brit. Foods, RHM,
Unilever, FOOD RETAILING (1) Iceland Frozen, HEALTH &amp; HSEHLD (3) AAH,
Bespak, Whatman, HOTELS &amp; LEIS (2) Manchester Utd., Savoy, INSCE BROKERS (2)
Berry Birch &amp; Noble, Lloyd Thompson, INSCE COMPOSITE (3) American Intl.,
Aon, Hibernian, INSCE LIFE (5) Liberty Life Assoc. Africa, Lincoln Natl.,
Prudential, Torchmark, Utd. Friendly, INV TRUSTS (50) MEDIA (7) Headline,
Johnston Press, Metal Bulletin, Taylor Nelson, Trinity, Utd. News,
Watmoughs, MISC (9) Airsprung Furn, BAT Inds., Birkby, Black (P), Danka,
Faber Prest, Linact, Norbain, Plantsbrook, MOTORS (1) Trinity, OIL &amp; GAS (4)
Burmah, Exxon, Pict, Sidlaw, OTHER FINCL (8) Caledonia, Henderson Admn.,
Mercury Asset, Perpetual, Prov. Fincl, Rathbone Bros., S &amp; U, Tyndall Aust.
Options, OTHER INDL MATERIALS (3) BTR Wts., Do Wts. '95-96, McKechnie, PCKG,
PAPER &amp; PRINTING (8) API, Bemrose, Boxmore, Ferguson, Jarvis Porter,
Microgen, Portals, St. Ives, PROP (1) Lon. Merchant Secs. 7 3/4 pc Cv.
'00-05, STORES (5) Betterware, Courts, Fine Art Dev., GUS A, Oriflame,
TELEPHONE NETWORKS (1) Nth. Telecom, TEXTILES (8) Claremont Grmts,
Courtaulds, Dewhirst, Leeds, Richards, Shani, Stirling, TRANSPORT (4)
Dawsongroup, Mersey Docks, Powell Duffryn, Tibbett &amp; Britten.
NEW LOWS (22).
BUSINESS SERVS (1) Comac, CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRCN (2) CRP, Jarvis,
ELECTRONICS (1) INSTEM, ENG GEN (2) Beauford, Wheway, HEALTH &amp; HSEHLD (1)
Specialeyes, INV TRUSTS (2) Murray Euro Wts., TR Euro Growth, MEDIA (1)
TV-am, MISC (1) Pittard Garnar, OIL &amp; GAS (2) Bula, Edinburgh, OTHER FINCL
(3) Baltic, East German, LIT, PROP (2) Derwent-Valley, High-Point, MINES (4)
Beatrix, East Rand, Harmony, Kells Minerals.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-480</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Profits taken in a less active
session
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE UK stock market paused for breath yesterday after five consecutive
sessions of rising share prices. Trading volume fell back and profits were
taken both in the blue chip leaders and in the second line stocks. But stock
index futures remained at a high premium over the cash market and both the
FT-SE 100 and the FT-SE Mid 250 Indices staged successful rallies from the
day's lows.
There were signs that, with few fund managers interested in selling shares
against the highly bullish trend of the market, stock is becoming hard to
find. Marketmakers wanted to see shares lower but futures traders seeking to
arbitrage could not find blue chip shares.
In early trading, equity prices were destabilised by a temporary failure in
the Stock Exchange Topic information and price-quoting electronic system.
But after dipping to the 2,818 area, the FT-SE Index rallied to close at
2,827.4 for a net fall of 14.6. The FT-SE Mid 250, nearly seven points off
at midsession, cut its loss to 2.8 for a final reading of 2,842.6.
Firmness in the US dollar helped oil shares and some other Wall
Street-influenced stocks towards the close. However, the Footsie was held
back by selling pressure on a handful of leading shares.
Seaq-reported volume contracted to 552.7m shares from the 815.1m seen on
Tuesday, when retail, or customer, business stayed high and was worth Pounds
1.46bn. Retail business has exceeded Pounds 1bn daily since mid-September
when sterling's departure from the ERM triggered a rise in the Footsie now
extended to around 20 per cent.
Turnover in stock index futures virtually halved from the previous day, but
the March FT-SE Index contract remained around 44 points premium to the cash
market - fair value, allowing for dividend and financing flows, stands at
about 19 points.
Business in traded options also fell sharply, returning a total of only
13,772 contracts, against 42,002 previously. The FT-SE option contract saw
barely more than 5,000 contracts dealt, compared with 10,825 on Tuesday.
Among individual contracts, Amstrad, heading the actives list with 1,340
contracts transacted, was the only name to trade more than 1,000 lots. Bass
(748) and Storehouse (549) were the nearest rivals.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-481</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / State of the Art: The verbiage of creativity that is. .
.mad, bad and dangerouse to use - Ballet/Dance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLEMENT CRISP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'WHEN I use a word,' Humpty Dumpty said in a rather scornful tone, 'it means
just what I choose it to mean - neither more nor less.' 'The question is,'
said Alice, 'whether you can make words mean different things.'
AS any dance-follower today knows, the problem is really to find words that
mean the same thing for any two observers of the art at the same time. The
very word ballet, which might be supposed to have a certain exactness, has
been used to describe the central European lumberings of Kurt Jooss, the
abrasive activities of William Forsythe in Frankfurt, and the dire
posturings of Bejart's troupe, as well as the academic rectitude of the
Mariinsky company in Petersburg - which does show us ballet in the exact
sense. Confusion is worse confounded when two common words of criticism -
classical and modern are examined.
Classical identifies the language of the ballet as established by such late
19th century stagings as Sleeping Beauty or Raymonda. It has nothing to do
with classical in an art-historical or musical sense, yet it embraces ideas
of formal harmony and balance which share that meaning in other arts. Sir
Frederick Ashton's choreography is classical because he used and understood
the older language, and revitalised it for our national ballet. It thus also
earns the title of neo-classical, though this is less used. Similarly,
Balanchine took his classical inheritance from the Mariinsky to New York,
naturalised it on American bodies in a freer, speedier society. He produced
a classical dance language of the late 20th century, and a survey of his
work will be seen in next May's 'Balanchine Festival' to be staged by his
company, New York City Ballet, marking the tenth anniversary of his death.
It will be an apotheosis of classical ballet for our time.
Classical is also merrily used to describe any girl in point shoes or any
boy with tights and a blank expression. Not so. True classical dancers are
the product of a rigorous schooling in the danse d'ecole, the purest
academic style. There is implicit in this identification an idea of a
harmonious and balanced physique as well: Ludmila Semenyaka and Yury
Posokhov, two former Bolshoy dancers seen in the west this year, are ideal
examples, their artistry noble in proportion, grand, like their schooling
and their actual appearance. They offer pur sang classical dancing, and
despite the attractions of high-kickers and whizz-bang virtuosi to set the
groundlings in a roar, classical ballets are only truly alive with such
serene artists at their heart.
Modern, as in modern dance must be taken to mean that free dance which
emerged in America 60 years ago with Martha Graham, when it was indeed
modern, just as Art Nouveau was once nouveau. If we talk about modern dance
in its exact sense, then we pass by post-modern, which implies American
dance only 30 years ago, until - perish the thought - we reach
post-post-modern, which is more a stutter than a definition, and new dance
which can be used to indicate recent activity. That it is often neither new
nor dance is another example of a vocabulary resonant with special pleading.
The French, who have precise minds about language, but vastly serious
problems about what is being passed off as modern dance, call it La jeune
danse Francaise. In these pages we have called it other, unlovelier things.
Yet it is hard to find labels, those emergency exits from thought, to
identify the work of such fine practitioners of today's dance as Siobhan
Davies, Laurie Booth, Julyen Hamilton, Yolande Snaith, Jonathan Burrows.
Their dancing and choreography is, in truth, modern, and the label is
meaningless. My colleague Alastair Macaulay notes that certain terms are
burdened with purely local meaning, so that new dance was used in London in
the 1970s to describe choreography which had a social and politically
radical stance, while in Montreal there is something called danse actuelle.
Having seen some of the dance coming out of Montreal, the very words are
like a knell.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-482</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / State of the Art: The verbiage of creativity that is. .
.mad, bad and dangerouse to use - Words, words, words] / In the current
buzz-words pertaining to the arts, 'post-modernist' could well be classed as
jokey, backward looking or - amazingly - just plain original
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MURRAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR AS LONG as anybody can remember, buzz-words have cropped up in
art-critical chat and then, sooner rather than later, faded ineluctably
away. Remember 'plastic', from Goethe to Ruskin - or in musical commentaries
'serialist', from the original Schoenberg school until the time when the
composer Berio remarked candidly, 'You can 'serialise' anything]'
Since ours is not a time of consistent, well-defined fashions or methods in
the creative arts, the critical buzz-words are prudently high-level:
structuralist or post-structuralist, modernist and post-modernist and
deconstructionist. Those terms are not much of any kind of muchness, for
they have been hijacked from quite different areas of discourse. Even in
their original homes, they were never sharply defined. But at the outset,
certainly, the first two and the last named critical methods or stances,
especially in Lit. Crit.; whereas the other pair came into current play as
labels for artifacts inspired by special artistic persuasions (usually
combative), much like 'pre-Raphaelite' or 'Parnassian'.
'Structuralist' is easy enough, though still wonky. The great French
linguist Ferdinand de Saussure had propounded a deep distinction between la
parole and la langue: what we actually say, and the language-system that
makes it possible for us to say it. Like the American linguist Chomsky
later, he argued that when we tell each other things we must trade
constantly upon language-structures, unaware of them though we generally
are.
When the anthropologist Claude Levi-Strauss began to discern plausible deep
'structures' in human conduct, too (though of quite different kinds, to some
sceptical eyes) 'structuralist' analysis became a vogue. The idea was that
there were real hidden structures in human doings that could be
illuminatingly winkled out, through close observation, and described. And if
in communal language and social practices, surely also - more idiosyncratic,
of course, and more defensively concealed - in novels, plays, poems, films?
What a 'structuralist' novel or play might be, however, is anybody's guess,
when every art-work is supposed to embody unadmitted structures. Some
critics use the word as if it were synonymous with the old-fashioned
'formalist' (damaging in Stalinist times), something like '(too) consciously
concerned with formal proportions and markers'; or again, to report telltale
echoes of the infinitely self-aware, ironical litterateur Roland Barthes, or
of the 'structuralist' psychoanalyst Jacques Lacan's sweeping presumptions.
'Post-structuralist' is easier, at least on the critical side. The
post-structuralist French critics were the ones who suspected that all those
grand, hidden 'structures' in talk, life and literature were generated
merely by the structuralists' rhetoric itself. Jacques Derrida has led the
attack by subjecting structuralist metaphors and rhetorical tropes to
reductive analysis: 'deconstructing' their metaphysical constructions,
exposing their self-justifying formulas. On his procedure any text, whether
expressly 'creative' or just critical, is to be read - never interpreted] -
purely through its own literal terms, treated as hermetic.
Any supposed authorial intentions are irrelevant (authors are notoriously
bad witnesses for those), and so is any assumed historical or social
context. A text is just an ecrit but it can display a unique ecriture -
suggestive fingerprints, ways of putting things, a betraying concern with
certain kinds of detail - which may reward examination (ie prompt some new
texts, subject to all the same reservations).
Nonetheless it is its own sole witness, and it is never really 'about'
anything else at all. Once more, we know what a deconstructionist analysis
will look like, but not a 'deconstructionist' art-work. Again a provocative
term has done a sideslip: a work of fiction that deliberately flaunts its
scaffolding, or a visual piece with a knowing commentary attached, may now
be called 'deconstructionist' - though such devices go back a long way
before structuralism or deconstructionism.
Initially 'modernism' and 'post-modernism' were more straightforward, at
least (and maybe at most) as terms for postwar British architectural
aspirations. A Modernist architect hereabouts is austerely concerned with
self-contained form and actual function, eschewing all 'traditional' echoes
except where they have a rightful contemporary application (though he or she
probably harbours great respect for the Bauhaus and Le Corbusier). A
post-modernist is happy to play around, arguing that buildings should be fun
in up-to-date terms, whether those prompt neon glitz, eclectic pastiche - as
long as it comes in inverted commas - or pure one-off whimsy (TV-AM's giant
eggcups in Camden Town).
In other countries, however, such architectural divisions were never so
clearcut; and in the other arts any modernist/post-modernist distinction is
a matter of intuitive freehand sketching (though American Lit. Crit. has, I
believe, its own peculiar canons for assigning poetry and criticism to one
camp or the other). To count as 'post-modernist' it may be enough to be
inconsequently jokey, or knowingly backward-looking - or just plain
original, highly unlikely as that will always be.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-483</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / State of the Art: The verbiage of creativity that is. .
.mad, bad and dangerous to use - Architecture / Post-moderism was invented
by architects hanging on to history as a result of the destruction of much
of the past during the 1960s
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By COLIN AMERY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AT THE top of the high-tech headquarters of Lloyd's in London is a board
room designed by the 18th century architect Robert Adam, bought by Lloyd's
to provide an appropriately classical setting for their Council's
deliberations. At the top of the brand new hotel in Canary Wharf is a set of
conference rooms designed and furnished in the style of the 18th century
cabinet maker Thomas Chippendale. At the top of the massive modern office
blocks at Broadgate there are bankers' dining rooms and director's offices
furnished as though they were occupied by Cotswold squires about to emulate
the activities depicted in the hunting prints on the walls.
Earlier this year I had breakfast at the New York apartment of a successful
currency dealer whose fortune is made by the speedy working of
communications technology. The elevator arrived in a Louis Quinze entrance
hall and we ate as though we were in an English country house, surrounded by
Paul de Lamerie silver and 18th century portraits. Down the road on Madison
Avenue, is a major office building designed by one of America's leading
architects, Philip Johnson, originally as the headquarters of the
telecommunications giant, AT &amp; T and now occupied by the even more
technocratic Japanese company Sony. It has a grand classical entrance hall
with an arched golden ceiling and the building hits the New York skyline
with a giant broken pediment worthy of ancient Rome. It is known as the
Chippendale building because it happily reminds New Yorkers of an 18th
century tallboy.
What is going on? Why is so much recent architecture still hanging on to
history with its finger nails. What happened in the second half of the 20th
century that made the apparently solid foundations of modern, functional
architecture quiver and shake with historical uncertainty? The virus that
infected the body of contemporary architecture and changed it forever is a
phenomenon known as post-modernism. Many people use this term in fields of
creation other than architecture: but it is to architecture that the term
has become firmly stuck.
The simple definition of modern architecture was the one liner coined by the
Bauhaus boys: 'form follows function.' I suppose the simple one liner for
post modernism must be: 'form follows fiction.' Since the end of the 1950s
those architects who can be classified as post-modernists have designed
buildings that pay some homage to both the recent past and to a much more
distant past. A post-modern building (a good example is the Sainsbury Wing
in London by the American architects, Robert Venturi and Denise Scott-Brown)
combines the spatial planning wizardry that architects have learned from the
International Modern Movement with a sometimes quixotic use of traditional
sources. Part of the point of post modernism is the fact that it
acknowledges some of the technological advantages of modernism while adding
elements to the architectural design that are familiar and based on
historical sources.
Why do we seem to need the comfort of the past and the familiar? What is it
that makes an important international high-tech computer company from Texas
decide to make its British headquarters in a group of buildings Richmond
that are new but resemble an 18th century palace, a Palladian pavilion and a
Venetian Gothic villa? Why is it that at Euro-Disney and Disney World all
the buildings have to resemble something else? There are hotels in the shape
of swans, diners in the shape of dolphins and a hotel with a classical
pediment supported by the seven dwarfs. At Disney it is not the
internationally famous architects who really design the buildings but the
teams of Disney animators and 'imagineers'. Why does Euro-Disney need to
bring to Europe an American version of a romantic Sleeping Beauty castle
when France is full of examples of the real thing? It is as though in our
post-modern world, when our eyes are conditioned by television and video, we
can no longer believe reality. We have to be served with a selection of
historical fragments, artfully arranged to provide an elementary illusion of
the real thing.
I suspect that the real reasons for the invention of post-modernism and the
token revival of history that it briefly provided are twofold. One is the
need for a sense of comfort brought on by our unhappiness at the rapid
destruction of so much of the past in the development booms of the 1960s and
1980s. The other is bad reason I suspect is only too true: cynical
intellectual idleness on the part of a poorly educated architectural
profession.
History has not been well taught in architectural schools for the best part
of half a century. A profession that dimly sensed the public disaffection
with modern tower blocks, cities raped by motorways and crude out-of-scale
developments, reached out for fragments of history to make their creations
more palatable. The result is a rash of pedimented office blocks and false
facades that barely conceal the routine ordinariness of the commercial
spaces behind. Just take a look at the Bishopsgate end of the Broadgate
development in the City of London where we witness a giant Wurlitzer of
styles applied to a steel frame series of office boxes. The public senses
something is wrong but they are equally uninformed about the past and so
appear to be content to swallow travesties and jokes that are both slight
and hollow.
I used to think that post-modernism in architecture was an important
transition from the worst aridities of naked modernism to a possible revival
of ornament, richness and decoration. Sadly, that has not happened and the
few good post-modern buildings are isolated in a sea of mediocre
Disney-style jokes. Post-modernism has shown that there is no satisfaction
in an effortless, superficial styling that pretends to understand history.
Real architecture is difficult and complex and satisfying in its resolution
of problems according to a set of rules. Post modernism broke the rules and
appeared to abandon social improvement function and form. It certainly
demonstrated the lack of any common language and in a world where anything
goes threw architectural standards to the winds. It is any wonder that we
cling to our architectural roots in the hope that some reality remains in a
world of cynical illusions?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-484</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / State of the Art: The verbiage of creativity that is. .
.mad, bad and dangerous to use - Pop music is dead; long live pop music
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WITHIN weeks of the arrival of Bill Haley and his Comets in the mid-1950s
commentators were speculating on what would replace this irksome new craze,
rock and roll: would it be calypso or a return to the romantic ballad? The
idea that an art form was emerging that would create a multi-billion dollar
industry; a shared global experience; and have the most profound impact on
the culture, morals, even the politics of the rest of the 20th century, was
beyond comprehension.
But I think we can now start to ask whether pop, in its more pretentious,
aesthetic form, has not exhausted its relevance. It will not disappear, but
like classical music, art, dance, and the theatre, become an art form which
lives off its back catalogue, its former creativity.
It will do this very well. It is one of the ironies of pop that something so
temporary, so fickle in taste and style, has a reverence for its past that
is quite absent from other 'art' forms. Any artist, any trend, in pop's
forty year history is integrated into its sacred text. There might be a
brief time in the shadows but death is guaranteed to restore the reputation
of the most insignificant musician, and nostalgia the revitalistion of any
fad. Pop rejects nothing. Today ABBA, the personification of glib,
transient, commercial, singles, are regarded as a major ikon; even glam rock
has been allocated its altar in the pantheon.
This acceptance of everything in the canon goes along with an obsession with
the most trivial facts. There are more books on pop statistics - best
selling singles; artists with most chart entries; first blind singer to have
a top ten album - than on any comparable subject, including cricket. If you
want, you can easily discover what all four Beatles were doing on a
particular day in 1963; or unearth the birthday of the first drummer in The
Sweet.
It is nonsense to argue that pop will die, but not so idiotic to suggest
that is going through a severe crisis. Now that the pop generation embraces
virtually the entire population outside pensioners - observe the disco at
the Conservative Party Conference - a reaction was bound to set in.
There is a band cleverly called Pop Will Eat Itself. It will not; instead it
will continue to sustain a flourishing industry in critical nostalgia. Eight
of the ten best selling albums in the UK last week contained the re-cycling
of archive material, including albums by ABBA and the dead Freddie Mercury.
This suggests that mature fans are re-living their past, and a younger
generation favours the music of the 1980s, 1970s, 1960s, rather than
contemporary sounds. Pop is failing to replenish itself.
Contemporary youth is growing up on a pop music that is far removed in
relevance from that of preceding generations; a pop music that is less
significant to their lives. Pop has become boring, jaded, old fashioned,
establishment. It is the music that their parents enjoy. Like so many
aspects of contemporary society it has become subsumed inside a life style.
To the young music is no more important than fashion, or alternative
electronic developments, like computer games. The absence of new creative
figures, like the Bob Dylan of the 1960s, the Elton John of the 1970s, or
Bruce Springsteen of the 1980s, has forced teenagers to see pop as dance
music, sounds to which to rave. Drug culture has added to this trend. Pop is
part of the experience; it is no longer the most important thing on earth.
Suddenly contemporary pop is boring. Its very success in making itself
accessible to all - any Brixton youth can set up as a rapper; any
electronics freak can pick and mix snippets from previous records, add in
synthesised rhythms and sounds, and produce an acceptable background noise -
has destroyed the development of creative artists. Studio engineers have
replaced musicians; a myriad of minority tastes has seen off the new idea,
be it punk, or pomp rock, or singer-songwriters, that swamped the memories
of past generations. The development of the CD player enabled a prosperous
older generation, in work, to re-purchase the music of their youth in a new
format and widened the gulf with teenagers, still hooked on the vinyl
single.
It is not only outside forces that have reduced pop music to a mindless pap.
Pop became a career for some of the brightest minds of the 1960s and 1970s.
It became intellectualised. The new Penguin Book of Rock and Roll Writing
includes contributors who happily link black soul singers with the writings
of Barthes; who deconstruct the lyrics of a Rolling Stone song with the
determination of a Derrida. Professors of music have compared the Beatles
with Schubert; poetry lecturers have placed Dylan alongside Byron. These
intellectuals are appalled by the superficiality of current pop. They are
pulling up the drawbridge, washing their hands of the young, like their
parents in the 1950s.
Pop began to self-destruct as soon as it was taken seriously. It is only
relevant in the individual imaginations of the young, in its ability to
communicate on behalf of the incoherent and the illiterate. Pop is currently
passing through an intellectual and an artistic crisis, but there is no
likelihood of it disappearing. It will re-invent itself to suit the demands
of a new generation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-485</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / As they say in Europe . . .: Fear of towels on deckchairs -
James Morgan considers Anglo-German attitudes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES MORGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE would be no traditional English Christmas were it not for the Germans.
Prince Albert has a lot to answer for by smuggling in trees, cards and
carols in his baggage.
The English still live too much in the shadow of the Tannenbaum, a tree
strewn with goodies but also a dark conifer that sheds sinister needles to
prick the English into spasms of hostility.
Germany is either an object lesson or a series of highly charged negative
symbols. That latter cross is one that Germans have to bear universally. In
Britain, though, the Germans attract uncritical admiration, even for their
stupidities.
Thus subsidies for British coalmines, which may or may not be rational, are
justified by the colossal sums that the Germans waste in similar projects.
Germany can throw billions away on a not very good railway system and this
is used to berate Whitehall's attitude to British Rail.
Germans study British Rail to see how to run a reasonably economical system.
Germany can spend twice as much per head as Britain on its health service
and land up with results that are often inferior.
So it is that Germany appears in British eyes as a kind of Manichean
conflict within itself. Good and evil fight it out between Rhine and Oder.
And that disturbs the Germans: they are regularly infuriated not just by the
references to jackboots and swastikas but note also the British view that
every deckchair in every resort from Benidorm to Barbados is covered by a
German towel by 8am.
Even the London correspondent of the Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung,
Bernhard Heimrich, could not forebear to mention this curious belief when he
gave his readers an long account of British attitudes at about the time of
the Queen's state visit in October.
He was more intrigued by the number of people in British public life who
wrote novels and the dominance of German themes in historical fantasies.
Not only was there Len Deighton's SS-GB and Robert Harris' Fatherland but
also the 1986 novel by the noted parliamentary Euro-rebel Michael Spicer -
Prime Minister Spy. In this work, the inhabitant of No 10, Rupert Higginson,
turns out to be the bastard son of Adolf Hitler and a vegetarian cook -
'conceived in a moment of non-culinary pleasures of the flesh in the
Fuhrerbunker', apostrophised Heimrich delicately.
His piece was called Angst auf dem Sandbank, a reference to Erskine
Childers' The Riddle of the Sands, which was published in 1903. (Just one of
the many works of this type which have never been published in Germany.)
Heimrich noted - this was in October - that: 'The British Teuton-genre,
whose leitmotiv was freshened up in the latest strife (with the Bundesbank)
by the shrill colours of the prole-press, is older than Hitler's war, even
older than the first war.'
Now, since this was for a German audience, considerable pyscho-analytical
insight was needed. When Childers wrote his book, 'Freud's free association
method was scarcely ten years old, but 'sands' is really the most striking
word the author and his readers could have come across.
It expresses the inimitably British mixture of security and threat: the
self-confidence of an island nation which is protected by the sea, and which
simultaneously feels vulnerable to seaborne attack and coastal erosion.'
The conclusion is that in this type of book the British are not really
concerned about the past or historical might-have-beens.
In Heimrich's eyes, the obsessional nature of the relationship with the
German threat represents fear of the future and of the truth.
For example, the information released last summer about the flight of
Hitler's deputy, Rudolf Hess, to Britain in 1942 sparked speculation in
Britain about there having been some double game between London and Berlin.
This episode parallels French concern about collaboration under the Vichy
regime. But of course, notes Heimrich, in Britain the truth will not be
known until well into the next millennium because of governmental secrecy.
The next item for legitimate speculation is why the Germans are so concerned
about the curiosities of their image in British eyes. It is not just that it
hurts. I am firmly of the belief that the analysis of the role of the
British 'Teuton Myth' in forming the contemporary German psycho-syndrome
could provide the subject matter for another productive essay.
But it will not come from my pen. There was, however, an odd illustration of
Anglo-German attitudes at the Edinburgh Summit. A German TV correspondent
asked his British technician to save him a chair.
'You'd better put a towel over it,' said the Brit.
The German understood immediately.
'I don't have one here.'
'I'll give you one for Christmas.'
James Morgan is diplomatic correspondent of the BBC World Service.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-486</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Skiing: Leadville, living on a legend - Arnold Wilson visits
an old mining town which is finding new ways to survive
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARNOLD WILSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Christmas Eve, 1881. Leadville, Colorado.
'WITH HUGE spruce logs crackling in the fire-place, the scene presented on
this eve of the gladsome Christmas is far from dispiriting. Carroll, warn
out from the day's work, is asleep in his bunk, doubtless dreaming of the
yule log and mistletoe, and fat stockings and plum pudding. Summers and
Temple are enjoying a game of cards called 'hunky-punky' over there by the
fire, and I am not so sure but that their thoughts also are far away,
mingling unconsciously with those of loved ones in distant New England
homes.'
Albert Morrison, a young prospector started this letter to his impoverished
mother and fiancee, Charlotte, in New York State.
'As tomorrow will be Christmas Day,' he wrote, 'I will have plenty of time
to complete this letter . . .'
But the letter never was finished. At one minute after midnight, the shack
shared by four prospectors was enveloped by a snow-slide leaving the men
frozen as in a tableau of life, with Albert's hand still holding his pen.
The scene later described by a rescue party provided an enduring myth for
the highest skiing town in the US.
Some 101 years later, it is a freezing night in Leadville - sometimes known
as the 'city in the clouds'. Ski lift operators from the local resort of Ski
Cooper and further afield at Copper Mountain, Breckenridge and Keystone have
returned to their homes for the night. The ornate, relic-filled and slightly
kitsch Silver Dollar Saloon has emptied on to a street corner. And Attorney
Neil V. Reynolds, the local judge, puts his Holmesian pipe down and picks up
a microphone.
'Ladies and gentleman,' he announces. 'We have just heard that Santa Claus
has arrived in Leadville]'
There are cheers from a smallish crowd of children and parents who have
assembled on the sidewalk outside the white courthouse - all exhaling
dragon's breath as the temperature dives in the town which is perched at
10,150 ft beneath Colorado's highest peaks: Mount Elbert and Mount Massive.
Leadville's Christmas tree - a mere 12ft high - is about to be illuminated.
There is a NASA-style countdown to the big moment.
'Five-four-three-two-one-ZERO]' It is a small flicker for mankind as a score
of tiny - almost pathetic - fairy lights are switched on. The little tree
does not exactly light up the sky. But it is symbolic of a special town. A
town that has twice been left for dead. And twice refused to die.
Leadville - past residents included Jesse James, Doc Holliday and Wyatt Earp
 -is one of Colorado's oldest mining centres. In 1893, when along with other
old mining towns which were later to become famous ski resorts, such as
Aspen, Telluride, Crested Butte, Breckenridge, Park City and Alta, Leadville
had its heart torn out by a government decision to end the silver standard.
The boom years of silver were over.
Christmasses in Leadville became bleak: if they were lucky, children
received an orange, a stocking full of candy, a brief chat with Santa Claus
and a visit to the Dreamland or Empire Theatre to see the latest film.
While Breckenridge became an official ghost town, with a population of just
seven, and the other mining towns struggled for survival, the mining
community at Leadville picked themselves up and started again with a
different quarry: molybdenum, used as a strengthening agent in steels.
Molybdenum was certainly a strengthening agent for Leadville. The town
thrived again, until almost exactly a century after the silver crash,
competition from Russia and South Africa, where molybdenum could be produced
more cheaply, brought the town's second mining era to a close.
Today there are still working mines dotted around Colorado, but unlike the
good old bad old days, they are now run by small groups of amateurs, or so
highly mechanised that they no longer provide much employment for
Leadville's close-knit, hardy populace.
What makes Leadville tick and survive today is skiing in winter - and
tourism in summer. Ski Cooper is a fairly small, hillbilly ski area seven
miles from Leadville. At Chicago Ridge, there is some excellent snowcat
skiing on runs such as Leaning Tree Drop-off, Heavenly Traverse, Tree Shots,
Middle Earth and Buckeye Trees.
Richard 'Rocket' Mathews drives the cat and Stu Schaefer guides (they
exchange roles from time to time.) The resort, where troops of Colorado's
celebrated 10th Mountain Division trained during the war, is ideal for
families with its moderately gentle terrain. Apart from weekends, the trails
are empty. So with the once-celebrated mines in California Gulch long since
fallen silent, there are few options for those seeking employment. One is
working in the resorts of Copper, Breckenridge, Keystone and Arapahoe Basin.
There is a housing shortage in those resorts which brings pressure to live
out of town. Leadville, where housing is much cheaper since the mining boom
went bust, is an obvious choice. So daily, mountain staff have to make the
cold and sometimes dangerous journey to and from work. Sometimes the road is
blocked by snow. But however hazardous such commuting may be, nothing
compares with the regular tragedies experienced down the mines. In one
seven-month period during May, 1880, 26 miners were killed and almost 50
seriously injured in accidents.
Of these 62 per cent were 'shaft-related', 26 per cent were caused by
mishandled or faulty explosives, four per cent by cave-ins and rock-falls,
four per cent by fumes, fire and suffocation and a final four per cent by
drowning or crushing. But the death of Albert Morrison and his friends was
perhaps the saddest.
Santa Claus arrives in Leadville this month in a glistening, new fire engine
on which is inscribed: 'Leadville and Lake County Fire &amp; Rescue'. Under the
red costume and white beard is Jim O'Neil, who is 75 and has been playing
the role for decades. Like almost every other elderly man in Leadville, he
used to work at a local mine.
'Now give a big welcome to Santa Claus,' says Judge Reynolds.
Leadville is still searching for its role in the 21st century. With such
resilient folk, Leadville will probably get by for the time being with
skiing and tourism. But if you ask Reynolds what the citizens of Leadville
will do in the long term, now that the mining era is over, he says: 'We
haven't decided yet.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-487</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Gardening: Euro-sceptics to the core - The Sloane Wallys
have suffered a culture shock
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBIN LANE FOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AMAZINGLY, six years have slipped by since Julian and Veronica Sloane Wally
first made their move from Onslow Gardens in London to their not-so-old
rectory in Sussex.
There have been happy Christmasses meanwhile, but a cloud is hanging over
this one. Like most of this year's problems it traces back to Europe.
The truth is that, by different routes, the Sloane Wallys are confirmed
Euro-sceptics. In Julian's case, scepticism is too weak a word for it. He
still believes in the Special Relationship across the Atlantic and this
year, he proved the value of his convictions by buying the dollar heavily in
July.
It is not just that he mistrusts Europe's combination of Opus Dei, the Mafia
and New Germany: he hates the annual batch of petty Brussels legislation and
the eternal hypocrisy about class.
Everybody blames Britain for its class system, but the worst snobs are to be
found in Europe, even though most of their titles were only dished out by
Napoleon: this year Brussels has also excelled itself by impinging on
Julian's favourite pastime.
Shooting has always run in his family, but he is now being asked to take
seriously a semi-federal Europe which has recently legislated to protect
magpies and is about to require a qualified vet to be present within an hour
of the killing of any bird or animal which is later to be sold to the game
or poultry market.
The prospect of sodden vets standing by Sussex gamecarts in order to conduct
post mortems on each pheasant killed by Julian's friends on Boxing Day seems
only slightly less absurd than declaring one of the worst predators in
nature to be an endangered European asset.
Until this summer, Veronica has been less dogmatic. Admittedly, the social
wage would make nonsense of her deal with her Sussex daily woman but, in
today's world, might it not be better to hang together, save Germany from
the Germans and export post-Sloane style to the French who have always been
mad about pearls and proper jerseys?
Or so she thought, until Julian took her in late June to the equivalent of
France's Game Fair beside the great chateau of Chambourd, on the way back
from the gardens at Villandry, where the mass bedding out of ornamental
cabbage had solved one of the Sloane Wallys' problems for next year's new
paddock border.
At first, the French idea of a game fair seemed rather fun. It was amusing
to see what ritual the French made of killing things and to walk past stands
with titles such as La Passion des couteaux. It was even funnier to discover
an association which was exhibiting dead foxes, stuffed and fitted for
slinging over the shoulder, for anyone who might have joined in the chase
but felt cheated at having to go home without any trophy to show to the
family. Veronica thought of ordering half a dozen for Sussex friends who
hunt with the Crawley and Horsham, on the grounds that it is years since
they last killed a fox in the open, but a nearby stand brought her up with a
bump.
At first sight, it looked very touching. Beneath a thatched roof, on a bed
of straw, the French attendants had set out a family of badgers, stuffed,
scrubbed to a chic black and white and shown in relaxed family mood. In one
corner, a mother was snuffling, in the other, father was reviewing a litter
of seven bright-eyed cubs, several of whom were engaged in acts of community
care.
It looked so like a nativity crib that Veronica thought at first of ordering
one for the front hall at Christmas, when a Frenchman thrust a leaflet into
her hand and asked if she wished to sign up as a chasseuse de blaireau 'at
the adjacent tent'.
Beside the straw crib demonstrators were showing a range of truly fearful
instruments: tongs to catch a blaireau by the snout, spikes with which to
extract it from the sett, long-handled spades with which to dig for a victim
and a reverse attachment for coshing the head of Monsieur le Blaireau if he
was found chez soi. Even worse, photographs of this foul sport were
plastered all over the tent and the equivalent of a French field sports
member was keenly enlisting names and distributing catalogues. The equipment
made the antis' version of the Quorn hunt on video look like an episode from
the Flopsie Bunnies.
Julian was not in the least surprised, as Europeans had always struck him as
totally unsporting and unsafe in the field, ever since he found two
Spaniards out shooting with his syndicate. They had brought large sheets of
metal and fixed them into the ground on either side of their stand, to
protect themselves when they shot too low down the line during drives.
Veronica's sympathies were rudely shaken: if this is Europe's idea of sport,
how could someone who was Green from her head to her wellingtons have
anything to do with it?
This week, these old fears from the summer have resurfaced. After his coup
with the dollar, Julian has been shopping across the Atlantic for his
special presents this Christmas.
A Sloane Wally can never say no to a gadget: in New York, he was given a
copy of the All American Garden Supply Company whose goods looked
irresistible. He was tempted by the Cadillac of Composters, electronically
powered for a basic Dollars 99; there are Handy Totes with a Hundred Uses,
Aerator Sandals which spike the lawn as you walk on it and two utterly
irresistible tools of choice.
One is a steel-plated Sod Corer with which, apparently, you can 'core the
sods' which otherwise resist you: Julian decided it would be just the job
for Veronica who is now sitting on the planning committee of the East Sussex
Council.
He has also ordered two machine-powered Bulb Planters with an auger which
will kit into a handyman's drill and bore holes a foot deep for daffodils
while a rounded shaft prevents kickback. Bulb planting is the great chore of
the Sloane Wally's autumn, but next year, they will core sods and test-drill
for narcissi even if the ground is as hard as bricks.
Yesterday, the Americans delivered promptly, but, unfortunately, Veronica
took receipt of the parcels. Wrapped in orange polythene, their contours
seemed uncomfortably familiar.
There was no post mark, but the sod-corer and the bulb-borer look worryingly
similar to the very tools which the blaireau boys were trying to sell to
Julian at Chambourd this summer. has he really had the nerve to buy them?
If he has gone and made her a member of the French Society for Badger
Digging, he will have to find someone else to cook his Christmas farm-fresh
bronze turkey. The gadgets, meanwhile, are brooding in the stair-cupboard,
items in a culture-clash, America or Europe, which has affected even a
Sloane Wally's outlook in 1992.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-488</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Government Bonds: Strong rally in index-linked gilts enables
Bank to sell tap stocks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB and PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
UK government bonds closed higher, with the index-linked sector continuing
to show strong gains due to expectations that real yields in the European
bond markets will fall.
The rally enabled the Bank of England to sell some of its tap stocks.
Three tap stocks were exhausted yesterday - the Pounds 250m tranche of 9 per
cent conventional gilt due 2008 (announced on December 11), the Pounds 150m
tranche of 2 1/2 per cent index-linked stock due 2009, and the Pounds 150m
tranche of 2 1/2 per cent index-linked gilt due 2024.
The 2 1/2 per cent index-linked stock due 2024 rose from 102.00 to 102 13/16
, while among conventional stocks, the 9 3/4 per cent gilt rose from 109
1/16 to 109 3/8 .
EUROPEAN government bond markets continued to strengthen on the back of
comments by Mr Helmut Schlesinger, the president of the Bundesbank.
Mr Schlesinger was reported on Tuesday as saying that German long-term
yields could drop below 6 per cent during the current cycle of falling
rates.
The comments fuelled hopes of lower interest rates across Europe.
German government bonds ended slightly firmer, with the Liffe bund future
contract trading at 92.53 by late afternoon, against 92.49 at the opening.
News that the cost of living for former West Germany rose 0.2 per cent in
December from November, to give a year-on-year increase of 3.8 per cent, had
little impact on the market, dealers said, as the figure was in line with
expectations.
US Treasuries eased slightly yesterday as trading wound down for the
Christmas holidays and participants reacted to a disappointing afternoon
auction of five-year notes.
In late trading, the benchmark 30-year government bond was down  1/8 at 103
7/32 , yielding 7.351 per cent, and the two-year note was down 1/16 at 99
29/32 , to yield 4.658 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-489</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / International Company News: Thomson sells white-goods arm to
Italian-led group
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THOMSON, France's state-controlled electronics group, is selling Thomson
Electromenager (TEM), its profitable white-goods subsidiary, to a consortium
led by Elettrofinanziaria (Elfi), the Italian electronics concern, for an
unspecified sum.
The sale, which will turn Elfi into Europe's fourth-largest white goods
group, was triggered by the loss-making Thomson's need to reduce its FFr10bn
(Dollars 1.85bn) debt.
The combination of TEM and Elfi will also help them to achieve the necessary
size to compete against the huge groups, notably Philips-Whirlpool and
Bosch-Siemens of Germany, that dominate the white goods market.
The Italian group is to acquire 66 per cent of TEM with its consortium
partner, Credit National, the French bank, taking 34 per cent.
TEM, which includes the Vedette and Thomson brands as well as the
recently-acquired De Dietrich, is an established force in European
white-goods. It employs 7,000 people and was profitable - it does not
disclose the actual level - on sales of FFr6bn last year.
However, Thomson has been concerned about TEM's long-term prospects in the
intensely aggressive white-goods sector and its ability to match the vast
marketing and research resources of its larger counterparts.
There has been long-running speculation it might be forced to sell TEM.
Mr Henri Lagarde, TEM's chairman, who was said to have opposed any earlier
suggestions of a sale, led the negotiations with Elfi.
Elfi has some French interests in boilers and refrigeration. It said
yesterday that Ocean, its white-goods business (which last year provided
FFr3bn of its FFr7bn turnover) was completely complementary to TEM.
Elfi estimated that Ocean and TEM would command 10 per cent of the European
white goods market.
Ciments Francais, the French cement group, and Paribas, the French bank,
have been forced to raise their offer for Guintoli, the building company
embroiled in the Ciments scandal, from FFr890 to FFr956 a share at the
request of the Paris stock market authorities. This raises the value of the
offer for the 67.1 per cent they do not already own from FFr313m to FFr336m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-490</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / International Company News: Digital chief announces
restructuring
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DIGITAL Equipment, struggling to return to profitable growth, has
restructured its operations into nine business units, each of which will be
accountable for its financial performance.
The restructuring represents 'a fundamental change in the way Digital
conducts business,' the company said. It follows the recent appointment of
Mr Robert Palmer as president and chief executive, following the retirement
of Mr Kenneth Olsen, the company's founder.
Mr Palmer said that Digital would become more responsive to customers. In
the past, 'Digital has been an outstanding technology company, but has done
a terrible job of marketing, of listening to what customers want,' he added.
A pioneer of the minicomputer, Digital grew to become the second-largest US
computer manufacturer. However, the company was slow to respond to
competition from cheaper desktop computers and failed to endorse
wholeheartedly the trend towards 'open systems' based upon industry
standards.
Digital recorded losses of Dollars 260.5m for its first fiscal quarter
ending in September, following losses of Dollars 2.8bn for the fiscal year
that ended in June.
The new business units include five marketing groups that will address
sectors in which Digital has been successful over the years, as well as
industries targeted for significant growth, Mr Palmer said. They are:
health; discrete manufacturing and defence; communications, education and
entertainment; consumer and process manufacturing; and financial,
professional and public services.
Digital has also formed four product development and manufacturing groups
for personal computers; components and peripherals; storage; and multivendor
customer services.
'These organisations will be responsible for understanding customer needs
and providing solutions to meet those needs,' said Mr Palmer. 'Collectively,
the new business units will have all of Digital's worldwide profit
responsibility.'
The changes at Digital mirror a similar restructuring at International
Business Machines 12 months ago, as both companies overhaul their operations
in response to shifts in the computer market towards cheaper,
microprocessor-based computers and a move towards standardisation of
hardware and software.
'There is a similarity,' Mr Palmer acknowledged. 'We are trying to get at
the same sort of problems. I think it probably validates the concept of
business unit accountability and an understanding that the computer market
is very complex and different business models are required for different
market segments.'
Like IBM, Digital is in the middle of reducing its manufacturing capacity
and its workforce.
Since 1989, Digital has cut 27,000 jobs. Over the next few months, Digital
plans to reduce its payroll to about 90,000, from 108,500 at the end of
September.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-491</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / International Capital Markets: Shake-up in French regional
banking
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CREDIT Mutuel, the group of regional French banks, is restructuring some of
its provincial banking networks in response to the competitive state of
French financial services and the changes within the European banking
system.
Three networks under the Credit Mutuel umbrella - those for northern France,
the Champagne-Ardois region east of Paris and Artois-Picardie north of the
capital - are merging to create Credit Mutuel du Nord-Est.
The new network will be the third-largest in the Credit Mutuel group, after
those covering central and eastern France and Britanny. Credit Mutuel du
Nord-Est will manage savings funds worth FFr41bn (Dollars 7.59bn) and
FFr16bn of credit.
France's banks have had a tough time in the past year. High real interest
rates have depressed demand for credit from both consumers and the corporate
sector, intensifying competition. The banks have also suffered from the
economic slowdown, which has affected the value of their industrial
investments and property portfolios.
These problems have intensified the pressure on smaller, regional players,
such as those within the Credit Mutuel group. The regional banks have also
been anxious to ensure they will meet the new standards to be imposed on
European Community banks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-492</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / International Company News: Commerzbank plans DM125m
offering
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
COMMERZBANK'S delayed capital-raising programme is to start next month with
the issue of DM125m (Dollars 78.6m) of new shares.
The issue, although smaller than expected, will bolster the bank's capital
base, giving it more room for expansion within capital adequacy constraints.
The bank yesterday declined to comment on the issue price.
The move follows the issue of DM500m of profit-sharing certificates last
month, which counts as Tier Two capital. Under European legislation, Tier
One equity capital should be maintained at a minimum of 4 per cent of total
assets.
The distribution of the new shares, which will carry full dividend rights
from January 1, will allow Commerzbank, the smallest of Germany's top three
banks, to expand.
Although domestic economic conditions are difficult, the bank will be better
placed to benefit from any recovery in the US, where it enjoys an A1+
rating.
Commerzbank is expected to issue more shares during next year, although the
timing and the size of of programme will depend on economic conditions and
how well this initial tranche is received.
The board, which was given shareholder approval earlier this year to issue
8m new shares up to the end of 1997, postponed an action planned for
September which was designed to raise up to DM600m, assuming a price of
DM200. The issue was withheld because of the weak state of the stock market.
At the time Commerzbank's shares were trading close to the year's low at
around DM220, compared with the year's high of DM273. They have recently
steadied at above DM240.
A group of institutional shareholders, including Dresdner Bank and Allianz,
Germany's biggest insurer, are to pool their stakes in Veba, the
energy-based conglomerate.
They plan to set up a new company which will hold around 10 per cent of
Veba's shares, at present widely distributed among more than 500,000
shareholders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-493</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / International Company News: Finmeccanica details terms of
incorporation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FINMECCANICA, the holding company controlling the aerospace and high
technology interests of Italy's IRI state holding group, yesterday revealed
terms of its planned incorporation of its Ansaldo, Alenia and Elsag-Bailey
subsidiaries.
Shareholders in Alenia will be offered three Finmeccanica ordinary shares
for every five currently held. Those in Elsag-Bailey will receive nine
Finmeccanica ordinary shares for every five now held. Trading in the shares
of all three companies has been suspended for the past two days pending the
details.
The project should allow substantial savings by eliminating some management
levels, as well as creating major tax benefits. Bankers claimed it could
also improve transparency.
The share swap also covers Ansaldo, which is not quoted, but in which three
Italian companies together own around 5 per cent. The Ansaldo shareholders
will be offered three ordinary Finmeccanica shares for every five ordinary
Ansaldo shares now held.
The transaction, which requires approval from shareholders' meetings in
February, will take place via a L184bn (Dollars 129m) capital increase by
Finmeccanica.
Minority shareholders not accepting the swap will be offered a cash
alternative.
Should all minorities agree, IRI's stake in Finmeccanica's ordinary shares
will drop to 86.6 per cent from 96.4 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-494</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World Commodities Prices: Wool
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WOOL The market in Australia closed last week with prices tending slightly
dearer and the AWC market indicator at 509 cents a kg, after a low point in
the week of 502. There were however quite heavy withdrawals by farmers,
either at thier own reserve prices fixed earlier, or prior to the sale
itself. The Christmas recess in the selling season is expected to be a dull
period for the trade. Prices are as usual subject to currency movements and
strengthening in the US dollar has tended to firm up UK calculations of
overseas costs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-495</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / International Company News: Arnotts given boost in fight for
improved offer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARNOTTS, the Australian biscuit company facing a hostile ADollars
8.80-a-share bid from Campbell Soup of the US, yesterday said its two
biggest institutional shareholders had undertaken not to accept the offer.
Mr Bill Purdy, chairman, told shareholders in a letter that the AMP Society
and National Mutual Life, which hold a combined 10.8 per cent of Arnotts,
believed the bid was too low.
The announcement will provide a significant boost to Arnotts' campaign to
force Campbell to increase the offer, which the board has dismissed as
'opportunistic'.
Mr Leigh Hall, AMP investment manager, said the offer was 'inadequate'.
Campbell, which owns almost 33 per cent of Arnotts, is seeking a further
17.2 per cent for majority control at a cost of ADollars 206m (USDollars
142.3m). The offer values the company at ADollars 1.2bn.
Most opposition to the bid has come from family shareholders, who jointly
control about 20 per cent of the stock. The rejection of the offer by two
institutions is likely to stiffen resistance among uncommitted shareholders.
Mr Purdy said only three of 3,000 Arnotts shareholders contacted by the
company had said they would accept the offer. He did not say how many
shareholders had responded.
Arnotts' shares closed 3 cents lower at to ADollars 9.17 on the Australian
Stock Exchange.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-496</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / International Company News: DAF shares soar as minister
hints at state support
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES in DAF, the lossmaking Dutch commercial vehicles maker in which
British Aerospace owns a 16 per cent stake, surged yesterday after a
government minister indicated the company could count on state support if it
needed extra financing, writes Ronald van de Krol in Amsterdam.
'DAF may soon need perhaps several hundred millions of guilders, which I
will seek to arrange, together with the banks and the Belgian government,'
Mr Koos Andriessen, the Dutch minister of economic affairs, said in an
interview.
DAF's shares rose 10.6 per cent to Fl 8.30 from Tuesday's close of Fl 7.50
before dropping back to finish at Fl 8.10, a rise of 8 per cent on the day.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-497</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Economic Diary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TOMORROW:Christmas day. Commonwealth of Independent States leaders meet for
summit meeting in Belarus. Turkish parliament votes on the 1993 budget bill.
SATURDAY:Referendum on Niger's new multi-party constitution.
MONDAY:Bank holiday. Mr Boutros Boutros-Ghali, United Nations secretary
general, attends one-day conference in Geneva on economic future of Africa.
Mr Thorvald Stoltenberg, Norway's foreign minister, will hold informal talks
about co-operation in the Barents region with his Russian counterpart, Mr
Andrei Kozyrev, in preparation for a wider meeting of foreign ministers in
the northern Norwegian town of Kirkenes in January.
TUESDAY:Kenya holds multi-party general elections. Meeting in Johannesburg
to prepare for peace summit between Mr Nelson Mandela and chief Buthelezi.
Ghana holds parliamentary elections.
WEDNESDAY:US leading indicators (November); new home sales (November). First
round of Congo's parliamentary elections (second round on January 13).
THURSDAY:Central Statistical Office publishes figures for engineering sales
and orders at current and constant prices (October). The Department of Trade
and Industry issues energy trends for October. US issues figures for jobless
claims and factory orders (November). Official end to the Czechoslovak
federation. Mr John Major, prime minister, lights first beacon of Beacon
Europe to celebrate completion of the single market. Publication of the New
Year honours list.
FRIDAY:New Year's day. The world's largest single market, the European
Economic Area, comes into being. Denmark takes the presidency of the
European Community. New ITV companies and ITV teletext services begin
transmission.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-498</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Exceptionals keep Graig in the black
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Graig Shipping has stayed in profit in the half year ended September 30 1992
thanks to exceptional credits, although the pre-tax outcome fell from Pounds
1.7m to Pounds 995,000.
In view of that the interim dividend is being halved to 1p. Earnings per
share worked through at 7.3p (10.8p).
The directors explained that the freight market was very weak and, combined
with firm exchange rates led to a trading loss of Pounds 1.06m compared with
a profit of Pounds 515,000.
Exceptional credits totalled Pounds 2.5m (Pounds 3.56m) comprising the sale
of Garth Shipping and disposal of a large part of Exclusive Group.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-499</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Isosceles wins space to negotiate
restructuring
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A RADICAL financial restructuring of Isosceles, the leveraged buy-out
vehicle for the Gateway food retail group, is to be negotiated between the
company, its lenders and its shareholders over the next few months.
The company, which has debts of about Pounds 1.3bn, yesterday agreed the
terms of a standstill arrangement with its lenders under which it will defer
interest on its loans and its capital repayments until May 28. In total
Isosceles will defer payments of about Pounds 90m.
The banks have also provided additional working capital facilities.
Isosceles refused to put a figure on this facility for commercial reasons,
but it is understood to be sizeable and sufficient.
Isosceles also confirmed that Mr David Simons will join as chief executive
on January 4.
He replaces Mr Alistair Mitchell-Innes who will return to his non-executive
role until he retires from the board in March.
Mr Ernest Sharp, chairman, said yesterday: 'I am pleased that we have
created the breathing space needed for a complete financial restructuring of
Isosceles. All our lenders and major shareholders have recognised the need
for a radical restructuring with a sense of realism and determination.'
The restructuring is expected to involve a sizeable debt for equity swap,
with mezzanine lenders and shareholders interests savagely diluted.
This will be the third restructuring of the group's finances since the
Pounds 2.1bn buy-out in 1989. The second restructuring was only finalised at
the annual meeting in October, although it was negotiated in the summer.
That was a relatively minor affair, involving the recasting of covenants,
the deferral of Pounds 48m of interest on mezzanine debt and conversion of
preference shares into ordinary shares.
Mr Mitchell-Innes said that trading conditions had not worsened
significantly since the summer, and the group was close to profit forecasts
made then. However, he said: 'I do not think the situation was then seen to
be as important as it is now.'
Since the summer, Isosceles has sold Wellworth, the northern Irish
subsidiary, for Pounds 128m, rather less than originally expected. A
hoped-for sale of Herman's, the US sporting goods chain, has fallen through.
Added to that suppliers are understood to have taken a tougher line on
credit terms.
Mr Mitchell-Innes said it was important that all parties understood that
this restructuring would be the last. He added that 'whatever the structure,
the business has to perform.'
The company faced a long haul, but was still profitable at the trading
level, he said. The restructuring would have to 'make sure it offers a
growth way out,' which could eventually provide some value for equity
holders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-500</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Oliver Resources' Norwegian buy
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Shares of Oliver Resources, the Dublin-based oil and gas company which is
quoted on the USM, were suspended at 2 1/4 p yesterday at the directors'
request, following the announcement that it was to make a recommended offer
for Kirkland, the Norwegian oil and gas producer.
The offer, which is subject to certain preconditions, is on a 250-for-1
basis and values Kirkland at about NKr228m (IPounds 20m).
It is proposed that, subject to the offer becoming unconditional in all
respects, Oliver will apply for a full listing of its shares on the stock
exchanges in Dublin and London.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-501</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: ITN contract still waiting to be finalised
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Negotiations on the Pounds 53.6m a year Independent Television News contract
with the ITV companies look like continuing to the last minute.
A number of substantial ITV companies were holding out yesterday, and a
number suggested it may be December 31 before the five-year deal is signed.
The new franchises start from the beginning of next year.
The row is over the proposals for a two year review. Companies such as
Yorkshire-Tyne Tees, HTV, Meridian and Grampian which will no longer be
shareholders in ITN, want a wide-ranging review.
If substantial savings flow from the new ownership structure the ITV
companies want to benefit.
Carlton Television, it is believed, wants to set firm limits on the
conditions that would trigger a review.
Once the news supply agreement is signed the restructuring of ITN will go
unconditional.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-502</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Radiant Metal in profit at halftime
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
After many years of losses, Radiant Metal Finishing has returned to a small
profit.
For the half year ended August 31 1992 it turned in a pre-tax profit of
Pounds 1,263 on turnover of Pounds 513,000. That compared with a deficit of
Pounds 40,626 on sales of Pounds 595,000 last time, and by that year-end the
losses had reached Pounds 95,000.
A decision on a dividend payment will be deferred until the full year
results are available.
The principal activity of the group is electroplating and metal finishing in
common and precious metals.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-503</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Caspen to capitalise on Villiers name
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Caspen Oil is to change its name to Villiers Group to reflect the shift in
balance of the business towards engineering, and to capitalise 'on a
well-known and respected name in the engineering world.'
The company moved into engineering in 1991 through the acquisition of
Machine Tool Services, and in August bought the specialist engineering
business and trade names of Villiers.
Meanwhile, results for the year ended July 31 1992 showed a pre-tax loss of
Pounds 166,000, after crediting exceptionals of Pounds 169,000, compared
with a profit of Pounds 60,000 after gains of Pounds 164,000.
Oil and gas turnover came to Pounds 891,000 (Pounds 1.46m) and engineering
sales to Pounds 499,000 (nil). Operating profit fell to Pounds 97,000
(Pounds 304,000) while interest charges were at Pounds 225,000 (Pounds
195,000) and administration expenses at Pounds 249,000 (Pounds 261,000).
Losses per share were 0.32p (earnings 0.47p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-504</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Guardian maintains recovery trend
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The USM-quoted Guardian Group, formerly Associated Energy Services, has
continued its recovery with a pre-tax profit of Pounds 47,000 in the three
months to September 30.
First quarter turnover was Pounds 817,000 and earnings came to 0.216p. The
company intends to declare a dividend at the earliest commercially prudent
time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-505</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Wates sells Milk St interests for Pounds 9m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Wates City of London Properties has sold its freehold and long leasehold
interest in 1-6 Milk Street, EC2, to Prudential Nominees. The consideration
was Pounds 9.35m cash.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-506</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Trading warning hits Instem shares
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Instem's share price fell by 19p to 81p yesterday after the USM-quoted
company said the trading position of its electronics arm had worsened and as
a result group pre-tax profit for the year might be significantly lower than
last time's Pounds 1.01m.
The board said receivers had recently been appointed to two of the
division's customers. The precise impact upon the company would depend on
the outcome of the receiverships.
However, it was likely that an exceptional charge would be incurred, which
could hit profits for the year to January 1. It intended to maintain the
final dividend at last year's 3p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-507</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Kembrey cuts losses back to Pounds 114,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Kembrey, maker of electrical connectors and accessories, has cut its loss in
the six months ended October 3 1992 to Pounds 114,000 after exceptional
charges. That is set against the deficit of Pounds 517,000 in the second
half of last year, after a Pounds 170,000 profit in the first.
'We expect the full year's figures to show a significant reduction in the
losses of the previous year', said Mr David Burnet, chairman.
He said the improvement over the second half arose mainly from reductions in
interest to Pounds 382,000 (Pounds 439,000), losses from discontinued
businesses at Pounds 152,000 (Pounds 365,000), and exceptional charges to
Pounds 121,000 (Pounds 168,000).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-508</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Caledonia Inv sells De Morgan stake
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Caledonia Investments, in which the Cayzer family has a 48 per cent stake,
has sold its holding in De Morgan, to Mr Patrick Cooper, De Morgan chairman,
for Pounds 258,000.
The holding of 11.5m ordinary shares carries 24.3 per cent of the voting
rights.
The bulk of the consideration has been satisfied by a Pounds 208,000
interest-free loan to Mr Cooper. The remaining Pounds 50,000 is satisfied by
the granting to Caledonia of the right to share in any profits on the sale
of the shares within the next five years.
Caledonia's shares yesterday added 13p to 450p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-509</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Kelsey falls Pounds 307,000 into red
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
KELSEY INDUSTRIES finished the year ended September 30 1992 with a loss  -
the first one in its history - and is halving its dividend to 13p.
Mr Brian Arbib, chairman, said in the worst trading conditions - with the
exception of the far East - he could remember in 38 years, the group
sustained a pre-tax loss of Pounds 307,000, compared with a profit of Pounds
1.44m which took in exceptional gains of Pounds 350,000.
Turnover fell from Pounds 43.4m to Pounds 41.4m. Losses per share came to
16.2p (earnings 20p) and the final dividend is cut from 18p to 5p. The
group's activities cover roofing, soldering products, audio/video products
and engineering.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-510</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Wheway shares dive as McLeod talks end
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MATTHEW CURTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES in Wheway plunged 6 1/2 p to 6p yesterday after the struggling
environmental engineering group announced that merger talks with McLeod
Russel Holdings, the paints producer and distributor, had collapsed.
Both parties said they had been unable to agree on a suitable price for a
deal.
Wheway's current market value is Pounds 8.4m, compared with Pounds 17.5m
before the announcement as shares rose earlier this month on hopes of a
deal.
Wheway, in need of refinancing after its costly move out of heavy
engineering, warned of a sharp deterioration in year-end results in
November, and turned a Pounds 2.8m pre-tax profit into a Pounds 3.51m loss
in the 12 months to October 3.
Mr Hugh Ashton, chairman, said the group had secured credit lines -
necessitating a Pounds 1m after-tax provision - from its bankers to cover
its working capital requirements until September. The group's 1992 results
would receive a qualified auditor's report.
The group's best prospects lay in merging with a larger financially robust
company, and it had received a number of approaches from third parties since
the breakdown in talks with McLeod.
Wheway's turnover fell to Pounds 79.8m (Pounds 89.3m), while operating
profit of Pounds 1.38m (Pounds 4.78m) was offset by interest charges of
Pounds 1.68m (Pounds 1.98m). Exceptional items related to retrenchment and
business closure costs amounted to Pounds 2.11m and Pounds 1.1m
respectively.
Losses per share were 2.87p (2.08p earnings) and no final dividend is being
paid - the interim was 1p and a 2p total was paid last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-511</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Forte holders agree to Gardner sale
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GARDNER MERCHANT, the contract catering company, yesterday began a journey
to a likely stock market flotation when shareholders of its parent, Forte,
agreed its sale to management.
The sale proceeds will allow Forte to expand further in Europe and leaves
the hotel group with a 24 per cent stake in the buy-out vehicle.
Mr Garry Hawkes, the Gardner Merchant managing director, said the buy-out
was 'an attempt to bring back ownership and hopefully motivation' to the
managers who have delivered 15 per cent growth for Forte in recent years.
Approval of the Pounds 402m deal came as Magnet, the DIY and kitchens group,
provided another reminder that buy-outs are not always a gilded route to
riches for management. Bankers yesterday put Magnet's holding company into
receivership and took control of the trading company's assets.
The timing of a return to the stock market, which could be as early as two
years from now, will be dictated partly by the speed at which Gardner
Merchant can increase operating profit and reduce debt.
But it is equally dependent on the performance of Compass Group, the
catering and hospitals group, which is one of Gardner's main UK competitors
and which pulled out of talks to buy the company from Forte earlier this
year.
'The progress of Compass must be very important,' said Mr Hawkes. 'It will
be the bellwether share for Gardner Merchant and it will dictate what we can
do when.'
Mr Hawkes believes that Gardner Merchant's markets still retain considerable
growth potential. In its core business of providing catering services to
factories and offices, only 38 per cent of that market is currently covered
by contracts.
There are also the developing markets providing catering to hospitals and
local authorities as the UK government accelerates its programme of
contracting out services.
Gardner Merchant is also at a substantial advantage over some other
companies that have led leveraged buy-outs in that its businesses require
very little capital.
Debt is unlikely to be much of a burden and not only because the interest
rates on most of the Pounds 200m of senior debt has been hedged long term.
The deal involves more equity than many MBO's and more than would have been
necessary had the proposed buy-out by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts earlier this
year gone through.
Mr Hawkes says that Gardner Merchant was, in any case, used to paying most
of its profit and cash flow to Forte in dividends. 'The interest charge is
no greater than what was taken out of the business by Forte,' Mr Hawkes
says. Cash flow should also be adequate to repay debt over seven years.
In its last financial year, Gardner raised operating profits by 16 per cent
to Pounds 31.1m from sales of Pounds 864m. Almost 40 per cent of these sales
are derived from 15 countries outside the UK.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-512</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Spanish bank accused in fraud inquiry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BANCO SANTANDER, Spain's most aggressive commercial bank, has been accused
by the country's senior monetary court judge of inducing some of its clients
to commit a huge tax fraud.
The bank has been ordered to post by Sunday a bond of Pta8bn (Pounds 46.1m),
thought to be the biggest ever set in Spain. The order brings to a head a
long investigation by judge Miguel Moreiras into the creation by Santander
of a tax avoidance instrument, called a credit assignment, in the late
1980s.
In a hostile ruling made on Tuesday, Mr Moreiras said he had found 'clear
evidence of criminality' against Santander's president, Mr Emilio Botin, its
managing director, Mr Rodrigo de Echenique, its directors general and
regional and local office managers.
Although Mr Moreiras is still investigating the case, legal experts said
yesterday his comments significantly increase pressure on Santander. It is
up to Mr Moreiras to decide whether to go to trial and who to try.
Mr Moreiras' ruling - rejecting an appeal by the bank to shelve the
investigation - even questioned Santander's suitability to continue
operating as a bank, saying it had abused the confidence of the Finance
Ministry - the ultimate bank licensing authority - by committing a
'multitude of fraudulent acts' against the revenue service.
He said Santander had made 45,000 credit assignments between 1986 and 1989.
Santander says they were legal, but the judge said the bank incited and
assisted selected clients to evade taxes. The credit assignment, he said,
was 'a contract to commit a fraud'.
Credit assignments were prompted by high Bank of Spain reserve requirements,
under which banks were required to match a portion of their deposits with
obligatory, interest free, deposits with the Bank of Spain.
This greatly increased the cost of funding.
Using the assignments, Banco Santander would sell loans in its portfolio to
a customer. The payment from the customer was not regarded as a deposit and
was thus 'liberated' from the reserve rules. Also, the customer's payment
attracted interest from the bank but as the amount was not a deposit,
Santander says, the interest was not subject to the withholding tax applied
to normal deposits.
Banco Santander said yesterday it 'categorically rejected' Mr Moreiras' view
that the 'payments' were subject to withholding tax as a normal deposit
would have been.
But Mr Moreiras also indirectly accuses the bank of misleading the tax
authority. Frequently, in some 8,000 assignments, worth more than Pta20m
each, 'it appears that the names of the certificate holder given by the bank
to the revenue service do not coincide with documentation recovered by this
court'.
Banco Santander owns nearly 10 per cent of Royal Bank of Scotland and 16 per
cent of First Fidelity Bancorp of the US.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-513</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Patent mouse
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Ohio University has been awarded only the second US patent to be issued on
an animal. Its patent mouse carries a human gene making it resist viral
infections.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-514</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Yeltsin wins cabinet posts for his chief reformers: Radical
deputy PM to take over finance and economy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD, LEYLA BOULTON and ANTHONY ROBINSON, Eastern Europe Editor
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Boris Yeltsin, the Russian president, yesterday emerged from three days
of tough bargaining having secured a cabinet of all the main reformers he
wanted, plus a new radical deputy prime minister in charge of finance and
the economy.
This marks a decisive victory for the reformers in protracted
behind-the-scenes negotiations between the president and Mr Viktor
Chernomyrdin, the new prime minister.
Mr Boris Feodorov, Russia's executive director at the World Bank and a
former Russian finance minister, joins Mr Anatoly Chubais (in charge of
privatisation) and Mr Alexander Shokhin (in charge of foreign economic
relations) in the ranks of deputy prime ministers.
Mr Chernomyrdin said the composition of the cabinet had not changed
drastically, and it would continue reform but take into account social
considerations, Itar-Tass news agency reported.
Also on the cabinet list, signed by Mr Yeltsin last night, is Mr Andrei
Kozyrev, the embattled foreign minister. Mr Kozyrev, together with the
ministers of defence, interior and security - also confirmed in their posts
 -must now submit himself to approval by parliament. The liberal Mr Kozyrev,
who has always been next after Mr Yegor Gaidar, the former acting prime
minister, in the conservative and centrist deputies' firing line, is thought
unlikely to get it.
However, Mr Sergei Shakhrai, the former legal adviser to Mr Yeltsin - and
another deputy prime minister remaining in place - said yesterday Mr Yeltsin
could himself confirm Mr Kozyrev as foreign minister, at least for a further
three months.
Mr Vladimir Shumeiko stays on as first deputy prime minister, and Mr Andrei
Nechayev, the economics minister, also retains his post - meaning that the
economics team appointed by Mr Gaidar is all but untouched. The one
casualty, Mr Pyotr Aven, the trade minister, who resigned on Monday, is
replaced by Mr Sergei Glazyev, his former deputy.
The one concession to the conservative deputies, who won the resignation
last week of Mr Gaidar during the Congress of People's Deputies' session,
was in the appointment as a deputy premier of Mr Yuri Yarov, a deputy
chairman of parliament.
Mr Yarov has been a supporter of Mr Ruslan Khasbulatov, the parliamentary
speaker, but has kept links with Mr Yeltsin's camp and has been less
fiercely opposed to the reform government than Mr Khasbulatov.
Mr Yarov appears to replace Mr Georgi Makharadze, a deputy prime minister in
charge of regional affairs.
Mr Feodorov's appointment, for which Mr Chubais and Mr Shokhin fought hard
in the past three days, is seen as a crucial one for maintaining the fight
against inflation and strengthening privatisation.
Anthony Robinson, Eastern Europe editor, adds: Mr Mikhail Gorbachev, the
Soviet Union's last unelected communist president, last night denounced his
old rival Mr Yeltsin, Russia's first popularly elected president, as a
neo-Stalinist.
Speaking in an interview with the BBC's Newsnight, Mr Gorbachev, who
resigned as Soviet president on Christmas Day last year, also said Mr Gaidar
had prepared his own downfall with what he called 'cynical policies which
had made people poor'.
He added it would be 'completely wrong' to imagine the reforms could only
continue under Mr Gaidar, whose reforms he said had brought chaos.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-515</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Palestinian leader calls for 'someone to do something'
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Palestinian leader in the occupied territories yesterday called for
'someone to do something' to save the Middle East peace process. Faisal
Husseini, flanked by Ghassan Khatib and Hana Ashrawi, fellow peace talks
delegates, was speaking as Israeli troops shot dead two Palestinians during
protests in the Gaza Strip against the deportation of 415 alleged Islamic
fundamentalist militants
Report, Page 3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-516</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2BCADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / International Company News: Magnet holding company in
receivership
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MAGNET, the UK fitted-kitchens retailer, was given a new lease of life
yesterday as its main bank lendersput its heavily-indebted holding company,
Airedale Holdings, into administrative receivership.
The move almost certainly means that the subordinated creditors and
shareholders involved in the controversial Pounds 700m (Dollars 1.06bn)
management buy-out in 1989 will have to write off their investments.
GE Capital, a subsidiary of General Electric of the US, is the largest
subordinated creditor, with Pounds 70m outstanding. It is seeking to upgrade
its position through legal action.
The eight senior lenders to Airedale Holdings, owed an estimated Pounds
450m, will also only retrieve a proportion of their outstanding loans. They
include Bankers Trust, Standard Chartered, Hill Samuel, Bank of Scotland,
Creditanstalt, Bank of America, Continental Bank and the Long-Term Credit
Bank.
The banks announced that their vehicle, Magnet Group, had purchased Water
Meadow Holdings, which controls the Magnet business, from receivers for a
sum believed to be in excess of Pounds 10m.
Insiders said that about Pounds 25m of the senior debt had been swapped for
equity in the new vehicle.
The banks intend to float or sell Magnet Group within two to five years. The
proceeds from flotation will be paid as a deferred consideration to
Airedale's receiver, who will then pay off Airedale's creditors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-517</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2BCADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / International Company News: Thirteen preselected for Greek
telecoms bid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KERIN HOPE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ATHENS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THIRTEEN international telecommunications companies have been preselected to
bid for a 35 per cent equity stake in OTE, the Greek state
telecommunications monopoly, in what is expected to be Greece's largest
privatisation deal.
The list includes AT&amp;T, Ameritech and Southwestern Bell of the US, NTT of
Japan, Korea Telecom, PTT Netherlands, France Telecom, Stet of Italy and
Telefonica of Spain.
The Greek government is looking for an experienced international operator to
lead a consortium that would also take over management of OTE and carry out
substantial modernisation of the country's telephone network.
A new operator would be expected to invest up to Dollars 10bn in updating
the fixed wire system, which is already close to capacity with a
waiting-list for almost 900,000 new lines.
A short-list of bidders will be drawn up early next year, with the sale due
to be completed by the summer. The government hopes to raise about Dr210bn
(Dollars 1bn) from the sale of the strategic 35 per cent stake.
Another 14 per cent of the company's equity will be floated on the Athens
Stock Exchange immediately after the sale, with shares being offered first
to OTE employees and their families.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-518</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2BCADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Chilean economy expands by 10%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LESLIE CRAWFORD and JOE MANN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SANTIAGO, CARACAS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Chilean economy has grown by almost 10 per cent in 1992, its best
performance in 30 years, according to Mr Alejandro Foxley, the finance
minister.
The higher-than-expected growth was spearheaded by a 30 per cent increase in
private sector investment, evident in new mining projects, a construction
boom in Santiago and a host of small manufacturing businesses. Mr Foxley
forecast the economy would grow at least six per cent in 1993.
The independent Central Bank has used interest rates and a revaluation of
the peso to lower inflation by almost six points to 13 per cent this year.
Mr Foxley said the Treasury would continue to generate fiscal surpluses of
around three per cent of GDP to keep inflation in check. However, many
economists believe the inflation target for 1993 of 11 per cent will be
difficult to meet.
Mr Foxley said high levels of employment and the government's social
policies were beginning to narrow the income gap between rich and poor.
Increases in the minimum wage, family benefits and state pensions had
allowed 1m Chileans to escape the poverty trap since President Patricio
Aylwin's government came to power three years ago. One third of the
population, about 4.3m people, still live in deep poverty. Mr Foxley said
the government was concerned about the high levels of youth unemployment.
Venezuela's economy continued to post strong gains for the third consecutive
year in 1992, growing by 7.3 per cent in real terms, according to
preliminary year-end figures published by the Central Bank of Venezuela, Joe
Mann writes from Caracas. However, the public-sector deficit was estimated
at 6.1 per cent of GDP, compared with a 0.7 per cent surplus in 1991, while
the current account ran a deficit of over Dollars 3.7bn in 1992, against a
Dollars 1.6bn surplus last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-519</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2BCADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Smokers face 30% price rise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
French smokers, banned from many public places by strict new laws, face
another blow: a 30 per cent rise in tobacco prices next year, Alice
Rawsthorn reports. They are the latest target of the government's efforts to
cut the spiralling budget deficit.
Early yesterday, parliament voted to raise the price of tobacco 15 per cent
on January 18, and another 15 per cent on May 24. This means France's
smokers will have to pay FFr13.70 (Dollars 2.56) for a packet of 20
cigarettes next month, and FFr15.75 from May. The government stands to gain
an extra FFr4.5bn in revenue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-520</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2BCADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / US orders for durable goods fall by 1.9%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
US durable goods orders fell 1.9 per cent between October and November, more
than expected, official figures showed yesterday. The fall followed a 4.6
per cent rise between September and October and mainly reflected weakness in
the defence and civilian aircraft sectors.
Orders for non-defence capital goods, excluding aircraft, rose 0.3 per cent.
Figures for personal incomes and consumption were also weaker than expected.
Personal incomes rose 0.2 per cent last month against 1.1 per cent in
October. Personal consumption grew 0.3 per cent in real terms against 0.6
per cent in October.
Changes in farmers' subsidies distorted figures. Excluding distortions,
incomes rose 0.8 per cent last month. Fourth-quarter consumption spending is
expected to be above third-quarter levels.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-521</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2BCADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Baghdad rejects UN request
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Iraq rejected a United Nations request to allow UN guards to inspect and
escort trucks carrying aid to Kurds through government-held territory.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-522</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2BCADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Tajik refugees flee
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Thousands of Tajik refugees fled across the border to Afghanistan to escape
forces loyal to the new hardline government of Tajikistan.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-523</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Finance and the Family: Record fine for Scottish Widows
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LAUTRO, the life assurance watchdog, set again its record high for a fine
this week. The culprit, was Scottish Widows, was fined Pounds 120,000 for
failing to monitor its tied agents, and check that proper 'fact-finds' were
being filled in on the financial circumstances of potential clients.
The company has already been ordered to contact all the clients affected,
and to pay full compensation if inappropriate advice is disclosed. Scottish
Widows has attempted to contact all clients affected - there is still
difficulty tracking some of them down - and no definite cases of wrong
advice have been discovered. No compensation has been paid, but Newton
Scott, Scottish Widows's manager of sales and marketing, admits there is 'a
very small proportion who may have a compensation claim.'
Lautro is also investigating the advertising for Scottish Widows' Monthly
Income Bond, after complaints from advisers. If this is found to have been
misleading, then Scottish Widows could be required to contact investors,
explain the product and repay the amount invested if it no longer seems
appropriate. This would mirror the action taken against two companies
earlier this year for misleading advertising of with-profits bonds.
In all, Lautro appears to have grown a particularly vicious set of teeth
during the past year. The watchdog denies the fine is part of a 'get-tough'
policy and says it reflects the severity of the offence.
That is not how it has been interpreted elsewhere. The Consumers'
Association welcomed the fine as a method of taking compliance seriously.
The association says that the banks' life assurance subsidiaries, regulated
by the Securities and Investments Board, could also benefit from the
tenacious regulation being administered by Lautro.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-524</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / TUC expected to urge public-sector strike
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART and DAVID LASCELLES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Trades Union Congress is expected to call for a one-day public-sector
strike in February over jobs, pay and the mining industry crisis.
Mining unions yesterday tried to maintain pressure for an immediate
resumption of coal-cutting at the 10 pits earmarked for closure. They argued
leaving them on a stand-by basis might cost Pounds 150m over nine months.
The TUC has been reluctant to urge a full one-day strike because of the
legal complications and the fear of lack of support. But many unions are now
more ready to risk industrial action. They have been encouraged by Monday's
High Court judgment that the pit closure programme had been carried out
unlawfully.
The mining unions and the TUC public-services committee will meet separately
on January 5 to discuss strategy. The TUC said the committee would consider
'synchronised balloting on industrial action with the aim of building
activity around jobs and pay on a date in February'.
Mr Michael Heseltine, the trade and industry secretary, yesterday formally
appointed mining consultants Boyds to report on whether British Coal should
proceed with the closure of the 10 earmarked pits.
The High Court ruling called for an independent assessment before any
closure decision was taken. But the unions argue that Boyds is not
sufficiently independent, as it is working for the government on the wider
Department of Trade and Industry review of the closures due in February or
March.
Mr Norman Willis, TUC general secretary, emphasised in a letter to Mr John
Major, the prime minister, that appointing Boyds was 'not a satisfactory
response; not even the letter of the judgment seems to be followed'.
British Coal has agreed to buy 87,000 tonnes of coal from Monktonhall
colliery, near Edinburgh, which it closed five years ago. The colliery is
now leased by miners who ploughed their redundancy money into operating it
as a private pit. A miners' strike in Poland has reduced imports of
house-coal, and the one-year order for Monktonhall has been placed to make
up the shortfall.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-525</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / More tour groups cut holiday prices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
LUNN POLY, Pickfords and Thomas Cook yesterday followed Thomson, Owners
Abroad and Airtours in attempting to stimulate the sluggish holiday market.
Lunn Poly is offering 10 per cent discounts on holidays booked between
December 28 and January 2 up to a total of Pounds 1m a day, while Pickfords
is cutting the price of an average package by about 10 per cent.
Thomas Cook said that from December 28 all bookings would need only a Pounds
1 deposit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-526</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6ACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Court suspends Moi candidates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NAIROBI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Kenya's High Court yesterday suspended the nominations of nine candidates
from Kenya's ruling Kanu party - the party of President Daniel arap Moi -
after opposition parties alleged foul play in next week's general elections,
Reuter reports from Nairobi.
The ruling temporarily stopped the automatic election of nine Kanu
candidates who were declared unopposed in Kenya's first multi-party polls
for 26 years. Opposition parties alleged their candidates were prevented
from handing in nomination papers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-527</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / International Company News: Dassault and Aerospatiale to
link under French government scheme
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DASSAULT, the French aircraft manufacturer, is to join forces with
Aerospatiale, the aerospace concern, in a French government plan to bolster
the two groups in the increasingly competitive aerospace industry.
The government yesterday announced plans to revive Sogepa, the dormant
state-owned company which still owns shares in both Dassault and
Aerospatiale, by ceding part of its holding in the two groups. The deal is
an initiative by Mr Pierre Joxe, defence minister
Under the terms of the deal, Sogepa, which already owns 20 per cent of
Dassault, will receive another 16 per cent, leaving the government with 10
per cent. The state also plans to transfer part of its 72 per cent stake in
Aerospatiale to increase Sogepa's 7 per cent holding.
Sogepa will then form a supervisory committee composed of representatives of
Dassault and Aerospatiale to identify opportunities for co-operation. The
two groups already collaborate in composite materials and the Hermes space
programme. Mr Louis Gallois, chairman of Aerospatiale, will be Sogepa's
chairman and will join Dassault's administrative board. Mr Serge Dassault,
his opposite number at Dassault, will become deputy chairman of Sogepa and a
member of Aerospatiale's administrative board.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-528</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: ITC rejects request to revoke HTV's licence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Independent Television Commission yesterday rejected a request that
HTV's television licence should be revoked before it was evident that it
could not carry out its obligations.
Sir George Russell, chairman of the ITC, has written to the C3W consortium -
which was seeking withdrawal of HTV's licence - saying there are no grounds
for revoking it. C3W was one of the losing bidders for the Wales and the
West franchise.
Sir George, in his reply to C3W, says that HTV has not indicated it does not
intend to provide an ITV service. He does not consider that for any other
reason the Commission 'has reasonable grounds for believing that HTV will
not provide that service once the licence has come into force.'
HTV has admitted it will have to save Pounds 10m a year to meet the demands
of the Pounds 20.5m a year it has to pay the government. It also has to pay
2 per cent of its advertising revenue to the Treasury.
Mr Charles Romaine, group chief executive of C3W, said yesterday that
savings of Pounds 12.5m had been found.
City analysts are now predicting pre-tax profits of Pounds 2.5m for calendar
year 1993, a figure that could well be exceeded.
Every aspect of the business has been looked at but the main savings have
come from the contracting out, or casualisation of services.
By the middle of next year the staff could be cut to a third of the more
than 900 figure in 1989. Staff are being encouraged to set up their own
businesses selling services to HTV.
For example, the outside broadcasting unit has been 'privatised' with HTV
having the right to the first 10 per cent of its time.
HTV's share of ITV advertising revenue, which fell as low as 5.3 per cent in
November, is expected under new deals now being done to rise to 6.2 per cent
and possibly as high as 6.4 per cent.
The company will also get an additional Pounds 1m from the sale of part of
its Culverhouse Cross site for which Atlantic Properties has won planning
permission for a retail development.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-529</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Electrocomponents divested of Misco
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Electrocomponents, the distributor of electronic, electrical and mechanical
components, has completed the divestment of its loss-making Misco personal
computers subsidiaries.
The remaining Misco operations have been sold to companies under the Global
Computer supplies umbrella for a net consideration of Pounds 10m.
Electrocomponents said that after taking into account proceeds from this
latest sale and the sale earlier this year of Misco Sweden, minus the cost
of closing Misco France and losses incurred by the Misco businesses since
March 31, an additional charge of Pounds 1m was expected to be made at the
year end.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-530</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Hickson pays Pounds 5.5m to buy ICI
business
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Hickson International, the speciality chemical company, is paying Pounds
5.5m to purchase from Imperial Chemical Industries the Anionic Surfactants
business with the manufacturing facility at Renory, Belgium.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-531</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Stanhope near to agreeing refinancing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER, Property Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STANHOPE Properties yesterday announced the sale of two buildings for just
over Pounds 100m and said it was close to agreeing the refinancing of Pounds
160m of debt.
However confusion surrounded the exact state of Stanhope's refinancing talks
for a few hours yesterday afternoon when Brunswick, the company's public
relations adviser, inadvertently released a statement to the stock exchange
which claimed that the refinancing had been agreed. The statement was later
retracted.
The error arose because Brunswick had prepared two alternative releases
describing the sale of a building, one of which also announced the
refinancing of Stanhope's debt. The wrong released was issued.
Stanhope said the extension of its revolving credit facility until December
1996 had indeed been agreed by the 16 banks directly involved. However,
agreement had not been reached by all the banks involved in Stanhope's
projects, some of which are guaranteed by the parent company. In particular,
the head office of a French bank had yet to give formal approval, although
the deal had been agreed at branch level.
The revolving credit facility has been reduced from Pounds 165m to Pounds
160m and, if finally agreed, will be subject to bank approval in December
1994 and December 1995.
Rosehaugh Stanhope Developments, Stanhope's 50 per cent-owned subsidiary,
has sold Broadwalk House, a 280,000 sq ft building within the Broadgate
office complex in the City of London to Credit Lyonnais, the building's main
tenant.
Rosehaugh, the other half of the RSD venture, went into receivership a month
ago.
Credit Lyonnais will pay Pounds 12.7m for the building and will assume the
building's debt of Pounds 76.3m. RSD will benefit from any increase in the
value of the building before 1995, up to a ceiling of Pounds 1.75m.
Stanhope also announced yesterday that an overseas buyer had paid Pounds
20.5m for a Staines office building, let to the tobacco division of BAT.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-532</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921224
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 DEC 92 / Dollars 25m damages over implants
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HOUSTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A Texas jury awarded Dollars 25m (Pounds 16.4m) in damages yesterday to a
Houston woman who said silicone-gel breast implants caused an autoimmune
disease after rupturing inside her, Reuter reports from Houston.
Pamela Johnson won the award against Medical Engineering, a subsidiary of
Bristol-Myers Squibb, after claiming silicone leaked from two sets of
implants, attacked her immune system and caused various illnesses, forcing
her to have a partial mastectomy. Bristol-Myers Squibb, whose stock fell
Dollars 3.125 to Dollars 68.125 after the ruling, plans an appeal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-533</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Business and the Environment: Skiing's natural balance -
Victoria Griffith examines the row over water use in the US
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTORIA GRIFFITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Skiers heading for the slopes this winter are unlikely to be plagued by
doubts that they are doing something harmful to the environment. Indeed,
fresh air and mountain scenery have always been part of the lure of the
sport, which appears comfortingly benign to nature.
Yet at mountain resorts all over the US, environmentalists are in a fierce
ecological battle with the ski industry over an increasingly precious
commodity - snow.
The fight over snow is really a battle for water. Environmentalists say ski
resorts are siphoning so much water from mountain streams that the streams
may begin to run dry for part of the year. A dry river or stream bed is not
only an unpleasant sight; it can also be lethal to fish populations.
'The snow-making issue is turning into the most bitter environmental battle
this region has seen in years,' says Andrew Hamilton, a lawyer with the
Conservation Law Foundation, a Boston-based environmental group which has
challenged the ski areas' water rights. In some areas, ecologists say, the
water drainage has been devastating, threatening the survival of fragile
trout and salmon populations.
In years past, ski resorts relied on Mother Nature to provide them with the
snow they needed, and she was kind enough to oblige. So was the world's
economy. After the second world war, increasing wealth in the industrialised
world turned a once obscure sport into an internationally popular pastime.
In the US, the industry enjoyed tremendous growth, becoming a big
money-earner in states like Colorado and Vermont. Over the last two decades,
though, growth in the ski business has slowed dramatically, and ski areas
are competing for a greater share of a stagnant market.
In the fight for customers, snow-making has become a common way of extending
the season, guaranteeing snow from late October through April or even May.
Unfortunately, the demand for artificial snow is at its highest in November
and December, months when mountain streams are at their lowest level, and
when fish eggs are most in danger of being destroyed if the stream freezes
through.
'We are concerned that the stream rates are too low for the survival of the
fish, particularly Atlantic salmon, which is a threatened species,' says
Spencer Conley of the New England Fish and Wildlife Service. In Colorado,
which faces a state-wide water shortage, limits on water withdrawal for
snow-making have hit the ski industry hard, nipping in the bud plans for
expansion at many resorts.
But the hard times have also unleashed unprecedented creativity in the art
of making snow. Some resorts have financed 'cloud seeding', an experimental
procedure in which aeroplanes fly through clouds in the hope of producing
precipitation.
To protect the fish population, some ecologists suggest planting trees on
river banks for shading, and placing boulders and rocks at strategic points
in the water to create pools of water for fish eggs. Others are advocating
the recycling of treated sewage water for snow-making, though the idea may
not be well-received by skiers.
The best alternatives are, unfortunately, among the most expensive. One
option is to create storage tanks above the ground to collect rain water
throughout the year. The problem is that the tanks are not aesthetically
pleasing, an issue of great importance for the ski industry. Another
possibility is the creation of artificial lakes, which collect water when
the snow melts in the spring, and can be used later to make snow. This
method is not only feasible, it is also aesthetically attractive.
However, the creation of an artificial lake is prohibitively expensive for
any single resort to contemplate. Yet in Colorado, competing resorts have
begun to pool resources to try to resolve their problems together. In one
case, five ski areas have just agreed to help finance the creation of an
artificial lake together with the city government of Denver. In return for
their investment, they will each be awarded a certain amount of the
collected lake water.
The ski industry is understandably concerned about the anti-snow-making
movement. 'If our customers see that there is no snow here in November, they
may not book into Vermont for their winter ski vacation,' says Joseph
Parkinson of the Vermont Ski Areas Association.
Even so, environmentalists believe much of the industry is anxious to
co-operate. 'It's in their best interest to work together with us,' believes
Lewis Milford, an attorney with the Vermont Conservation Law Foundation.
'They are selling to an increasingly environmentally-conscious public. If
their customers start to believe that skiing is not
environmentally-friendly, they may begin to stay away.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-534</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Business and the Environment: Pollution verdict worries
insurers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
US business has won another round in its long running legal battle with
insurers over who should meet the cost of cleaning up pollution. The
victory, in an Illinois Supreme Court decision earlier this month, has
potentially serious implications for insurers at the Lloyd's market, who are
heavily exposed to businesses in the state.
The Illinois court decision freed Outboard Marine Corporation, an outboard
motor manufacturer, to pursue its insurers for the costs of cleaning up
polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs) dumped into Lake Michigan between the 1950s
and the 1970s.
In 1978, Outboard was ordered to clean up the PCBs, which had been present
in pydraul, a hydraulic fluid the company had used in die-casting. Insurers
 -mainly US companies and none of them London-based - had restricted
coverage under liability policies to cases where pollution was 'sudden and
accidental' and resisted claims on the grounds that the pollution had
occurred over a long period.
The Illinois court ruled on December 4, however, that the term 'sudden' was
ambiguous and said coverage was available regardless of how rapidly
pollution had occurred if it could be shown that pollution had been
'unexpected and unintended'.
Nine other US state supreme courts have also ruled on the interpretation of
the 'sudden and accidental' clause. Verdicts so far have been mixed, with
five courts ruling that there is coverage only where the pollution is
'sudden' in a temporal sense.
However, lawyers acting for policyholders claim that the Illinois ruling is
a crucially important one and could lead to a huge escalation of pollution
losses for the market.
Lloyd's underwrites directly in the state (one of two in which it is
licensed to do so) and many US companies have their headquarters in the
state, which is also one of North America's most polluted, increasing the
chances that legal action might take place there.
At the very least a series of long-drawn out - and hugely expensive  - legal
battles is on the cards.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-535</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Business and the Environment: Switzerland tries to halt the
slide - Levelling slopes may encourage erosion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
With up to 700,000 skiers hurtling and skidding down Switzerland's slopes on
a crisp winter's day, the activities of the piste and chalet set are no
longer just plain harmless fun.
Yet now that skiing is no longer a growth industry, the government feels
less inhibited about restricting the freedom of skiers and resort operators
so as to help protect the fragile environment.
Skiing affects the ecology of Switzerland and its Alpine neighbours in three
main ways. Perhaps the most important is through modifications to the
landscape by resort operators. These include the clearing of forests to make
courses, the levelling of terrain and removal of rocks to permit the use of
snow-packing machines, and the creation of gentle pathways for novices.
The construction of hotels, restaurants and lift machinery also disrupts the
landscape, though modern cable cars, gondolas and chair lifts are less
damaging than old drag lifts for which special paths had to be carved.
The second type of impact arises from the increasing use of snow-making
machines. These need vast quantities of water and energy and are very noisy.
Finally, beginners who look enviously on accomplished skiers and
snowboarders can take some comfort from the fact that these powder hounds
terrify wildlife and damage young flora as they swish through the trees. In
recent years, several Swiss communities have fenced off areas to prevent
skiers from disturbing animals.
Swiss concern about the impact of skiing on the environment dates from the
1970s when the industry was expanding rapidly. In 1979, the federal
government published its first directives on limiting environmental
disturbance, mainly to help cantonal governments confronted with development
applications.
Since then, the legal framework has been tightened, various studies and
policy documents written and correction programmes launched. The unwritten,
but widely accepted, basic policy that no entirely new ski areas will be
developed also dates from the late 1970s. Only improvements and expansions
at existing resorts are allowed, and for these, strict guidelines have been
adopted.
For example, because of the delicacy of the high Alpine environment, no
levelling of slopes is allowed above 2,000 metres. Also, alterations to the
landscape are not allowed where protected species of fauna and flora would
be affected.
Gilbert Thelin, the Swiss environment ministry's skiing expert, says these
restraints are not as onerous as might be expected. Ski resort operators
used to bulldoze gently graded paths into mountains to enable weaker skiers
to get down safely. But these paths just encouraged weaker skiers to go
faster, causing more accidents.
The only real conflicts occur when an operator wants to smooth out a whole
slope so that a snow-packing machine can be used. An artificially packed
slope will resist melting in the spring, thus lengthening the ski season.
Environmental experts say the grading and removal of rocks reduces the
slope's ability to resist erosion. Thelin says the government cannot prevent
the removal of every rock, but forbids large scale smoothing.
The government originally took a hostile view of snow-making machines. In
principle, it said, these should be used only for problem areas - such as
part of an otherwise well covered course where excessive exposure to the sun
destroyed the snow cover.
But the trends to warmer winters and, in the late 1980s, to inadequate
snowfalls, has made life more difficult for operators, so the government has
had to retreat a little.
'We now accept that a few pistes in a region can have full snow-machine
coverage,' says Thelin. He believes market forces will prevent matters from
getting out of hand. It takes about two weeks of constant production to
fully cover a slope with artificial snow, and this is fairly expensive for
an operator. Thus, he is likely to be reluctant to do it often or at lower
altitudes where the risk of melting is higher.
'Our tourism people think that in the long term some ski resorts will move
to other sports,' Thelin says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-536</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / People: Radcliffe steps down from CBI
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mark Radcliffe is stepping down as deputy director general of the CBI,
though he is continuing his involvement as an adviser on industrial affairs.
At the same time he is taking up two new non-executive positions, the first
of which is the chairmanship of construction company McLaughlin &amp; Harvey.
The other is to be announced shortly.
In November 1991, Radcliffe, 54, was seconded from TI, where he has been a
main board director since 1988, to set up the National Manufacturing Council
which aims to promote the cause of British manufacturing to government,
business and the City. Presentation of the NMC's blueprint 'Making it in
Britain' formed the centrepiece of the CBI national conference in Harrogate.
A year ago there was some speculation that Radcliffe might have been a
candidate to succeed Sir John Banham as director general, and some CBI
watchers have recently expressed surprise that he is stepping back so soon
after the birth of the NMC. But Radcliffe now maintains that the deal with
TI was, from the outset, that the secondment should last just 12 months.
'But it was left open as to how we would go on from there. And now we have
decided on the role of adviser,' he says.
Radcliffe adds that TI had paid his salary, and he had done some advisory
work for the company, but he had relinquished his board seat because of
potential conflicts of interest; there were never any plans for him to
return to TI. He acknowledges that a year is not long in terms of a task as
vast as reviving Britain's manufacturing industry base - 'it is a project
that won't be completed in my life-time'  - but claims to be 'rather
encouraged' by the interest shown by both government and the City.
He is accepting the post at small construction group McLaughlin &amp; Harvey,
where the chairman and chief executive, Charles Denny, retires at 60 at the
end of the year, because he believes it is important to 'spread your
industries'. He is also a non-executive director at Lancer Boss and at
Partnership Sourcing, a CBI/DTI joint venture.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-537</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / People: Telecom Eireann
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Ron Bolger, 44, a managing partner in the Stokes, Kennedy, Crowley
accountancy firm in Dublin, has been appointed as the new chairman of
Telecom Eireann, the Irish state-run telecommunications company.
Bolger will be Telecom's fourth chairman in twelve months. He replaces John
Scanlan, who held the post on a temporary basis after his predecessor
Brendan Hynes was sacked last July. Hynes' 'hands-on' approach to
rationalisation in the company had led to a rupture with the company board.
Hynes' predecessor, Michael Smurfit, who is the chairman of the Jefferson
Smurfit Group, resigned in September 1991 after the then prime minister
Charles Haughey asked him to step aside pending the outcome of a public
enquiry into a controversial property deal which involved Smurfit.
Bolger is a specialist in taxation and corporate finance and was a member of
the board of Greencore, the Irish sugar and foods group, until last
September.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-538</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / People: Great Universal Stores
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Baroness Brigstocke, who presided over St Paul's Girls' School for 15 years
as High Mistress, is joining Great Universal Stores on a part-time basis
where she will be responsible for training and personnel.
The 63-year-old life peer is one of two new associate directors of GUS, one
of Britain's leading mail order firms and high street retailers. Arthur
Hutchinson, 49, director of warehousing and distribution for GUS Home
Shopping, has also been appointed an associate director.
Lady Brigstocke is not becoming a full member of the GUS board, which is
headed by Lord Wolfson, the son of the firm's founder - but she will work
one or two days a week. She has been advising Burberrys and Kay's - two GUS
retailing ventures  - on personnel and training for some time. (See
Observer)
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-539</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / People: Renishaw
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
David McMurtry, chairman and chief executive of Reni-shaw, the metrology
company he built from his invention of touch-trigger probes, is to resume a
more active role in new product development.
McMurtry, who developed probe technology in the early 1970s while developing
the engine for Concorde, will also take responsibility for manufacturing
technology in addition to his enhanced R&amp;D role. Renishaw has been working
on substantially cutting the cost of high precision engineering at its
Gloucestershire manufacturing facilities.
Ben Taylor, currently joint managing director, will become assistant chief
executive. In particular, he will assume responsibility for worldwide sales
and will relieve McMurtry of some of the day-to-day duties of running the
company.
John Deer, the deputy chairman and other founding partner of Renishaw, has
now fully recovered from a heart condition and is to assume greater
responsibility for production.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-540</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Mixed views on BA news
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE announcement by British Airways that it had pulled out of its plan to
take a Dollars 750m stake in USAir was expected and the share price shrugged
off the news. Traders attributed a net rise of 5 to 307p to the seasonal
market, commenting that, at any other time the shares would have fallen.
Smith New Court, which on Monday hardened its cautious stance on BA,
believes the shares are overvalued. The house suggested that termination of
the US deal should have prompted a 20p slide in the stock. Smith said that
in terms of BA's drive to be a global player, the planned link-up with USAir
was more important than last week's deal with Qantas.
However, County NatWest feels that following the recent agreements with
Qantas, TAT and DanAir, the proposed deal with USAir might have imposed a
heavy financial burden on BA, perhaps prompting a rights issue.
Redland strong
Building materials group Redland spearheaded a general burst of
outperformance of the market by some of the leading building issues, with
the stock closing 34, or 8.7 per cent, higher at 424p. The Footsie rose 1.2
per cent. Turnover in the shares reached a higher than usual 4.4m.
Dealers said the stock was up and running from the outset, with a number of
leading brokers adopting the view that it had underperformed for far too
long, reflecting widespread concern about the apparent downturn in the
German economy.
Worries about the security of the final dividend, expected next spring, were
overdone, they said, adding that the group's German business, trading under
the Braas name, had performed better than expected during the past couple of
months.
Holiday wars
The two leading quoted air-tour operators in the UK, Airtours and Owners
Abroad, lost ground after news that Thomson Holidays, market leader of the
package holiday business, had fired the first shots in the 1993 package
holidays war.
But many leisure analysts adopted a relaxed view of the move by Thomson,
pointing out that the Christmas period is traditionally the starting point
for special offers from the holiday companies and that the Christmas period
sees the tour companies issue the second editions of their summer holiday
brochures.
Nevertheless, there was marginal disappointment around the market at the
price war news, given the bullishness of leisure analysts over the recent
deal between Owners Abroad and the German group LTU.
Some analysts remained highly bullish of the sector. 'We still view the
holiday sector as undervalued,' said Mr Bruce Jones at Smith New Court.
Owners declined to 82 1/2 p before closing a net 2 off at 85p, while
Airtours closed the same amount down at 275p, having dipped to 270p.
Confusion over current year profits forecasts from some brokers and heavy
turnover in the market at the outset of trading caused a sharp early retreat
in Ladbroke shares. They later rallied to close a net 5 easier at 184p.
Turnover of 23m was swollen by tax-related bed and breakfast trades
totalling 18.5m shares.
Auctioneer Christies International was bid up 11 to 145p on news that the
commission charged to buyers at a number of its branches is to be raised by
5 per cent to 15 per cent from March 1.
Conglomerate Hanson saw unusually heavy turnover of 15m shares as a two-way
pull on the stock left it only 1 1/2 firmer at 229 1/2 p.
British Aerospace turnover was also particularly heavy, at 9.9m shares, and
the stock was one of the few casualties in a healthy market as profit-takers
moved in. The shares weakened 8 to 169p.
Financial Times owner Pearson relinquished 9 to 390p following a recent good
performance as Prudential announced that it had reduced its stake.
The shift from defensive stocks gathered momentum yesterday as most
pharmaceutical shares showed early weakness. Only Wellcome, however,
remained down on the day, closing 20 off at 978p.
Analysts mentioned speculation in the US of a new drug from a rival company
to be used with Wellcome's anti-Aids product. There was also a
follow-through from weekend criticism by the American Academy of Pediatrics,
which said the drug Zovirax should not be routinely recommended for
treatment of chicken pox in healthy children.
Glaxo Holdings and SmithKline Beecham were off in early trading but
recovered later. Glaxo was held back initially by a profits downgrade from
BZW. Analyst Mr Jonathan de Pass cut his 1993 forecast by Pounds 30m to
Pounds 1.65bn, saying that the company's cash mountain would be hit by
currency shifts and new products were not coming through as fast as
expected. The shares were down 11 at one stage but ended 2 up on the day at
781p.
SmithKline was marginally easier at first. Then, news that the company had
reached agreement for the sale of a portfolio of its men's personal care
products in the US, Puerto Rico and Canada helped sentiment and the shares
closed 11 stronger on balance at 525p.
The heaviest turnover (10m shares) in the banks sector was in HSBC
London-registered stock, which edged up 4 to 472p. Barclays (4.6m) rose 10
to 384p in spite of BZW increasing its forecast of losses for the current
year to around Pounds 110m.
Standard Chartered shares closed 24 stronger at 568p on good turnover of
2.5m after the bank said it had sold almost all of its Hong Kong
headquarters for Pounds 74m. The infusion of funds would give a significant
boost to the bank's tier one and tier two capital ratios, specialists said.
Merchant banks raced ahead, with the recent surge in stock market indices
and activity triggering thoughts among the institutions of a new year rush
of takeover bids and rights issues, all of which are seen as hugely
profitable.
Merchant banks with marketmaking arms perceived as having performed
exceptionally well during the recent burst of buying in London's equity
market were in the forefront. Kleinwort Benson forged ahead 16 to 319p on
unusually good turnover of 500,000 shares, while SG Warburg appreciated 20
to 544p in relatively thin trading.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (266).
OTHER FIXED INTEREST (1) Met. Water 3pc B, AMERICANS (20) BANKS (5) Abbey
Natl., Lloyds, Mitsubishi, NatWest, Sumitomo, BREWERS (2) Bass, Scot. &amp;
Newcastle, BLDG MATERIALS (3) Anglian, Rugby, Wolseley, BUSINESS SERVS (5)
Brit Data, Chubb, Inchcape, Rolfe &amp; Nolan, Serco, CHEMICALS (3) Akzo, Allied
Colloids, Halstead, CONGLOMERATES (2) Hanson 9 1/2 pc Cv., Wassall,
ELECTRICALS (5) Denmans, Jones Stroud, Menvier-Swain, Mitsubishi, Sony,
ELECTRICITY (3) Norweb, Scot Hydro, Scot Power, ELECTRONICS (13) Admiral,
Blick, Cray, Diploma, Eurotherm, GEC, ISA, Linx, Misys, Multitone, Nesco,
Telemetrix, Tunstall, ENG AEROSPACE (1) Westland, ENG GEN (10) Barry
Wehmiller, Bristol Channel, FKI, Halma, Powerscreen, Protean, Rotork, Siebe,
VSEL, Vosper, FOOD MANUF (4) Assoc. Brit. Foods, Barr (AG), RHM, Wessanen,
FOOD RETAILING (6) Argyll, Iceland, Kwik Save, Morrison, Do 5 1/4 pc Pf.,
Sainsbury, HEALTH &amp; HSEHLD (5) AAH, Amersham, Bespak, Mayborn, UniChem,
HOTELS &amp; LEIS (3) Granada, Savoy, Vardon, INSCE COMPOSITE (5) American Intl,
Comm Union, Domestic &amp; Gen., GRE, Sun Alliance, INSCE LIFE (9) Britannic,
Legal &amp; Gen, Lincoln Natl, Prudential, Refuge, Torchmark, Transatlantic, Do
6pc Pf., Utd. Friendly, INV TRUSTS (67) MEDIA (14) Carlton Comms., Central
ITV, Daily Mail, EMAP, Johnston Press, Metal Bulletin, Reed, Reuters, TVS
Ent, Do 7.4pc Pf. '08, Taylor Nelson, Telegraph, Trininty, Utd News,
MERCHANT BANKS (1) Rea Bros., METAL &amp; METAL FORMING (1) Johnson Matthey,
MISC (8) Airsprung Furn, BAT Inds., Birkby, Danka, Faber Prest, LGW, Lincat,
Rothmans, MOTORS (4) Bletchley, Lex Service, T &amp; N, Trinity, OIL &amp; GAS (4)
Burmah, Exxon, Pict, Pittencrieff, OTHER FINCL (9) Caledonia, Invesco MIM,
Do 9pc '95-00, Lon Scottish, Prov. Financial, Rutland, S &amp; U, Tyndall
Australia, Do Options, OTHER INDL MATERIALS (11) BTR, Do Wts., Do Wts.
'92-93, Do Wts. '94-95, Do Wts. '95-96, Charter Cons, Cookson, McKechnie,
Scapa, Staveley, Williams 8p Pf., PCKG PAPER &amp; PRINTING (9) API, Bemrose,
Bowater, Do 7 3/4 pc Pf., Boxmore, Bunzl, Ferguson, Macfarlane, Microgen,
PROP (1) Lon Merchant 7 3/4 pc Cv. '00-05, STORES (13) Asprey, Boots,
Country Casuals, Fine Art, GUS A, Hughes (J), Kleen-E-Ze, Moss Bros., Next,
QS, Smith (WH), Storehouse, Tie Rack, TELEPHONE NETWORKS (4) Cable &amp;
Wireless, Do 7pc Cv. '08, Nth. Telecom, Vodafone, TEXTILES (4) Claremont
Grmts, Leeds, Shani, Toray, TRANSPORT (8) BAA, Cons. Freightways,
Dawsongroup, Forth Ports, Mersey Docks, NFC, Powell Duffryn, Tibbett &amp;
Britten, WATER (1) Northumbrian, PLANTATIONS (1) Golden Hope, MINES (1) RTZ.
NEW LOWS (16).
BLDG MATERIALS (1) Chieftain, CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRCN (1) CRP Leis., ENG GEN
(1) Platon, INV TRUSTS (1) Japanese Wrt. Fd., MEDIA (1) Home Counties, MISC
(2) Erskine House, Spandex, OIL &amp; GAS (1) Edinburgh, PROP (2) Derwent
Valley, High-Point, STORES (2) Oliver, Pentos, TEXTILES (1) Victoria Crpt,
MINES (3) Blyvoor, Deelkraal, Niugini.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-541</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Futures drive shares to new heights
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRE-CHRISTMAS trading on the London stock market reached new heights
yesterday, spurred on by a strong rise in stock index futures which prompted
heavy arbitrage business between the March contract and the underlying FT-SE
stocks. Although the FT-SE Mid 250 Index continued its advance, gaining a
further 1 per cent to 2,845.4, the futures-related activity turned the
spotlight back on to the blue chip leaders. At the close, the FT-SE 100
Index was 34.3, or 1.2 per cent, higher on the day at another new peak of
2,842.
Yesterday's buyers appeared to be a shade more speculative than over the
past week. In addition to the securities houses, busily arbitraging between
futures and equities, buying came from across the range of investors, now
convinced that economic revival is on the way.
Investors, also encouraged by firmness in other European bourses, appeared
afraid of missing the turn in the markets; some analysts now predict a
Footsie level of 3,500 next year.
Equities looked uncertain at first in spite of a heavy load of overnight
tax-related deals. But after the Footsie had dipped 2.3 to 2,805.4, the
futures market opened and a substantial premium on the March Footsie
contract sent the blue chips racing ahead.
Later, the market took a favourable view of a modest rise in exports
disclosed in the UK trade figures for November. Seaq volume of 815.1m shares
compared with 831.4m on Monday when retail, or customer, business was worth
Pounds 1.46bn.
The March contract on the FT-SE Index traded at a premium of around 46
against the underlying stock market throughout the session as securities
houses and traders sought to position themselves for the new year. Business
was extremely heavy, with the March total approaching 9,000 lots in late
dealings. The final reading showed March at a 45 premium to cash, compared
with an estimated 19 fair value premium, the calculation which allows for
dividend flows and financing costs.
Increased business in traded options lifted total contracts to 42,365 from
Monday's 33,811, but turnover in Footsie options dipped to 11,090 lots.
National Power (3,034) headed individual stock contracts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-542</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Late buying by public
funds lifts Nikkei
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE NIKKEI average closed marginally higher on late buying by public funds
ahead of today's national holiday, writes Emiko Terazono in Tokyo.
The 225-issue average gained 45.23 to end at the day's high of 17,690.67 on
late afternoon buying, having fallen to the day's low of 17,563.59 during
the first hour of trading on selling by tokkin, or specified money trusts.
Volume declined to 220m shares from 246m. Most dealers remained on the
sidelines since they end trading for their December accounts on Friday.
Overall declines, however, still led advances by 534 to 409, with 196 issues
unchanged. The Topix index of all first section stocks rose 4.09 to
1,349.86, and in London the ISE/Nikkei 50 index edged up 0.68 to 1,102.55.
The Ministry of Finance announced plans for a new capitalisation weighted
futures index to end criticism of the negative effects of futures and
options trading. The proposed weighted index will take into account the
number of shares outstanding and is planned to replace the Nikkei 225
futures index, which is a simple price average of 225 stocks.
The announcement prompted little reaction from the futures market, but
triggered some buying in stocks which are currently under-represented in the
Nikkei 225. Electric power utilities gained ground along with banks and
telecoms.
Tokyo Electric Power moved ahead Y90 to Y2,680, Mitusbishi Bank Y10 to
Y2,430 and NTT Y10,000 to Y572,000.
Dainippon Ink and Chemicals put on Y5 at Y411 on reports of planned joint
ventures in China. Suzuki Motor, also a China related stock, climbed Y15 to
Y846.
Trading of Jax, the import car dealer listed on the over-the-counter market,
was once again suspended. Volkswagen announced in the morning that it would
acquire a 49.9 per cent stake in Jax to boost its Japanese sales network.
Medical hygiene-related shares gained on the Finance Ministry's draft budget
for fiscal 1993, which earmarked Y134m for prevention measures against a new
virus contracted mainly in hospitals. Sanden, a steriliser maker, firmed Y5
to Y593 and Terumo, a leading manufacturer of disposable medical
instruments, rose Y10 to Y875.
In Osaka, the OSE average slipped 35.20 to 19,082.48 in volume of 37m
shares. The index retreated for the first time in four trading days ahead of
the national holiday.
Roundup
THE region's markets were mixed yesterday.
HONG KONG was lifted by foreign institutional buying and the Hang Seng index
finished 55.26 ahead at 5,297.74 in low turnover of HKDollars 1.77bn.
Among the actives, HSBC Holdings appreciated 50 cents to HKDollars 53, while
Cheung Kong gained 40 cents at HKDollars 17.90 and Jardine Matheson moved
forward 50 cents to HKDollars 41.50. Hong Kong Telecom firmed 20 cents to
HKDollars 9.45.
SINGAPORE retreated on profit-taking in blue chips. The Straits Times
Industrial index receded 22.33 to 1,489.16 in volume of 68.5m shares,
against 112.9m on Monday.
SEOUL reversed early losses as investors concentrated on small and
medium-sized companies. The composite index was finally 3.55 higher on
balance at 657.01 in turnover of some Won460.7bn.
TAIWAN regained some of Monday's fall but sentiment remained nervous
following the ruling Nationalist party's poor performance in parliamentary
elections at the weekend. The weighted index improved 3.88 to 3,579.97 in
low turnover of TDollars 8bn.
AUSTRALIA lost ground after its strong recent performance, the All
Ordinaries index closing 7 down at 1,530.1 in turnover of ADollars 301.7m.
BHP relinquished 8 cents to ADollars 13.08.
BANGKOK was subjected to profit-taking and the SET index shed 7.46 to 863.87
in turnover of Bt6.1bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-543</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow modestly higher after
erratic session
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
US MARKETS ended a see-saw day in positive territory yesterday as investors
managed to achieve a modest pre-Christmas rise, writes Patrick Harverson in
New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 8.64 at 3,321.10, below
the day's best but well above its low for the session. The more broadly
based Standard &amp; Poor's 500 ended 0.39 off at 440.31 and the Nasdaq
composite lost 1.62 at 660.84, but rises outnumbered declines on the New
York SE by 985 to 885 after heavy turnover of 250m shares.
Buyers moved into the market at the start in anticipation of a year-end
rally, lifting the Dow by 16 points in the first 30 minutes. Early sentiment
was also aided by gains in overseas markets, where prices in London,
Frankfurt and Tokyo all finished higher, and from another strong rise in
bond prices.
The market failed to maintain the upward momentum and by early afternoon was
firmly entrenched in negative territory as some investors sold stocks to
realise their 1992 losses for tax purposes. A late program trading-related
rally, however, boosted prices just before the close.
The day's only economic news - a downward revision in the third-quarter
gross domestic product figure from 3.9 per cent to 3.4 per cent - was
largely ignored by investors.
Airlines were active after British Airways pulled out its proposed Dollars
750m investment in USAir because the US government was about to block the
deal. Since the market had already discounted the deal's collapse, USAir
firmed Dollars  3/8 to Dollars 12 1/8 . Delta ended Dollars  1/2 up at
Dollars 51 3/8 , AMR flat at Dollars 63 3/4 and UAL Dollars 1 3/4 higher at
Dollars 123.
Wal-Mart slipped Dollars  5/8 to Dollars 63 1/4 in nervous trading ahead of
a network television programme which was expected to be critical of the
retailer's trading and import policies.
Unisys receded Dollars  5/8 to Dollars 10 1/8 in turnover of 2.9m shares
after Wall Street investment bank Lehman Brothers cut its rating on the
stock from 'buy' to 'outperform'. IBM, Dollars 2 3/4 better at Dollars 51
5/8 , rebounded from recent losses, although it remained near historical
lows.
On the Nasdaq market, Heart Technology climbed Dollars 2 to Dollars 18 1/4
after winning approval from the US Food and Drug Administration to restart
commercial distribution of its Rotablator system used to treat
atherosclerosis in leg arteries.
Homestyle Buffet shed Dollars  1/4 to Dollars 2 5/8 after warning that it
would post a 'substantial' loss in the fourth quarter.
Canada
BLUE CHIP Toronto stocks ended virtually flat with a slightly firmer bias as
earlier gains on Wall Street ebbed and pulled Toronto's heavier weighted
shares and broader index down from initial gains. Gold shares, pinched by
falling bullion prices, led losses on the Toronto SE.
The TSE 300 index was finally 3.1 up at 3,313.5 and rises led declines by
343 to 316 after a large volume of 45.6m shares valued at CDollars 390m.
The heavily weighted gold shares index fell 102 points to 5,123, led by
losses in Placer Dome and Pegasus Gold. The latter shed CDollars  1/2 to
CDollars 18 3/8 , additionally depressed by an analyst's recommendation to
take profits on the stock.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-544</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
GAINS in leading industrial and financial shares lifted the all-share index
by 5 to 3,233. The industrial index rose 11 to 4,303, but gold shares were
weaker on the back of the unexciting bullion price and the index lost 14 to
822.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-545</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Continental bourses continue
their year-end rally
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CONTINENTAL bourses continued their Christmas rally yesterday, writes Our
Markets Staff.
FRANKFURT remained positive as some disappointing economic news was largely
ignored. Remarks by Mr Helmut Schlesinger, the Bundesbank president,
forecasting a fall in long-term interest rates caused bonds and futures to
rally but had little effect on equities, as he reaffirmed that there would
be no change in short-term rates.
The DAX index closed up 7.99 at 1,523.57, but off the day's high of
1,529.83. Turnover was barely changed at DM4bn after DM3.9bn.
Volkswagen declined DM7.10 to DM237.20, partly as investors continued to
sell following recent gloomy forecasts from the company but also because the
German Automobile Association reported stagnating domestic demand and
reduced orders from overseas.
Retailers continued to be firm on a report that Christmas period turnover
could beat expectations. Asko firmed DM20 to DM665, Karstadt was up DM4 to
DM488 and Kaufhof improved DM5 to DM400.
Utilities rose on news that a legal dispute between east German
municipalities and power groups had been settled. RWE gained DM4.30 to
DM399.80 and Viag rose DM7 to DM329.50.
PARIS was lifted by a strong bond market and signs that pressure on the
franc was easing, but some dealers feared that the stock market had risen
too far, too fast. The CAC-40 index ended 38.08 higher at 1,824.37 in heavy
turnover of FFr3.6bn.
Most blue chips participated in the rally, with Alcatel rising FFr12 to
FFr679 and BSN up FFr24 to FFr938. Drinks stocks also found favour, as LVMH
put on FFr145 or 4.2 per cent to FFr3,600 and Pernod-Ricard added FFr16.50
or 4.8 per cent to FFr360.
Hopes of lower interest rates again buoyed up financial stocks, as Suez
gained FFr9.80 to FFr254.80 and Societe Generale added FFr16 to FFr597.
MILAN was lifted right at the end of a dull session by news that the Bank of
Italy had lowered its official discount rate by one point to 12 per cent.
The Comit index ended 0.09 higher at 428.96 in turnover estimated at close
to Monday's L134.5bn.
Insurers and telecoms featured for a second day as Ras added L1,030 to
L19,530 and Generali rose L160 to L27,610.
Stet and Sip were traded heavily on continued hopes that the government was
willing to sell a controlling stake in Stet. Stet was fixed L19 down at
L1,760 but jumped to L1,842 after hours. Sip rose L101 to L1,486.
Credito Italiano gained L38 to L2,850. The prime minister, Mr Giuliano
Amato, said yesterday that the state-owned Banca Commerciale Italiana (up
L175 at L4,600) would be put up for sale once the government had dealt with
the sale of Credito Italiano.
BRUSSELS built on Monday's gains with a 14.32 rise in the Bel-20 index to
1,141.56. Bekaert, which said after Monday's close that it was to pay a
BFr100 1992 dividend rose BFr550 to BFr13,525.
AMSTERDAM rose in thin trading with the CBS Tendency index gaining 1.2 to
105.6. Ahold advanced Fl 1.60 to Fl 88.60 on news that it was to help set up
the first food distribution system in Moscow.
STOCKHOLM turned lower as profit-taking emerged after a three-day rally and
the Affarsvarlden general index eased 6.8 to 914.6. Astra again dominated
trading, accounting for roughly SKr190m of total turnover of SKr910m. Its A
shares fell SKr2 to SKr748.
HELSINKI rallied as the approaching year-end pushed up share prices and
volumes. News that parliament had passed legislation dismantling
restrictions on foreign ownership of shares from the start of 1993 also
lifted sentiment. The Hex index rose 13.9 to 823.9.
VIENNA's ATX index gained 16.53 or 2.3 per cent to 739.43.
ISTANBUL closed at a three-month high, as cement and textile stocks
featured. The 75-share index gained 44.84 or 1.1 per cent to 4,075.60 in
turnover estimated at TL370bn.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                       FT-SE Actuaries Share Indices
December 22                                         THE EUROPEAN SERIES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes              Open      10.30      11.00      12.00
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100        1068.86   1068.85    1068.78    1069.19
FT-SE Eurotrack 200        1154.63   1153.02    1151.67    1154.00
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                Dec 21     Dec 18     Dec 17
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100            1059.21    1050.25    1034.41
FT-SE Eurotrack 200            1145.44    1136.56    1119.02
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes              13.00     14.00      15.00      Close
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100        1071.20   1072.30    1073.44    1072.92
FT-SE Eurotrack 200        1156.12   1155.77    1157.18    1157.60
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                            Dec 16         Dec 15
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100        1036.62        1038.14
FT-SE Eurotrack 200        1117.67        1115.23
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value  1000 (26/10/90)  High/day: 100 -  1074.73 ; 200 -  1157.97
Low/day: 100 -  1068.38  200 -  1151.67
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-546</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: Colombian equities look ahead to a
better year - The stock market has been held back in 1992 by economic and
political difficulties
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARITA KENDALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
For Colombia, 1992 has been a very difficult year as severe power rationing,
low coffee prices and guerrilla attacks on the oil and mining industries
took their toll on the economy.
This has been reflected in the stock market, which has risen more modestly
this year. According to the IFC, part of the World Bank, Colombia rose by 32
per cent in dollar terms from the start of 1992 to the end of November, well
below the surge of 173.5 per cent achieved in 1991.
A fall in interest rates in the first half of this year led many investors
to transfer some of their holdings out of fixed-interest instruments and
into equities. But a sudden increase in interest rates in August and
September reversed this trend.
Nevertheless, the outlook for the stock market is improving: government and
independent sources have forecast an economic growth rate for 1993 of more
than 4 per cent, compared with government estimates of above 2 per cent for
1992. Businessmen and brokers endorse the government's economic optimism.
Imports have begun to rise, and will probably continue to do so as
industrialists take advantage of lower tariffs, while a higher devaluation
rate will boost exports. Colombia has an annual devaluation rate of about 16
per cent and inflation is running at 24 per cent.
Foreign funds - 20 have now been approved  - were particularly active during
the first half, but mounting political and economic problems dampened
foreign interest in recent months. The escape from jail of the drug
trafficker Pablo Escobar and a surge in guerrilla violence (with the economy
as the main target) have undermined the government's prestige.
'These problems have an impact on the foreign investor. The country risk is
more important than the company risk,' says Mr Paul Weiss of the
stockbroking firm Corredores Asociados. 'But next year the 12 per cent
profit remittance tax will fall to zero and this will encourage foreign
investors.'
The high incidence of kidnappings and extortion also affects the willingness
of local companies to expose themselves: once a company is listed on the
market, guerrillas and criminals can find out how much the business and its
owners are worth.
Nevertheless, several new companies have issued shares this year, including
Fibratolima, a textile manufacturing firm, and Colsanitas, a hospital. Fewer
than 180 companies are listed in the stock market and only about a tenth of
them are actively traded. Some are only there for tax purposes, says Mr
Weiss, not for trading, and he expects a reshuffle next year as such
companies drop out and new ones come in, offering real alternatives for the
investor.
The government's privatisation programme is moving more slowly than
expected, although the industrial development institute is selling off its
holdings in a number of small companies. It is not clear whether the
government has enough support to brave the trade unions and privatise the
bigger companies that should attract foreign investors.
The stock exchange authorities are enthusiastic about new plans and
regulations, which will create confidence in the market and encourage
expansion. Pension funds will probably start operating next year and
different forms of risk coverage are being studied. Controls on the origin
of money are also being applied more rigidly by banks and financial
institutions to prevent money-laundering. Small investors are showing more
interest in shares now that mutual funds are beginning to operate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-547</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Schlesinger remarks lift dollar
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOLLAR rose by more than 1 1/2 pfennigs against the D-Mark yesterday
after comments from the Bundesbank president suggested that an easing in
German monetary policy might come sooner than expected, writes James Blitz.
In a newspaper interview, Mr Helmut Schlesinger said it was possible for
long-term interest rates to decline to below 6 per cent, and that inflation
might be down to 3 per cent by next year.
Dealers interpreted these comments as a totally unexpected piece of
Christmas cheer from the otherwise rather conservative Mr Schlesinger. The
dollar rose on the back of the news to finish at DM1.5865, after a previous
close of DM1.5680. The gain was moderately extended in New York with a
closing DM1.5885.
In very thin trading the French franc made progress against the German
currency for the first time in a week, momentarily rising above FFr3.41 to
the D-Mark, before settling back to a close of FFr3.4110, more than 1/2
centime up on the day.
Although the D-Mark was weaker against most currencies, a significant loser
in yesterday's events was sterling. The pound lost some 2 1/2 cents against
the dollar, ending at Dollars 1.5390. In New York it eased further to
Dollars 1.5365.
Dealers said that although Mr Schlesinger's comments had triggered thoughts
of a possible cut in German interest rates, they were hedging themselves by
selling sterling for dollars rather than the D-Mark. However, the UK
currency was weak enough to lose against the D-Mark as well, falling 1
pfennig to close at DM2.4425.
Several analysts confessed that it was hard to see any new information
contained in Mr Schlesinger's interview. Nobody in the markets doubts that
interest rates will come down next year. And, although German inflation may
rise a few more points, the forecast of 3 per cent inflation by the end of
next year is not unusual, bearing in mind the German recession.
However, Mr Steve Hannah, head of research at IBJ International in London,
said the D-Mark's weakness was due to a creeping feeling in the market that
governments can cut interest rates with impunity, without following what the
Bundesbank is doing.
Italy, for example, yesterday lowered its discount rate by 1 percentage
point to 12 per cent, but the lira actually improved against the D-Mark,
finishing at L896.4
In recent days, the Canadian authorities have cut their key interest rates
by 150 basis points, but the Canadian dollar has rallied and the Canadian
central bank has had to sell its currency in markets.
Enthusiasts for lower interest rates in Germany were also cheered yesterday
by news of a full 1 percentage-point fall in Germany's M3 money growth in
November. Economists said the dip reflected the unwinding of September's
currency intervention by the Bundesbank.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-548</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Money Markets: Boost for futures
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FRENCH AND German money markets rallied strongly yesterday after the
Bundesbank president was reported as saying that long-term interest rates in
Germany could decline to below 6 per cent during the current phase of
falling rates, writes James Blitz.
The reaction to Mr Helmut Schlesinger's comments in a newspaper interview
was far more muted in the sterling market, because of the pound's
disconnection from the European exchange rate mechanism.
However, at least one commercial bank dealer said the French and German
markets' reaction to Mr Schlesinger's comments yesterday was significant,
and that there were growing hopes of a reduction in official German rates at
the first Bundesbank council meeting of the new year.
'It is the first time anyone can remember Mr Schlesinger saying something
bullish about interest rate cuts,' he added.
In an interview with the Westdeutsche Allgemeine Zeitung yesterday, the
Bundesbank president said he was confident that Germany's inflation rate
could near 3 per cent in 1993 from an average of around 4 per cent in 1992.
But it was unclear from the interview which long-term interest rates Mr
Schlesinger felt could be reduced.
However, the comments triggered 'a rash of bullish feeling' in French and
German markets, according to one dealer. Euromark futures rallied sharply,
with the March contract rising 12 basis points to a close at 92.19. German
cash rates were generally easier, with three-month money in the Euromark
trading at around 8.87 per cent offered, down from around 9.25 per cent as
recently as last Thursday.
French futures rose sharply on Germany's coat-tails, with the March contract
gaining 15 basis points to close at 90.64 and the June contract adding 9
basis points to end at 91.77. The cash market, centre-stage in the battle of
the French franc, was more resistant to change: three-month money was as
high as 12 1/4 per cent yesterday.
The sterling markets were quieter. The Bank of England forecast a large
shortage of Pounds 1.95bn at the start of the day, but trading was difficult
and there was late assistance of Pounds 475m. Cash rates were generally
unchanged, with three-month money closing again at 7 3/16 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-549</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Peruvians feast on guinea-pig
and chips - One thoroughbred specimen can now serve four hungry people
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SALLY BOWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A QUARTER guinea-pig and chips is an increasingly common menu item in the
small towns of the high Peruvian Andes. Nothing remarkable in the protein
source - local inhabitants have been eating guinea-pig for thousands of
years. A whole animal has traditionally been the portion, as the creatures
tend to be small.
Now a well-researched programme of genetic improvement plus an imaginative
initiative by international aid agency Care are starting to bear fruit - and
provide much-needed animal protein in the Andean diet.
'Guinea-pig meat is excellent food value,' says Mr Jose Sarria, head of the
research programme at Lima's national agrarian university of La Molina.
'It's higher in protein and lower in fat than beef, pork, lamb or chicken.'
The Andean farmers and their families, who are primarily responsible for the
millions of guinea-pigs that Peruvians consume each year, know it's
delicious.
Even though the guinea-pig, or 'cuy' as it is most commonly known in Peru,
is first cousin to the rat it has a different number of chromosomes. Mating
between the species is impossible, experts assure the squeamish.
Cuyes are traditionally to be found scurrying about the dirt floors of
Andean kitchens, eating whatever scraps of food and vegetable peelings come
their way. Always handy, they get plucked and thrown into the pot whenever
there is reason for a party - Andean weddings, local saints' days and visits
from relatives are never celebrated without cuy.
But this type of small animal management, or mismanagement, has caused
genetic deterioration in a species native to the Andes. When animals of all
ages and sizes and both sexes run free, in-breeding swiftly becomes a
problem, which the exceptionally short biological cycle of the cuy
exacerbates. Females can come on heat as early as 25 days old, but they will
produce small and often weak litters that their own underdeveloped bodies
are incapable of feeding adequately.
Standard Andean grasses, maize stalks or potato peelings, while convenient,
do not produce what the locals term 'the giant cuy'. Mr Sarria says the
improved guinea-pig needs a diet of 18 per cent protein. Even alfalfa
provides only a small percentage of that.
Finally, traditional management means that a process of inverse selection
occurs. For celebrations since the times of the Incas, the best animals have
found their way to the table, while the punier are left to continue the
race.
In the mountains of the Callejon de Huaylas, known as 'Peru's Switzerland'
for its eternally snow-covered, 22,000 ft peaks, Care has been sponsoring a
cuy breeding programme in conjunction with the regional government since
1989. It is estimated that 45 per cent of local children in the beautiful
but poor valley are chronically under-nourished.
So far nine local communities are proud owners of a model breeding shed
where 400 animals mate, are properly fed, weighed and watched over. Another
70 communities benefit from technical advice at an individual family level.
Most of the community projects are run by the 'mothers' clubs' of village
women. In the small town of Tingua, a countrywoman shows off her animals.
'See, this one we'll keep for breeding. She has short hair and dark, bright
eyes. This one here does not look so good - it will be sold for the pot.'
The animals are kept in separate concrete-built 'pens' holding about ten,
where they can be better monitored, selected for breeding and quickly
isolated if they fall sick. A prize specimen tips the scales at 1.75 kg, the
weight of a good-sized chicken.
In Cruz de Mayo, another Andean village, high above Caraz, lloking after the
community's rotating stock of 400 cuyes is a new job for a villager who
admits that he is now 'useless for hard labour in the fields'.
He is proud to pass on his new-found expertise, showing how young animals
are sexed and separated at one month old. Ten females are put to one male,
'but not until they are 90 days old', he explains. 'That way they make
better, fitter babies.'
Eighty villagers share management of the Cruz de Mayo 'cuy-house'. There is
a rota for cleaning out the pens, for cutting and transporting the alfalfa
or maize stalks. A separate room contains a small stock of veterinary
products for treatment of occasional skin diseases or parasites.
'A little bit of technical help makes a huge difference,' says Tulio
Triveno, Care's local director as he distributes simple illustrated leaflets
explaining the basics of cuy care. 'But the cuy is a hardy beast, much more
resistant to the tough climate, the altitude and infections than the
rabbit.'
There's still a long way to go. Ninety-nine per cent of Peru's estimated 22m
guinea-pigs are still reared in the bad old ways. Mr Sarria's goal is to
raise production to a minimum of eight healthy young per female per year.
And it is just possible that this traditional Andean staple could become a
delicacy for jaded palates abroad. The cuy is already kept for food in
several North African countries and the Agrarian University has recently
dispatched samples of the 'improved' animal to Cuba and parts of the US that
have large colonies of Peruvian exiles.
'We think that the guinea-pig, kept in most developed countries for
laboratory experiments, is a real food option in many countries of the
world,' says Mr Sarria.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-550</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Diamond gloom lifts as Angolan
smuggling eases
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE THREAT of civil war in Angola and growing consumer confidence in the US
is lifting some of the gloom from the diamond market.
The flood of smuggled rough (uncut) diamonds from Angola, which was severely
destabilising the market, has slowed to a trickle. Also official production
by Angola's state-owned Endiama group has come to a halt following renewed
tension and fighting between government forces and the Unita movement.
At one time an estimated 50,000 private enterprise diggers were picking up
diamonds from dried-up river beds in Angola. The stones were smuggled out
mainly to Antwerp where De Beers, which controls 80 per cent of world-wide
rough diamond sales, attempted to keep the market stable by buying them for
its stockpile.
At the height of the rush De Beers' buyer in Antwerp mopped up nearly
Dollars 40m-worth in one week and the group estimates about Dollars 500m of
stones were smuggled out of Angola this year, representing a sudden 10 per
cent addition to world supply.
However, most of the unofficial diggers disappeared when political tension
in Angola was renewed after elections in September and the Unita forces
withdrew to their stronghold in the southern provinces, including the Lunda
Norte diamond district.
After fighting broke out last month, sub-contractors who mine on Endiama's
behalf withdrew all their personnel. Last year Angola's official diamond
production was in the region of 1m carats, worth about Dollars 100m.
Coming at a time when demand was weakening in the biggest diamond markets -
the US and Japan - because of recession, the Angolan smuggling has been
putting a severe strain on De Beers' financial resources and its ability to
stop a precipitous fall in rough diamond prices.
De Beers has told the producers whose stones it markets that it can take
only 75 per cent of the agreed quota and has also severely restricted the
diamonds releases to the market via merchants at its monthly 'sights'.
Some traders suggest that, consequently, rough diamond prices are getting
firmer and there are even some shortages of particular types of polished
stones. 'Rough (diamond) buyers say the market is now in balance rather than
a buyer's market as it was a few weeks ago,' said Mr Mark Cockle, editor of
the Diamond International magazine.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-551</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Banana growers breathe more
easily after EC deal - Canute James reports on Caribbean reactions to last
week's compromise agreement
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CANUTE JAMES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CARIBBEAN BANANA producers are breathing much more easily in the wake of
last week's compromise agreement by the European Community's farm ministers
on a regime for marketing the fruit in Europe. The region's political and
farm leaders have said, however, that the market for Caribbean produce in
Europe is still threatened unless production costs can be reduced and
quality improved.
The Caribbean industry has concluded that its two main concerns of access
and price have been met by the formula agreed by the farm ministers, and
that the region's fruit will still be competitive against the cheaper,
so-called 'dollar area' fruit from Latin America.
Caribbean and African producers had feared that they would lose their market
share to the more competitive fruit when a single European market was
created next month. The four Windward Islands, which produce two out of
every three bananas consumed in Britain, said they were satisfied with the
new EC import regime, which is based on tariff quotas for Latin American
fruit.
In lobbying for guaranteed access to the European market the Caribbean and
African producers had argued that the community had a legal obligation to
protect their market, based on a protocol in the Lome Convention, an aid and
trade treaty, under which the EC promises not to place its banana producers
'in a less favourable situation than in the past or the present'.
The Caribbean producers feel that, with the dollar area fruit attracting
duty of Ecu100 (Pounds 80) a tonne on its 2m tonnes - a - year quota, the
region has a virtually guaranteed access for the remaining 1.5m tonnes a
year that the EC will need, as the Ecu850-a-tonne duty that Latin American
bananas will attract if they breach the quota will make the fruit too
expensive.
Mr James Mitchell, prime minister of St Vincent, said that with the new EC
regime coming into effect in July, the Caribbean will have to improve the
quality of its fruit. One repeated criticism of Caribbean fruit has been
that its quality has been consistently lower than that of the Latin American
fruit. 'The price which we can get will be better for good quality,' said Mr
Mitchell.
Dame Eugenia Charles, the prime minister of Dominica, feels that there is
still a possibility that, even with the tariff, Latin fruit could be cheaper
in Europe, bringing down prices paid for imports from the African, Caribbean
and Pacific (ACP) group of countries.
The Jamaican government appears to have more reservations than others about
the new arrangement, and plans consultation with its partners in the region,
although they have already said they are satisfied. Mr David Coore,
Jamaica's foreign trade minister, said there will be consultation with the
Windward Islands' governments, and with banana distributors in the UK 'to
determine whether this arrangement goes far enough and what further action,
if any, we may need to take to protect our vital interests in this matter'.
Jamaican farm leaders, however, appear more optimistic than the government.
'We were hoping to have a quota and assured entry, but with what has been
allocated the Caribbean and other ACP producers, we will be able to
survive,' concluded Mr Bobby Pottinger, president of the Banana Growers
Association of Jamaica.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-552</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: EC asked to revoke agreement on
banana sales
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN JOSE, COSTA RICA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The presidents of eight Latin American banana-producing nations have asked
the EC to revoke an agreement restricting their banana sales to community
countries from next year, reports Reuter from San Jose, Costa Rica.
'We urge the European Community to revoke the decision taken, in order to
renew dialogue and negotiate with our countries the new conditions of access
for Latin American bananas in accordance with the norms and commitments of
the Uruguay round and Gatt,' the presidents said in a joint statement handed
to the British Embassy in San Jose.
Latin American nations expect to export some 2.7m tonnes of bananas to EC
countries in 1992.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-553</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Minor Metals Prices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Prices from Metal Bulletin (last week's in brackets).
*****
ANTIMONY: European free market 99.6 per cent, Dollars per tonne, in
warehouse, 1,670-1,710 (1,635-1,700).
*****
BISMUTH: European free market, min. 99.99 per cent, Dollars per lb, tonne
lots in warehouse, 2.20-2.40 (2.25-2.45).
*****
CADMIUM: European free market, min. 99.5 per cent, Dollars per lb, in
warehouse, 0.45-0.55 (same).
*****
COBALT: European free market, 99.5 per cent, Dollars per lb, in warehouse,
15.50-16.00 (15.50-16.20).
*****
MERCURY: European free market, min. 99.99 per cent, Dollars per 76 lb flask,
in warehouse, 120-140 (same).
*****
MOLYBDENUM: European free market, drummed molybdic oxide, Dollars per lb Mo,
in warehouse, 1.85-1.95 (same).
*****
SELENIUM: European free market, min 99.5 per cent, Dollars per lb, in
warehouse, 4.80-5.50.
*****
TUNGSTEN ORE: European free market, standard min. 65 per cent, Dollars per
tonne unit (10 kg) WO, cif, 40-50 (same).
*****
VANADIUM: European free market, min. 98 per cent, Dollars a lb VO, cif,
1.75-1.85 (same).
*****
URANIUM: Nuexco exchange value, Dollars per lb, UO, 7.90 (same).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-554</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: London copper prices rise
sharply on technical factors
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING, Mining Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COPPER PRICES rose sharply yesterday as technical influences gripped markets
where trading was thin because of the approaching holiday.
Traders said there was some Chinese buying and news that Polish copper
miners might join a general strike, but these had little influence - neither
did renewed unrest in Zaire, once a big copper producer.
The upward surge was mainly caused by options-related activity, currency
movements and by chart-watching buyers, they suggested.
Copper for delivery in three months reached Dollars 2,277 a tonne (Dollars
1.03 a lb) at one stage on the London Metal Exchange yesterday and it was
still Dollars 2,274 in after-hours business, up Dollars 17 a tonne from
Monday.
In sterling terms, the price was also helped by the pound's weakness against
the dollar. Three-month copper closed at Pounds 1,489.25 a tonne, up Pounds
35.75.
Mr Ted Arnold, analyst at the Merrill Lynch financial services group,
pointed to the profound effect commodity funds, managing about Dollars 26bn,
were having on traded metals markets.
'These funds tend to work primarily on technical analysis,' he said.
 ---------------------------------------
LME WAREHOUSE STOCKS
(As at Monday's close)
tonnes
 ---------------------------------------
Aluminium        +6,750  to  1,526,650
Copper           +5,075  to  342,400
Lead             -250    to  212,550
Nickel           +720    to  67,914
Zinc             +7,400  to  457,525
Tin              +675    to  15,385
 ---------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-555</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: CIS aluminium costs 'are half
world average'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALUMINIUM SMELTERS in the Commonwealth of Independent States have
exceptionally low operating costs, according to estimates by the Anthony
Bird Associates consultancy group.
In mid-1992 these costs were about 25 US cents a lb on average - well below
the 53.6 cents average at smelters in the rest of the world, it suggests.
CIS smelters are 'technically inefficient and are only made economic by
astonishingly low input prices (for essentials such as labour and energy),'
it says in a new study of industry costs.
'This edge will disappear if the CIS continues to move towards a market type
of economy,' the study suggests. But 'by the year 2000 only one or two of
the CIS smelters will still be competitive by western standards. The rest of
them won't necessarily close down, they might be kept in business to supply
local demand, on a protected basis. But cost pressures will put an end to
the flood of metal flowing from east to west'.
Aluminium Production Costs: 1992. Pounds 4,500 from Bird Associates, 193
Richmond Road, Kingston upon Thames, Surrey KT2 5DD, UK.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-556</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World Commodities Prices: Cotton and Jute
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
COTTON
Spot and shipment sales in Liverpool for the week ended 18 December amounted
to 200 tonnes against 228 tonnes in the previous week. Subdued offtake did
not bring many operations. Support was forthcoming in certain specialist
styles notably in the Central Asian and Mali range.
JUTE
Jan/Feb: C and F Dundee- BTC USD 360, BWC USD 380, BTD USD 325, BWD USD 340.
C and F Antwerp- BTC USD 340, BWC USD 340, BTD USD315, BWD USD 315.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-557</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World Commodities Prices: Market Report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
London's robusta COFFEE futures closed near a fresh 20-month high as the
strong upward trend showed no signs of abating. Dealers said the market's
advance continued to be fuelled by the strength of New York where key
resistance levels were being regularly breached. However, New York arabica
futures were only moderately firmer by midday as profit taking emerged
following the sharp gains of the past two days. GOLD reversed small early
gains to hover near support around Dollars 332 a troy ounce with the market
nervous of a a possible repeat of Monday's Dollars 4 sell-off. Dealers said
trade was thin. 'Under normal circumstances the volume traded would not have
moved the market so much,' said one trader. SILVER was in retreat in London
after selling at the Comex opening. One dealer said some long-term operators
had returned to the market to buy at 370, but others said recent rallies in
world equity markets could indicate industrial recovery, lifting the silver
price.
Compiled from Reuters
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-558</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Capital Markets: Japan plans new futures index
to curb criticism
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN'S Ministry of Finance yesterday announced plans for a new stock
futures index, in an effort to avert criticism over futures and options
trading, in which foreign brokers are particularly active.
Local criticism, that stock futures and options trading creates volatility
in the underlying stock markets, prompted the ministry's move to review the
Nikkei average of 225 leading stocks, which is a simple average of 225
stocks and does not take into consideration the number of shares
outstanding.
The ministry is now proposing a capitalisation weighted index, which takes
into account the number of shares outstanding, to replace the Nikkei 225
futures index, which is seen as easily manipulated. The ministry is also
considering rule changes and introduction of a 'circuit-breaker' system.
Debate on the impact of derivatives trading has flushed out frictions
between large and small brokers, Japanese and foreign houses, some of which
have made large profits from derivatives, and between the Tokyo and Osaka
stock exchanges - Osaka has a thriving futures market and Tokyo does not.
Argument has focused on the composition and volatility of the Nikkei 225
index, which measures cash prices in Tokyo and is used as the basis for
derivatives trading in Osaka and overseas exchanges, which list the Nikkei
225 futures.
Some traders have tried to use the announcement as a marketing slogan,
promoting shares which are under-represented by weight on the Nikkei 225
index. Ministry officials said stocks on the new index had not been decided.
The introduction of the new index is likely to create friction between the
Japanese and overseas exchanges, such as Singapore International Monetary
Exchange, and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, for which the Nikkei 225
futures index is a lucrative product. Simex said futures trading of the
Nikkei 225 futures index rose 395 per cent during the January to November
period. However, Japanese officials said they would need to request overseas
exchanges to switch to the new index.
Since the market crashed in 1990, Japanese have blamed foreign brokers, the
most adept in dealing in derivatives markets.
Smaller Japanese houses, which lack the expertise or the capital to trade in
derivatives, have indicated resentment towards the larger houses.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-559</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Government Bonds: Schlesinger hint on German rate reduction
sparks rally
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS and PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRICES in most of Europe's government bond markets jumped sharply yesterday
as Mr Helmut Schlesinger, Bundesbank president, appeared to hold out the
hope of substantial further reductions in German long-term interest rates.
The thinness of the pre-holiday markets accentuated the movements, which
were widely seen as an over-reaction.
Mr Schlesinger's reported comments that long-term yields in Germany could
fall to below 6 per cent in the current interest rate cycle helped to push
prices on 10-year bunds up by as much as two-thirds of a point. Yields have
fallen by 15 basis points, to 7.25 per cent, over the past week.
However, it was difficult to find widespread belief in sub-6 per cent
yields.
Ms Alison Cottrell, of Midland Montagu, pointed out that German yields had
fallen to that level only briefly in the mid-1980s, when commodity markets
were depressed and German inflation stood at about 2 per cent.
OTHER European markets prefered to look on the bright side of Mr
Schlesinger's comments, creating a favourable background for a discount rate
cut in Italy and talk of a possible rate cut in France.
Italy's 1 percentage point rate cut, to 12 per cent, was timed to coincide
with the passing of next year's budget through parliament. The BTP futures
contract on Liffe advanced from 93.45 on Monday to 94.67.
THE UK government bond market joined in the general rally, with longer-dated
gilts making up about one-third of a point. Prices were held back partly by
two tranches of tap stock overhanging the market, both of which were brought
into operation late in the afternoon. An earlier tap stock, of 8 per cent
gilts due 2002-06, was exhausted during the day.
These gains were outstripped by index-linked gilts, which jumped by over a
point thanks to foreign buying and the fact that the tap stock has not
placed a ceiling on the market.
US Treasury prices continued to post solid gains at both ends of the
maturity spectrum yesterday.
The benchmark 30-year government bond closed up at 103 15/32 , yielding
7.331 per cent. The short end of the market was firmer in the wake of a
successful note auction, with the two-year issue up  5/32 at 100 5/32 ,
yielding 4.521 per cent.
Yesterday's downward revision in third-quarter gross domestic product
figures was good news on the inflation front.
The widely-watched third-quarter implicit price deflator showed the smallest
rise since 1967.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-560</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Equities: Equity growth held in check by
Europe and US - Some international investors were discouraged by the
currency turmoil in 1992
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DIFFICULT stock market conditions in Europe and the US held the growth in
international equity offerings in check this year. The total volume of
international equity issues increased only 7 per cent to Dollars 21.72bn in
1992, against Dollars 20.28bn the previous year, according to figures
compiled by Euromoney.
The US and Europe still account for the lion's share of international equity
business, and 1992 saw two large offerings - from Wellcome of the UK and
General Motors.
Wellcome's Pounds 2.1bn global share offering in July was the biggest
non-privatisation issue in the world. Wellcome Trust, the medical charity,
sold 288m shares in Wellcome, the pharmaceuticals group, raising Pounds
2.1bn and cutting its stake in the company from 73.5 per cent to 40 per
cent.
The deal, which was lead-managed by Robert Fleming, was achieved using the
book-building method more commonly employed in the US than in Europe. Robert
Fleming won considerable praise for successfully arranging such a large deal
at a time when world stock market conditions were difficult.
The second big issue of the year was General Motors' Dollars 2.14bn share
offering, the largest by a US company. The deal was oversubscribed and the
size of the offering increased due to strong demand.
International equity issues from North America increased to Dollars 7.34bn
from Dollars 6.04bn in 1991, with a total of 188 issues, according to
figures supplied by Euromoney.
However, while equity offerings from the US and Canada rose, those in
western Europe declined in volume, to Dollars 6.51bn from Dollars 7.07bn, as
turmoil in the foreign exchange markets unsettled the European stock markets
and discouraged some international investors.
The currency turmoil had two effects. First, investment bankers point out
that it probably deterred international investors from buying European
equities because of the greater foreign exchange risk, especially with the
pound and lira floating outside the ERM.
Secondly, several governments which had planned to push ahead with
privatisations in an effort to reduce large budget deficits found that the
stock market conditions were unsuitable. 'A lot of finance ministers found
they were tied up with Maastricht instead of thinking of ways of raising
money,' says one UK investment banker.
At the start of 1992, investment bankers had set their sights on seeing some
big privatisation issues from Italy, France, Sweden and Finland. Only a few
of those deals went ahead. Italy, which generated only Dollars 755m in
international equity offerings this year, is expected to push ahead with the
privatisation of its state-owned banks.
Sweden's centre-right government had hoped to raise about SKr18bn from
selling a further stake in Procordia, the state-controlled food and
pharmaceutical group. The sale was due to take place in the autumn, but was
postponed because of currency worries and the unfavourable stock market
conditions.
The bulk of the European equity offerings came from the UK (where volume
dropped to Dollars 2.95bn from Dollars 3.35bn) and France, where volume rose
to Dollars 1.61bn from Dollars 1.27bn.
In June, the French government raised FFr9.5bn from its sale of shares in
the Total oil group, the biggest offering in France's partial privatisation
programme.
Given the pressures to raise money from the sale of state assets, investment
bankers are confident that the privatisations which were shelved or delayed
this year (Procordia of Sweden, Rhone-Poulenc of France, Repsol of Spain)
will be dusted down and re-scheduled for 1993.
Among the emerging markets, Mexican issues dominated those from Latin
America, but the steady flow floundered in the summer as the Mexican stock
market tumbled and international investors found they had had their fill of
Mexican paper, especially when they started to see share prices fall. Some
investors, who had participated in a Dollars 600m equity offering by Cemex,
the Mexican cement company, were annoyed when the money was used only a few
months later to invest in Spain rather than in the domestic market.
Mexican companies raised a total of Dollars 3.02bn against Dollars 3.53bn in
1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-561</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Capital Markets: S&amp;P places Citicorp paper
under review
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STANDARD &amp; Poor's, the US rating agency, yesterday placed some of Citicorp's
mortgage-backed securities under review for a possible downgrade because
losses on the pool of loans secured by the securities have been worse than
expected.
Although about Dollars 1.3bn of Citicorp certificates are affected by the
move, the banking group said yesterday that S&amp;P's decision to consider
downgrading the securities reflected the performance of mortgages originated
under old Citicorp mortgage programmes that were discontinued in 1991.
Since then, the bank claims, the performance of its mortgage portfolio has
improved. Earlier this year, Citicorp announced a Dollars 1bn non-recourse
commitment with the Federal National Mortgage Association (Fannie Mae),
which was seen as a vote of confidence by Fannie Mae in Citicorp's mortgage
business.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-562</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: K mart plans 100 stores for
Mexico
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MEXICO CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
K MART, the big US retail group, plans to open some 100 discount stores in
Mexico, through a joint venture with Grupo Liverpool, a Mexican department
store chain.
The two companies intend to invest Dollars 250m each in the discount stores,
which will be similar to K mart's stores in the US, selling food and general
goods. The project will start with two or three pilot stores in Mexico City
next year. The 100 stores will employ about 35,000 people.
K mart is following the steps of both Walmart and Price Club, the US store
groups which last year opened membership-only discount stores in joint
ventures with Mexican retail companies, Cifra and Comercial Mexicana. The
stores have proved successful, with 45-minute queues regularly forming
outside their car parks.
Grupo Liverpool owns 17 department stores in Mexico, and has annual sales of
over Dollars 1bn. The company was keen to point out that the discount stores
would not compete or overlap with its existing stores, which target the
upper and upper-middle levels of the market. Liverpool hopes K mart's huge
buying power will enable it to obtain lower wholesale prices than Mexican
rivals.
K mart said it was attracted to Mexico by the rapid development of a market
of 80m people, and political stability.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-563</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: BTR Nylex disposes of adhesives
subsidiary
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BTR Nylex, an Australian subsidiary of BTR of the UK, yesterday said it had
sold ACI Hong Kong, its adhesives business in the colony, to National Starch
and Chemical for about ADollars 17m (USDollars 11.8m)
Mr Alan Jackson, chairman of both BTR and BTR Nylex, said the sale was in
line with the group's strategy of disposing of peripheral businesses. 'ACI
no longer fitted because BTR is moving (to) high-tech industries,' he said.
National Starch is a subsidiary of Unilever, the US chemicals group. It
makes adhesives, resins, speciality chemicals and starches.
BTR Nylex reported a net profit of ADollars 182.5m for the six months to
June 30, compared with Dollars 151m in the corresponding period of the
previous year. Mr Jackson said the company had a strong balance sheet and
was poised to 'burst forth in the 1990s'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-564</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: Restructuring helps Isuzu cut
back loss for year to Y23.5bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ISUZU Motors, the Japanese vehicle maker with close links to General Motors
of the US, yesterday announced a pre-tax loss of Y23.5bn (Dollars 191m) for
the 12 months to the end of October. The result was an improvement on the
previous year's loss of Y48.4bn and a sign that its restructuring programme
is making an impact.
The company recently announced plans to stop production of passenger cars
and to concentrate on commercial vehicles. It will also make recreational
vehicles for Honda, which will be allowed to market passenger cars though
Isuzu dealers.
Isuzu's sales rose 4.6 per cent to Y1,198.7bn for the year, while the
after-tax loss was Y12.7bn, against a previous loss of Y47.2bn. The company
hopes to break even this year at the net level, but is forecasting a Y13bn
pre-tax loss.
The company, which has trimmed its force of temporary workers and
streamlined the components supply system, reported a fall in sales of large
trucks and buses. But there was an increase in demand for smaller trucks and
buses, and a 10 per cent increase in sales of engines and other car parts.
Isuzu last week announced a plan to commission GM, which has a 37 per cent
stake in it, to produce medium-sized trucks in the US from early 1994 as
part of an expanded partnership between the two.
'We are hoping for a rapid economic recovery and an improvement in the
business environment,' Isuzu said. But the Japan Automobile Manufacturers'
Association reported yesterday that domestic vehicle production in November
was down 9.3 per cent from a year earlier.
Truck production in November was down 13.9 per cent - the 16th straight
month of a year-on-year decrease.
Fuji Kiko, a Japanese vehicle component maker 23.8 per cent owned by Nissan
Motor, has acquired FFV Autotech, a Swedish auto component maker for Y500m,
Reuter reports from Tokyo.
FFV Autotech - which produces steering components for Volvo, Saab-Scania,
and Renault - expects net profits of SKr87m (Dollars 12.6m) in 1992.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-565</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: A&amp;P slides to pre-tax deficit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GREAT Atlantic &amp; Pacific Tea Company, one of the largest US supermarket
groups and an investor in Britain's Isosceles group, has reported a pre-tax
loss of Dollars 4.38m for the three months to December 5. At the net level,
after a Dollars 4.8m tax credit, there was a small surplus of Dollars
422,000.
The company has seen steadily declining figures for the past two years, but
this is the first time it has dipped into the red at the pre-tax level.
The third-quarter loss compares with a profit of Dollars 6.82m in the same
period of 1991, and brings the net loss for the first nine months of the
year to Dollars 149.4m. This includes the Dollars 89m write-off of the
company's investment in Isosceles, taken in the first quarter, and Dollars
91m of non-cash charges related to accounting changes.
Sales during the third quarter fell from Dollars 2.61bn to Dollars 2.37bn,
and A&amp;P's chairman, Mr James Wood, blamed the 'negative sales comparisons'
for the loss. 'Approximately 25 per cent of that reported sales shortfall
was due to the Canadian dollar exchange rate softening from last year,' he
said.
However, Mr Wood added that sales trends in Ontario had finally 'turned
around' after two poor years, although sales in key US markets continued to
be soft. The company has been badly hit by the relatively weak local
economies in Michigan, the mid-West, New England, Canada and the
mid-Atlantic states - where about 80 per cent of its stores are based.
Yesterday, Moody's, one of the large US rating agencies, said that it was
reviewing the long-term debt ratings of A&amp;P with a view to a possible
downgrade.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-566</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: Chilean airline sell-off
attracts flag-carriers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LESLIE CRAWFORD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SANTIAGO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CORFO, the Chilean state holding company, plans to sell its remaining 22.4
per cent interest in Lan-Chile, the loss-making national airline partially
privatised in 1989.
British Airways has announced an interest in acquiring a stake in the
Chilean flag carrier. Mr Robert Kay, British Airways' general manager in
Santiago, said negotiations on a purchase were taking place. At present, BA
has no flights to Santiago.
Iberia, the Spanish flag carrier, and Japan Airlines are also reported to be
interested.
Scandinavian Airline Systems is the biggest shareholder in Lan-Chile with 35
per cent. The Chilean carrier reported a 179m peso (Dollars 474,800) loss
for the first nine months of 1992.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-567</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: VW takes large stake in Japanese
car distributor
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO, PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
VOLKSWAGEN Audi Nippon, a wholly-owned Japanese subsidiary of the German
carmaker, has confirmed it is buying a large stake in Jax, a Japanese car
distributor, to boost its sales in the country.
VW yesterday signed an agreement with Jax, which has an extensive network in
metropolitan Tokyo, to take a 49.9 per cent stake.
The German group has been seeking an alternative to its long-standing
partnership with the Yanase distribution group, which is to be dissolved at
the end of the year.
Jax, sole distributor of Renault of France, has faced financial difficulties
owing to the slump in Renault car sales. Mr Takanori Matsumoto, president of
Jax, said it would end its sales agreement with Renault.
Jax, listed on the over-the-counter market, will issue 5.3m new shares worth
Y2.6bn (Dollars 21m) for allotment to VW.
Renault said yesterday it had been seeking a new Japanese distributor for
its cars for almost a year, but Jax would sell its cars for months yet,
Reuter reports from Paris.
'We have an assurance from Jax on the distribution of our vehicles and
after-sales service for a period that runs much longer than three months,'
Renault said.
Industry sources said there should not be any time gap between the end of
the Jax link and the beginning of a contract with a new partner.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-568</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: Resignation clears way for Astra
takeover
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM KEELING
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JAKARTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Mr SUMITRO Djojohadi-kusumo resigned yesterday as chairman of Astra
International, Indonesia's dominant automotive company.
The move clears the way for a consortium led by Mr Prajogo Pangestu, a
timber tycoon, to buy 44.5 per cent of Astra from the Soeryadjaya family,
who currently hold a majority stake.
Last week, Mr Djojohadikusumo vetoed the proposed sale of 108m shares for
Rp1,080bn (Dollars 518m) to the consortium, describing it as against the
interests of Astra and the nation. Toyota, the company's main joint-venture
partner, and at least one Japanese bank with exposure to Astra, had opposed
the deal, he added.
Toyota said yesterday: 'In spite of the chairman's resignation, we would
like to do business with Astra group in the same friendly relations as
before.' Toyota remains undecided about whether to purchase 20m shares
offered by the Soeryadjayas last month.
Mr Djojohadikusumo was appointed chairman in September to replace Mr William
Soeryadjaya, who wanted to concentrate on rescuing Bank Summa, owned by his
family.
Last week, Bank Summa was ordered into liquidation, owing Rp1,600bn, and Mr
Soeryadjaya has been trying to raise finance to repay depositors. Mr
Djojohadikusumo resigned under pressure from Mr Soeryadjaya, brokers say.
Astra's shares rallied Rp250 yesterday to Rp8,750, but brokers expressed
disappointment at the resignation.
'He (Mr Djojohadikusumo) was brought in to protect the company's minority
shareholders and insulate Astra from Bank Summa. He failed, because he was
put in an intolerable position by the Soeryadjayas,' said a foreign broker.
Brokers stress details of the expected sale of Astra shares are unclear,
including the identity of many members of Mr Pangestu's consortium and how
the deal would be financed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-569</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: HK office sold with a 'unique
contract'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON HOLBERTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AMOY Properties' HKDollars 900m (USDollars 116.4m) purchase of Standard
Chartered's headquarters in Hong Kong utilised a unique form of contract for
the colony and underlined the company's belief in the long-term future of
the colony, analysts said yesterday.
Moreover, the price paid for the property indicated that property prices for
prime locations in the colony were still rising, in spite of the current
political row between China and the UK about Hong Kong's political
development.
Mr Charles Wheatman, a senior executive with Jones Lang Wootton, who advised
Standard Chartered, said the price per square foot paid was well in excess
of what other similar properties were selling for.
Amoy, which is 54 per cent owned by Hang Lung, has bought from Standard
Chartered the title to the property, but its right to occupy it has been
deferred for 20 years.
Five years ago, the property was developed by Nishimatsu, the Japanese
property company. It acquired the right to let the property from the bank
for 25 years. Nishimatsu then leased about 83 per cent of the space to the
bank on a fixed rent which allows for periodic rent increases.
Amoy has taken over the bank's lease and rental commitment to Nishimatsu,
and leased back the space the bank needs but at market rents. Amoy's only
income from the property is the difference between the market rent and the
long-term rental agreement it has acquired. In 20 years' time, the whole
property reverts to Amoy.
Analysts said that the transaction was akin to Amoy buying a property
future, or a zero coupon bond. As the company has bought ownership but not
used it, an estimate had to be made of the property's future value and the
rental income foregone. That value was then discounted to take account of
risk and loss of income.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-570</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: GM considers extending its
alliance with Toyota
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GENERAL Motors of the US and Toyota of Japan are believed to be discussing
an extension of their existing alliance, which manufactures cars at a plant
in California. The expansion might include the use of an idled GM factory to
produce Toyota vehicles.
Since 1984, GM and Toyota have had a 50-50 joint venture in California,
called New United Motor Manufacturing Inc (Nummi), which is managed by the
Japanese company and builds cars sold by each company under its own name.
A Japanese newspaper report, denied by Toyota, said GM had now asked Toyota
to use one of GM's idled US factories to build Toyota's new mid-size T100
pick-up truck. The T100 has caused a ripple of anxiety among Detroit
manufacturers, who currently have the US market for large pick-up trucks to
themselves.
But GM issued a more positive statement, declaring that the Nummi joint
venture provided a 'foundation for further co-operation'. It added:
'Certainly, the utilisation of idled facilities in the US presents a
potential area for discussion.'
GM said it was monitoring initial US market reaction to the T-100 and
remained committed to defending its number one position in full-sized
trucks. It would vigorously compete with all competitors.
But analysts said an expanded alliance could benefit both companies. By
manufacturing at a GM plant in the US, Toyota would get round a 25 per cent
tariff on imported trucks and avoid the cost of building a new factory at a
time of financial stringency.
Co-operation with financially-troubled GM to keep an idled plant open would
help Toyota lessen protectionist sentiment in Washington.
GM, struggling to turn its lossmaking North American operations to
profitability, would save money on labour costs, since under an agreement
with the United Auto Workers union it is obliged to pay laid-off workers
virtually full pay indefinitely. The Toyota truck would also occupy a market
area where GM does not have a model.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-571</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Ambroveneto lifts uncertainty over its future
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BANCO AMBROSIANO Veneto (Ambroveneto), Italy's biggest private-sector bank,
has lifted some of the uncertainty over its future following agreement
between controlling shareholders on reshuffling their stakes, writes Haig
Simonian in Milan.
Gemina, one of the five companies which together form the shareholders' pact
dominating the bank, has accepted the L6,000-a-share offer from its other
partners for its 13.06 per cent stake.
Gemina, which is indirectly controlled by the Fiat group, indicated in
September it wanted to sell out. The L387bn disposal will produce a capital
gain of L225bn. Gemina, which controls the RCS publishing group and the Fila
sportswear company, among other investments, has not indicated how it will
invest the proceeds, which will be paid in mid-January.
Details of how Gemina's stake will be distributed among the other members of
the Ambroveneto pact, which include Credit Agricole of France and Crediop,
the Rome-based long-term lending bank controlled by Istituto Bancario San
Paolo di Torino, have not been revealed.
Both Credit Agricole and Crediop have said they are ready to increase their
holdings.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-572</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: Details to emerge of IRI's
high-tech group
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DETAILS will be announced today of plans to create a single Italian
high-technology group covering companies controlled by the IRI state holding
concern.
Shares in Finmeccanica, IRI's aerospace and engineering subsidiary, were
suspended yesterday pending an announcement.
The suspension, also covered Finmeccanica's listed Alenia aerospace and
Elsag-Bailey precision engineering offshoots. The moves are the
curtain-raiser to an offer by Finmeccanica to buy out minorities in its two
subsidiaries.
Terms of the deal, which has been preceded by detailed valuation work, will
be released later today. Shareholders in Alenia and Elsag-Bailey will be
offered equity in Finmeccanica.
It is not known whether there will be a cash alternative. Nor is it as yet
clear why shares in Finmeccanica's quoted Ansaldo Trasporti subsidiary have
not been suspended.
The plan crowns Finmeccanica's ambition to become the single quoted vehicle
for all IRI's high-technology industrial activities. Apart from Alenia and
Elsag-Bailey, Finmeccanica's operations include the big Ansaldo engineering
and transport equipment concern.
The group, which has 56,000 employees, had sales of L10,966bn (Dollars
7.78bn) last year. After meeting a European Commission requirement to repay
IRI L719bn in aid and interest to the Alfa Romeo cars group, formerly owned
by Finmeccanica, it posted a 1991 loss of L525bn.
Taking their inspiration from conglomerates such as Siemens and General
Electric, Finmeccanica executives have claimed that a single listing would
provide substantial financial and marketing benefits.
That strategy has been indirectly boosted by the new Italian government's
privatisation plans. Last week, Mr Piero Barucci, the treasury minister,
forecast eventual capital increases for both Finmeccanica and Stet, IRI's
telecommunications holding company, including a much bigger role for private
shareholders.
Finmeccanica took a first step in October, when it gained a stock market
listing through the reverse takeover of its already-quoted Sifa property and
securities trading arm.
The transaction was to have been the prelude to an ambitious multi-stage
capital increase, raising up to L1,700bn via a cash injection from IRI, bank
credits and, eventually, convertible bonds for private investors. However,
IRI's financial difficulties and the poor state of the bourse forced the
company to shelve its immediate cash-raising plans.
Bankers question Finmeccanica's claim that a single listing will prove more
attractive to investors than the current situation. Although it will create
a much bigger float, the operation will reduce the transparency of
Finmeccanica's individual operations.
Incorporating subsidiaries such as Alenia electronics companies, could also
help Finmeccanica mask trading difficulties at some operations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-573</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: UBS faces challenge from key
shareholder
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZURICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A POTENTIALLY long and tense confrontation between Union Bank of Switzerland
(UBS) and its largest shareholder began yesterday in a typically understated
Swiss way.
BK Vision, a Zurich-based investment trust which holds SFr664m (Dollars
469m) worth of UBS shares carrying nearly 4 per cent of the votes, sent a
letter to its shareholders saying that it had contacted UBS about changes in
the composition of its board announced last weekend.
The letter, signed by Mr Kurt Schiltknecht, managing director, said the
trust sought 'to put forward the interests of our company as shareholder in
a direct conversation with them'.
Mr Schiltknecht said he would not comment publicly on the substance of the
trust's concerns about the board changes, but it is widely known in Swiss
financial circles that the dispute is over the UBS board's decision not to
renominate Mr Christoph Blocher, a controversial industrialist-politician,
to its ranks at the annual meeting in April.
BK Vision is one of two specialised investment trusts set up last year and
managed by BZ Bank, a maverick Zurich securities house led by Mr Martin
Ebner. The other is Pharma Vision, of which Mr Blocher is chairman.
In both cases, the trusts have taken over shares held by large institutions
with the view to creating a single large shareholder capable of putting
pressure on companies' managements. In particular, it advocates having
independent representatives on company boards, and it undoubtedly sees Mr
Blocher as one such at UBS.
UBS said it was sacking Mr Blocher, who is a member of the federal
parliament, because of his alleged advocacy of government regulation of
mortgage interest rates and of bringing the Swiss central bank under
parliamentary control.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-574</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: Ciments Francais bids for
remainder of Guintoli
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CIMENTS Francais, the troubled French cement group, has bowed to pressure
from the Paris stock market authorities by mounting a bid for the remaining
shares in Guintoli, the building company linked to the scandal over its
off-balance sheet dealings.
The bid, which values Guintoli at FFr466.7m (Dollars 87.2m), has been made
by Ciments Francais and Paribas, the French bank which, following this
autumn's scandal, was forced to offer to repay FFr500m of the FFr6bn it
received for selling control of Ciments Francais to Italcementi of Italy.
Ciments Francais and Paribas are offering FFr890 a share for the 67.1 per
cent of Guintoli's equity the former does not already own. This is the same
price that Ciments Francais paid for its original 32.9 per cent stake.
Paribas' involvement forms part of its agreement with Italcementi. Under the
terms of that deal it now owns Ciments Francais' existing stake in Guintoli
and will be entitled to any shares that are subsequently acquired.
The offer follows an announcement last week by the Conseil des Bourses de
Valeurs,the French stock market regulator, that Ciments Francais should bid
for Guintoli after the discovery that the off-balance sheet dealings - worth
FFr1.05bn overall  - had raised the group's stake above the 33.3 per cent
level at which, under law, a company must make a full offer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-575</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: French retailers caught in a
chilly climate - Alice Rawsthorn examines a series of upsets in the sector
which is facing intense pressure on prices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN Mr Jean-Jacques Delort this week resigned as chairman of Printemps, one
of France's most famous department store groups, he closed the latest
chapter in the saga of French retailing.
His departure, following a row with Mr Francois Pinault, whose industrial
group acquired Printemps last year, is only one of the dramas to have hit
French retailing in the past week. Tesco, the UK supermarket group, last
Friday took control of Catteau, a chain in northern France.
On the same day, Carrefour, one of the biggest French retailers whose
chairman, Mr Michel Bon, resigned this autumn after reporting a sharp fall
in interim profits, announced that November's sales had been 'the worst in
(its) history', and issued a profits warning.
The French retail sector is struggling against weak demand and pressure on
prices at a time when Germany's heavy discounters are expanding into France
and the big indigenous groups - Promodes and Casino, as well as Carrefour
and Pinault-Printemps - are digesting sizeable acquisitions. These problems
are aggravated by the historically low profitability of some areas of French
retailing, notably food.
'Life has been tough in French retailing for a couple of years, but it has
become much, much tougher this year,' said Ms Christiane Thorne, European
retailing analyst at UBS Philips &amp; Drew in London.
The crux of the problem is consumer confidence which has been hit by high
real interest rates and concern about rising unemployment.
Some retail sectors, such as clothing, have also been affected by the
unseasonally dull summer and mild winter. Hypermarkets saw their sales slip
by 0.7 per cent in the first three quarters of this year. Department store
sales fell by 2.3 per cent. Meanwhile, the trend for people to trade down to
cheaper goods has squeezed margins.
Retailers' attempts to adapt to this chilly climate has been hampered by the
internal changes within the industry. First, the German discounters, notably
Aldi and Norma, have become increasingly aggressive in the food sector. The
Germans have accelerated their openings in France over the past two years
prompting, the French to expand their own discount chains, as Carrefour has
done with Europa and Ed l'Epicier.
The discounters are expanding at a time when the saturated state of the
French food market is making it more difficult for established retailers to
open new outlets. Many of the major players have been forced to contract by
closing poorly-performing stores.
This problem, combined with the need to increase purchasing power to remain
competitive in negotiations with the multinational food manufacturers, such
as Unilever and Nestle, has catalysed the recent stream of acquisitions that
has reshaped French food retailing.
Small companies such as Catteau, a family-owned chain of 90 stores in
northern France, have been forced to sell out to larger players, in its case
to Tesco. Similarly, Carrefour last year acquired Euromarche and Montlaur,
just as Casino this summer took over Rallye.
There have been similar deals in other areas of retailing. Pinault's
controversial takeover of Printemps included the Conforama furniture shops
and La Redoute mail order catalogue as well as the department stores.
These acquisitions have intensified the pressure on smaller companies. They
have also destabilised the larger groups, thereby making them more
vulnerable to the economic slowdown. Pinault-Printemps has been left with
heavy debts and prey to boardroom rows of the type that triggered Mr
Delort's departure. Carrefour and Casino have hit the downturn at a time
when they are still trying to integrate their acquisitions and are not yet
able to benefit from their improved purchasing power. Similarly, Promodes is
still digesting Plaza, a German business bought last year.
'These companies were all over-optimistic about their acquisitions,' said Ms
Claire Kent, European retailing analyst with Morgan Stanley in London. 'The
economic slowdown undoubtedly means it will take longer to bring them up to
an acceptable level of profitability.'
At the same time, the economy shows no sign of improvement. A survey
published yesterday by INSEE, the state statistics institute, indicated that
more than half the French expect their standard of living to deteriorate
over the next few months. Even if interest rates fall, there is no real hope
of a recovery in consumer spending until after the March elections.
Tesco has chosen a very tricky time to enter French retailing. 'Tesco did
say that it saw the Catteau deal as a learning experience,' said Ms Thorne.
'Let's hope it meant it]'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-576</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: Sweden provides fresh start deal
for Nordbanken
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BROWN-HUMES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE SWEDISH government is providing a further SKr14bn (Dollars 2bn) in
equity and SKr10bn in guarantees as part of the reconstruction of the
troubled Nordbanken group.
The announcement yesterday came as the state said it would formally take
over Securum AB, a company holding SKr67bn in bad loans and shares (SKr50bn
after write-downs), from Nordbanken at the beginning of 1993.
The aim is to provide Nordbanken with a fresh start, facilitating the bank's
eventual return to the private sector, while gradually disposing of the
assets within Securum.
The government is financing Securum with SKr24bn in equity and it is
providing a SKr10bn guarantee for a further SKr30bn in credits which
Nordbanken is making on favourable terms to Securum.
The support is in addition to a SKr10bn injection which Nordbanken received
from the state last month, and it includes SKr10bn of help already promised
but not given. It means the state will contribute a total of SKr34bn in
equity to resolve the problems relating to Nordbanken.
Nordbanken was generally considered to be in a more critical condition than
the other banks in Sweden's ailing financial sector. However, the figures
announced yesterday were much higher than indicated in June, when a SKr20bn
support package was announced. The deterioration implies more support is
going to be required for the Swedish banking system as a whole than
previously thought.
The worsening in the general economic situation is the main reason for the
change.
Nordbanken's credit losses, including those within Securum, will now be
SKr10bn more than the SKr6-SKr8bn estimated in May. The government also
accepts that it will take longer to dispose of the assets within Securum and
prices realised will be lower, than it thought earlier.
The bank is also cutting SKr1bn off costs and reducing staff 20 per cent to
4,500 people.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-577</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Uruguay Round deal awaits new US administration: David
Dodwell on some misplaced optimism surrounding the conclusion of the world
trade talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TAKE with a pinch of salt whatever President George Bush and Mr John Major
said in Washington at the weekend about finishing within the first two weeks
of January the six-year Uruguay Round of talks aimed at reducing barriers to
international trade.
There was a stronger sense of realism in Geneva when the statement was
released. Most European Community negotiators had returned to Brussels, the
head of the US mission had taken his son to the circus, and Mr Balkrishan
Zutchi, India's respected ambassador to the General Agreement on Tariffs and
Trade, commented: 'It's not possible for President Bush to conclude this. We
have to wait and see what the Clinton administration proposes.'
The most patient response to the Washington initiative came from a senior EC
official: 'It was an honest attempt to achieve a conclusion. If it were just
up to the US and the EC, then it might just be possible. But Bush and Major
have wholly under-estimated the resistance of the multilateral system, which
calls for backing from another 106 countries.'
Even Mr Arthur Dunkel, director general of Gatt, under whose wing the
Uruguay Round negotiations have progressed, complained of the critical time
lost since the US and the EC settled their long-standing dispute over reform
of farm trade in Washington early in December. 'There is still a tremendous
amount of technical work to be done,' he said this week.
The Bush and Major statement had its roots in the tokenism that Group of
Seven leaders have so often shown over the past three years.
Note the G7 summit resolution of Houston in 1990. It said: 'We stress our
determination to take the difficult decisions necessary to achieve
far-reaching, substantial results in all areas of the Uruguay Round by the
end of this year.
'We intend to maintain a high level of personal involvement and to exercise
the political leadership necessary to ensure the successful outcome of these
negotiations.'
However, one senior US trade official in Geneva commented: 'I don't see what
changes in circumstances are possible between now and the new year to make a
settlement possible. It is not the negotiators who are creating the
blockages, but the instructions from politicians back home.'
The US-EC breakthrough on reform of farm trade, which consumed the first 11
months of this year, without doubt triggered some progress. There have been
three weeks of intensive activity in Geneva as countries involved in the
Uruguay Round negotiated an array of tariff cuts, concessions to open up
trade in services, and new protection for patents and copyright.
But amid all of this technical work, disagreements have emerged which can
doubtless be resolved, but which will take time and the sort of political
commitment that leaders such as Mr Bush can no longer provide.
The most critical of these are:
US calls for amendment of the proposed anti-dumping rules, essentially
giving the US more flexible recourse to bilateral sanctions if multilateral
dumping rules fail to deliver 'fair' trade.
A US challenge to the Multilateral Trade Organisation (MTO), the umbrella
organisation that would supersede the Gatt, and would embrace the new areas
of trade subject to international rules. The US administration is concerned
the MTO would compromise important sovereign powers. EC demands that any
agreement on trade in audio-visual services should exempt 'cultural
programmes' from unfettered international competition. Audio-visual services
are the US's second most important export, and any talk of exemptions
triggers angry responses. Other services are sensitive, including financial
services (where concessions are being demanded from Japan, South Korea, and
the six Asean countries in south-east Asia) and maritime services (where the
US is dragging its heels).
Developing countries are unhappy about the speed at which markets are to be
opened up to free trade in textiles (too slowly), and are to provide patent
protection in drugs and agricultural chemicals (too quickly).
Tariff cuts remain contentious, with the US pressing for a number of sectors
to have tariffs cut to zero, and the EC preferring to tackle sectors where
tariffs are particularly high. Pressure is on Japan and South Korea to open
their markets up to rice imports, albeit behind high initial tariff walls.
Negotiators in Geneva believed firmly this week that these issues could be
resolved, though it was open to question within what time frame. As Mr
Zutchi noted: 'I am assuming that there is too much on the table that is
worth preserving for the Clinton administration to want to lose it. But if
their agenda is completely different, then talks could go on for several
years.'
He, like so many others, is waiting for Clinton.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-578</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Collor defence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRAZILIA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The head of the impeachment proceedings against Brazil's suspended president
Fernando Collor de Mello yesterday appointed Mr Inocencio Martires Coelho, a
former attorney-general, to defend him after Mr Collor forced a week's delay
in his Senate trial, Reuter reports from Brazilia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-579</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Troops move on two Somali towns
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOGADISHU
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
About 1,000 US Marines and French troops rolled out of Mogadishu yesterday
to secure two more towns in Somalia's starving interior for Christmas Day,
Reuter reports from Mogadishu. At the same time the US Task Force command in
Somalia said fewer American troops would be required in Operation Restore
Hope than originally expected.
The White House said yesterday that President George Bush would spend the
New Year's holiday visiting US troops in Somalia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-580</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Air crash in Libya leaves 157 dead
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TUNIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A Libyan Boeing 727 crashed yesterday, killing all 157 people aboard,
official sources said, Reuter reports from Tunis. An official at Tripoli
airport said the aircraft was on a domestic flight to Tripoli from the
eastern city of Benghazi.
Foreigners were among the dead, the agency added.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-581</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Airbus in Dollars 3.3bn Singaporecontract
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Airbus consortium yesterday clinched a Dollars 3.36bn (Pounds
2.2bn) order from Singapore Airlines (SIA) for 20 of its latest A340-300
long-range widebody airliners, ending one of the toughest years in the
aircraft maker's 20-year history on a positive note.
After fighting off a strong challenge from Boeing, Airbus said SIA had
signed a contract involving firm orders for seven A340-300s and options for
13 more. The deal included the cost of spares and spare engines, SIA said.
The aircraft will be powered by CFM 56-5C4 engines jointly made by General
Electric of the US and Snecma of France.
The announcement coincided with certification of the A340 yesterday by the
European Joint Airworthiness Authorities, grouping 18 countries, after an
intensive flight test programme. The US airworthiness authorities are
expected to certify the aircraft in the next two months.
The SIA contract has partly offset the blow to Airbus earlier this month
when Northwest Airlines, its biggest single customer, cancelled firm orders
for 74 aircraft, comprising 24 A340s and 50 narrow-body A320s.
SIA says it intends to use its new A340s, which will be delivered between
1996 and 1998, to carry 271 passengers in three classes on long-distance
routes such as Singapore-Paris that do not justify the larger Boeing 747-400
jumbo.
The A340 will enter commercial service for the first time next spring with
Lufthansa of Germany and Air France. It has the longest range of any
commercial airliner in the world, flying up to 9,000 miles with a full
payload on 16- to 17-hour non-stop flights.
The European Airbus consortium, whose partners are British Aerospace (20 per
cent), Aerospatiale of France (37.9 per cent), Deutsche Aerospace (37.9 per
cent) and Casa of Spain (4.2 per cent), reached a preliminary agreement with
SIA for the A340 order in August 1991.
SIA had originally planned to buy McDonnell Douglas MD-11 three-engine
airliners, but decided to switch to Airbus because it said the MD-11 did not
meet its range and payload requirements.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-582</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Hungary in sell-off bid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS DENTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUDAPEST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE HUNGARIAN govern - ment intends to follow up on the success of its
latest two stock market privatisations with up to 20 more launches next
year, including Matav, the national telecoms utility, Mr Tamas Szabo,
privatisation minister announced yesterday.
The authorities plan to float 10-20 state companies, he said. Mr
The privatisation moves come as political reaction is growing against the
predominance of foreign investors, who have provided 70 per cent of
Hungary's Ft67bn (Pounds 532m) privatisation proceeds in the year so far.
The other prong of the conservative government's privatisation strategy is
therefore to allow the Hungarian public to buy on easy terms run-of-the-mill
companies that cannot be floated.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-583</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / US NBER says recession ended in March 1991
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The US National Bureau of Economic Research yesterday declared the recession
ended in March 1991, eight months after it began in July 1990, Michael
Prowse reports. It delayed its decision until yesterday's figures from the
Commerce Department confirmed that the economy had surpassed its
pre-recession peak. The figures showed real gross domestic product growth at
an annual rate of 3.4 per cent in the third quarter compared with a previous
estimate of 3.9 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-584</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Australian satellite vanishes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DANIEL GREEN, KEVIN BROWN and YVONNE PRESTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, SYDNEY, BEIJING
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A Dollars 140m (Pounds 92.1m) satellite disappeared shortly after it was
launched from south-west China on Monday. The loss endangers part of
Australia's communications infrastructure and renews doubts over the
capabilities of China's fledgling commercial launch industry.
The Chinese Aerospace Ministry said the loss was caused by 'a satellite
problem, not a launching problem'. China was 'not responsible for the loss
of the satellite'. But the Californian builder of the satellite, Hughes
Aircraft, said it had not ruled out a fault in the launch.
Inquiries have been set up in China and California which could take several
weeks to report conclusive findings. A finding against China could smother
its recently successful efforts to win western contracts by offering
cut-price launches.
Optus Communications, the Australian telecommunications carrier that owned
the satellite, needed it to replace one launched in 1985. It would have
provided direct TV broadcasting, mobile and data communications and video
conferencing.
Mr Ian Boatman, Optus chief operating officer, said disruption to users
would be minimised by re-allocating capacity on existing satellites. But
analysts said the loss would reduce Optus's ability to compete in
Australia's mobile phone market, and reduce the quality of service available
to its broadcasting, defence and aviation customers.
The loss could also force the postponement of subscription TV in Australia
if the launch of a replacement satellite is delayed more than 18 months.
Optus is owned by BellSouth of the US, Cable and Wireless of the UK, and
Mayne Nickless, the Australian transport group.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-585</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Japanese urge US to become less litigious
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A SENIOR advisory body established to redefine the economic relationship
between Tokyo and Washington delivered a final report which urged the US to
overhaul its education system, become less litigious, and improve corporate
management.
The Council on Japan-US Economic Relations, comprising prominent Japanese
academics and executives, also proposed a new economic policy council be set
up to supersede the bilateral Structural Impediments Initiative, designed to
remove 'structural' obstacles to trade.
In the report to Mr Michio Watanabe, foreign minister, the council suggested
the two countries study their trading patterns, and Japan 'frame a theory'
to explain its positive business practices, such as long-term planning and
worker management. The ministry intends to use the document to review its US
policy, and will present the recommendations to other ministries, as the
council conceded Japanese decision-making lacks transparency and the
distribution system needs reform.
Several US deficiencies were described. The council suggested policies be
considered to encourage personal savings and capital spending, and improve
the patent system, said to offer 'excessive' protection.
The council, which includes Mr Akio Morita, Sony chairman, and officials
from the Bank of Tokyo, Mitsubishi Corporation and Toyota Motor, gave
reasons why Japan has been unable to exercise political influence equal to
its economic might. 'For Japan to take the initiative in fulfilling its new
role as a responsible international leader, it is vital reform be
implemented in the Japanese political and administrative systems. A
revolution in people's thought at grass root is required, since leadership
in external relations must go hand in hand with leadership in the domestic
sector.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-586</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Japanese prosecutors decide not to lay charges in shares
donation case
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Japanese prosecutors have decided not to lay charges against 60 MPs from the
ruling Liberal Democratic party who received shares in an illegal Y500m
(Pounds 2.65m) donation from Tokyo Sagawa Kyubin, a scandal-tainted trucking
company, Robert Thomson reports from Tokyo. The prosecutors' decision
appears to close the case book on the Tokyo Sagawa scandal, which has
already seen the resignation of Mr Shin Kanemaru, the LDP's godfather, and
highlighted the links between leading politicians and gangsters.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-587</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Airbus clinches Dollars 3.3bn Singapore Airlines contract
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Airbus consortium yesterday clinched a Dollars 3.36bn (Pounds
2.2bn) order from Singapore Airlines (SIA) for 20 of its latest A340-300
long-range widebody airliners, ending one of the toughest years in the
aircraft maker's 20-year history on a positive note.
After fighting off a strong challenge from Boeing, Airbus said SIA had
signed a contract involving firm orders for seven A340-300s and options for
13 more. The deal included the cost of spares and spare engines, SIA said.
The aircraft will be powered by CFM 56-5C4 engines jointly made by General
Electric of the US and Snecma of France.
The announcement coincided with certification of the A340 yesterday by the
European Joint Airworthiness Authorities, grouping 18 countries, after an
intensive flight test programme. The US airworthiness authorities are
expected to certify the aircraft in the next two months.
The SIA contract has partly offset the blow to Airbus earlier this month
when Northwest Airlines, its biggest single customer, cancelled firm orders
for 74 aircraft, comprising 24 A340s and 50 narrow-body A320s.
SIA says it intends to use its new A340s, which will be delivered between
1996 and 1998, to carry 271 passengers in three classes on long-distance
routes such as Singapore-Paris that do not justify the larger Boeing 747-400
jumbo.
The A340 will enter commercial service for the first time next spring with
Lufthansa of Germany and Air France. It has the longest range of any
commercial airliner in the world, flying up to 9,000 miles with a full
payload on 16- to 17-hour non-stop flights.
The European Airbus consortium, whose partners are British Aerospace (20 per
cent), Aerospatiale of France (37.9 per cent), Deutsche Aerospace (37.9 per
cent) and Casa of Spain (4.2 per cent), reached a preliminary agreement with
SIA for the A340 order in August 1991.
SIA had originally planned to buy McDonnell Douglas MD-11 three-engine
airliners, but decided to switch to Airbus because it said the MD-11 did not
meet its range and payload requirements.
However, SIA delayed completing the deal with Airbus partly because of
concerns about the A340's long-distance capabilities. This encouraged Boeing
to bid for the SIA deal with its new 777 twin-engine widebody airliner.
But after some adjustments to the aerodynamics of the A340, Airbus appears
to have satisfied SIA's range and payload requirements.
The European consortium is now stepping up its challenge to Boeing's
dominance of the large long-distance airliner market with the four-engine
A340 and its sister aircraft, the twin-engine A330.
The SIA deal was regarded as particularly important because the airline is
one of world's most profitable, and is based in one of the few markets which
has continued to show sustained growth during the air transport industry
recession.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-588</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / South Korea and Vietnam establish diplomatic LINKS
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SEOUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE establishment of diplomatic relations yesterday between Seoul and Hanoi
removes the main obstacle to expanding Korean investment in Vietnam, writes
John Burton in Seoul.
Vietnam is the last country with which South Korea has forged ties as part
of President Roh Tae-woo's policy to normalise relations with current and
former socialist nations.
South Korea had delayed establishing formal relations with Vietnam in
deference to US wishes that the issue of missing American soldiers during
the Vietnam war be resolved. More than 310,000 South Korean troops were
involved in the war against Hanoi.
Seoul, however, has allowed Korean companies to make limited investments in
Vietnam. There are more than 30 Korean concerns with branch offices in
Vietnam. Authorised Korean investments totalled Dollars 84.4m (Pounds
55.5m), making South Korea Vietnam's seventh-largest foreign investor.
Trade has also expanded from Dollars 77m in 1988 to more than Dollars 440m
this year, making Vietnam Korea's third largest trading partner in the
former socialist bloc after China and Russia. The trade surplus is heavily
in Korea's favour.
Analysts believe that Vietnam will compete against Indonesia and Thailand
for Korean investment in south-east Asia in the next few years.
'We prefer to invest in countries, such as Vietnam and Myanmar (Burma) in
south-east Asia, where the Japanese are not dominant,' explained Mr Bae
Soonhoon, president of Daewoo Electronics.
Medium-sized Korean textile and toy producers have so far been among the
biggest investors in Vietnam.
Korea's leading industrial groups are awaiting the lifting of US economic
sanctions against Vietnam, which will permit international financial
institutions such as the World Bank to provide credit for infrastructure
projects.
All of Korea's big construction companies are seeking contracts to build or
repair roads and port facilities.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-589</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Court rejects appeal to reverse Israeli expulsion of
Palestinians
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY and MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM, NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ISRAEL'S High Court last night rejected appeals to force the government to
reverse its expulsion of 415 Palestinians to Lebanon as the army again
threatened to open fire if the deportees made further attempts to return to
Israeli-held territory.
A seven-judge panel ruled against petitions from civil rights lawyers that
Israel had a responsibility to take back the alleged Islamic fundamentalist
militants because Lebanon had refused to accept them, and because their
lives were in danger as they were stranded in no-man's land between Israeli
and Lebanese forces.
The decision was not a surprise. But Mrs Hanan Ashrawi, the Palestinian
spokeswoman, said it was a further 'heavy blow' to Middle East peace talks
which the Palestinians say they will boycott until the deportations are
reversed.
Mr Hosni Mubarak, Egyptian president, said he regretted the deportations but
said the peace talks should continue.
In New York, Mr Boutros Boutros Ghali, UN secretary-general, said he would
send Mr James Jonah, an under-secretary general from Sierre Leone, to Israel
for talks with the government.
The deportees yesterday returned to the makeshift camp they set up soon
after they were expelled last Thursday. Lt-Gen Ehud Barak, the army chief of
staff, told the High Court they could face warning shots if they tried to
return to Israeli lines. Extra Israeli troops were sent to the area and the
road to Israeli-occupied areas of south Lebanon was mined and blocked.
Mr Yitzhak Rabin, the prime minister, told a meeting of the Knesset foreign
affairs and defence committee that he had authorised the use of live fire,
which reporters at the scene said injured at least two of the deportees. 'To
the best of my knowledge, not one person was hurt,' Mr Rabin asserted.
The prime minister will today come under pressure from government ministers
to take balancing measures to offset the damage to Middle East peace talks
caused by the deportations row.
A meeting of senior Labour party figures will hear calls for Mr Rabin to
open an unprecedented direct dialogue with the Palestine Liberation
Organisation. Mr Rabin is unlikely to sanction talks with officials from the
PLO's Tunis headquarters but he might
consider talks with Mr Faisal Husseini, the senior PLO-associated figure in
the occupied territories who has been barred by Israel from attending the
peace talks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-590</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / IMF expects decline inworld economic growth
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE International Monetary Fund yesterday responded to fresh evidence of
global economic weakness by sharply revising down its growth projections for
next year.
Its latest figures show industrial countries growing at only 2 per cent next
year, nearly a full percentage point slower than estimates made in
September.
Most of the downward revision reflects the IMF's growing pessimism about the
outlook for Japan and Europe. Japan is now expected to grow by only 2.4 per
cent against a previous projection of 3.8 per cent. EC growth has been
revised down to 1 per cent from 2.3 per cent.
The biggest single revision was for Germany, which is now expected to grow
at 0.6 per cent rather than 2.6 per cent.
The US remains a bright spot with projected growth of 3 per cent, a
reduction of only 0.1 percentage points.
Staff said the revisions reflected a reassessment of the negative impact on
private spending of falling asset prices, adverse effects of persistent high
real interest rates in Europe and Canada, and uncertainty in European
exchange markets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-591</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Hungary steps up sell-offs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS DENTON and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUDAPEST, PRAGUE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE HUNGARIAN government intends to follow up on the success of its latest
two stock market privatisations with up to 20 more launches next year, a
minister announced yesterday.
The privatisation authorities plan in 1993 to float 10 to 20 state
companies, including Matav, the national telecommunications utility, said Mr
Tamas Szabo, privatisation minister.
The authorities' affection for popular privatisation comes as a political
reaction is gaining force against the predominance of foreign investors,
which have provided 70 per cent of Hungary's Ft67bn privatisation proceeds
in the year so far.
Nevertheless, Mr Szabo admitted yesterday that few Hungarian companies were
suitable candidates for the Budapest stock market.
The other prong of the conservative government's privatisation strategy is
therefore to allow the Hungarian public to purchase on easy terms
run-of-the-mill companies which cannot be floated.
Mr Szabo said the government had decided to stimulate domestic investor
interest in privatisation by opening to the public a low-rate and
long-maturity 'existence' credit facility.
The new wave of privatisation flotations has gained impetus from the share
offering this month of Danubius, a hotel chain, and Pick, Hungary's leading
salami producer, and their unexpected success.
The popularity of the Danubius issue in particular showed to the Hungarian
authorities that tax preferences, easy payment terms and bonus shares could
draw the public to invest in privatisation.
The first round of Czechoslovakia's ambitious privatisation scheme was a
success with nearly 93 per cent of available shares sold, officials said
yesterday, Reuter reports from Prague.
Some 21.55m shares (7.2 per cent) remained unsold from the 299.39m offered
early in the year when the scheme started with 8.54m people, more than half
of Czechoslovakia's population of 15m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-592</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Collor defence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRAZILIA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The head of the impeachment proceedings against Brazil's suspended president
Fernando Collor de Mello named a former attorney general yesterday to defend
him after Mr Collor forced a week's delay in his Senate trial, Reuter
reports from Brazilia. Supreme Court President Sydney Sanches, who is
overseeing the impeachment, named Mr Inocencio Martires Coelho as Collor's
new defence attorney and put off his trial for a week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-593</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Murder verdict in US-Mexico drug case
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MEXICO CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The brother-in-law of former Mexican president Luis Echeverria has been
found guilty of conspiring to murder Mr Enrique Camarena, an official of the
US Drug Enforcement Agency (DEA), in a case that led to a sharp dispute
between Mexico and the US, Damian Fraser writes from Mexico City.
Mr Ruben Zuno Acre was tried with the Mexican doctor Mr Humberto Alvarez
Machain, who had been kidnapped by agents working for the DEA in 1990 to
face charges in the US. The case against Dr Alvarez Machain was dismissed by
the judge last week. The kidnapping of Mr Alvarez Machain and subsequent
trial infuriated the Mexican government.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-594</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Bush and Yeltsin discuss N-pact
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Presidents George Bush and Boris Yeltsin held their second telephone
conversation in two days on Monday to try to nail down a treaty making deep
cuts in strategic nuclear weapons, US official sources said yesterday,
Reuter reports from Washington.
'It's getting there. It's not a done deal yet but it's getting there,' one
official said of prospects for agreement on a new strategic arms reduction
treaty (Start-2) before Mr Bush leaves office on January 20.
Mr Yeltsin surprised Washington last week when he said a Start-2 agreement
was in hand and would be signed before Mr Bush hands over power to
President-elect Bill Clinton.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-595</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Troops move on two Somali towns
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOGADISHU
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
About 1,000 US Marines and French troops rolled out of Mogadishu yesterday
to secure two more towns in Somalia's starving interior for Christmas Day,
Reuter reports from Mogadishu. At the same time the US Task Force command in
Somalia said fewer American troops would be required in Operation Restore
Hope than originally expected.
The Christmas push was confirmed by a US spokesman, who said the
American-led multinational force in Somalia would enter Bardere tomorrow,
and secure Hoddur at first light on Christmas Day.
Mr Boutros Boutros Ghali, the United Nations secretary-general, again called
on Washington to disarm warlords and gangs in Somalia and said American
troops should fan out through the country and not limit themselves to the
hunger zones.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-596</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Air crash in Libya leaves 157 dead
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TUNIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A LIBYAN Boeing 727 crashed yesterday, killing all 157 people aboard,
official sources said, Reuter reports from Tunis. An official at Tripoli
airport said the aircraft was on a domestic flight to Tripoli from the
eastern city of Benghazi.
Libyan Arab Airlines flight 1103 crashed at 10.07am local time, the official
news agency Jana said.
Foreigners were among the dead, the agency added. Neither Jana nor the
airport official could say how many.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-597</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Capita varies terms for ED&amp;M purchase
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Capita, the management consultancy, information technology and building
services consultancy, has reached agreement with the vendors of Estate
Design &amp; Management to vary the terms of the deferred consideration payable
to them in respect of the acquisition of ED&amp;M by Capita earlier this year.
The company has now entered an agreement to cancel the remaining deferred
consideration arrangements in return for a total consideration of Pounds
705,716 which has been satisfied by the issue of 169,596 new Capita
ordinary.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-598</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Improvement at F&amp;C Smaller Cos
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Over the six months ended October 31 1992 net asset value of Foreign &amp;
Colonial Smaller Companies recovered from 107.3p to 109.2p.
At end-October 1991 it stood at 109p.
Sir Peter Hordern, chairman, said in all the principal markets of the world
smaller companies had been under pressure. But the company outperformed the
stock market indices.
On the income side, dividends from investments had been better than expected
although there was a few reductions. Benefit came from the fall in sterling
and foreign currencies were borrowed at low interest rates.
Total revenue improved from Pounds 2.83m to Pounds 3.28m while earnings per
share came to 1.66p (1.45p). The interim dividend is lifted to 0.68p (0.65p)
and it is intended to pay a final of 1.16p (1.1p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-599</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Kynoch capital reconstruction
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Kynoch Group has called an extraordinary meeting for January 14 to consider
proposals for a capital reconstruction to eliminate the deficit on profit
and loss account.
That will involve cancellation of the share premium account and reduction of
the ordinary capital by writing down the nominal value of shares from 25p to
10p.
The group makes and supplies medical equipment, and is involved in Shetland
knitwear. In the 16 months ended December 31 1991 the holding company showed
a deficit on profit and loss account of Pounds 2.08m, and the directors are
forecasting that will increase to no more than Pounds 2.89m for 1992.
It is expected the reduction should be effective in or about February, after
the High Court has given sanction.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-600</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Receivers called in at Trilion
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr AV Lomas and Mr AJ Barratt of Price Waterhouse have been appointed
administrative receivers to Trilion, the USM-quoted television production
company. This follows last week's announcement that its shares had been
suspended at 3p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-601</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: HTV gets go-ahead for land sale
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Having been granted planning permission, HTV Group announced it is now able
to complete the sale of 9.3 acres of undeveloped land at Culverhouse Cross,
Cardiff.
In response to an appeal by the developer, Atlantic Property Developments,
the planning inspector gave his formal consent to the planning application
made on December 17.
Subject to the statutory period to challenge the appeal decision, the sale
becomes unconditional on March 17 1993.
On the agreement becoming unconditional HTV will receive Pounds 2.5m - the
group has already received Pounds 1.5m cash - representing a surplus of
Pounds 1.8m above book value.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-602</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: I&amp;S Optimum net asset value falls
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I&amp;S Optimum Income Trust saw its net asset value fall to 89.48p at November
30 1992, compared with 95.86p a year earlier.
The trust's aim is to provide a high and growing level of income by
investing in blue chip UK companies.
In the six months ended November 30 gross income came to Pounds 1.72m
(Pounds 1.71m) and earnings per share worked through at 3.87p (3.94p).
The second quarterly dividend is 1.85p to make 3.7p (3.6p) so far. A minimum
total for the year of 7.4p (7.25p) is indicated.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-603</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Abbey Panels dives deeper into the red
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Abbey Panels Investments, an engineer supplying the motor, aerospace and
defence industries saw a further downturn in the year ended September 30.
Losses have escalated from Pounds 234,000 to Pounds 1.82m on turnover which
has fallen from Pounds 18.21m to Pounds 12.36m. Losses per share have jumped
from 10.9p to 65.54p. There is again no dividend - the last payment was a
final of 2p in respect of 1989-90.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-604</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Heavy decline at Minstergate
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Full year pre-tax profits of Minstergate, which is involved in property
management and development, declined from Pounds 2.16m to Pounds 1.2m.
Sales for the period, to August 31 1992, jumped from Pounds 2.96m to Pounds
5.66m. Earnings per share came through at 0.72p (59.1p). Dividend pay-outs
absorb Pounds 1.26m (Pounds 2.31m) leaving a loss transferred to reserves of
Pounds 1.04m (Pounds 96,000).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-605</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Batleys profits down by 26%
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Batleys, the private Huddersfield-based chain of cash and carry wholesalers,
increased turnover 7.5 per cent but saw pre-tax profit fall 26 per cent in
the half year ended October 31 1992.
Turnover came to Pounds 239m (Pounds 222m) while the profit worked through
at Pounds 3.1m (Pounds 4.18m). Interest charges were reduced from Pounds
183,000 to Pounds 79,000.
Earnings per share were 13.71p (18.81p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-606</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Inchcape expands motor operations
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Inchcape, the international services and marketing group, has moved into
motor operations in Scandinavia and eastern Europe with the acquisition of
Haka Auto.
On January 4 it will buy the Finnish distributor of Mazda vehicles for
Pounds 3m cash, and assume responsibility for the borrowings estimated at
Pounds 33m.
Haka Auto has the exclusive import and distribution rights in Finland,
Estonia and the St Petersburg area of Russia. In Finland it also imports and
distributes Jaguar cars.
Inchcape is the exclusive importer and distributor of Mazda vehicles in
France and Hong Kong and has a 40 per cent share of the Mazda UK import and
distribution operation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-607</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Dana funding and capital proposals
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Dana Exploration, the principal activity of which is the exploration for
precious and base metals in Ireland and overseas, announced proposals for a
fund raising together with a capital reorganisation and a reduction of
capital.
The company is to raise Pounds 150,000 net by way of an open offer of
15,872,600 new ordinary shares at 1p each on the basis of two new shares for
each share held.
Any shares not taken up will be placed on the market on a 'best endeavours'
basis by MMI Stockbrokers.
To permit the offer to proceed, a capital restructuring is necessary and a
new class of shares with a par value below that of the existing ordinary 10p
shares is to be issued.
This means a reduction of Dana's share capital by IPounds 714,267.
Hardman Resources and Tolltrek Systems now own 58.77 per cent of Dana
following an offer for Dana in August.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-608</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Hope for Polly Peck Cypriot settlement
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Michael Jordan, an administrator of Polly Peck International yesterday
expressed hope of a settlement next year on the assets of the collapsed
conglomerate in the Turkish part of Cyprus.
'We hope there will be in early 1993 a resolution on Polly Peck's problems
here,' he said after meeting for the first time Mr Salih Cosar, the Turkish
Cypriot finance minister.
Turkish Cypriot authorities had refused to put the assets of Polly Peck and
its founder Mr Asil Nadir, originally a Turkish Cypriot, on the selling
block, after Mr Nadir's empire collapsed in 1990.
Polly Peck's properties include two hotels in north Cyprus, its Sunzest
citrus packing unit and Uni-Pack, a cardboard box manufacturer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-609</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Brake Bros placing to raise Pounds 8.7m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BRAKE BROS, a supplier of frozen foods to the catering trade, is placing
2.29m new ordinary 10p shares at 380p each to raise Pounds 8.7m net. The
funds will be used for the continuing development and further expansion of
the business.
The new ordinary shares - representing a 5 per cent increase in Brake Bros'
equity - have been placed by UBS Phillips &amp; Drew. Dealings are expected to
commence on December 30.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-610</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Breaking tradition with a new concept -
Peggy Hollinger reports on Era Group's move into the home entertainment
field
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LITTLE did Tony Fay know as he wended his weary way home one Friday night
last month, that the small hobby and games company of which he is chairman
was about to attract some serious attention from the City. In the space of
seven days the share price of Era Group, the specialist retailer, jumped 85
per cent - for no apparent reason.
After a bit of sleuthing, the board came to the conclusion that
pre-Christmas press coverage of the home entertainment sector had sparked
interest in the shares. They now stand at 23p, compared with 13p in
November.
Long-time shareholders in Era Group, owner of Beatties, Tecno and the toy
and model distribution business, Kohnstam, are likely to welcome this little
bit of Christmas cheer. For almost three years, the shares have languished
at significantly less than half a 1988 high of 91p.
However, the company's management hopes that the most recent price movements
might be the justification they have long sought for their revamped
retailing strategy.
Era, best known for its traditional model and toys business, Beatties, aims
to tap into the potential of the home entertainment market with the
recently-launched Virtual Reality brand name.
The company hopes to carve out a niche in the sale of the most advanced
computer and console games, as well as the latest technology in interactive
compact disc and video equipment. Space is being allocated - and
appropriately stocked for either young or old customers - in both Beatties
and Tecno, the up-market camera and video retailer for the Virtual Reality
concept.
Mr David Henley, chairman of the retail division, says the brand strategy
should put Era in a prime position to sell the actual virtual reality
products - interactive computer worlds seen through a helmet - when they
come to Britain in 1995. Eventually, the con-cept could even be used to
launch a new retail chain.
Mr Henley, who has been with Beatties since the 1960s, explains the logic
behind the strategy. 'The key is not to lose the thing you are good at, but
to develop early enough the things that are coming next,' he says, citing
the development of Beatties from second-hand model railway merchant to mass
market toy and hobby retailer.
For him, and the board, the retail businesses had an obvious link in the
potential for domestic electronic games.
The strategic switch is the latest chapter in a corporate history which has
been anything but calm. In the five years since it was transformed by
acquisitions from a shell company to specialist retailer, Era has had three
different managements.
The most recent board, chaired by Mr Anthony Fay, took over in April 1990
following an acrimonious annual general meeting and the unexpected exit of
the controversial Mr Murray Gordon as chairman.
There is little love lost between Era's present management and its
predecessors. For the past two years, Mr Fay and his team have been
struggling to recover from the fiasco of the loss-making Lexterten furniture
business, which left the group with a crippling debt and a precarious
relationship with its bankers. Lexterten alone had been responsible for the
group's sharp drop in profits from Pounds 4.6m to Pounds 631,000 in 1989.
The sale of Lexterten, for the nominal sum of Pounds 1, in 1990 ended up
costing Era Group a grand total of Pounds 7m, according to Mr Fay. However,
he maintains the bad times are now largely behind the company.
Costs have been cut substantially and Era now operates on a just-in-time
basis - ie, without warehouses  - for its 99 retailing outlets. Era has also
successfully re-established its relationship with its bankers, Barclays,
although average gearing is still high at more than 100 per cent.
For the first time since 1990, Mr Fay says, the board has been able to sit
back and work on a strategy for its three divisions.
Industry observers and analysts are less convinced that the group will be
able to make its new strategy work. 'They have got it right,' says Jeremy
Allen of Kleinwort Benson, 'but they are still bearing the legacy of the
difficult years, in the form of a balance sheet with too much debt.'
Others, such as Mr Jim Douglas, editor of GamesMaster magazine, cite the
aggressive programme at Dixons, which has devoted space in an estimated 250
stores to computer games, compared with Era's 80 stores with Virtual Reality
branding. Dixons and Currys together dominate the Pounds 500m-a-year
computer games market, and being far larger, have much greater buying power,
he says.
Some analysts wonder whether the new strategy is different enough in a
highly competitive market. 'Will it attract a sufficient number of people to
walk through the door?' asks Mr Richard Hickinbotham of SG Warburgs.
Messrs Fay and Henley reject the criticisms. They are horrified by
comparisons with their bigger rivals, claiming they do not compete with
Dixons or Currys. Era's strength will be a highly-trained staff, they say,
and more advanced products.
Mr Henley adds that the group is selling a concept which will take time to
bear fruit. 'We are trying to sell the concept, not of games for today, but
of games for tomorrow,' he says.
On one thing the analysts and management agree. Profits are expected to fall
further in the current year, which ends on December 31. Forecasts range from
Pounds 700,000 to Pounds 1.7m, against Pounds 2.17m a year earlier, but all
depends on the crucial Christmas period when Era makes some 30 per cent of
its annual sales. The evidence so far points to a patchy performance.
Finally, there is the question of just how the company will bring down its
debt and fund any expansion. A rights issue alone while the shares are so
low - even after the recent rally  - is unlikely, according to Mr Allen of
Kleinwort Benson. 'I would have thought they might wait for something more
positive to add a rights issue to such as an acquisition.'
Mr Fay is suitably coy about tackling a new purchase, although he will not
rule out the possibility of a move in the UK. 'There are lots of expansion
prospects,' he says. 'But you need cash, location and the management
resource.' Era, he adds, to enhance all three 'as we go along'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-611</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Christie's follows rival and lifts charges
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CHRISTIES International, the fine art auctioneer, has followed its rival
Sotheby's in increasing the premium it charges buyers at its sales from 10
to 15 per cent from March 1 1993.
The new charge will apply to the first Pounds 30,000 of the hammer price on
any lot. Above Pounds 30,000 the 10 per cent rate will continue to be
levied.
Christie's South Kensington and Christie's Scotland, which between them
account for 64 per cent of the lots the group sells in the UK, will retain
the 10 per cent charge, as will coin and wine auctions at the main King
Street saleroom.
The art market is recovering from the recession more slowly than both
Sotheby's and Christie's anticipated: hence the need to raise their charges
to buyers.
At the same time the fierce competition between the two houses for major
properties to sell has forced them to reduce the commission they charge
important vendors.
In 1992 Christie's further closed the gap on market leader Sotheby's.
Sotheby's reported year-end sales figures of Dollars 1.13bn (Pounds 674m)
yesterday, a rise of 2 per cent in dollar terms and 5.5 per cent in sterling
over 1991. Christie's did relatively better. Its annual turnover of Pounds
631m (Dollars 959.1m) represented a 2 per cent im-provement in dollar terms
and 8 per cent in sterling. (The auction houses use slightly different
currency valuations). It seems the 1991 balance of 52:48 in favour of
Sotheby's has changed slightly to 51.5:48.5.
Christie's had a better autumn season with sales at Pounds 312m (Dollars
488m), up 17 per cent in sterling but only 4 per cent in dollars following
October's devaluation of sterling. In dollar terms Sotheby's autumn figures
were down by 3 per cent at Dollars 495.4m, although translated into sterling
at Pounds 318m, they were up 10 per cent.
Both salerooms have shed staff in the past week. Mr Christopher Davidge,
Christie's managing director, reported that since 1990 costs have been cut
back by Pounds 32m, or 24 per cent, with 300, or 20 per cent, of the group's
jobs going in the same period.
The market is improving, but very slowly, with sellers in particular
reluctant to offer good objects at auction. Sotheby's reports that it sold
70 works of art for more than Dollars 1m this year as against 51 in 1991.
Christie's broke the Dollars 1m barrier 69 times in 1992 compared with 61 in
1991, and 38 times in the autumn season compared with 34 in 1991. For the
fourth successive season it sold the most expensive work of art at auction,
the Dollars 14.5m (Pounds 9.6m) paid in New York for Harmionie Jaune by
Matisse.
The salerooms' decision to increase their income from buyers is a gamble. It
offers an opportunity for dealers, who are pricing their works of art more
competitively, to regain some of the ground they have lost to the auction
houses in recent years.
Among the smaller London salerooms Phillips saw its turnover fall by 11 per
cent in 1992, to Pounds 80.8m and Bonhams had its best year ever, with sales
of Pounds 22.5m, a gain of 22 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-612</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Provision arrests Border TV
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MATTHEW CURTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BORDER Television, the Carlisle-based regional ITV station, reported a small
improvement in pre-tax profit, from Pounds 509,000 to Pounds 519,000, in the
half year to October 31.
However, Mr Peter Brownlow, finance director, warned that the company might
not match last year's full-year performance, when pre-tax profit jumped 40
per cent to Pounds 1.22m. In spite of successful cost-cutting, the company
faced a shrinking advertising pie.
Turnover was unchanged at Pounds 5.9m with a 4 per increase in advertising
revenue offset by lower programme sales.
Pre-tax profit was reduced by a Pounds 385,000 exceptional provision for
retrenchment costs, stemming from the 20 per cut in staff announced in
September. That followed the decision by Border and Granada to link their
transmission and sales operations.
Mr Brownlow envisaged Border striking up a range of 'cost-saving alliances'
with other franchise holders in the north of England.
Mr Melvyn Bragg, chairman, said Border would continue to invest in local
radio. The location of Carlisle Radio - Border has a 20 per cent interest in
the consortium which successfully tendered for the franchise this year - at
the company's headquarters had created 'a true broadcast centre'.
Earnings per share were 3.4p (3.3p). The interim dividend is increased from
1.1p to 1.3p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-613</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Pilkington takes stake in Pounds 110m
Polish project
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PILKINGTON, the glass maker, has signed a joint venture agreement to build a
float glass plant in Poland. The deal, which has been under negotiation for
18 months, will give it a 40 per cent equity stake in the Dollars 171.5m
(Pounds 110m) project.
The new company Pilkington Sandoglass, will take the state owned glass plant
at Sandomierz giving the Polish state treasury a 30 per cent equity stake in
return.
The company will build a new float plant with an annual design capacity of
140,000 tonnes adjacent to the existing plant which can produce 106,000
tonnes a year of sheet glass.
Mr Andrew Robb, Pilkington's finance director, said its equity investment
will be largely repaid within a year by fees for technology and equipment as
it provides the expertise to build and operate the plant.
Pilkington Sandoglass will have equity of Dollars 64.2m and borrowings of
Dollars 107.3m. The International Finance Corporation, part of the World
Bank, will provide Dollars 33.3m of debt finance, will syndicate another
Dollars 24.5m, and also take a 15 per cent equity stake. The European Bank
for Reconstruction and Development is putting in Dollars 34m of debt and
taking another 15 per cent stake. The Polish Development Bank is lending
Dollars 15.5m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-614</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Bula to raise IPounds 10m via offer
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Bula Resources, the oil and gas exploration group, is to raise up to IPounds
10.7m (Pounds 11.55m) via an open offer of up to 1.08bn new shares at 1p
each on a 2-for-1 basis. The target minimum amount to be raised is IPounds
800,000.
Qualifying shareholders may apply for any number of open offer shares.
Proposals to sub-divide and convert the ordinary 2.5p shares into 1p
ordinary and 1.5p deferred shares will be put to shareholders at an
extraordinary meeting.
The interim results for the six months to June 30 showed there was a net
profit of IPounds 31,000, compared with IPounds 34,000 last time. Turnover
was down from IPounds 1.23m to IPounds 913,000. Earnings were little changed
at 0.006p (0.007p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-615</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Asprey and Mallett take first step towards
merger
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TWO OF London's oldest and most respected firms of antique dealers are
taking the first steps towards a merger.
USM-quoted Asprey, of 163 New Bond Street, best known as a silver,
jewellery, and luxury goods specialist, has acquired a 6.8 per cent stake in
Mallett, the English furniture dealer based at 40 New Bond Street.
Asprey is run by Mr Naim Attallah, who is building up a small conglomerate
of companies trading in up-market accessories. In the past year Asprey has
acquired Watches of Switzerland from Ratners for Pounds 23.2m and Hamilton &amp;
Inches, the Edinburgh-based silversmiths, for Pounds 1.3m. It also owns
Garrards and Mappin &amp; Webb.
Negotiations are in a very early stage but Mallett does not seem opposed to
a full bid. 'We look favourably on people who are going to improve our share
value,' said the company yesterday.
Started in Bath 125 years ago, Mallett has been in Bond Street since 1908.
Mallett of Bourdon House, an associate company, operates nearby in Davies
Street and specialises in continental furniture and decorative objects.
In 1991 Mallett acquired Christopher Wood, one of London's leading dealers
in Victorian art. Wood's stock of pictures now occupies two of Mallett's
five floors in Bond Street.
As a furniture dealer Mallett has not suffered as badly during the recession
as dealers in paintings, but its 1991 turnover of Pounds 8.39m and net
profit of Pounds 200,000 compared with Pounds 14.6m and Pounds 1.56m
respectively in 1990. Mallett incurred a small loss in the first half of
1992. Its stocks are valued at Pounds 11.8m.
Along with Partridge, its Bond Street neighbour, Mallett is regarded as the
leading dealer in antique furniture in the UK. Both Asprey and Mallett are
stressing that negotiations have barely started but Mallett would certainly
fit neatly into Mr Attallah'sprogramme of luxury acquisitions.
Mallett's shares rose 19p to 73p yesterday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-616</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: C3W seeks withdrawal of HTV's licence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
One of the unsuccessful bidders for the Wales and the West ITV franchise has
formally called on the Independent Television Commission to revoke HTV's
licence.
C3W which passed the quality threshold but was outbid by HTV sent the formal
application to Sir George Russell, the ITC chairman, on the grounds that HTV
would not be able to fulfil its programming obligations. The new franchise
period starts on January 1.
HTV bid Pounds 20.5m a year to retain its broadcasting licence and like most
ITV companies has been hit by the recession. It has also been suffering from
a drift of advertising to London and the south.
C3W is backed by Associated Newspapers and Flextech, the cable television
companies. The consortium has also been recently joined by Chrysalis, the
independent record and broadcasting group.
Earlier this year White Rose Television made a similar move against
Yorkshire but it was thrown out by the ITC.
The ITC is likely to take a similarly robust view of the C3W attack on HTV.
ITC officials believe that according to broadcasting legislation a company
only has to have its business plan passed once by the ITC.
An existing ITV company is already proving that it is capable of
broadcasting and that it is only when it has actually failed to fulfil its
programme obligations that the ITC would move against it. The ITC has the
power to impose fines, reduce the length of a company's franchise and even
remove the licence.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-617</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Thorn sale helps Chrysalis return to black
with Pounds 5.6m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A PROFITABLE exit from a joint venture with Thorn-EMI helped Chrysalis, the
music publishing, communications and media company, return to the black with
pre-tax profits of Pounds 5.63m for the year to August 31, against losses of
Pounds 9.33m.
The result, struck on sales 3 per cent lower at Pounds 65.9m, was enhanced
by the Pounds 9.65m net profit on discontinued activities, taken above the
line. This included the Pounds 11.58m profit from the sale of the company's
stake in Chrysalis Record Companies, to Thorn in November 1991.
Mr Nigel Butterfield, finance director, said that at the operating level,
the company recorded a loss of about Pounds 4.8m. The group again passed the
dividend, which has not been paid since 1989-90. Earnings per share of
26.02p compared with losses of 30.06p.
Worsening conditions in MAM, Chrysalis's fruit machines subsidiary and the
costs of investing in existing businesses were the main reasons behind the
operating losses, said Mr Butterfield. Fruit machines incurred losses of
Pounds 1.8m (Pounds 1.1m) and this business was expected to suffer
substantial losses this year.
Music publishing profits dived from Pounds 1m to Pounds 250,000, due to the
investment of more than Pounds 1m in signing new talent. Recent names
included the Smashing Pumpkins, who have several hits in the US, and the
Sugar Merchants in the UK.
Higher operating costs hit wholesale exports, which fell by Pounds 200,000
to Pounds 500,000.
All other on-going business incurred deeper losses, except property, which
cut its deficit by Pounds 700,000 to Pounds 300,000. However, Mr Butterfield
said that the media businesses had 'turned round profits' in the current
year. Excluding the fruit machine businesses, the group was capable of
achieving healthy profits, he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-618</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Treatment of repurchasing debt - Andrew
Jack discusses the effect of a new accounting rule
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE battle lines are drawn over a prospective new accounting rule which
could force several prominent British companies to take as a charge in their
current financial year many millions of pounds spent in repurchasing debt.
The principal companies affected immediately will be the privatised
utilities which successfully took part in the government debt auction last
November: British Telecom, Scottish Power, PowerGen and Scottish Hydro.
At stake is a mooted ruling from the urgent issues task force of the
Accounting Standards Board, which could be published and enforced as early
as next spring.
The decision has not yet been finalised, but the task force says the
preliminary view of a majority of its members is that any gain or loss to a
company on the repurchase of its own debt should be recognised immediately.
The alternative view - already adopted and defended by some companies - is
to defer these items and recognise them over the period of the loan.
Scottish Hydro-Electric has already publicly announced that it intends to
adopt the former approach. The company bought back from the government
Pounds 116m in 11.5 per cent debt redeemable in 2001, using cash and some
short-term borrowings.
It will show a redemption charge in its accounts for the year to March 31
next year of Pounds 12.5m. That cost will be offset by an estimated saving
in interest payments of Pounds 1m for the current year and Pounds 4m a year
thereafter. There will also be the impact of the short-term borrowings it
used on the repurchase, which are currently estimated at about Pounds 20m.
'It would be more of a nuisance value to keep writing off the debt each
year,' says Mr John Gray, finance director. 'It's better to take a big hit
now while it is flagged and fresh in the minds of analysts. It's nice to
clean these issues up.'
That is a view shared by Mr John Rennocks, finance director of Powergen,
which bought back Pounds 150m 11.9 per cent debt at a premium of Pounds 19m.
'I think this is the most sensible and reasonable solution,' he says.
Mr Ray Hinton, technical partner at Arthur Andersen and a member of the task
force, echoes these views. He says the argument works on two levels.
Intellectually, the ASB's statement of principles says an asset is a right
or access to future economic benefits. The gains or loss on repurchase of
debt would not qualify. Intuitively, he says: 'People didn't feel
comfortable with taking the gains or losses on one type of transaction and
pitching it on to another.'
To have reached its preliminary view, only two task force members could have
voted against. Most are strongly minded to support the move when they meet
again in January. It could then come into force almost at once.
But Mr Duncan Whyte, finance director of Scottish Power, takes the
alternative view. 'We have made it very clear we will write off the debt
over the period it was redeemable,' he says. 'To do otherwise would be
inconsistent and lead to distortion of earnings.'
He stresses that this is not a short-term, self-serving solution. PowerGen
has already adopted the practice as part of its declared accounting
policies, and used it in a previous repurchase of about Pounds 13m in debt
from the National Loan Fund. Had it adopted the task force's approach rather
than amortising the gains, it would have boosted short-term earnings.
But with a financial year-end in March, it may be forced to change its
approach to comply with the new ruling. That will mean showing the Pounds
18m premium on the profit and loss account, offset by about Pounds 4m a year
in saved interest payments assuming interest of 7 per cent.
Meanwhile, British Telecom has yet to make up its mind. It bought back
Pounds 320m in the government debt auction at 12.25 per cent, some
redeemable in 2000 and the rest in 2002. That incurred a premium believed to
be about Pounds 55m.
There is a wider significance to the task force's statement last week.
First, it represents an attempt to ensure that preparers of accounts are
notified well in advance to give time for consultation. That follows anger
from companies that they were caught by surprise by a ruling a year ago on
the treatment of goodwill on the disposal of acquisitions.
Second, debt repurchase is one of the first issues on which the task force
has been used as a sounding board for a prospective accounting treatment.
This is in line with a plea earlier this month by Sir Ron Dearing, chairman
of the Financial Reporting Council, the ASB's parent body, who wants to get
away from the practice of the task force reacting to unusual treatments
already produced in published accounts.
Scottish Hydro approached the task force over the summer to ask how it
should deal with the repurchase of its debt. It - and particularly the other
utilities - will watch the final task force ruling with great interest.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-619</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: US Smaller raising Pounds 40m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
US SMALLER Companies Investment Trust, which floated on the main market in
1991, is raising another Pounds 40m via a placing and open offer.
The trust is managed by Wellington Management International, part of the US
investment group Wellington, and its share price has performed well since
launch. Shares were trading at 129p yesterday morning, compared to a launch
price of 100p and the warrants (initially offered on a one-for-five basis)
were trading at 64p. The prices were unchanged on the day
Shares in the trust were trading at a small premium to net assets yesterday
morning, traditionally a necessary condition for an investment trust to
raise new equity capital.
The placing, is in the form of 100p units which will be convertible into
shares and warrants at a price equivalent to asset value on January 15.
Holders will be entitled to new units on a two-for-five basis.
The trust said that the additional funds 'will enable the company to invest
in a cost-effective manner in a greater number of US smaller companies
without reducing the size of its individual holdings.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-620</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Rescue plan proposed for Upton &amp; Southern
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A RESCUE reconstruction has been proposed at Upton &amp; Southern Holdings, the
Middlesbrough-based department store and property group. A new management
team, headed by Mr James Hodkinson, a director of Kingfisher, the retail
conglomerate, is also planned.
USH lost Pounds 2.86m before tax in the financial year to end-January. The
balance sheet showed negative net worth of Pounds 500,000 and the accounts
were qualified. It owes the Bank of Scotland Pounds 5.9m.
The bank has agreed to a reconstruction involving Pounds 1.5m of the debt
being turned into convertible preference shares, a Pounds 3m sale and
leaseback of freeholds, a Pounds 375,000 write off of accrued interest
leaving the group with a term loan of Pounds 800,000.
USH also aims to raise Pounds 785,000 through a firm placing of 65m shares
and an open offer of 36m shares at 1p a share, which will be roughly equal
to net asset value after the reconstruction. The shares, traded on the Stock
Exchange's new SEATS system, stood at 5p yesterday.
Mr Hodkinson will become a non-executive chairman, and Mr Jeffrey Gould,
ex-managing director of the John Kent chain, will be chief executive. Of the
existing board only Mr John Upton will remain. Mr Ian Steven, who was
finance director of A Goldberg, a Scottish retailer which went into
receivership, will be a non-executive director.
Directors will apply for 8.25m of the shares and the new directors and
associates will subscribe for 9.75m, giving a combined stake of 16.4 per
cent.
Mr Gould said the group had been dragged down by its property side, but that
the retail business was fundamentally sound. He said that with annual sales
of Pounds 12m and after the capital reconstruction, the group was large
enough and had the cash to be turned round.
However, looking ahead, he said 'it is not our intention to run a group with
Pounds 12m of sales' hinting at acquisitions and expansion.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-621</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Companies in this issue
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -------------------------------
UK
 -------------------------------
Abbey Panels               15
Albrighton                 14
Asprey                     14
BA                         13
BICC                        5
Batleys                    15
Berlitz                    14
Border TV                  14
Brake Bros                 15
British Airways             1
British Telecom            13
C3W                        14
Capita                     15
Christies Intl             14
Chrysalis                  14
Dana Exploration           15
Debenhams                   5
Era Group                  15
Estate Design &amp; Mngt       15
F&amp;C Smaller Cos            15
GEC Alsthom                12
GUS                         6
HTV                    14, 15
I&amp;S Optimum                15
Inchcape                   15
Kingfisher                 14
Kynoch Group               15
MCC                        14
Mallett                    14
Minstergate                15
National Power              4
Pilkington                 14
Polly Peck                 15
PowerGen                    4
Standard Chartered         13
TI                          6
Tarmac                     14
Thorn-EMI                  14
Trilion                    15
US Smaller Cos             14
Upton &amp; Southern           14
Wardell Roberts            15
 -------------------------------
Overseas
 -------------------------------
A&amp;P                        18
Ambroveneto                16
Amoy Properties            18
BTR Nylex                  18
Bula Resources             14
Ciments Francais           16
DCC                        15
Delta Air Lines            18
EdF                         1
Elec de France              4
Finmeccanica               16
General Electric           12
General Motors         12, 18
Grupo Liverpool            18
Hasbro                     13
IRI                        16
K mart                     18
Kukutake                   14
Lan-Chile                  18
Mattel                     13
Nordbanken                 16
PT Astra Intl              18
Printemps                  16
Telecom Eireann             6
Toyota                     18
UBS                        16
USAir                   1, 13
Volkswagen                 18
 -------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-622</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / BT may have to write off Pounds 55m against profits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH TELECOM may be forced to write off Pounds 55m against current year
profits for premiums on the repurchase of government debt, under a proposed
ruling expected early next year from the Accounting Standards Board.
Three of the regional electricity companies are also likely to have to
account for the costs of repurchasing debt totalling Pounds 50m between them
in their current financial years.
The treatment is expected to be required under a ruling from the urgent
issues task force of the Accounting Standards Board, which could be
effective by early next year. But it is opposed by Scottish Power.
The task force warned last week that it plans to ask all companies to
recognise immediately the gains or losses when they repurchase debt. Up till
now, companies have been able to write off these costs or benefits over the
life of the original debt.
The issue came into focus as a result of the government debt auction in
November, at which four of the privatised utilities bought back their debt
to reduce borrowing costs. The premiums were due on December 15.
British Telecom said it has not yet decided how to treat the costs of
repurchasing two tranches of government debt totalling Pounds 320m, believed
to total about Pounds 55m. Scottish Hydro-Electric announced earlier this
month that it intended to show the full cost of the repurchase of Pounds
116m in debt in its accounts for the year to March 31 1993. That will result
in a redemption charge of Pounds 12.5m, offset by annual savings in interest
payments of Pounds 4m.
Mr John Rennocks, finance director of Powergen, said yesterday that his
company had also decided to adopt this treatment. But Mr Donald Whyte,
finance director of Scottish Power, said that it had already adopted a
policy of longer-term write-off. He stressed that this treatment did not
simply boost short-term profits and had reduced short-term gains from a
repurchase of debt from the National Loan Fund.
The company paid a premium of Pounds 18m buying back Pounds 142m of the debt
in the most recent auction, which will be offset by annual interest savings
of between Pounds 2.5m and Pounds 4m at current rates.
'We have made it very clear we will write off the debt over the period it
was redeemable,' he said. 'To do otherwise would be inconsistent and lead to
distortion of earnings. Obviously we would give our views if asked and we
might consider given our views even if not.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-623</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Bank property sales net Pounds 200m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT PESTON, Banking Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STANDARD Chartered has raised Pounds 200m from a series of property sales in
Hong Kong, Malaysia and Singapore.
The properties, which include its Hong Kong headquarters and several
branches, cost the bank only Pounds 13m and were valued in its balance sheet
at Pounds 77m. It has owned many of them for decades.
Mr Rodney Galpin, the chairman, who is due to retire next year, said the
sales were carried out as part of the bank's strategy of concentrating on
its international banking businesses. They followed the sales at the end of
1989 of the bank's London headquarters and its Singapore office block for a
total of Pounds 403m.
The largest of the latest disposals is of Standard's interest in its Hong
Kong headquarters building - which cost the bank Pounds 2m - to Amoy
Properties for Pounds 74m.
Last week, it announced the disposal of 13 Hong Kong commercial buildings,
occupied by branches, to Koon Wah for Pounds 64m.
A number of residential, commercial and investment properties in Singapore
and Malaysia are also being sold. Some date from Standard Chartered's
beginnings in UK colonial banking before the First World War.
The sales mean that some of the company's Asian operations will now have to
pay rent on the premises they occupy. However, a Standard executive said
that in 1993 the bank would earn more from investing the sale proceeds than
it would be paying in new rents.
The deals will also lead to a Pounds 180m increase in the bank's tier one or
core capital, a measure of balance sheet strength.
Standard Chartered shares rose from 544p to 568p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-624</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Heavy weather for BA's ambitious global strategy: Paul Betts
and Nikki Tait on why the airline's proposed partnership with USAir was
grounded
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS and NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH AIRWAYS has fulfilled two of its three strategic goals this year to
become the world's biggest global airline. But the most significant
component of this strategy collapsed yesterday when the UK flag carrier
announced it was pulling out of its proposed Dollars 750m (Pounds 493m) deal
to buy a 44 per cent stake in USAir, the sixth largest US carrier.
Last week, BA was chosen by the Australian government as the preferred
international airline partner for Qantas. Earlier this year, BA consolidated
its position in the European market by acquiring Dan-Air, the ailing UK
regional carrier, taking large minority stakes in TAT, a French regional
carrier, and in a new German airline venture called Deutsche BA. In Russia,
it launched a new international joint airline venture with Aeroflot called
Air Russia.
But the biggest prize was always a partnership with a US airline to
strengthen BA's reach into the world's single biggest aviation market. After
failing two years ago to forge a strategic alliance with United Airlines, BA
last year sought to form a strategic alliance with KLM Royal Dutch Airlines
and Northwest Airlines, KLM's US equity partner. That deal also collapsed
and BA turned its attention to USAir.
For USAir, BA provided a financially strong partner giving it access to the
international market. For BA, USAir provided the passenger feed it was
looking for to boost its transatlantic operations.
The pressure to secure a ally in the US had been increasing for BA following
the takeover of the old Pan American and TWA transatlantic routes two years
ago by the big three US carriers American Airlines, United Airlines and
Delta Air Lines. Since their multi-million dollar route acquisitions, these
three airlines have launched an aggressive offensive into the European
market. But suddenly faced with a direct challenge by BA into their own back
yard, they ganged together to put intense pressure on their government to
block the BA-USAir deal unless they were granted greater access into the UK
market, especially BA's home base of Heathrow.
Lord King, BA's chairman, and Sir Colin Marshall, the UK airline's chief
executive, argued strongly against any further opening of Heathrow to US
carriers unless the US government eased its tight regulations on foreign
ownership of US airlines and granted UK carriers more access into the US
market.
The deadlock intensified with neither side prepared to give ground on the
basic issue: greater access to Heathrow for US carriers in exchange for the
BA investment in USAir.
However, the UK carrier has not given up the possibility of negotiating a
revised deal with USAir in the New Year.
If the collapse of the deal is a strategic set-back for the British carrier,
it presents a more immediate problem for the US one. Quite simply, USAir
could have used the cash.
Ever since the BA proposal was announced last July, USAir has walked a
lobbyist's tightrope. On the one hand, it has proffered its ailing financial
condition and the fear of future job losses as reason for politicians to
support the BA transaction. On the other, it has been anxious not to alarm
the financial community, nor US travellers who have grown wary of distressed
airlines.
But USAir's financial statements show that between the beginning of 1990 and
the end of September, 1992, the company lost almost Dollars 1bn after tax.
It is also carrying around Dollars 2bn-worth of long-term debt on its
balance sheet - in part, the product of operationally-troublesome mergers
with Pacific Southwest Airlines and then Piedmont Aviation in the
late-1980s. These borrowings cost over Dollars 200m a year to service, while
USAir last made an operating profit - a flimsy Dollars 21m  - in 1989.
So how has the Arlington-based carrier stayed afloat? Like many of its
competitors, USAir has become adept at collaterising assets and rescheduling
aircraft deliveries. The carrier has also held a series of negotiations with
its bankers.
More fundamentally, however, USAir has reorganised its flight schedules,
pulled out of some Californian markets, and wound down its presence at the
former Dayton, Ohio, hub. It has secured wage concessions from its main
employees - flight attendants excepted  - said to be worth Dollars 400m a
year.
Whether the overall result of these moves adds up to profits in 1993 - let
alone profits which meet the debt service requirements - depends to a
considerable extent on the business environment which the carrier faces.
This looks a little brighter on the back of the improving US economy, but a
year ago, few would have predicted the savagery with which price-cutting
gripped the industry in 1992.
'I don't think there's a short-term crisis right around the corner, but the
environment is still very difficult,' said Mr Robert Ray at Moody's, the US
credit rating agency, which now has USAir debt ratings under review with
direction 'uncertain'.
What appears clear is that USAir does not intend to remain a regional
carrier. And since the company's main attraction is its strong East
Coast-based route network, a Transatlantic partner is the obvious fit.
As for BA's own future, it clearly intends to try once more to forge a
working partnership with a US carrier to complete its global strategy.
If USAir remains elusive, the UK carrier is likely to scour the US for
another suitable match. The list of candidates, however, is becoming
worryingly short.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-625</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Big Six accounts groups lift fee income
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE WORLD'S largest six international accountancy networks boosted fee
income 6 per cent to Dollars 31bn (Pounds 20bn) in the last year, according
to figures to be published today by International Accounting Bulletin.
KPMG Peat Marwick topped the list with income from 124 affiliated firms up
2.3 per cent to Dollars 6.2bn in the year to September 30, while it reduced
staff and partner numbers by 4 per cent to 73,488.
The remaining Big Six firms - in descending order by fee income  - were
Ernst &amp; Young, Arthur Andersen, Coopers &amp; Lybrand, Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu
and Price Waterhouse.
With the exception of Arthur Andersen, most of the international networks
are loosely integrated associations of firms which share referrals but not
profits or liabilities.
Because they are partnerships, none publishes profit figures.
In spite of reduced staff numbers and the prolonged effects of the global
recession, fee income for the leading 28 networks rose by 11 per cent,
comparable with the previous year.
Andersen reported fee income up 12.7 per cent to Dollars 5.6bn in the year
to August 31, and was one of very few firms to increase staff from 59,797 to
62,134.
Kreston International boosted fee income 34 per cent to Dollars 189m, Clark
Kenneth Leventhal by 23 per cent to Dollars 487m, and Nexia International by
19 per cent to Dollars 483m.
Much of this growth came through the addition of new members to the networks
of the firms.
Only one network - GMN International  - reported a decline, with income down
0.6 per cent to Dollars 165m.
The 28 international accountancy networks listed generated fee income of
nearly Dollars 41bn in the latest financial year.
But the figures in the report, published by the Lafferty business
information group, illustrate the continued dominance of the leading 'Big
Six' accountancy networks.
The top six firms reported income of Dollars 31bn in their most recent year,
with a substantial jump from the seventh largest, BDO Binder Hamlyn, at
Dollars 1.2bn to the sixth, Price Waterhouse, at Dollars 3.8bn.
Total employment across the 28 networks was about 500,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-626</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / GM suppliers face big fines for faulty parts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COMPONENT suppliers to General Motors' Saturn cars subsidiary in the US face
fines at a rate of Dollars 500 (Pounds 325) for every minute of production
lost through defective or mislabelled parts.
The sanction is set out in a letter to all suppliers to the Spring Hill,
Tennessee, plant which makes GM's Saturn range.
Signed jointly by Mr Alec Bedricky, vice-president of purchasing and
supplier quality, and United Auto Workers co-ordinator Mr Jerry Childers, it
represents one of the starkest examples to date of the pressures now on GM -
and its determination to regain competitiveness against Japanese rivals.
The confidential letter, a copy of which was sent to the specialist Detroit
publication Automotive News, says the fine will be invoked for any
production stoppage caused by a missed just-in-time delivery, under-supply
of components or materials relative to pre-agreed schedules, or sub-quality
or mislabelled parts.
'Saturn has chosen to apply a flat rate of Dollars 500 per minute of lost
production,' the letter says.
The penalising of suppliers for production disruptions is not unknown in
North America or Europe, but in the past these penalties have tended to be
negotiated individually. A more formal system could set a precedent for the
industry.
GM refused to comment on the letter and would not say whether any penalties
had been imposed since the fines regime came into effect on November 1.
The Saturn plant is GM's Dollars 14bn 'showcase' venture to demonstrate that
it is capable of meeting Japanese rivals head-to-head on quality and costs.
GM considers extending Toyota alliance, Page 18
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-627</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Garel-Jones to resign as minister for Europe: PM's close
ally to see Maastricht bill through
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Tristan Garel-Jones, the foreign office minister for Europe who has
played a central role in heading off Tory Euro-sceptics' attacks on the
Maastricht treaty, is to resign next year.
He announced his unexpected decision last night, telling Mr John Major, the
prime minister, in a letter: 'You have known for some time that I hanker
after a change.' His decision is a setback for Mr Major who has suffered a
bruising parliamentary session since April's election.
Mr Garel-Jones is expert on the contents of the Maastricht treaty and, from
his past job as a government whip, on tactics for its ratification by
parliament. However, he will remain in office until the bill has completed
its Commons' stages - probably in late spring.
Whitehall colleagues and officials were adamant last night that Mr
Garel-Jones was genuine in his wish to pursue other interests. In his
letter, he wrote: 'I want to spend more time at home and in my constituency.
I also hope to resume some of my personal interests - even perhaps buy some
more pictures.'
Before joining the Foreign Office in 1990 he was a government whip for eight
years, often working gruelling hours. He remains MP for Watford.
For anti-Maastricht MPs his decision was not a cause for regret. Mr Bill
Cash, Tory MP for Stafford, said Mr Garel-Jones was a 'formidable
adversary'.
The timing of the announcement suggests that Mr Garel-Jones, who appeared
unlikely to secure one of the top Cabinet jobs, wanted to make clear his
determination to step down. It reinforced signals from Downing Street that
no reshuffle of Cabinet or other ministerial posts is imminent.
Mr Garel-Jones told the prime minister in 1991 that he wanted to return to
the backbenches after the general election, but was persuaded to stay for
Britain's European Community presidency and the buildup to the Edinburgh EC
summit.
Replying to Mr Garel-Jones, Mr Major said: 'Your contribution at the Foreign
Office, especially during the British presidency, has been immense, and
played a considerable part in the outcome at Edinburgh last week.'
Mr Garel-Jones has a low public profile, but is a close political ally of Mr
Major.
In the past year, Mr Major has seen two other allies leave Whitehall - Mr
Chris Patten, now governor of Hong Kong, and Mr David Mellor, former
National Heritage secretary.
Major's 'Mr Fixit', Page 4
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-628</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Christie's
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Christie's confirmation of faint stirrings in the art market comes as a
considerable relief to the hard-pressed auction house, but it may have a
wider significance too. Increased demand for pretty pictures adds to the
impression that the investing classes are finally recovering their nerve.
Although modest, Christie's 4 per cent improvement in dollar-denominated
sales in the autumn season shows the serious art market is at last heading
in the right direction. The number of lots topping Dollars 1m rose from 34
to 38, with a sale of impressionist paintings in New York being particularly
well-supported. Demand has been fuelled by private American buyers rather
than the Japanese corporations and Australian entrepreneurs who drove up
prices in the 1980s. America's wealthy may believe they have seen the floor
for asset prices. Alternatively, they may simply be fed up with the returns
from cash or IBM shares.
The art market, is, though, still severely depressed, as Christie's and
Sotheby's sorry profits testify. Sales stand at only 40 per cent of peak
levels. Christie's decision to follow Sotheby's in lifting its buyer's
premium from 10 per cent to 15 per cent should help margins rebound when
real recovery takes hold. Added to their seller's commission, the auction
houses will keep up to 25 per cent of the price of many sales. Such are the
joys of duopolies, if not of fickle markets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-629</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: UK economy
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Those who have been pacing the economic garden in search of green shoots may
derive modest encouragement from yesterday's trade figures. Excluding
erratic items, the volume of non-oil exports grew 4 per cent in the three
months to November, while imports were flat. That is doubly gratifying, as
it is too early to expect September's devaluation to have had much effect on
export volume. Perhaps rising British productivity will make for a spot of
export-led recovery. At least, net exports should make a positive
contribution to fourth quarter GDP.
How far the advantage can be sustained is another matter. Devaluation
benefits may be offset by declining demand elsewhere in Europe, leaving the
UK to rely on increasing its share of a dwindling market. The depreciation
of sterling against the dollar may help win new business in the growing
markets of Asia and Latin America, but even this is unlikely to compensate
for a likely rise in both the value and volume of imports.
That the devaluation is already having its effect on imports is clear from
the 4 per cent rise in their unit value in the latest quarter. Volumes may
rise, too, at the first sign of real domestic recovery. Indeed, the 12 per
cent fall in car imports over the quarter to November looks something of a
blip, given the revival in registrations. It may be 1994 or even later
before the trade deficit reaches unmanageable proportions. Just the same,
worry about the trend will probably overhang the recovery from mid-1993.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-630</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: A Standard solution
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
It is difficult to exonerate Standard Chartered entirely from the charge
that it is selling the family silver to pay for its losses in Bombay. Had it
not had to make Pounds 100m in provisions on its Indian business this year,
its capital ratios would be stronger. But the bank's sale of real estate in
Hongkong, Singapore and Malaysia is also a response to a more serious
underlying problem; its capital is denominated in sterling while its assets
are mostly in dollar-related currencies.
Without the property proceeds, sterling's depreciation would have taken its
tier 1 ratio down to only around 4.6 per cent at the year end. Instead the
ratio should end up at a more comfortable level close to 5.5 per cent,
enabling the bank to keep pace with Asia's rapid economic growth. An
alternative solution might have been to raise dollar preference capital, but
Standard seems cautious about taking the plunge, possibly because its
developing world involvement would make US disclosure requirements
particularly onerous.
Relief that the bank had not decided to solve the problem through a rights
issue helped its shares advance 4 per cent yesterday. They may have further
to rise, but there is a danger in getting carried away. The Bombay scandal
will mean a high tax charge as well as provisions this year; Standard will
have to make additional provisions on its Pounds 100m Isosceles exposure.
Then there is its reputation for being accident-prone. The bank is at pains
to stress the commercial justification for selling its Hongkong property at
this stage in the cycle. If it is right, one has to hope it will not now use
the proceeds to lend aggressively on real estate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-631</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Credit and debit cards escape scrutiny by MMC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GAPPER, Banking Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CREDIT and debit card companies have escaped an investigation by the
Monopolies and Mergers Commission into the fees they charge retailers, but
face further scrutiny by Sir Bryan Carsberg, director-general of fair
trading.
Sir Bryan announced yesterday he would not refer credit and debit card
markets to the MMC. He said he would inquire into three possible unfair
practices.
The decision was welcomed by banks and retailers who have complained about
charges over the past two years. The most recent complaint over debit card
charges was made by five supermarket chains this summer.
Sir Bryan said Office of Fair Trading inquiries had not found collusion over
fee increases among banks which issue credit and debit cards. There was also
no evidence the issuing banks were making excessive profits.
The most recent controversy over debit card charges was sparked in June when
Asda, Gateway, Safeway, J. Sainsbury and Tesco complained about a rise in
the fee charged on each Switch card transaction from about 5p to 11p.
The fee charged on credit card transactions has narrowed to about 1.5 per
cent of each purchase for big retailers because of increased competition
among banks to carry out processing. This followed the 1989 MMC report on
credit cards.
Sir Bryan said he would review credit and debit card markets in two years.
Meanwhile, he would informally check three practices:
Retailers which accept cards such as Visa and Mastercard are obliged to
honour any issuer's card and are subject to minimum fees on some
transactions. Sir Bryan said he was concerned that this might mean
'inflexible and unresponsive' pricing.
Although retailers can charge different prices for purchases made by credit
cards rather than cheques or cash, this cannot be done for debit and charge
cards. Sir Bryan said this seemed 'an anomaly' and he would ask if it could
be removed.
Only banks are allowed to act as the 'merchant acquirers' which carry out
card processing and transactions on behalf of retailers for a fee. He said
he would ask if more merchant acquirers could enter the market.
Mr Colin Smith, chairman of the committee of retailers which complained
about debit card pricing in June, said retailers looked forward to
co-operating with the director-general in the further inquiries he had
proposed.
Mr Richard Reay-Smith, chief executive of Barclaycard, said the decision was
'a victory for the consumer'. Card operators had demonstrated that card
processing was a very competitive business, and pricing was often below
cost.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-632</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Letter: Too too bad
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr JOHN ANSTIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Re Observer's 'Dreaming spiral' (December 18)
what manner of Oxonian would write 'the hoi polloi' - 'the the many'.
John Anstis,
Stratford Lodge, 4 Park Lane,
Salisbury, Wiltshire
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-633</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Observer: Tail spin
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The spirit of amukadari - the 'descent from heaven' of Japanese civil
servants to senior positions in industry - appears to have been turned on
its head at Mazda. Kenichi Yamamoto, who developed the carmaker's rotary
engine and led its 1980s expansion, has stepped down as chairman, where he
is replaced by Norimasa Furuta, to become 'supreme adviser'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-634</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Observer: Big stick
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Watch out, Baroness Brigstocke is on the prowl. The former High Mistress of
St Paul's Girls' School, whose no-nonsense style has sometimes been compared
with Lady Thatcher's, has been appointed an associate director of the
powerful, but secretive, Great Universal Stores.
Although she once did a stint as a shopgirl at Selfridges, Heather
Brigstocke made her name as Britain's most formidable head mistress. Since
she quit teaching in 1989, she has been doing some consulting work for GUS
and has now been given a title and a job - advising Lord Wolfson's family
retailing business on training and personnel.
She says she is 'enormously impressed' with the young women she meets in GUS
but feels that there is 'far more potential in the workforce than has been
realised'. Sounds familiar. Must try harder, girls.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-635</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Observer: Sacks tax
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Swiss may be a bit befuddled after voting for isolation from the rest of
Europe in a referendum earlier this month, but they are still Swiss. From
January 1 in many communities, new regulations come into effect on the
handling of household rubbish, designed mainly to require people to pay
directly for rubbish collection.
In Zurich, refuse will not be picked up unless it is in specially coloured
bags that include the tax in their purchase price. Of course, these are now
sold out.
In Basle, residents must purchase and stick on each bag a little tax stamp.
And woe betide those who fail to do so. 'The local authority is entitled to
open bags that do not have a sticker attached to discover the culprits,' a
city notice warns.
And being a Swiss authority, no doubt it will.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-636</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Observer: Beyond our Ken
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Who would have thought it? The Sun is inviting its readers to write and
complain. Not normally known for its contribution to raising readers'
standards of literacy, the tabloid is cockily enjoining its faithful
followers to, well, pen a letter of complaint about the content of Britain's
top selling daily newspaper.
Ken Donlan, former Sun managing editor and Ombudsman these past four years,
dealt with two big cases and heavily censured the paper, the tabloid informs
us yesterday in an article flagged 'Save our Ombudsman'. But since then -
shock, horror, probe  - nothing.
So wake up readers. Save his job by telling him 'how you, personally, have
suffered from intrusion or inaccurate reporting'.
Sounds as if the Sun's editorial powers-that-be are trying to come up with
an unusual foil for those politicians currently making nasty noises about
anything from privacy to accuracy to a right of reply.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-637</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Observer: Spanish practice
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A colleague flying to Spain with British Midland after Christmas was advised
by the airline to telephone Avis about renting a car.
Yes, said Avis, we have a special deal for British Midland customers: Pounds
400 for two weeks. When mild disbelief was expressed at the rate demanded,
the reservations clerk responded immediately with an even more special deal
of Pounds 200.
the moral for prospective customers seems clear: when dealing with Avis, act
on the company's slogan and try harder.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-638</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Observer: Up and down at Barron's
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
For 26 years his column has been among the best loved - and feared  - on
Wall Street. But now Alan Abelson, the colourful 67-year-old editor of
Barron's, has been sacked by his overlords at the mighty Dow Jones
publishing group.
To be fair, Dow Jones has only asked Abelson to resign as editor and wants
him to continue writing his outspoken and market-moving 'Up &amp; down Wall
Street' column under a new editor.
But Abelson, who only this week was calling for the boss of IBM to quit and
the company to be declared an official disaster area, knows better than most
the various ways to get rid of people without calling it 'the sack'.
Few financial journalists have been as influential as Abelson, who has
edited Barron's since 1981 and has worked there for 35 years. Indeed, in the
minds of many of Barron's 250,000 subscribers the weekly magazine is
indistinguishable from the editor himself.
'I came out of the womb and the first thing I saw was the Barron's logo,'
Abelson joked yesterday.
So what happened? 'Two weeks ago I came to work and was told that Dow Jones
wanted a new editor. It's a reasonable choice. It's their shop. I guess I'm
a bit long in the tooth, although my teeth are still pretty sharp,' says
Abelson.
He would have liked Kathryn Welling, a protege and associate editor, to take
over. 'But she is going into the business of mothering,' and has decided to
'take herself out of the loop, as George Bush would say.'
The worry now is that Dow Jones will replace Abelson with a Wall Street
Journal editor. If so, it could result in the sort of internal row which
Abelson has so enjoyed reporting over the years. But for the moment he is
behaving impeccably. 'I have never felt this good in my memory. All of a
sudden the weight of the world has been lifted off my shoulders.'
Sounds uncharacteristically diplomatic for Abelson.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-639</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Letter: National lottery - a means to fund a better quality
of life (2)
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr DENIS VAUGHAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Your leader writer seeks to be more in love with financial principles
than with the quality of life. The reason we proposed a national lottery was
to fund those areas of British life which are dramatically underfunded. Our
board defines quality of life objectives as those which make available to
the individual, from all walks of life, the widest possible range of healthy
and vital leisure activities, so that all may enjoy fuller and richer lives.
On the advice of some of the best economists in the UK, our board has
proposed that the National Lottery should be mounted as a charitable
foundation, with specific purposes. Thus it would increase the current
Pounds 17bn turnover of charities to an estimated Pounds 18bn. The
foundation, an idea first put forward by Sir Robin Day, would be out of the
reach of government manipulation and thus in a position to make a genuine
contribution to new ventures, with participation in arts, sports and the
environment as particular aims.
The most successful business in Norway is its lottery, which is untaxed.
Britain would be wise to follow this example. Residual funds, after prizes
and expenses are accounted for, would go into the foundation, rather than to
the Treasury as direct tax. The funds that will flow back to Treasury as a
result of the lottery's operation will increase, because of its 'feel good'
effect on the public. In the Irish Republic both the top 20 charities'
income and the betting duty have increased since the lottery started to
function.
Were the UK lottery market to be opened up to a variety of competitors as
you propose, no single lottery would be able to offer the large prizes
which, throughout the rest of the world, attract massive and regular
participation. So the total funds available for the regeneration of life
throughout the country would be considerably reduced.
Denis Vaughan,
executive director,
Lottery Promotion Company,
21 Floral Street,
London WC2E 9DG
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-640</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Letter: National lottery - a means to fund a better quality
of life (1)
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Baroness SEEAR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, In your article on the national lottery ('Monopoly game', December 10),
you point out that the funds from the lottery will be channelled to
charities by the national heritage secretary.
Charitable voluntary organisations have in recent years become increasingly
dependent on grants from government departments and there is a serious
danger that many of them may become little more than administrative agents
of the departments. Yet it is widely recognised that the value of voluntary
organisations is their ability to criticise established practice, to
experiment and to initiate work which such dependence can seriously
undermine. To halt this trend alternative sources of finance, totally
independent of government, are urgently needed.
The national lottery provides an opportunity not to be missed.
Baroness Seear,
House of Lords,
Westminster,
London SW1
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-641</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Letter: Privatisation - gas provides a lesson
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr T S CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Proposals put forward by Sir James McKinnon, the gas regulator, that
British Gas should be divided and his remarks on the permanency of
conditions in the prospectus, which undoubtedly proved attractive to
investors at the time, highlight the uncertainty facing users of postal
services.
In announcing its plans to privatise ParcelForce and the wider review of the
Post Office, which could result in further privatisation, the government has
committed itself to the continued provision of nation-wide parcels and
letters services at uniform and affordable prices and a nationwide network
of post offices. It has been stated unequivocally that these requirements
are not negotiable.
Last month the council which I chair submitted its views on the government's
two initiatives. In the case of ParcelForce we have stressed that if the
universal service obligation is accepted by a purchaser it is important that
the means are put in place to enforce the honouring of that obligation.
Users expect appropriate machinery to be established to ensure the required
standard of service, price and adherence by the provider. They also need to
know how government proposes to guarantee continuation of the universal
service should the purchaser of ParcelForce fail or, as is now occurring in
the case of British Gas, a significant change of direction be mooted some
years on. Similar guarantees and the means to enforce them will be required
in the event of a decision to privatise Royal Mail or Post Office Counters.
Our understanding is that these issues are still under consideration by
government. I believe it is vital that careful account is taken of the
implications and the outcome of what Sir James McKinnon has now proposed for
British Gas.
T S Corrigan,
Post Office Users'
National Council,
Waterloo Bridge House,
Waterloo Road, London SE1 8UA
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-642</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Letter: St Andrews apostrophed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From DOUGLAS GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
In your otherwise excellent report on university research ('Top-quality
research 'is scarce' ', December 18), you include in your list of
universities that of St Andrew's. I have never heard of this university,
although I am fortunate to have a research degree from St Andrews University
in Fife. Perhaps we will be seeing a Leed's University in next year's table.
Douglas Gourlay,
137 Desswood Place,
Aberdeen,
Scotland
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-643</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Letter: Restrictions on access to US market to blame for
breakdown of BA-USAir deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Sir COLIN MARSHALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, British Airways' reluctant decision to terminate its agreement to
invest Dollars 750m in USAir may indeed mean that a significant opportunity
has been lost to liberalise transatlantic air services, but not for the
reasons put forward by Stephen Wolf (Letters, December 22).
The proposals tabled by the UK government in early October show very clearly
that the UK has offered to remove the restrictions on services that may be
operated from any airport, including Heathrow, by airlines of both sides.
The talks broke down because the US demanded immediate and unlimited access
to the UK market while maintaining high protective barriers to its own
market, which is 40 per cent of air transport worldwide. Had they been
prepared to agree to relax their outdated restrictions on inward investment,
the two countries would now be on an assured path to a fully liberal
agreement.
Colin Marshall,
deputy chairman and chief executive,
British Airways,
Heathrow Airport (London),
Hounslow TW6 2JA
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-644</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Out of the mouth of babes and businessmen: Roderick Oram
compiles the business quotes of the year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RODERICK ORAM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'What is good for Volkswagen is not necessarily good for Europe.'
Jean-Pierre Chevenement, former Socialist defence minister and
anti-Maastricht rebel.
'The European boat has to learn how to sail with the German elephant aboard'
Gianni Agnelli, Head of Fiat, on Germany's economic power
'I am tempted to take my family, go to my yacht and sail away.'
Bernard Tapie, Adidas owner, after resigning from the French government.
'De Beers would rather cut its throat than the dividend.'
Richard Stuart, a leading Johannesburg analyst, shortly before the company
predicted it would cut its final dividend for only the second time in its
history.
'I like to buy a company any fool can manage because eventually one will.'
Peter Lynch, legendary former head of Fidelity Investments' Magellan Fund.
'It's been four years and we still don't know what we have in inventory and
we still don't know what we're selling.'
Sir Richard Greenbury, chairman of Marks and Spencer, on information systems
at Brooks Brothers, its US store chain.
'After 150 years, we've finally learned how to run a railroad.'
John Snow, chief executive of CSX, after the US railway group raised profits
19 per cent on flat revenues.
'Imagine the outcry from the black community if a brewer were to market a
liquor entitled Martin Luther King Beer, or from the Christian Community for
a Jesus Christ White Wine.'
Gregg Bourland, chairman of South Dakota's Cheyenne River Sioux Tribe, after
Hornell Brewing named its new malt liquor Crazy Horse.
'It has a strong, fruity fragrance accentuated with floral top notes.'
Mark Cash, an Esso advertising executive, on the odour of a new diesel fuel.
'We Swiss may get up early, but we wake up late.'
Zurich banker after the Swiss voted against joining the European Economic
Area.
'In French we have an old Arab saying: let the jackals bark, the caravan
carries on.'
Rene Leclezio, chairman, of Lonrho, on the media's 'misleading campaign of
hysteria' about the international trading conglomerate.
'If your house price has fallen, you are afraid of losing your job, and you
have high levels of personal debt you are bloody well not going to go out
and spend money no matter where interest rates are.'
Geoff Mulcahy, chairman and chief executive of retail group Kingfisher.
'Here is the person to be your minder, godfather, counsellor . . . He has
one authority - he's going to control the purse strings.'
BTR's message to Hawker Siddeley executives after it won control of the
company with a Pounds 1.55bn bid.
'Other people at the top, like Nigel Mansell and Rod Stewart, are paid huge
sums of money, so why not businessmen?'
Greg Hutchings, Chief executive of Tomkins, defending his salary of some
pounds 1m
'We've already had a million Germans and a million British guests, and to
have those numbers in France without a war going on is really something'
Michael Eisner, Head of Disney, on visitors to its French theme park
'Stopping the company going into receivership in October 1990 and October
1991. I'm sorry I didn't perform a hat-trick.'
David James, company doctor-chairman of Davies &amp; Newman, on his greatest
achievement. The December 1992 EGM voted to wind up D&amp;N and sell Dan-Air,
its main asset, for Pounds 1 to British Airways.
'James has a lot to contribute. But he may become part-time and decide to
elect for a non-executive role.'
Derek Bonham, chief executive of Hanson, the Anglo-US conglomerate, on the
future role of Lord Hanson, the group's founder and chairman.
'I often tell people I sleep like a baby. I wake up every 10 minutes
screaming.'
Tony Ryan, chairman and founder of GPA Group, the aircraft leasing company,
three months before the group's Dollars 800m flotation was abandoned.
'When the whorehouse burns down, the pretty ones run out with the ugly.'
Roland Shaw, chairman of Premier Consolidated Oilfields, setting his own
sliding share price in the context of the oil sector's collapse shortly
before he agreed to relinquish his executive role.
'It doesn't take an Einstein to figure where the opportunities are . . . And
if that is a society moving towards capitalism, then that's the place for
me]'
George Walker, ex-boxer, ex-chairman of Brent Walker, on why he and his wife
were exporting cigarettes to Russia.
'They tend to be splintery-type crumbs rather than ball-type crumbs.'
Brian Lambe, finance director of Clifford Foods, on the company's decision
to start producing Japanese crumbs for breaded fish makers.
'People take me for either an idiot or a hooligan. I believe I am neither
one nor the other.'
Jean-Luc Lagardere, reacting to critics of his plan to merge his Hachette
book and magazine publishing group with his Matra defence and transport
company.
'The last three years have been a bloody nightmare'
Alan Sugar, On the trials of running Amstrad
Further Sugar lumps:
'Prime karaoke candidates.' On whingers at the EGM.
'I don't want to convince anyone of anything.'
On why he had failed to visit the City to discuss his offer to buy out
Amstrad shareholders.
'If the shareholders were to turn me down, one has to take it quite bluntly
that they think I've been lying to them.'
'I've told them it's best for them to get out. If they don't believe me,
it's because they think I'm trying to trick them. That's the most hurtful
thing at the moment.'
On shareholder rejection.
'I've sold lots of shares and made a personal fortune . . .
Look, in 1980 I had a company which was worth nothing.'
On the joys of taking Amstrad public.
'I'm a miserable sod.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-645</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Sun, surf and Santa: Letter from Sydney
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Christmas is coming and the price of prawns is going up, illustrating both
the changing nature of the Australian Christmas and the danger of
over-exploiting fragile fishing grounds.
Apart from the weather, an English visitor of 30 or even 20 years ago would
have been hard pressed to spot the difference between Christmas in Sydney
and Christmas in Sydenham, south London. Inspired by the view held by Sir
Robert Menzies, Australia's prime minister from 1946 to 1965, who portrayed
his country as the modern-day jewel in the British crown, Australians were
still doing everything they could to evade the realities of the un-English
climate and geography.
Ignoring summer temperatures of 30 degrees centigrade or more, families ate
heavy meals of hot turkey, roast beef and plum pudding, and then watched or
listened to the Queen's traditional Christmas day broadcast from London.
Presents were piled around imported Christmas trees, holly wreaths were
nailed to front doors, and the most enthusiastic attempted to simulate the
effect of snow on window panes.
Even in the 1960s, there must have been plenty of Australians of non-British
heritage who thought this collective attachment to the 'traditional'
Christmas a bit strange in a country where December falls in midsummer. But
few of that generation of immigrants felt able to resist the pressure from
the Anglo-Saxon majority to conform by becoming more Australian, which
meant, of course, more British.
Now attitudes are changing, and the style of Christmas celebrations is
becoming less homogeneous, reflecting the move towards a more genuinely
Australian culture which started a decade or so ago.
For one thing, Australian government policy is now officially multicultural,
which has helped give minority ethnic groups the self-confidence to develop
or reinterpret their own Christmas traditions.
For another, the sheer number of immigrants who have come to Australia since
the second world war (more than doubling the population from 8m to 17m) have
altered the ethnic balance of the population and weakened ties with the
so-called mother country.
Fewer than 60 per cent of Australians now claim family ties with Britain and
Ireland, compared with more than 90 per cent 40 years ago. The New
Australians are Italian, Greek, Yugoslav, Arab and, increasingly, Asian.
Few of the new Australians will spend Christmas day in the house or garden,
where the Menzies-era Australians felt most comfortable. They will be at the
beach, or at the many parks and recreation areas maintained by local
councils, which often include family-style barbecues.
Others will work out their own compromise between tradition and common
sense. A Swiss friend plans to cook her family's traditional Swiss ham
outside in a barbecue. English friends will cook a turkey the day before,
and eat it cold with salad.
But it is not just recent immigrants who are finding new ways to celebrate
Christmas. Many Australians of British extraction whose families have lived
in their new homeland for generations are also taking a fresh look at the
merits of tradition. After all, Britain has been consciously cutting its
ties with the old dominions since it joined the European Community in 1973,
encouraging Australians to come to terms with their own region.
From this perspective, Paul Keating, the Labor prime minister, was only
reflecting the drift of opinion when he suggested earlier this year that
Australia should become a republic and remove the Union symbol from the
corner of the national flag.
These ideas are still at the formative stage, and it may be years before
either comes to fruition. But once people start thinking about such weighty
ideas as national destiny, just about every facet of life is likely to come
under the microscope.
So it is hardly surprising that there are less frost-inspired decorations
around this year, or that snowy windowpanes have almost entirely
disappeared, or that fewer Christmas cards feature horse-drawn sleighs
jingling down snowy village lanes.
Even the schools are getting in on the act. Children are still making models
of Santa's sleigh, but the motive power is more likely to be supplied by
kangaroos than reindeer. And koalas and wallabies are appearing in the
Christmas stable.
There are still some oddities about Christmas Down Under. At my local carol
service in north Sydney, for example, shirt-sleeved children sang
uncomprehendingly about events In The Deep Mid-Winter, and appeared entirely
unimpressed by the Boxing day trials of poor, frozen, Good King Wenceslas.
Increasingly, however, Australians are ready to put their own stamp on
Christmas, even if no two people agree about what it should be. In time, a
uniquely Australian Christmas may emerge, reflecting the development of a
more mature and self-confident society.
But for now, it's everyone for himself. Me? I shall be throwing another
prawn on the barbie, and dreaming of a white Christmas.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-646</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Leading Article: Brussels gets a new team
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR ALL the problems dogging European integration, the European Commission
seems to be attracting a higher profile category of job applicant. On the
evidence of the new line-up unveiled yesterday, the Commission has shrugged
off its image as a collection of government cast-offs. The fresh team in
Brussels, containing two seasoned foreign ministers, from Portugal and the
Netherlands, appears well suited to steering the Community through the next
two years.
At the helm remains Mr Jacques Delors, whose adept mind will be increasingly
turning not only to the future shape of Europe, but also to his possible
role as a candidate for the French presidency. The adjustments Mr Delors has
produced in Commission portfolios bear the mark of a hand skilled in the art
of both compromise and strategic planning. The departure of the UK's Sir
Leon Brittan from the competition job - where he has habitually tangled with
Paris  - will make the Commission's balance somewhat more favourable to
French sensitivities.
This is important not just for Mr Delors' prospects. French support for the
free competition policies backed by Britain, and personified by Sir Leon, is
still, at best, tenuous. The qualms voiced by France over the chances of a
Gatt deal may presage further new year squalls between Brussels and Paris -
especially if the March elections return a right-wing government. The French
will still have to deal with Sir Leon, who takes over Commission
responsibility for Gatt in his new external trade portfolio. But, in
general, Mr Delors' decision to opt for a Commission in which French
interests appear well served is intelligent as well as being predictable.
The Commission has to give a lead. But it also must follow member
governments' overall policies. The rearrangement of portfolios and
personalities reflects the rebalancing of Community interests. Agriculture,
social affairs and the environment - areas where deals have either already
been done, or where economic downturn has made governments less eager for
change - are taking a back seat. Mr Karel van Miert, who takes the
competition job, has proved himself no pushover for the forces of
corporatism during his time as transport commissioner. He will however act
cautiously in curbing national monopoly powers in fields such as energy and
postal services - excluded from the 1993 single market.
The real heavyweight jobs are in foreign affairs. Mr Hans van den Broek, the
Dutch foreign minister, and Sir Leon will jointly shoulder the challenges of
enlargement talks with the states of the European Free Trade Association.
They must also forge a strong relationship with the new US administration
and ensure that the community does what it can to prevent chaos in the
former Soviet bloc, which may yet provoke disruption in Europe on a wider
scale.
Apart from ending the recession, the EC's main priority next year must be to
improve the management of its foreign relations. Given a degree of good
fortune, the new Commission should be able to play its part in that task.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-647</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / 1992: better safe than sorry - Equity markets have taken a
backseat to fixed interest securities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The pre-Christmas wave of optimism which propelled the UK equity market to
another new all-time high of 2842.0 last night (the FT-SE 100 Index is now
up 14 per cent this year) is not typical of markets around the world.
In fact, another poor year for the global economy, in which overall growth
of the 24 nations in the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and
Development is estimated to have been only 1.5 per cent, has formed the
backdrop for a generally dreary 12 months for the world's capital markets.
In these conditions fixed interest securities have often outperformed
equities, although rapidly expanding government financial deficits have had
the effect of subduing the bond markets too. Only some spectacular events in
the currency markets have livened up the year and provide the more
speculative investors with some handsome returns at limited risk, mainly by
courtesy of the European central banks.
As the year draws to a close, hopes for a global recovery look little
better. The OECD has just knocked down its 1993 growth forecast from 3.0 to
1.9 per cent. And although some of the countries early into the recession
are now showing signs of an upturn - certainly the US and possibly the UK -
Germany and Japan may not yet have seen the worst.
Investors are having to grapple with the evidence that this is not just
another business cycle but that long-term structural changes are afoot. When
leading industrial companies such as IBM are shedding tens of thousands of
jobs, while the only rapidly-growing areas of the global economy are in
regions such as southern China and parts of Latin America, it is a foolish
portfolio manager who continues to extrapolate the long-term charts from the
past.
Certainly, shareholders had to dabble in stock markets such as Hong Kong and
Mexico this year in order to achieve returns that were at all interesting in
local currency terms. The best-performing national market in dollar terms
has been Malaysia with a gain of 23 per cent. For sterling-based investors
the numbers naturally look much better, given the pound's 13 per cent
trade-weighted depreciation since last December 31 (and 18 per cent against
the dollar). The British investor is showing gains of around 40 per cent in
Malaysia, Hong Kong and Mexico, according to the FT-Actuaries World Index
series.
Overall, however, the World Index is down 7 per cent this year in dollar
terms and is up just 12 per cent for investors who prefer to do their
calculations in sterling. The pace is always dictated by the markets in New
York and Tokyo, which account for two-thirds of the world index's
weightings.
On Wall Street it has been an amazingly steady year, with a year-on-year
improvement of only 4 per cent. Moreover, 1992 has been the least volatile
year for the US stock market in living memory, essentially because the
recovery in the economy and therefore in corporate earnings was already
discounted in 1991. Since then there has been a flood of money into equities
from private individuals fleeing low savings deposit rates and buying large
quantities of mutual funds. But, on the other hand, there has been a sharp
rise in new stock issues and a certain amount of selling by foreigners who
generally feel that Wall Street is overpriced. The net result has been
stalemate.
As for Tokyo, the well-managed slow-motion stock market meltdown has gone a
stage further in 1992. This year's index fall has been 20 per cent (only
Denmark has performed worse in local currency terms) and the Japanese equity
market now accounts for only 26 per cent of world market capitalisation
against about 45 per cent at its peak three years ago.
The painful return of Japanese property and equity prices to more
justifiable levels still poses a severe threat to the country's financial
system, with the capital bases of the banks undermined. But Japan is better
placed than most other countries in terms of fiscal balance and bond yields.
Ten-year Japan government bonds (JGBs) now yield only 4.6 per cent, easily
the lowest for any leading country.
A UK investor who bought JGBs a year ago - when they were yielding 5.4 per
cent - might not have seemed to be on to a good thing. But on top of that he
has been able to add a modest local currency capital gain and, more
importantly, a yen appreciation, in terms of sterling, of 22 per cent. The
return has been a handsome 36 per cent.
This kind of calculation has been the key to successful investment in 1992.
While the more glamorous equity investors have taken an unaccustomed back
seat the bond fund managers who trade fixed interest securities and
currencies have grabbed the limelight.
But once again a great deal has depended on the investor's base currency. In
the UK, the global bond funds have enjoyed a great year, and are heading the
unit trust performance charts. But it looks very different in the US where
the strength of the dollar against many currencies in the past few months
has caused many equivalent international fixed income funds showing returns
which are meagre and sometimes even negative.
Generally speaking bond yields have dropped in 1992, because the impact of
the recession and the influence of lower inflation rates has outweighed the
increasing flow of government debt as fiscal deficits widen. Average
inflation, according to the OECD, will fall from 3.5 per cent in 1992 to 2.5
per cent by the end of 1994. But the average budget deficit is running at
about 4 per cent of gross domestic product this year and next. Brokers James
Capel have calculated that new borrowing by the Group of Seven leading
industrialised nations next year will total a massive Dollars 750bn.
Real interest rates, apart from in Japan and Germany (where inflation is
still rising) are remarkably high. This ought to make bonds very good value,
as they indeed have been this year. But there could still be problems if so
much paper is issued that the markets find it indigestible. The UK
government, for instance, is threatening to issue gilt-edged securities at
the rate of Pounds 1bn a week during the financial year 1993-94. A real bull
market in bonds will not happen until investors can see a way in which
government deficits can be brought down.
The bond investor's calculation must be that real interest rates will have
to be brought down sharply. This could be done through an acceleration of
inflation, but there are not many countries in which that is going to happen
given the surplus of capacity in the industrial, farm and labour markets.
In the meantime, attention has been focused on currencies. It was hard to
make money by trading currencies when they were floating freely in the
1980s, but the growth of the semi-fixed rate European exchange rate
mechanism proved to be a godsend for speculators.
Politicians with short memories thought they could set exchange rates by
dictat. For an amazingly long time they seemed to be right. But by the
summer of 1992 the ERM lost its credibility, and unofficial and official
member currencies of the ERM were picked off one by one: the Finnish markka,
the Italian lira, the pound, the Swedish krona and the Norwegian krone.
Other currencies, such as the Spanish peseta, could only sustain their
position through exchange controls. By December, the French franc was coming
under severe pressure for the second time.
An old lesson was expensively relearned: central banks defending
unsustainable parities against hopeless odds serve only to hand juicy
profits to market operators.
But the egg on the faces of governments often brought smiles to stock market
investors. In the UK, the devaluation of sterling served to bring life back
to the equity market. Investors do not directly have to speculate in
currencies or buy foreign securities in order to benefit from a depreciation
of their domestic currencies. In the UK, overseas and export profits - which
are increased in sterling terms by a devaluation - account for almost half
the earnings of London-listed industrial companies.
Since Black Wednesday, London's FT-SE 100 Index of market leaders has
climbed by almost 20 per cent, and similar strength has been shown by the
equity markets in other devaluing countries. In Sweden, Finland and Italy
stock market indices have jumped by between 18 and 53 per cent since the
local currencies were unpegged from the D-Mark.
At the core of the ERM the picture is much bleaker, however. German equities
are a fifth below their May highs as industrial gloom accumulates. There is
a similar picture in France.
In the UK, fund managers are once again comfortable with their high
exposures to equities. For as long as the British government struggled to
keep sterling close to DM2.95 there was great worry that the corporate
sector would be crushed between a fixed exchange rate and an inflexible
labour market. Now, with the pound floating freely, there is more confidence
that British companies can go on delivering the healthy dividend growth
rates that UK institutions crave.
Nevertheless many British companies have been crippled. The leading sectors
this year have included water, electricity and food retailing, representing
cosy monopolies or oligopolies which can brush aside the recession. But
sectors such as chemicals, metals, aerospace and construction have slumped.
Among the 100 shares in the Footsie the worst performers have included a
variety of recession-hit industrials such as ICI, Arjo Wiggins and Fisons,
while Lasmo and BP have been victims of the poor oil prices which have
resulted from slow economic growth around the world.
Portfolio managers have been obsessed this year by the timing of any
recovery and the desirability of switching from recession-proof to recovery
stocks. There have been one or two false dawns. Small companies have
continued to perform badly for much of the year. But in the past few weeks
another flurry in the second-liners has begun. More indices have been
created to allow professional investors to follow better these swings and
roundabouts among the big, the medium-sized and the small stocks.
HSBC, the year's Footsie winner, is something of a freak, with the Midland
Bank share price's takeover gains being compounded by the Hong Kong market
windfall and the dollar appreciation bonus of its new parent, the Hongkong
and Shanghai Banking Corporation. Elsewhere, insurance and media recovery
stocks dominate the top performers' list, and water companies such as Thames
Water are a little way behind.
For 1993, if more manufacturers and capital goods stocks do not feature in
the winning list, something will surely have gone seriously wrong with the
British economic recovery.
 -------------------------------------------
  WORLD MARKETS: THE RETURNS OF RECESSION
 -------------------------------------------
FT-Actuaries World Index
% change (dollars terms)
 -------------------------------------------
Malaysia               22.92
Hong Kong              21.67
Mexico                 15.18
Switzerland            14.04
US                      4.62
Netherlands             1.02
France                 -4.59
Belgium                -5.90
Singapore              -6.81
UK                     -7.03
World                  -7.03
Finland                -7.41
New Zealand           -10.79
Sweden                -11.68
Germany               -11.85
Ireland               -15.73
Canada                -16.00
Austria               -17.53
Australia             -19.60
Norway                -20.07
Japan                 -20.55
Spain                 -23.08
Denmark               -25.58
Italy                 -29.31
South Africa          -40.69
 -------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100 Index
 -------------------------------------------
Top 10               % change
HSBC Holdings          92.59
Granada                77.60
Siebe                  68.30
Guardian Royal Exchange63.96
Bowater                61.60
Carlton Comms          61.11
BAT                    58.28
Burmah Castrol         54.47
Argyll Group           51.97
Thames                 50.46
 -------------------------------------------
Bottom 10            % change
Wellcome               -9.36
Redland               -10.96
British Steel         -13.87
ICI                   -15.29
Ladbroke Group        -18.53
BP                    -21.84
Forte                 -22.75
Fisons                -30.98
Lasmo                 -32.29
Arjo Wiggin Appleton  -36.21
 -------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-648</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Leading Article: Drugs pricing
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE pharmaceutical industry and the British government are currently
renegotiating the scheme controlling profits on drug sales to the National
Health Service. The government's negotiators should drive a tough bargain.
There are arguments in favour of the existing agreement, known as the
Pharmaceutical Price Regulation Scheme. As a long-standing piece of
industrial policy, the scheme has proved singularly successful.
It has controlled NHS drugs spending while encouraging the British-based
pharmaceuticals sector. There are few high-growth technology industries
where the UK is among the world's leaders. Pharmaceuticals is one of them.
Four of the world's top 10 best-selling patented medicines were discovered
and developed in the UK. The industry will contribute a trade surplus of
more than Pounds 1.3bn to the UK economy this year.
The scheme also has the advantage of simplicity and practicality. By fixing
a return on capital and not the prices of individual drugs, administration
and bureaucracy is kept to a minimum. The system is widely admired in other
countries; at one time, the French government considered copying it.
Such achievements should not be tampered with lightly. But the real argument
concerns not the price-setting mechanism, but the prices themselves. The UK,
along with the rest of the world, is faced with the inexorable tendency of
healthcare costs to grow faster than the economy as a whole.
During the late 1980s the rapid expansion of UK pharmaceuticals groups'
earnings was relatively inconspicuous. During the early 1990s, it looks like
an anomaly. Glaxo made 38 per cent return on capital worldwide last year,
SmithKline Beecham 45 per cent. This remarkably high return was achieved
after research and development costs.
At a time of sharply rising budget deficits, expenditure on NHS drugs is
growing at 12 per cent a year. Although the increase is partly due to
government-inspired health programmes, expenditure growth on this scale jars
at a time of public expenditure constraint.
There is thus a strong prima facie case for adjusting the price control
mechanism applied by the NHS, perhaps by tightening up the return on capital
parameters - currently 17 to 20 per cent a year.
The industry will argue that lower returns will drive investment and
research overseas, as indeed happened in the mid-1980s, when the UK
government tried to curb drug expenditure.
This time, though, the impact is likely to be limited. The world is bleaker
for the drug companies and in restraining prices and limiting expenditure,
the UK government would only be following the example of most other
countries. In any case, the UK retains the powerful attraction of a pool of
cheap, inventive scientists. The government can afford to bargain hard.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-649</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Leading Article: Serbia's vote
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE PROBABLE victory of the hard-line Mr Slobodan Milosevic in the Serbian
presidential election must be seen as a severe setback for efforts to find a
peaceful solution to the conflict in the former Yugoslavia. Though the
latest figures which give Mr Milosevic nearly 56 per cent of the vote, are
based on only a partial count of last Sunday's poll, it is most unlikely
that his moderate opponent, Mr Milan Panic, with 34 per cent, will be able
to close the gap.
By western standards, the conditions under which the elections were held
were far from satisfactory. The election broadcasts of the state-owned
Serbian TV were heavily biased in favour of Mr Milosevic and the large group
of international observers reported numerous irregularities in electoral
registration and voting procedures. Yet they do not appear to have been
serious enough for Mr Panic's demand that the elections be annulled and
another poll held within 90 days to stand much chance of success.
In the circumstances, Mr Panic, a Yugoslav-born American multi-millionaire,
did well to poll more than a third of the votes. His appeal lay in his
promises to end the fighting and Serbia's international isolation. But the
unpleasant fact the international community now has to face is that the
Serbian people have preferred to be represented by a xenophopic leader
determined to promote their national interests by whatever means necessary.
The presidential election results have been made worse by the marked swing
to the right in the separate parliamentary poll. The success of the extreme
nationalist Radical party at the expense of its allies, the Socialists
(ex-communists), is a bad augury for the fate of the ethnic minorities who
make up one-third of Serbia's population. The Radical party is led by Mr
Vojislav Seselj, whose militia is alleged by the US to have been responsible
for the murder of thousands of Moslems in northern Bosnia last spring.
The future Serbian government does not, therefore, look as if it will be
prepared to make the required compromises to bring the conflict in Bosnia to
a peaceful end. And its ethnic cleansing policies risk igniting conflicts in
other potential trouble-spots, such as Kosovo, which could spread quickly to
other regions in the Balkans through the involvement of countries such as
Greece, Turkey, Bulgaria and Albania.
Few options remain for the international community, in the absence of direct
military intervention in Bosnia, which has been ruled out by the great
majority of nations. However, that position is looking less tenable by the
day. Stricter sanctions alone have failed to have the desired effect and it
is difficult to see how the proposed cut in all international communications
or the enforcement of a 'no fly' zone over Bosnia will bring Serbia round.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-650</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Arts: Lully's 'Armide' goes abstract - Opera in Paris
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD CRICHTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Following last year's successful and enjoyable Alceste, the cycle of Lully
operas at the Theatre de Champs-Elysees in Paris continued with his Armide -
the last of the series of tragedies lyriques written with his eminent
librettist Quinault. Lully died in 1687, one year after the first
production. Owing to the king's absence this took place not privately at
Versailles but publicly in Paris. Quinault died after one more year.
The climate of taste was changing. Classical and mythological subjects were
giving way to medieval chivalry. At court the influence of the
pleasure-loving Mme de Montespan was waning. The increasingly powerful Mme
de Maintenon, whom Louis XIV had secretly married, was by comparison
austere: pleasure was under a cloud. The change is reflected in the tone of
Armide. I doubt, though, if the historical background had much if any
influence on the producers of Armide, Patrice Caurier and Moshe Leiser,
responsible for last year's Iphigenie en Tauride at Cardiff.
Caurier and Leiser turned their backs firmly and a little prudishly on the
sumptuous, enjoyable and illuminating baroque richness of their
predecessors' Alceste. In their programme note they rightly stress the vital
role of dancing in the choreographer-composer Lully's theatre works. But it
is absurd to deny the equally vital role of spectacle, 'machines' included.
The sum of his great gifts made Lully a super-entertainer, and
'entertainement' on such a level need not exclude serious subjects or deep
feelings.
The decors by Christian Fenouillat are based on abstract painted cloths of
the kind once popular for 'symphonic' ballet. They leave plenty of room for
the dancers but the general effect is dusty and dispiriting. The prospect in
the heathen sorceress Armide's magic realm that so enchants the besotted
Crusader knight Renaud consists of tall dark grey panels shifted round
against a gloomy background - Hades as imagined by a modern Gordon Craig. At
the end of the opera, when Armide realises she has lost her lover, a slatted
curtain is let down to which she bravely clings and is raised high enough to
show her palace in flames behind her. But all we saw of that palace was a
single panel painted streakily like fishmonger's marble.
Costumes by Elizabeth Neumuller were vaguely modern from flapperdom to New
Look skirts, with an emphasis on old-style sports clothes (had someone
remembered that the Debussy-Nijinsky tennis ballet Jeux was first given in
this theatre?). That at least gave some indication of Renaud's physical
prowess - there was very little to suggest a Holy War and next to nothing of
the Gorgeous Middle East. But then the producers avowedly shun anything
'anecdotal' like the plague.
The choreography by Stephanie Aubin was uneventful, unmemorable 'modern
dance'. The dancers' and singers' movement was unusually well integrated.
The good-looking dancers of the small Compagnie Larsen, like everyone else
in this production, were thoroughly prepared - this co-production with
Flemish Opera had already been seen at Antwerp. The singing and playing of
the Chapelle Royale (with the Collegium vocale from Ghent) gave continuous
pleasure. The expert conductor was Philippe Herreweghe, in livelier, more
authoritative form than in his recording of the opera a few years back - the
fourth act, omitted then, was included this time.
The Armide, Sylvie Brunet, is a strong performer who knows how to shape and
form Lully's varied, subtle and highly expressive phrases. Above a certain
level the voice took on a shrill vibrato inappropriate for such an
irresistible seductiveness, and she sometimes sang below the note. She was
not helped by nondescript garments. Some but not enough of her words were
clear. The best singing and declamation came from the Renaud of that good
artist Howard Crook, whose light tenor carried easily in this large theatre.
Gilles Ragou and Bernard Deletre as the two paladins sent to bring Renaud
back to the path of duty, had the best of this opera's subdued comic scenes.
As Hate, John Hancock appeared as a dyspeptic-looking gent in evening dress,
his supporting demons wearing white surplices over black trousers.
At the last of the six performances there was a full house, deeply attentive
and enthusiastic except when the production team took their curtain call,
when the usual and by now rather stale pandemonium broke out. Although I
believe this self-conscious effort to avoid theatrical archaeology to be
misguided and find the visual appeal unsuitably dreary, this Armide was a
serious, consistent piece of work, ably carried through. There is more than
one way of treating Lully on the modern stage. Next year the admirable
series promise Roland with Jose van Dam.
Sponsored by the Mecenat Culturel, the Caisse des depots et consignations
and the Fondation France Telecom.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-651</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Every year a few more artists or series are considered worthy of a Christmas
special, so every year they spread further into the days surrounding the
actual holiday. Today they are all over the place. Christmas In Vienna (7.30
BBC2) is a concert from the City Hall featuring Jose Carreras, Placido
Domingo and Diana Ross, and it sounds a bit like sacha torte: sweet enough
to make your teeth ache.
Stretching out half-hour comedies into much longer specials often results in
failure. Whether the outstanding Waiting For God can survive, we shall have
to wait and see. Since much of the strength comes from the superb acting of
Stephanie Cole and Graham Crowden as the rebellious couple in an old
people's home it may fare better than most (8.00 BBC1).
Jack Dee is a perfectly good comedian but it seems doubtful whether he could
sustain a 60-minute special; hence the various guests, presumably, in The
Jack Dee Show (9.00 C4). Best of the lot is likely to be Lenny Henry: In
Dreams (9.30 BBC1). His special last year, 'Bernard And The Genie', was one
of the best of the Christmas programmes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-652</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Arts: Prisoner of Zenda camps it up - Theatre
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALASTAIR MACAULAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Dungeons, swordfights, true love, intrigue and - best of all  - a hero who
looks so like Prince Rudolph of Ruritania that he can impersonate him to all
and sundry - yes, The Prisoner of Zenda has them all. Anthony Hope's novel
is the most glorious trash ever written; you can snicker at Georgette Heyer
but woe betide the smart Alec who thinks himself above The Prisoner of Zenda
 -not to mention the sequel, Rupert of Hentzau.
The best that can be said for this Greenwich staging is that it is a
tolerable introduction to the joys of Zenda, and is surely excellent
seasonal fare for office parties composed of people who have not read the
original. And, since I was in a post-works-outing glow myself, I enjoyed
myself a fair deal.
Lez Brotherston has designed an ideal set, with crossbridges and staircases
and walls that summon up all the various perilous locales. Mark Lockyer has
much of the right dark daredevil allure for Rupert of Hentzau, and Melanie
Jessop is as commanding and glamorous as Antoinette de Mauban should be.
But Hope's novel and the Ronald Colman movie are both dear to my heart, and
I incline to purism in Zenda matters. Matthew Francis's adaptation and
staging not only hang fire, but they also encourage both players and
audience to chuckle at the contrivances of this Ruritanian romance. The
intoxicating story keeps tipping over into camp; and this is hard to
forgive.
As the two Rudolphs, David Haig lacks both virile beauty and heroic ardour;
and what is The Prisoner of Zenda without those? Leonie Mellinger, a
talented actress, underplays the nobility and high romance of the Princess
Flavia. Nicholas Gecks is too mild for Black Michael (I found myself missing
Raymond Massey in this role more than anyone from the 1937 Selznick movie).
The production will undoubtedly improve in due course; injury robbed us of
the swashbuckling we had been hoping for. But not only more swordfighting is
needed. More seriousness is required too.
At the Greenwich Theatre, until February 6
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-653</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Arts: Glitz threatens the News at Ten - Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Anyone who wants to know what might be expected from the new ITV network
coming into operation on January 1 should have a look at News At Ten. For
decades ITV's flagship news programme was regarded, almost universally, as
being on a par with the BBC's Nine O'Clock News. Many people both inside and
outside television argued that it was superior. Now, under the Government's
new Darwinian rules for commercial television, with fierce competition for
peak time slots and the weakest going to the wall, the programme has been
transformed. What was once slick but dignified, and serious without being
solemn, has been turned into a mixture of sensationalism, glitz and
pomposity. Perhaps it will win for the new ITV an even bigger audience among
those who read tabloid newspapers, but in the process it will surely lose
many of its more serious viewers.
Over the years it has been argued in this column that, far from differing
significantly, the main television news programmes have seemed, to the non
professional onlooker, to be virtually indistinguishable. The BBC used to
employ as news readers people who were members of Equity, the actors' union.
ITN smiled superciliously and boasted that its presenters were not mere
'readers' but 'newscasters', members of the National Union of Journalists
with all the experience necessary to gather the news as well as read it out.
But to the average viewer the distinction was irrelevant. Whether or not
Richard Baker and Jan Leeming were members of Equity, many people preferred
their personalities and their diction to those of some ITN newscasters.
Anyway, whatever the qualifications of the presenters, the two news
programmes were remarkably similar: in the items they covered, the approach
they took, the significance they apportioned, and the general appearance on
screen, there was less difference than between, say, the Daily Mail and the
Daily Express. This always seemed rather odd. After all, television is a
mass medium with much of its output - soap operas, game shows, comedies -
directed straight at the tabloid market. Why, then, were all its news
programmes pitched somewhere just below the level of the Daily Telegraph?
More recent developments brought us more broadsheet style coverage in
Newsnight and Channel 4 News but still nothing like the BBC's old Nationwide
to appeal to the mass market.
Having argued in that manner it would be perverse now to start complaining
that News At Ten has gone down market (though it has). That is not the
complaint. The trouble is that its overhaul has resulted in so much that is
pretentious, superficial and downright silly. The effects of the change were
most vividly exemplified one evening during the recent blitz of royal family
stories when ITN's court correspondent made the bizarre assertion 'Trevor
the Queen is now behind me . . .' It took several moments to deconstruct
this.
It seems that News At Ten now specialises in the 'sandwich', a conventional
film report served up to the consumer between a studio intro and a live
two-way interview involving anchorman and reporter. Labelling a report with
the caption 'Live' is just one of many habits imported from the US. While
broadcasters are impressed with their own capacity to 'go live' it seems
unlikely that viewers care very much, but on News At Ten it has become
something of an obsession. To have the reporter 'live' in the studio is
considered pretty dull, so they are obliged to go out with a camera and
stand in front of some symbol of their expertise, even if it is pitch dark
(economics specialists favour a brass wall-plate saying 'The Treasury'), and
then conduct a technologically complicated conversation which they might
just as well be having in the warm back at base.
Apparently on this occasion the court correspondent was standing in front of
Buckingham Palace and was announcing that the sovereign had returned home.
The snag was that having begun her two-way with the mandatory 'Trevor' - a
useage which is supposed to establish anchorman Trevor McDonald in the
public mind as a tremendously amiable godhead, master of all he surveys but
still one heck of a feller chatting on first name terms with all those
people - she then omitted any indication of a comma and thus invented
someone called Trevor the Queen. Thus can pretentiousness trip you up.
It seems such a shame that all this razzmatazz should be tacked onto News At
Ten, of all programmes. Whatever your feelings about NUJ or Equity
presenters, News At Ten was for many years a pretty level headed sort of
affair which conveyed a sense of being there simply to give you the news
straight from the shoulder, no messing. Now it opens with airship shots over
London, a romantic overhead view of the ITN building in Gray's Inn Road, and
then a swooping Hollywood zoom through the high-tech newsroom, bathed in a
blue haze of light, to find the American-modelled lone anchorman heroically
holding the floor. You begin to wonder whether they have all watched
Broadcast News too often and started to believe in their own star quality.
Worse is to come. News at Ten has taken techniques from yoof series and
graphics from America and created the most mind-bogglingly over elaborate
image to be seen anywhere on British television. On top of a blue background
is laid a white grille. Over the white grille an oddly inaccurate map of
Europe (have a look at France). In front of the map a whole stack of monitor
screens. On the screens very often a mug-shot of somebody shown almost as
big as McDonald, frequently with some sort of symbol or logo, and usually a
word or two in capital letters pulled at random from the script: 'RELIEF
OPERATION' for instance, or 'NEW ROUTES' or 'GAS SPLIT'. These add not one
iota to viewer understanding but make the screen look busy and significant.
In front of all this lot sits McDonald himself.
The irony is that often, when a graphic is really needed - to show how the
light might have caused the fire in Windsor Castle for instance - ITN's is
much better than the BBC's. But then the same goes for the most basic and
important part of the content: the reports. When direct comparisons can be
made, ITN's reports are often better. For example Geoffrey Archer's recent
pieces from a dangerous bit of road in Bosnia were consistently clearer and
more comprehensive than the BBC's. (Though to be fair the best reporter in
Somalia has quite definitely been the BBC's excellent George Alagaiah.) But
the new News At Ten spoils all this by absurd catchphrases and silly bits of
linking script. McDonald keeps on saying 'Coming next, more of the day's
news' as though we might have been expecting some conjuring tricks.
At least they seem, in the past few days, to have decided it is a bad idea
to include a big 'Focus' item in every edition. Some of these mini current
affairs programmes were good, some - such as last week's on 'her-rassment'
(heavy handed heterosexuality at work) - were merely tired re-runs of
features which have already been done to death by national newspapers. None
seemed to have much justification in a flagship news programme, so it is
good to see the idea being re-thought.
However, this move seems to have coincided with greater determination than
ever to find sensational stories for the top of the programme. During last
Thursday's opening item on what was said repeatedly to be 'systematic and
organised rape' in Croatia (a horror tale told about French victims in the
First World War and Belgians in World War 2) it turned out that ITN could
produce not one single woman who would substantiate the story.
Perhaps this will turn out not to be the paradigm for the re-designed ITV.
Maybe we shall all be pleasantly surprised at the civilised and
sophisticated nature of the new network. Perhaps in 1993 there'll be pink
pigs over the white cliffs of Dover.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-654</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Management: Goose that lays the golden egg - Do you keep
your head when all around are losing theirs? Michael Cassell takes a trip to
the pantomime
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL CASSELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Take a thigh-smacking principal boy who happens to be a girl, a
balloon-bosomed matron who turns out to be a man, a stage-trained spaniel
and a string of sausages and what have you got? - a traditional British
pantomime.
The challenge of mounting one of the dozens of pantos now showing daily the
length and breadth of the country may appear no different from putting on a
conventional stage production.
But the seasonal task of whipping up a slapstick mix of old chestnuts and
oven-fresh farce would certainly test the organisational skills - not to
mention the patience - of any corporate manager.
Given a sales team (cast) usually entirely unknown to each other, a product
(storyline) which changes shape by the hour and an immovable launch deadline
(first night), putting on Puss in Boots can be anything but a pantomime.
Not surprisingly, some pantophiles insist that, to do the job well, the
producer requires an extra-special characteristic.
'I call it certifiable lunacy,' says Sheron French, a part-time teacher who
has organised amateur pantos in Birmingham for so long she claims she gave
Dan Leno, the famous 19th century dame, his (or was it her?) first break.
'If you can keep your cool, control a mob of budding prima donnas and still
please the customers, then I suppose you could run ICI,' she cheerily
volunteers.
Amateur or professional, the same panto production hurdles have to be jumped
and everyone has to complete the course simultaneously. 'We actually had
only half a horse one opening night. The caretaker stepped in and didn't put
a foot wrong,' French recalls.
Impressive logistical skills are required to co-ordinate the roles of
performers, technicians and support staff, while the theatrical excesses
which threaten to blow a raspberry at the budget have to be curbed.
The roll-call of producers' nightmares have included an outbreak of chicken
pox on first night, a high-wire act involving a dangerously heavy Peter Pan
and any number of incontinent animal acts.
Although she has no panto this year - 'don't blame the recession, its
because too many people are going away on holiday' - French ridicules the
idea that panto is as washed up as Widow Twanky.
Its detractors, however, claim that panto is dying on its feet, the victim
of three-foot high sophisticates who spurn Basil Brush in favour of Sonic
the Hedgehog. Not that pantomime is just for children, with many an adult
using youngsters as an alibi for a seat.
Pantomime began to emerge as an art form in the early 18th century. Serious
theatre was then often mixed with mimed scenes and dances played by
characters from the Italian tradition of masked comedy, commedia dell'arte.
This developed into full-length harlequinades and, finally, into pantomime,
offering hours of knock-about fun and weeks of employment for popular music
hall artistes.
While many of the elements of British pantomime were originally imported
from Europe, it has today become an almost exclusively British affair.
No-one knows why it has survived so long, though writers like John Morley -
a master of the art with 200 panto scripts under his belt  - attribute its
appeal to an ever-changing blend of traditional storylines and contemporary
characters capable of remaining relevant in an age of television and pop
celebrity.
Amateur panto appears to be in rude good health. Audiences can run into
several thousand for the most ambitious productions, which might cost
several thousand pounds to put on. Charities are usually the beneficiaries
of any profits.
The total absence this Christmas of panto in London's West End is being
cited as supporting evidence by those who say its days are numbered. But
within booing and hissing distance of theatreland, avid panto fans can find
Dick Whittington, Aladdin, Peter Pan, Cinderella and Jack and the Beanstalk.
This season, promoter Paul Elliott reckons that up to 1m children will watch
the 20 pantomimes he is staging around the country, like Aladdin at the
Birmingham Hippodrome.
Commercial pantomime is no laughing matter. It can offer its stars (nowadays
heavily drawn from television and the world of sport) very high pay - maybe
thousands of pounds a week  - for two shows a day, six days a week. A big
show can cost well over Pounds 500,000 for an eight-week run, half meeting
cast costs and the balance going on other production overheads.
But can pantomime continue to survive in a world less readily entertained by
awful puns and hammy one-liners? They will certainly have to compete
increasingly with a new breed of family shows offering children and adults a
more thoughtful evening out.
Clarion Productions, formed by James Woods and Justin Savage and run from
their homes in London, has already staged two successful West End
productions offering a taste of what is to come.
Their current show, 'The Witches' at the Duke of York's, attracted big
opening advances and has a larger budget than the average West End show.
Adapted from a Roald Dahl story, it is imaginative kids' stuff out of the
non-panto stable.
David Wood, the producer, believes that traditional pantomime is no longer
in tune with what modern families want: 'It is essential that we recognise
that children are our most important audience and deserve the best we can
give them.
'If we bore, under-estimate or patronise them, we will have only ourselves
to blame if, in the future, live theatre withers and dies.'
So is pantomime all washed up or not? Altogether now: 'Oh yes it is]' - 'Oh
no it isn't]'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-655</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Management: To Russia with no love lost - Andrew Jack
reports on a gulf of misunderstandings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE GOODSIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The recent political upheavals in Russia have added to the uncertainty about
the future of western investment in eastern Europe. But ask corporate
executives in the west about joint ventures in eastern Europe and they are
as bullish as ever. Ask their managers on the ground - let alone their
eastern partners - and the view is different.
After several years of experience of east-west joint ventures, many
companies have had their expectations dashed, according to a survey from
Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu, the international accountancy network.
Western managers in headquarters of companies with joint ventures said they
would recommend them. But only two-fifths of their eastern partners and
one-third of their own managers based in the east agreed.
Deloitte interviewed more than 168 companies with joint ventures or direct
foreign investment in Bulgaria, Czechoslovakia, Hungary, Poland, Romania and
Russia.
The key business problems identified in the east were the banking system,
telecommunications, fiscal laws and lack of market data.
The most significant staffing problems were management and language skills,
followed by the absence of the profit motive, salaries and the work ethic.
Eastern partners consistently rated these less important hindrances than
western partners.
Western managers complained about their partners' lack of understanding of
the western way of doing business and the lack of finance; easterners said
the westerners lacked understanding of local conditions and had excessive
short-term expectations of profit. Part of the difference may be explained
by their varied objectives. Eastern partners said they entered joint
ventures mainly to gain access to new products and capital. Westerners rated
local market knowledge and access as most important.
Based on its survey, Deloitte highlights four factors to help successful
investment in eastern Europe:
PEOPLE: Select staff who can understand different cultures; who are patient,
flexible and tolerant and who know the language. Hire local people with good
basic skills and the ability to be trained, not on 'relevant experience'.
FINANCE: Expect only long-term returns. Do not depend on local finance.
Phase investment and keep fixed costs low, given the uncertain future of the
region.
LOCAL ENVIRONMENT: Identify people who can track legal and regulatory
changes, who are familiar with the local public sector and banking system
and can find suppliers and sources.
MARKET: Adapt to local demands and cultural differences in brand and product
perceptions. The only way to sustain sales may be through export markets.
Some Russian experts recently questioned whether imported management
expertise is always relevant to the challenge of restructuring Russian
industry, writes Jane Goodsir.
Consultants attending a recent conference of the International Organisation
Development Association in Coventry agreed that partnerships between Russian
and foreign consultancies were the most effective approach in Russia.
Delegates also suggested that in future western consultants might take on
the new role of 'coaching' Russian consultants, rather than dominating
consultancy projects.
Nikhail Albertjian, a Moscow academic and consultant, said Russian clients
were showing less deference to western experts. 'Russian managers still
think that western consultants have much to offer, but they're no longer
seen as gods. As human beings, they have failings.'
The work of 'expert' strategy consultants is still valued and respected,
however. And there is great demand for practical solutions to immediate
implementation problems. But Russians distrust slogans and respond badly to
consultants who work with collective 'mission' and 'vision' approaches.
Cultural differences between western consultants and their Russian
counterparts can hinder partnerships. Reijer van Vegten, a director of the
German-based Mercurius Consulting, believes Russian consultants are strong
on theory but are often self-promoting and need better practical skills.
A 'Business Cultures Bridge' project, co-ordinated by the Academy of
National Economy aims to develop partnership work between Russian and
western consultants. A workshop is planned in Moscow next summer.
Workshop details from: Academy of National Economy, 82 Vernadsky Avenue,
117571, Moscow.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-656</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / BICC in optics tie with Japanese
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN HAMILTON FAZEY, Northern Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BICC, the UK cables manu-facturer, has formed a company with Furukawa
Electric and Nippon Telegraph of Japan to make optical components for
European telecommunications markets.
The company, Europtics, will operate from Knowsley, Merseyside. About 30
people will be employed when it opens next September but more than 120 jobs
are forecast by the end of 1995.
The government announced regional assistance of Pounds 900,000 for the
project yesterday. The companies are refusing to disclose the total value
because of a commercial confidentiality agreement with the Japanese
partners.
BICC will have 51 per cent of Europtics, with 29 per cent for Furukawa and
20 per cent for Nippon.
The project follows research by the companies into new markets for
fibre-optic technology in subscriber access and telephone networks, video
switching and computer processing systems.
The factory will be the first in Europe to make MT connectors - a plastic
moulded plug for joining optical-fibre ribbons, a fibre optics equivalent of
the three-way connector for a household electrical socket.
It enables several cables to be connected for about Pounds 25 as opposed to
Pounds 125 for joining them up individually.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-657</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Better late than never for big stores: Neil Buckley visits
Wimbledon to see how Christmas is bringing out the shoppers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL BUCKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF THIS Christmas sees the beginning of a consumer-led recovery, some
believe it may be sparked by men's guilt.
Ms Khym Hauxwell, department manager for cosmetics at Debenhams in
Wimbledon, says men shop on Christmas Eve 'slightly drunk after a few drinks
at the pub, with a huge guilt complex. They spend a fortune on perfume and
underwear for their wives and girlfriends.'
Even before Christmas Eve, men are more malleable, more easily persuaded by
a sales pitch. Women 'know what they want and tend to stick to it'. Ms
Hauxwell last week persuaded one man who thought he had come in for a bottle
of perfume for his wife to buy a Pounds 285 gift set.
But guilt-stricken men do not make a Christmas. Retailers are hoping for a
rush of buying this week to make up for what most agree has been the late
arrival of Christmas.
At Debenhams in Wimbledon, the chain's newest store and its showcase, there
was a sense of expectation as the shutters went up on Monday and the
sunlight and piped Christmas muzak flooded in from the recently opened
Centre Court shopping centre.
Mr Steven Gaunt, 39, store manager and veteran of three store launches, will
get little rest until Christmas day. Mr Gaunt says this is his 24th
Christmas in the retail trade.
By 8am he and his deputy are at their desks reviewing the trading figures
for the day before. The figures are a closely guarded secret, but the
managers seem pleased.
The first hour is quiet. Grandmothers with toddlers and pushchairs form the
mainstay of the shoppers. Many head for the restaurant, where a full English
breakfast for 99p is one of the best bar-gains.
Behind the scenes, in the storeroom with its yards of clothes racks and
hydraulic shelves, Christmas is in full swing as staff sort through the
first of the day's deliveries - 126 sets of men's clothing each containing
between three and 20 garments.
Most of the year there may be two deliveries a day from Debenhams warehouses
and several others for concessions within the store. In the weeks before
Christmas there may be twice as many, each three times normal size.
Mr Gaunt makes a detailed tour of the store. Fixtures are straightened,
displays prodded and tweaked. A table short of stock is viewed with a
mixture of satisfaction and disapproval. He can tell at a glance what people
are buying. Women's wraps did well yesterday; so did slipper socks and men's
casual shirts.
Upstairs in the toy department are other big sellers - Trolls, dolls with
elfin faces and clumps of brightly coloured hair, and, in what is normally
the hi-fi listening room in the electrical department, video games and home
karaoke machines.
By the time of the management meeting at 11am, the store is starting to
buzz. Mums are led by the hand by small children whose want lists are
blissfully unaffected by the recession. An hour later, they are joined by
workers on their lunch hour. Queues form by the checkouts; there are smiles
from the manage-ment.
As buying begins in earnest, Mr Gaunt reviews the socks and underwear
department. Marks are awarded for presentation and layout; even in the
Christmas rush retailing is an exact science.
There is time only for a microwaved cottage pie in the self-service canteen
before the managers head out to snoop around the shelves of their
competitor, Elys, the independent department store.
On the way there is a chance to review trading elsewhere in the centre.
There are encouraging signs. In spite of the recession, more than 65 per
cent of space in Centre Court has been let, with 70 per cent expected by the
end of January. Shops such as Athena and the Body Shop are teeming.
'People are out today,' Mr Gaunt says with approval. But few shoppers are
carrying the bulging plastic bags traditionally associated with Christmas.
Elys is full of shoppers, but lightly laden ones. The Debenhams spies learn
little except that Elys plans to open on Sunday, January 3. Debenhams does
not.
Back for the afternoon staff meeting, and there is something of a lull in
trading before the next peak around 5pm, when commuters start pouring in
from Wimbledon station. The last three hours could be the busiest of the
day.
By 6pm, Khym Hauxwell is smiling again. She has just persuaded a man to part
with Pounds 585 on perfumes and cosmetics for his wife and daughters. Even
in the depths of a recession, old-fashioned selling skills can pay off.
Retailers are wondering whether those skills will be enough.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-658</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Trade gap on visibles grows wider
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE rising costs of imports resulting from sterling's devaluation led to a
sharp increase in the visible trade deficit for November, the Central
Statistical Office said yesterday.
The worsening in the deficit was offset by record exports, indicating that
many manufacturers are holding their own in world markets in the face of
difficult trading conditions.
In terms of underlying volumes, which strip out the effects of price
changes, revised figures from the CSO indicate that imports are rising more
slowly than had been thought a month ago. That raises hopes that the pace of
the recent deterioration in the trade deficit may be slackening.
November's seasonally adjusted deficit on merchandise goods and oil - the
visible trade gap - was Pounds 1.39bn compared with a revised Pounds 1.16bn
in October. Last month's figure was the highest since July 1990.
Taking into account an assumed Pounds 200m surplus on invisible trade -
services, bank transactions, dividends and other transfers - the deficit on
the current account in November was Pounds 1.19bn. That compares with a
revised Pounds 955m for October, and is the biggest monthly number since
April.
In November, the value of imports was Pounds 10.57bn, 2.7 per cent higher
than the figure in October of Pounds 10.29bn. The November import bill was
the highest for 31 months.
Exports rose in value last month to Pounds 9.18bn, 0.5 per cent higher than
the value in October of Pounds 9.13bn.
In the three months to the end of November, the current-account deficit was
Pounds 2.78bn, after Pounds 2.46bn in the June-August period. The
current-account deficit for the first 11 months of the year stands at Pounds
10.28bn compared with Pounds 6.32bn for the whole of last year.
Between September and November, import unit values, a measure of underlying
price changes, increased by 8.8 per cent on a non-seasonally adjusted basis.
That indicates that most of the 12 per cent depreciation in the pound since
Britain left the European exchange rate mechanism in mid September has shown
through in higher import prices. Import unit values showed a 2.6 per cent
rise from October to November.
Between September and November, underlying import volumes excluding oil and
erratic items such as ships and aircraft fell by 0.4 per cent.
The CSO said yesterday that this measure of underlying import volumes showed
no increase in the three months to November 30, compared with the previous
three months.
A month ago the CSO put a different gloss on import growth. It said then
that, on a three-monthly basis to the end of October, underlying import
volumes showed a rise of 1.5 per cent.
Part of the discrepancy is explained by CSO revisions to its data for
October. Those have increased the previous estimate for the change in import
unit values between September and October, while cutting the estimate for
October import volumes.
Export volumes, on the same underlying three-monthly basis, increased by 4
per cent in the three months to the end of November. On the basis of CSO
figures issued last month, export volumes in the three months to the end of
October were flat compared with the previous three-month period.
Three-monthly underlying import volumes to the end of last month were 7.5
per cent up on a year previously, while the same measure of export volumes
showed a 6 per cent rise.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                     CURRENT ACCOUNT (Pounds bn)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                          Visible Trade Balance
                             Less oil
           Current             and                        Invisibles
           Balance   Total   erratics   Exports   Imports   Balance
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
1990        -17.0    -18.8    -21.2      101.7     120.5      +1.8
1991         -6.3    -10.3    -13.6      103.4     113.7      +4.0
Qtr 3        -1.3     -2.4     -3.5       26.4      28.8      +1.1
Qtr 4        -1.8     -2.6     -3.5       26.2      28.9      +0.8
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
1992
Qtr 1        -2.9     -3.0     -3.5       26.1      29.2      +0.2
Qtr 2        -3.1     -3.2     -3.9       26.7      29.9      +0.1
Qtr 3        -2.2     -3.2     -4.2       26.4      29.6      +1.1
Jan          -1.1     -1.2     -1.3        8.3       9.4      +0.06
Feb          -0.9     -1.0     -1.1        9.0      10.0      +0.06
Mar          -0.8     -0.9     -1.1        8.9       9.8      +0.06
Apr          -1.4     -1.4     -1.5        8.8      10.2      +0.03
May          -0.8     -0.9     -1.2        9.1      10.0      +0.03
June         -0.9     -0.9     -1.2        8.8       9.7      +0.03
July         -0.8     -1.1     -1.4        8.8       9.9      +0.4
August       -0.8     -1.1     -1.6        8.9      10.0      +0.4
Sept         -0.6     -1.0     -1.2        8.7       9.7      +0.4
Oct          -1.0     -1.2     -1.4        9.1      10.3      +0.2
Nov          -1.2     -1.4     -1.6        9.2      10.6      +0.2
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Invisibles for October and November 1992 are projections. Figures are
seasonally adjusted, and because of rounding may not add up. Source: CSO
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-659</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Businessmen urged to bid for sell-offs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN WILLMAN, Public Policy Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CABINET Office is inviting senior business executives to a conference in
London next month to encourage them to bid for the Pounds 1.5bn of central
government services to be put out to tender before the end of September.
Under the market-testing programme launched last month, more than 44,000
civil servants will have to compete for their jobs against bids from the
private sector.
The government expects to make savings of 25 per cent of the value of the
services put out to tender, even when the contract is won by the existing
staff.
The conference is being held because of fears that business has yet to
recognise the opportunities offered by the 60-fold increase in activities to
be put out to tender.
The government wants several bids for each activity, and hopes that a range
of businesses will be involved.
Ministers are also keen to highlight the extension of market-testing into
activities previously regarded as core Whitehall functions, such as managing
government computers holding criminal records. Other services to be
contracted out include finance, accounting, auditing, payroll, recruitment,
legal services, debt collection, typing and secretarial services, estate and
building management.
A similar event in Birmingham last month staged by the Ministry of Defence
attracted more than 600 companies.
The London conference, on January 18, is being organised along similar
lines, with members of the Cabinet Office efficiency unit explaining the
procedures for putting in bids.
Detailed information will be provided for the first time about the
activities to be market-tested. Representatives from each department will be
available to discuss their department's plans and offer guidance on who to
approach if bidding for a particular activity. More than 20,000 businesses
have been invited.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-660</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Drift net salmon fishing to dwindle
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE centuries-old tradition of drift net fishing for salmon off England's
north-east coast is to be phased out, it was confirmed yesterday.
Fishermen will no longer be able to hand down the skill to their sons under
a reform that will end the fishery during the next 30 years.
The National Rivers Authority was invited by the Ministry of Agriculture,
Fisheries and Food to draw up plans to phase out the 143 drift net salmon
licences between Holy Island in Northumberland and the Humber. Last year,
the licence holders netted about 30,000 salmon and a similar number of sea
trout.
The licensing reform follows claims from anglers and river bank owners that
drift net fishing is depleting river salmon stocks. The ministry said
although there was no evidence of an immediate threat, the stocks could be
better managed if netting ceased.
The river authority's North East Coast (Limitation of Net Licences) Order,
which has been accepted by the ministry, establishes a policy of
non-replacement of licences as holders retire, rather than outlawing the
600-yard nets are played out across the tide.
Mr Richard Banks, chief executive of the National Federation of Fishermen's
Organisations, said a public inquiry would not be sought: 'The angling
interests had a lot to gain but we had a lot to lose.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-661</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / OFT to examine computer complaints
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN CANE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Office of Fair Trading said yesterday it had received 'one or two'
complaints about Microsoft, the world's largest microcomputer software
company. But the OFT added it was too early to say whether the inquiries
would lead to a full investigation.
The company, which made pre-tax profits of Dollars 209m on sales of Dollars
818m in the first quarter of its current financial year, has been under
investigation from the Federal Trade Commission in the US for the past 30
months over alleged uncompetitive behaviour and abuse of its dominant market
position.
The allegations in the UK relate to a new form of licensing agreement that
Microsoft is offering manufacturers who wish to supply Microsoft's
market-leading MS-DOS operating software with their machines.
Under the terms of the new agreement, smaller manufacturers will be able to
offer the software ready loaded on to their machines.
Some are complaining that the terms of the agree-ment are onerous and commit
them to paying for an MS-DOS licence for every machine they ship  - even if
it uses another operating system.
Mr Bill Inglis, Microsoft UK sales director, rejected the complaints, saying
that neither pricing nor conditions had been altered.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-662</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Heseltine rebuffs pit restart calls
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Industrial and Political Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Michael Heseltine, trade and industry secretary, rebuffed calls yesterday
for mining to resume at 10 coal mines facing immediate shutdown - in spite
of the High Court ruling this week that the closure plan had been carried
out unlawfully.
He said the court had been concerned about the 'independence of the
consultation process that is under way'. British Coal, which is considering
whether to appeal against the judgment, said there was no requirement to
resume production at the 10 pits.
Mr Heseltine's embarrassment continued as backbench Conservative MPs made
clear that the government could not afford further mishaps in its energy
review, on which the future of 31 pits depends.
Sir Rhodes Boyson, Tory MP for Brent North, said: 'The government's reaction
to the High Court judgment on the closure-threatened pits must centre on the
need, at a time of heavy and increasing unemployment, to save all viable
mining jobs.'
Mr Paddy Ashdown, Liberal Democrat leader, joined Labour calls for the trade
and industry secretary's resignation, saying that the court ruling went to
the heart of Mr Major's approach to government. 'After 14 years in power,
the Conservatives are perverting the very system which made their power
possible,' Mr Ashdown said.
Labour, which is pressing for the 10 pits facing immediate closure to be
included in the government review, said it was winning the battle for public
support. Mr Robin Cook, shadow trade and industry secretary, delivered to
Downing Street a 600,000-name petition calling for the pit closure programme
to be reversed.
British Coal said it was considering how to comply with a High Court
requirement that greater independence be given to the procedures for
assessing pits before shutdown. It said 5,460 miners had applied for
redundancy since October 13, receiving average compensation of Pounds 25,000
each. But the redundancy rate is slowing, and unions hope this week's ruling
will stop it altogether.
Mr Mark Stephens, solicitor for the National Union of Mineworkers, said Mr
Heseltine had 'made a fatal mistake by his incredibly high-handed
behaviour'. His refusal to allow mining to resume at the 10 most threatened
pits was 'close to contempt of court'.
The 113 miners at Betws colliery, south Wales, the only one of the 10 still
producing coal, will today work their final shift before the holiday break,
but now hope to resume work in the new year.
Mr Mike Reynolds, NUM lodge secretary, said the High Court decision had
given the colliery 'a further breathing space to prove this is a viable
pit'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-663</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Newspaper industry plans second campaign against possible
VAT on papers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE newspaper industry is planning its second campaign in eight years
against the possible imposition of value added tax on newspapers, Raymond
Snoddy writes.
The industry is increasingly worried that the government will impose VAT on
newspapers and magazines - and possibly books - in one of next year's two
Budgets.
Mr Dugal Nisbet-Smith, director of the Newspaper Society, which represents
local and regional newspapers, said yesterday: 'We have not had a denial
from any minister that this is on the agenda.'
The Newspaper Society has commissioned consultants Price Waterhouse to look
at the impact the imposition of 17.5 per cent VAT on newspapers would have.
During the 1984-85 campaign against VAT, Price Waterhouse said a 15 per cent
rate of VAT would cut circulations by 7 per cent and lead to the closure of
12 or 13 regional dailies and about 100 weekly newspapers.
The society has found a disappointing response in its lobbying of MPs - the
mood may have swung against newspapers in the wake of revelations about some
senior politicians and members of the Royal Family.
The Newspaper Society fears that the imposition of VAT - which could also be
charged on free papers - would amount to as much as Pounds 500m a year.
Relaunching its campaign, the society said it believed 'that sufficient
evidence now existed that VAT on newspapers, books and magazines was again
on the chancellor's Budget agenda'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-664</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Names opting for individual legal action
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A GROWING NUMBER of Lloyd's Names faced with heavy losses are opting to
pursue legal action against their agents on an individual basis rather than
as part of action groups.
In the past two days, solicitors DJ Freeman have issued and served writs on
behalf of 27 Names - individuals whose assets support Lloyd's underwriting.
Mr David Tiplady of DJ Freeman, said the writs had been delivered personally
to members' agents.
More than 100 Names were likely to follow suit over the next few weeks.
So far, virtually all of the several thousand Names pursuing legal action
have done so as part of action groups. But some Names have become impatient
about delays in legal actions which they fear might reduce their chances of
obtaining compensation.
'It's part of the dash for cash,' said Mr Tiplady, added that many Names
feared that insurance funds available to settle legal disputes could be
exhausted before all their cases are heard.
The 27 Names who served writs this week are alleging negligence by the
members' agents which channelled them on to high-risk syndicates. The
majority of actions involve the Poland and Gooda &amp; Partners agencies, which
figure separately in the bigger actions.
In a separate development, another solicitor, Mr Guy Sutton of Norton Rose,
has warned Names that time might be running out if they wish to sue their
managing agents with the hope of winning adequate compensation.
From December 31 1992, managing agents (which administer Lloyd's syndicates)
will be no longer required to buy errors and omissions insurance, which
meets the cost of legal awards against them.
'Potential claims must be notified to insurers before the end of the year
for a Name to be certain that a managing agent will insured against such
claims,' Mr Sutton said.
He added: 'In only a few days, the door may have closed, leaving a Name
effectively barred in future because his claim against his managing agent is
uninsured.'
Mr Alfred Doll-Steinberg, the chairman of the Gooda Walker Action group,
which represents about 2,000 Names, has resigned with effect from February
28. He will remain a member of the group's committee.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-665</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Major loses his jovial 'Mr Fixit'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Tristan Garel-Jones, the minister for Europe who announced his imminent
resignation yesterday, is not only part-architect, part-pilot of the
Maastricht treaty who passionately pushes the case for Europe. He is also a
hate figure for Tory Euro-sceptics, the target chosen by Maastricht's
opponents when direct attacks on the prime minister smacked of spite and
disloyalty.
He has withstood the jibes and whispering campaigns with relish. Now he has
decided to make a break.
Last night there was nothing to suggest that his reasons for going from next
spring - time to see the Maastricht bill through its Commons stages - were
not genuine. He has a Spanish wife, five children, business interests, a
passion for painting and a house in Spain.
The loss of a senior minister responsible for a central part of government
policy will not help Mr John Major after a bruising six months.
The two have been close allies since they entered politics; the prime
minister has depended on Mr Garel-Jones's skills during a troublesome EC
presidency.
He spent eight years in the Whips office before becoming a foreign minister.
He rose to deputy chief whip, his 'wet' Conservative instincts more than
outweighed - in the eyes of Mrs Margaret Thatcher, the former prime minister
 -by his cunning and badgering prowess.
In 1990 he offered to resign, saying he was fed up with the hours and with
being the only whip who thoroughly understood parliament's complex
procedures. But Mrs Thatcher gave him a job at the Foreign Office that
matched his enthusiasms.
The same year, he was accused by the Tory right of plotting to bring Mrs
Thatcher down. A crucial meeting of ministers was held at his London house
during the leadership bid of Mr Michael Heseltine, now trade and industry
secretary; his version is that the meeting was just drinks with friends.
His joviality does not always compensate for a frantic lifestyle jetting
across Europe. At night he reads the 'red boxes' of official documents in
bed, scribbling witty - sometimes deeply undiplomatic - asides in the
margins.
In spite of the jesting, he does not like Euro-sceptics' charges that he is
'a Euro-freak'. The European Community, he told a fringe meeting at the
Conservative party conference in October, 'is the most frustrating,
pusillanimous organisation you have ever come across'.
He campaigned for Mr Douglas Hurd, the foreign secretary, to replace Mrs
Thatcher as prime minister. He says it was an act of loyalty - but he is
clearly at ease under Mr Major, whose down-to-earth style matches his own.
Mr Garel Jones first told the prime minister he wanted to step down last
summer, but his love of cut-and-thrust politics makes it hard to see how he
will manage to distance himself completely from the Whitehall machine.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-666</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Wider VAT might yield Pounds 9bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EXTENDING the range of goods on which value added tax is levied might add
revenue of more than Pounds 9bn to the Exchequer.
Treasury officials have suggested that ministers may consider levying VAT on
goods such as domestic fuel, public transport, new housebuilding and
newspapers.
Customs &amp; Excise said yesterday that there was no intention either to remove
any goods from zero-rating for VAT or to change the present VAT rate.
Treasury estimates last released in July in a parliamentary answer show that
total VAT forgone as a result of zero-rated goods was Pounds 17.1bn in the
year to last April.
That may be an over-estimate because it ignores 'second-round effects' -
consumption falling as the additional tax raised prices.
The government has a number of options for raising more VAT:
Reduce the number of exempt, zero-rated goods.
Increase the basic rate of VAT beyond 17.5 per cent.
Introduce a new intermediate VAT rate or a higher, luxury goods rate.
Reduce the threshold for VAT registrations by companies below the existing
Pounds 36,600 turnover.
The first option is the most likely. The thrust of government initiatives
has been towards increasing the VAT threshold - which rose by the maximum
permissible amount in the last Budget - and keeping VAT low compared with
other EC states.
Agreements by the European finance ministers would limit VAT rates to
between 15 per cent and 25 per cent, placing a ceiling on significant
increases.
Reducing the number of zero-rated goods would be controversial. The sixth
directive from the EC permits goods that were zero-rated for VAT before 1991
to retain that status. Once taxed, exempt status can never be regained.
Levying VAT on books, magazines and newspapers would be likely to bring
criticism from the education lobby. Levies on public transport and domestic
fuel would be criticised for the damage to those on low incomes - although
they could be com-pensated with extra allow-ances.
The estimated Pounds 3.4bn forgone from new construction would equally come
under attack. Mr Roger Humber, director of the Housebuilders Federation,
said VAT on the sale of new houses would be 'utterly nonsensical'.
Items that have not been mentioned for VAT rating include the single one
that provides most potential for additional revenue and controversy: food
other than restaurant meals, which could have generated about Pounds 7bn in
the last fiscal year.
Equally, there has been no mention of introducing VAT on drugs and medicines
on prescription, which might generate Pounds 400m, or on water and sewage
charges, estimated to be worth Pounds 500m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-667</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Union may urge action at TSB
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BANKING, Insurance and Finance Union said it expected to call for
industrial action in TSB after employees voted to protest at the loss of 840
jobs from the merger of its insurance and retail banking operations.
The vote in favour of industrial action was 7,169 to 2,172, out of the
19,000 Bifu members balloted. TSB, which has 25,000 employees, was
negotiating with the union yesterday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-668</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Bomb explodes in Tube station
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JIMMY BURNS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A BOMB believed to have been planted by the IRA exploded at Hampstead Tube
station yesterday evening. It caused disruption to London Underground
services and subsequent street closures by the police led to severe local
traffic congestion, Jimmy Burns writes.
British Transport Police said the explosion occurred at platform level at
the bottom of a shaft. It happened within 30 minutes of a coded telephone
warning to the Press Association news agency by a man claiming to represent
the IRA. There were no reports of casualties.
The incident represented a departure in the tactics being adopted by the IRA
in its pre-Christmas campaign. Previous IRA attacks affecting the
Underground system in recent months have taken place outside stations or
have involved small incendiary devices placed in carriages before passengers
have boarded trains.
Scotland Yard's anti-terrorist branch and the security service MI5 have
launched anoperation aimed at arresting an estimated three IRA units that
are believed to be operating on the mainland.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-669</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Confusion arises on orimulsion plant
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES, Resources Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE WAS confusion last night over plans for the UK's largest
orimulsion-burning power plant after the plant's owners denied a statement
by the pollution authorities that they had withdrawn their application for
authorisation.
The Pollution Inspectorate said National Power had withdrawn an application
to burn orimulsion at its Pembroke plant and was seeking authority to burn
heavy oil instead. The inspectorate referred to a letter from the manager of
the Pembroke plant on December 21. Orimulsion, developed in Venezuela in the
mid 1980s, is about 70 per cent bitumen by volume mixed with water and an
additive to keep the mixture stable.
National Power said the letter from the plant manager was intended to seek
more time to respond to a call from the inspectorate earlier in October for
stronger environmental safeguards. National Power said it was still
investigating the commercial prospects for orimulsion, although he confirmed
that it was also planned to burn heavy oil.
Oil is currently burned at the 2,000MW Pembroke plant. National Power's
plans to convert it to orimulsion have been denounced by the environmental
lobby, which labels orimulsion 'the filthy fuel'. The fuel became notorious
in August last year after an accident at Richborough power station, in Kent,
left cars corroded by 'acid smuts', a kind of acid rain.
In October, the inspectorate told National Power that it could not approve
the plant unless more environmental measures - which it did not specify -
were adopted.
The power generation industry accepts that orimulsion contains more sulphur
than most oil or coal, but argues that its overall emissions are less
harmful. It is cheaper than domestically produced coal and competes with
imported coal. PowerGen, the smaller of the two power generators, has been
burning orimulsion for several years on an experimental basis without
environmental controls at Richborough and at a power station in Cheshire.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-670</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Former BLMC executive dies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SIR George Turnbull, chairman and chief executive of Inchcape, the business
services group, died yesterday aged 66.
Sir George had a long and varied career in the motor industry, both in the
UK and overseas, being a former managing director of British Leyland Motor
Corporation, vice-president of Hyundai Motors and chairman of Talbot UK. He
had also been chairman of the Industrial Society's council between 1987 and
1990 and a past president of the Society of Motor Manufacturers and Traders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-671</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Damages for rig fire witness
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A MAN who witnessed the Piper Alpha oil rig disaster from a rescue vessel is
entitled to claim damages for psychiatric injury, the High Court ruled in a
test case yesterday.
Mr Francis McFarlane, 44, from Alloa, near Stirling, has not worked since
the disaster in which 164 died in 1988.
Mrs Justice Smith ruled that Mr McFarlane was a 'primary victim' of the
'horrifying calamity' because of his closeness to it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-672</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Russia's ousted reformer takes it all in his stride
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON and JOHN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE man President Boris Yeltsin called the cleverest Russian prime minister
in decades was yesterday viewing his removal from the 'worst job any man
could want' with equanimity and good humour.
Although he never expected to stay in the job as long as he did, Mr Yegor
Gaidar wishes he could have remained longer. The man who headed Russia's
drive to reform its economy on market lines believes this would have allowed
him to safeguard the mass privatisation campaign.
In his first full interview since being rejected by the Congress of People's
Deputies and abandoned by President Yeltsin last week, Mr Gaidar said the
privatisation programme was at a crucial stage. 'It is very, very easy to
destroy it . . . through just a few careless movements.'
The granting, for instance, of any additional rights to workers would
shatter a delicate compromise struck between the interests of the workforce,
directors, and efficiency.
Speaking in his new office as head of the Institute for Economic Problems in
the Transitional Period, he admitted that his repeated attempts at financial
stabilisation had amounted to improvisation.
But he had little time for the sort of pro-inflationary policy likely to be
embraced by his successor, Mr Viktor Chernomyrdin, saying it would probably
make co-operation with the International Monetary Fund 'difficult for some
time'.
Unlike his foreign advisers, he refused to attack the west for not providing
more support for his reforms - 'I never expected anyone to solve our own
internal problems' - even though he admitted that he had used western
promises of assistance as a political weapon to defend his reforms.
He denied he could have done more to cultivate the powerful state enterprise
managers.
Mr Gaidar said he had no political ambitions in the foreseeable future, even
though 'life is very long'.
For now he would focus on writing a book and running the research institute
he abandoned when he joined the government as deputy prime minister with a
team of like-minded young economists in October last year.
But among his bank of telephones is a direct line on which President
Yeltsin, whose adviser he remains, can contact him at any time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-673</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Moscow in turmoil over top cabinet jobs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD, LEYLA BOULTON and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Russian government was in turmoil last night as its radical and
conservative camps strove to promote or retain their own ministers in
portfolios responsible for the shaky reform process.
Mr Pyotr Aven, trade minister, resigned - reportedly telling aides that
'once (acting prime minister) Yegor Gaidar went, it was clear I was doomed.'
Mr Aven, one of the 'inner core' of ministers who launched Russia's economic
reforms last January, was in charge of talks with the Paris and London Clubs
on the Dollars 70-Dollars 80bn debt Russia inherited from the former Soviet
Union.
President Boris Yeltsin has said he would insist that new Prime Minister
Viktor Chernomyrdin keep the reform team in his government.
Mr Yeltsin was said last night by his press secretary to have 'a slight
cold.'
The cold was serious enough, however, to have caused the cancellation of a
planned meeting tomorrow with Mr Leonid Kravchuk, Ukrainian president, and
to postpone again the thrice postponed meeting of heads of the Commonwealth
of Independent States in Minsk, the Belorussian capital, due to take place
on Friday.
As the government battle raged on, the two senior pro-reform ministers - Mr
Anatoly Chubais and Mr Alexander Shokhin, were said to be using the
president's support for them as leverage to gain the appointment of Mr Boris
Feodorov, at present Russia's representative at the World Bank, as a deputy
prime minister in charge of the ministries of finance and the economy.
These ministers must now be agreed by parliament.
Russia's parliament adopted a resolution yesterday advocating membership of
the International Finance Corporation (IFC), a unit of the World Bank which
specialises in aid to the private sector, Reuter reports from Moscow.
Itar-Tass news agency said IFC membership would grant Russia access to large
foreign loans and investments, speed privatisation and facilitate creation
of a stock market. Tass said Russia's share in the capital of the IFC would
amount to 3.42 per cent, making it one of the largest shareholders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-674</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Brittan begins to clear his in-tray
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SIR LEON BRITTAN, outgoing EC competition commissioner, is to propose today
a series of decisions to fellow commissioners in a drive to clear his desk
before he takes on new responsibilities in January.
Sir Leon is due to take over the post of external trade commissioner from
January 6, handing over competition policy to Mr Karel Van Miert, the
Belgian socialist.
At a meeting today the Commission will be asked to impose heavy fines on an
EC-West Africa shipping cartel, approve guidelines for allowing national
courts to examine competition cases, and authorise exclusive supply/sales
agreements between the German coal industry and electricity generators.
Sir Leon began to clear his in-tray yesterday by condemning Ford New
Holland, the tractor manufacturer, for allegedly bullying its dealers and
trying to restrict the 'parallel' import and export of vehicles to other
national markets. Ford has been told to end such restrictions immediately.
He also announced the Commission would look into telecoms groups' charges
for rental and servicing of data-switching networks to see if they
discriminated against third parties renting lines.
Proposals on the table today include:
Clarification of national courts' rights to investigate alleged cartels and
the abuse of companies' dominant positions;
Fines on EC shipping companies for operating a cartel between Europe and
West Africa, following up an earlier decision to impose fines on an alleged
shipping cartel between France and Africa;
Setting a new ceiling on state aid to shipbuilders;
Approval of Germany's 'Jahrhundertvertrag', under which German electricity
suppliers must buy a set amount of subsidised local coal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-675</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Delors reshuffles the European Commission pack: David
Gardner and Andrew Hill examine the prospects for success of the Community's
new team at the top in Brussels
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GARDNER and ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE WAS no blood detectable on the carpet of Brussels' Egmont Palace
yesterday morning after Mr Jacques Delors, president of the European
Commission, shuffled the portfolios and gave his 16 fellow commissioners
their jobs for the next two years.
Prior expectations inside the Eurocracy of histrionics and tantrums were
misplaced. A mere ceremonial 15 minutes did the job because by last weekend
the hard bargaining had been completed.
What has emerged is a reasonably balanced Commission, with a strong foreign
and trade policy team, a marginally higher political profile, a pragmatic
approach to competition and industrial policy, tight budgetary control, and
little sign of priority being assigned to areas such as environment and
social policy, which the previous executive had high hopes of developing.
Mr Delors, of course, remains the primus inter pares of the 17-member
college. But now he is flanked by four or five political heavyweights,
against two or three at most in the outgoing Commission.
The heaviest hitters will be Mr Hans van den Broek, until this week the
Dutch foreign minister, and Sir Leon Brittan, until now in charge of
competition policy and a former British cabinet minister under Mrs Thatcher.
They divide between them the job that overwhelmed Mr Frans Andriessen, the
departing Dutch external affairs commissioner.
Mr Van den Broek, a Christian Democrat who chaired the council of ministers
in the run-up to Maastricht and handled the early stages of the Yugoslav
crisis, has two more big challenges. He will both develop the Commission's
contribution to the EC's emerging common foreign and security policy, and be
in charge of enlargement, opening negotiations next year on EC entry with
Austria, Sweden, Finland, and probably Norway.
Sir Leon, one of the most powerful members of the last Commission, will be
in charge of trade policy, and economic relations with the industrialised
world, China, east and central Europe, and the former Soviet Union.
He had wanted charge of enlargement too. But the federalist majority of the
12 - suspicious of the UK's attempts to 'widen' the EC at the expense of
'deepening' it - felt more comfortable with the integrationist Mr Van den
Broek, even though Sir Leon's communautaire credentials are now
well-established. Both men, however, are Atlanticist and free-traders,
boding well for relations with the US. Senior Brussels officials say they
themselves agreed on their share-out last week, and should be able to work
in relative harmony.
Mr Manuel Marin, a Spanish socialist, takes full charge of development and
humanitarian aid, adding relations with the south Mediterranean, Middle
East, Asia and Latin America to his previous responsibilities for the Lome
convention countries of Africa and the Caribbean.
Conventional wisdom yesterday was that the loser in this share-out was Mr
Joao de Deus Pinheiro, the well-regarded former conservative Portuguese
foreign minister. Formally he will be in charge of relations with a
strengthened European parliament, and 'with member states with regard to
openness, communicaton and information'. Mr Pinheiro, however, wanted this
job and could bring a high political profile to selling the EC as a more
democratic body which is responsive to its citizens - a sensitive task if
the EC is to recover from its current unpopularity.
Competition policy goes to Mr Karel Van Miert, the Belgian socialist who can
claim high credit for liberalising EC transport policy, and, after the
departure of the flamboyant Mr Carlo Ripa di Meana, for preventing a
wholesale roll-back of EC environment policy. Mr Van Miert is a pragmatic
socialist like Mr Delors, with whom he is closely allied.
A transfer of the powerful competition portfolio was a top priority for
France, which felt Sir Leon's approach was too doctrinaire, and impeded
development of a French-style industrial policy.
Mr Van Miert's appointment does not mean such a policy is coming; it does
mean pure competition will not be the overriding priority it was under Sir
Leon.
Mr Martin Bangemann, a German liberal who yet raged against Sir Leon's
'ayatollahs' in the competition directorate, adds telecommunications and
information technology to his industry portfolio. This falls far short of
his ambition to create an EC version of Japan's Miti by adding trade policy
to industry. But it gives a small fillip to efforts to develop an EC-wide
industrial strategy. So too does the regrouping of part of training with
basic research, under the new Italian socialist commissioner, Mr Antonio
Ruberti, a former research minister and rector of La Sapienza University in
Rome.
Mr Henning Christophersen, a Danish liberal, stays in the economic policy
job he has done competently, which will become more important if Maastricht
is now ratified, and economic and monetary union is reaffirmed as a central
EC goal.
Mr Peter Schmidhuber, a German Christian Democrat, keeps control of the
budget, adding the new Cohesion Fund for the poorer member states. But most
of the new 'cohesion' money will be managed at the regional policy
directorate by Mr Bruce Millan, the former Labour secretary of state for
Scotland, who stays in a job he has done with the quiet efficiency of a
Scottish accountant.
Social affairs, which the Greek socialist and UK bete noire Ms Vasso
Papandreou is vacating, goes to Mr Padraig Flynn, a former Fianna Fail Irish
justice minister, along with a new job monitoring EC immigration policies.
Mr Flynn achieved notoriety at home for his views against abortion, divorce
and on the role of women, and his appointment was greeted with reserve in
the Brussels social affairs directorate.
Environment goes to Mr Ioannis Paleokrassas, a conservative former Greek
finance minister. A senior official who will be working with him was
sanguine yesterday, but pointed out that last time round his boss had to be
revived with brandy on hearing of the appointment of Mr Ripa di Meana - who
put environment policy on the EC map.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-676</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Growth in money supply declines
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE growth rate in Germany's money supply fell in November for the first
time this year, but was still running far ahead of target. Provisional
Bundesbank figures yesterday showed expansion in the broad M3 measure
dropped to an annualised 9.3 per cent last month.
Though an improvement on October's 10.3 per cent, it was well above the 8.8
per cent recorded in August (the last 'normal' month) and almost 4
percentage points above the bank's top target range for 1992 of 5.5 per
cent. Figures for September (up 9.3 per cent) and October were distorted by
the effects of central bank intervention in the recent currency crisis.
Yesterday's figures showed high interest rates have yet to dampen demand for
money. Private-sector loans continued to expand, and the volume of cash in
circulation rose because of seasonal factors, the bank said. The fall had
been widely forecast, and further decreases in coming months are expected as
recession takes hold. Sharp cuts in industrial capital investment plans for
1993 are likely to affect the M3 measure as 1993 advances.
Some economists believe monetary expansion could fall within the
Bundesbank's 1993 target range of 4.5-6.5 per cent early next year. Money
supply control is a main aim in its search for monetary stability and
cutting inflation: prerequisites for interest rate cuts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-677</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Lost survivors of the Serbian solution
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUDY DEMPSEY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KARLOVAC, CROATIA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SOMETIMES Nenad stands for hours on the main square of Karlovac, an elegant
nineteenth century town located south of Zagreb, the Croatian capital.
There, in the bitterly cold, damp, winter fog, he waits for news about his
mother and two sisters. He has had no word of their whereabouts since May
26, when Serb paramilitary units entered his home in the village of
Kamicani, northern Bosnia.
'I was arrested on that day. I don't know why. All the men in the village
were rounded up and moved to the camp at Keraterm. In early June we were
moved to the Omarska camp. All I know is that my sisters and mother were
taken away to the sports hall near Prijedor, in the north of the republic. I
have heard terrible reports about rape, but I do not want to think about
it,' he said.
Nenad, aged 22, was dressed in a jumper, jeans, and anorak provided by the
International Red Cross. He has no other belongings. Nor has he got a home
to which he can return. 'My father was forced to sign away our house. He has
disappeared. The entire village has since been destroyed,' he said slowly,
in a calm, soft voice. He spent 72 days at Omarska, and then, along with
hundreds of others, was transferred to Manjaca, in northern Bosnia.
'That camp was very bad,' he explained. 'Many people were murdered, often in
cold blood. There were massacres, carried out on front of our eyes. For a
while about 20 or 30 people were killed each night. Their bodies were piled
upon each other. The next day they were sometimes burned. At times I could
not bear it.'
He paused. He lowered his eyes, and then he started to cry. 'I want to be
with my family. I want to live in peace. Please help us,' he said, placing
his hands over his wet face.
Nenad is just one of 3,000 former detainees, most Moslems, from Manjaca, who
were finally released by Bosnian Serb forces in December. Many have similar
stories to tell. Yet none feels bitterness or anger towards the European
countries. 'We are not blaming Europe in the way they treat Bosnia. Europe
is not guilty. It is we who are the guilty ones because we were too
peaceful. We should have armed ourselves. All we ask now is for weapons,'
said Rusmir, a 43-year-old craftsman.
After negotiations with the Croatian government in November, the
International Red Cross set up a transit camp for the former detainees of
Manjaca - the only camp throughout the entire former Yugoslavia  - with the
hope of resettling these homeless people in a third country.
So far the response from the international community has been abysmal,
according to Mr Alf Nordstrom, one of the main Red Cross co-ordinators in
Karlovac, a former Habsburg garrison town. 'These poor people have nothing
left,' he said. 'Many countries promised to resettle them, but there have
been a series of broken promises.
'These people are the victims of ethnic cleansing, yet the west is turning a
blind eye to this inhumanity. Have we learned nothing from the second world
war?'
The release from Manjaca camp has brought small relief to the former inmates
whose helplessness contrasts sharply with the sounds of Christmas
festivities from the Croat restaurants behind the square. Many do not want
to be resettled without first being reunited with their families. Besides,
most want to go home to Bosnia.
'It is my home,' said Haris, a 33-year-old car mechanic. But Nenad does not
want to think about going home. 'Home is with my mother, and siblings,
regardless of the country,' he said.
The Red Cross officials have no idea about how to reunite families who have
been forcibly divided. 'We do not know where the women and children are,'
said Mr Nordstrom, a Swede, who arrived in Karlovac three months ago to help
the refugees.
Every day hundreds of young and old men gather on the square waiting for
news of their relatives. On December 17 a bus bringing detainees from
Manjaca arrived in Karlovac. Some women refugees who had managed to escape
to Croatia travelled to Karlovac to see if their sons, husbands, or brothers
were among the released.
'My children were not on the bus,' wailed Amira, a 53-year-old mother of
four sons. Local Bosnian Serbs had stoned the bus as it crossed the border
into Croatia.
Every day Amira travels from a refugee camp the other side of Zagreb to see
if her family will ever be reunited. But nobody can offer her hope,
particularly in her case because she is the mother of a family of doctors
and engineers. 'It is hard to explain the process of selection,' said Nenad.
'In Omarska, for instance, the Serbs separated the professionals and the
wealthy men from the manual workers. These were my neighbours. I never saw
them again.'
Adil, a 45-old doctor, said he was lucky to be alive. 'Do you know about
Katyn, when the Russians killed the cream of the Polish professional class
during the second world war?' he asked. A crowd of young and middle-aged men
had gathered around, and listened in silence as Adil continued.
'The way the Bosnians were categorised reminded me of that. It is as if,
when all this is over, there will be no solid professional or civil class to
rebuild our society. I do not think the Serbs had a solid method or plan.
But the way they selected people and then took them away makes me believe
that they tried to prevent us from ever again creating a professional elite.
Do you know what I mean?'
Nenad was still crying.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-678</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Italy cuts discount rate again: Amato rules out early return
to ERM
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Bank of Italy yesterday announced a cut of one percentage point in the
discount rate, from 13 per cent to 12 per cent, writes Robert Graham in
Rome. It is the third reduction since the rate was raised to 15 per cent to
protect the lira in September.
The new rate, effective from today, is now back to that of December 23 last
year.
The Bank of Italy has been under pressure to cut interest rates to force the
banks to lower lending rates to industry, increasingly hard hit by recession
and high debts.
With growth projected optimistically in 1993 at 0.8 per cent, industry fears
1993 will be the bleakest year for more than a decade.
The three cuts in the discount rate would have been impossible if the lira
had not been in free float since its devaluation and withdrawal from the
European exchange rate mechanism in September.
Yesterday Mr Giuliano Amato, the prime minister, ruled out a return of the
lira to the ERM early in 1993.
He said it was unrealistic to expect the lira to re-enter the ERM while
currency markets remained unstable. Although no timetable was fixed,
officials had initially indicated a return to the ERM would be possible by
year's end.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-679</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Lord Ted Willis dies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Lord Ted Willis, writer of the television series Dixon of Dock Green, which
was broadcast between 1953 and 1975, died aged 78.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-680</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / John Major jokes with UN soldiers in Bosnia
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
John Major joked with British soldiers serving with the United Nations in
Bosnia yesterday when he paid them a surprise Christmas visit. The prime
minister, who flew out amid utmost secrecy, ended his journey into the
war-torn country by travelling along mountainous roads in an armoured Range
Rover. He promised the troops: 'Not for a second will we forget or take
risks with your security.' Lost survivors, Page 2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-681</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / D-Mark eases on hint of German rate cut
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR HELMUT Schlesinger, the Bundesbank president, yesterday helped to ease
the recent strength of the D-Mark on foreign exchanges by saying that
long-term German interest rates could drop to below 6 per cent in the
current cycle of falling rates.
In an interview published in the Westdeutsche Allgemeine Zeitung, Mr
Schlesinger did not specify when long-term interest rates - currently at
around 7.25 per cent - would come down.
However, analysts said yesterday that long-term rates in Germany could only
fall when the market believed that the prospects for reducing inflation were
improving.
Mr Schlesinger's remarks were interpreted as unusually optimistic from the
Bundesbank president, who also said he was confident that Germany's
inflation rate could fall to about 3 per cent next year from an average of
about 4 per cent in 1992.
Dealers bought dollars in the wake of his remarks, and the US currency rose
by two pfennigs against the D-Mark, to close in New York at DM1.5885.
The interview also helped to boost sentiment in the UK equity market. The
FT-SE 100 index of leading shares rose from Monday's all-time closing high
to a new peak of 2,845.6 points, before ending at a new closing high of
2,842.0, a gain of 34.3 on the day.
The remarks also eased pressure on the French franc, after several days in
which it had threatened to approach its floor against the D-Mark in the
European exchange rate mechanism. The French currency closed at FFr3.411
against the D-Mark in London, up more than half a centime on the day.
Although the D-Mark was weaker against most currencies yesterday, sterling
was a significant loser. The pound fell 1 pfennig to close at DM2.4425 in
London, while in New York it closed at DM2.441. It also lost more than 2 1/2
cents against the stronger dollar in London, closing at Dollars 1.539 from
Dollars 1.5645, and easing further in New York trading to Dollars 1.5365.
Wall Street stocks firmed after economic data indicated that the US economy
had expanded in the third quarter of this year. The Dow Jones Index closed
8.64 points stronger at 3,3231.1.
Growth in German money supply declines, Page 2
Italian rate cut, Page 2
Bonds, Page 19
Currencies, Page 21
World stocks, Page 27
London stocks, Page 30
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-682</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / BA's global hopes hit by collapse of Dollars 750m USAir deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, GEORGE GRAHAM and NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, WASHINGTON, NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH AIRWAYS yesterday suffered a severe setback in its ambitions to
become a global airline with the collapse of its proposed Dollars 750m
(Pounds 487m) investment in a 44 per cent stake in USAir, the sixth largest
US carrier.
Both BA and USAir said they would attempt to forge an alternative deal in
the new year after their proposed alliance was blocked by a US-UK government
dispute over liberalising air services between the two countries.
BA said it had decided to pull out of the proposed partnership with USAir
because of 'excessive demands' by the US government to give US carriers
greater access to the UK market.
Under pressure from the three largest US carriers - American Airlines,
United Airlines and Delta Air Lines - the US government had insisted that
the UK open up London's Heathrow airport to more US airline services in
return for approval of the BA-USAir deal.
The UK government in turn had offered a three-phase process of liberalising
air services between the two countries which would have led to 'open skies'
only after the US eased its rigid foreign ownership rules in US carriers.
BA said the UK government 'quite rightly' had been unwilling to make
'unwarranted and unilateral concessions' to the US.
Sir Colin Marshall, BA's chief executive, said talks between the two
countries had broken down because 'the US demanded immediate and unlimited
access to the UK market while maintaining high protective barriers to its
own market - which is 40 per cent of air transport worldwide'. The UK
Department of Transport said talks to liberalise air travel between Britain
and the US would continue.
Mr Andrew Card, the US transport secretary, confirmed in Washington that he
would 'probably not have approved the deal'. There was no need for him to
take a decision following BA's withdrawal, he said.
Mr Card said the existence of an open market for US carriers was a crucial
element in any decision on whether to allow foreign investments in US
airlines.
'BA, had this transaction been approved, would have had immediate access to
the entire US market. Our carriers would not have had access to the entire
UK market,' he argued.
USAir, like BA, also expressed disappointment over the collapse
of the deal. But Mr Seth Schofield, USAir chief executive, stressed his
carrier would 'continue to discuss alternative arrangements with BA and
evaluate other opportunities'.
USAir officials declined to speculate on what other avenues the carrier
might pursue, although it has talked to Germany's Lufthansa in the past. It
has made clear it does not see a future in remaining a regional US carrier.
Airbus in Dollars 3.3bn deal, Page 3
Letter, Page 11
Heavy weather for BA's global strategy, Page 13
London stocks, Page 30
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-683</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Stock and Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------------------------------
STOCK MARKET INDICES
 -----------------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100: 2,842.0 (+34.3)
Yield 4.27
FT-SE Eurotrack 100 1,072.92 (+13.71)
FT-A All-Share 1,359.55 (+1.2%)
FT-A World Index 142.14 (-0.1%)
Nikkei 17,690.67 (+45.23)
New York: Dow Jones Ind Ave 3,321.1 (+8.64)
S&amp;P Composite 440.31 (-0.39)
 -----------------------------------------------------
US CLOSING RATES
 -----------------------------------------------------
Federal Funds: 2 13/16% (3%)
3-mo Treas Bills: Yld 3.261% (3.239%)
Long Bond 103 7/16 (102 23/32)
Yield 7.334% (7.387%)
 -----------------------------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 -----------------------------------------------------
3-mo Interbank 7 1/4% (7 1/4%)
Liffe long gilt future: Dec 100 13/16 (Dec 100 5/16)
 -----------------------------------------------------
NORTH SEA OIL (Argus)
 -----------------------------------------------------
Brent 15-day (Feb) dollars 18.525 (same)
Gold
New York Comex (Dec) dollars 332.2 (334.0)
London dollars 332.3 (333.95)
 -----------------------------------------------------
STERLING
 -----------------------------------------------------
New York:
dollars 1.5365 (1.5585)
London:
dollars 1.539 (1.5645)
DM 2.4425 (2.4525)
FFr 8.33 (8.3825)
SFr 2.2075 (2.2125)
Y 190 (192.25)
pounds Index 79.6 (80.3)
 -----------------------------------------------------
DOLLAR
 -----------------------------------------------------
New York:
DM 1.5885 (1.5685)
FFr 5.422 (5.361)
SFr 1.4405 (1.4135)
Y 123.7 (123.0)
London:
DM 1.5865 (1.568)
FFr 5.4125 (5.3575)
SFr 1.434 (1.4135)
Y 123.45 (122.95)
dollars Index 65.3 (64.9)
Tokyo close Y 123.13
 -----------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-684</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Shake-up for EC leadership: Delors aims to strengthen trade
policy Brittan given new portfolio
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL and DAVID GARDNER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Jacques Delors, president of the European Commission, yesterday signalled
the birth of a tougher, more outward-looking European Community executive
when he announced the duties of his 16 fellow commissioners for the next two
years.
The commissioners who will work in Mr Delors' third Commission met for the
first time yesterday. Having spent the past few weeks jockeying for position
 -in person and through national governments - they took only 15 minutes to
decide which jobs they will inherit when they take office on January 6.
The changes should lend new weight to the EC's diplomatic and trade policy.
The Commission's external affairs portfolio - previously the domain of one
commissioner, Mr Frans Andriessen - will be split between Mr Andriessen's
successor as Dutch commissioner, Mr Hans van den Broek, the Netherlands'
foreign minister, and Sir Leon Brittan, the UK's senior commissioner.
Mr Van den Broek will take on responsibility for external political
relations, and will lead 'enlargement' negotiations with applicants for EC
membership - Austria, Sweden, Finland and Norway. Sir Leon, now responsible
for competition and financial services, will handle trade relations with the
industrialised nations, including the expected conclusion of the Uruguay
Round and anti-dumping policy.
Sir Leon said yesterday he believed he and Mr Van den Broek - who discussed
their new responsibilities last week - shared the same liberal and
'Atlanticist' approach to external relations, and would work well together.
The new allocation of duties will mean division of the Commission's
sprawling external relations department by April. Further restructuring of
the Brussels bureaucracy is likely to follow.
Sir Leon's competition portfolio passes to Mr Karel Van Miert, the Belgian
socialist currently in charge of transport and environment policy. Mr Van
Miert said earlier this week 'there will be changes' in the conduct of EC
competition policy, a job which Sir Leon and his predecessor, Mr Peter
Sutherland, built into one of the most powerful in Brussels.
In particular, Mr Van Miert is likely to try to make competition policy more
responsive to social and industrial considerations.
The distribution of portfolios reflects the enlargement of the Community's
role envisaged in the Maastricht treaty.
For example, Mr Van den Broek, who chaired the Council of Ministers in the
run-up to the Maastricht summit, will be responsible for Commission input to
the EC's embryonic foreign and security policy. Mr Padraig Flynn, the new
Irish commissioner, will monitor EC justice and immigration policy as well
as social policy.
In response to calls for more openness and accountability in EC
decision-making, a portfolio has been created for Mr Joao de Deus Pinheiro,
the highly regarded former Portuguese foreign minister. He will liaise with
the European Parliament, which will be strengthened if Maastricht is
ratified. He will also develop Mr Delors' idea that Brussels should give a
regular account of itself to national parliaments and through a more active
information policy.
In principle, the new Commission - which includes 10 members of the current
executive - will last for two years, assuming Maastricht is ratified. The
appointment of a five-year Commission at the end of 1994 will run in tandem
with a newly elected European Parliament.
Aid for developing countries has been regrouped under the senior Spanish
commissioner, Mr Manuel Marin. Spain pressed for a higher profile in the
Brussels executive and has gained from the reshuffle. Its junior
commissioner, Mr Abel Matutes, gets two jobs from the previous Commission -
energy and transport.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-685</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Minister's council move overturned
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A DECISION by Mr Michael Heseltine, trade and industry secretary, to close
the London borough of Haringey's own refuse collection service was
overturned by the High Court yesterday.
Two judges ruled that the closure order, due to take effect in the new year,
was legally flawed and must be reconsidered.
Mr Heseltine acted last March, while environment secretary, after
allegations of 'anti-competitive behaviour' by the Labour-controlled council
in awarding itself a contract for refuse collection and street cleaning
work.
Mr Michael Portillo, then local government minister, told parliament the
council had accepted the bid from its own direct service organisation in
spite of two lower bids from the private sector.
Yesterday Lord Justice Evans, sitting with Mr Justice Otton, ruled that Mr
Heseltine had been legally obliged to consider allowing the organisation to
put in a new bid, subject to conditions, before ordering a complete bar.
'There is no evidence that the secretary of state did this, and if he failed
to do so, then in my judgment he erred in law,' the judge said. Haringey
welcomed the ruling.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-686</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Former Inchcape chief dies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SIR George Turnbull, former chairman and chief executive of Inchcape, the
business services group, died yesterday aged 66.
Sir George, educated at King Henry VIII School, Coventry, and Birmingham
University, had a long and varied career in the motor industry, both in the
UK and overseas.
His career developed with Standard Motors from 1950, where he rose to be
general manager. From 1968 to 1973 he was managing director of British
Leyland Motor Corporation and from 1974 to 1977 vice-president of Hyundai
Motors, leaving to work with the Iran National Motor Company. From 1979 he
was chairman of Talbot UK.
He was also chairman of the Industrial Society's council from 1987 to 1990
and deputy president of the Society of Motor Manufacturers and Traders from
1984 to 1986.
Sir George, who joined Inchcape as group managing director in 1984 and was
appointed chief executive in 1986, retired last year on medical grounds. He
was married with two daughters and a son.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-687</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / MPs evade bribe charge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPANESE prosecutors have decided not to charge60 ruling party MPs who
received shares in an illegal Y500m (Pounds 2.65m) donation from Tokyo
Sagawa Kyubin, a scandal-tainted trucking company.
The prosecutors' decision appears to close the case book on the Tokyo Sagawa
scandal, which has already seen the resignation of Mr Shin Kanemaru, the
Liberal Democratic party godfather, and highlighted the links between
leading politicians and gangsters.
Mr Kanemaru admitted receiving the Y500m from Tokyo Sagawa, which had sought
to cultivate political contacts, but the 60 MPs refused to identify
themselves as having received funds, fearing they would be charged with
violating the Political Funds Control Law.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-688</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Clinton picks old hands for foreign, defence jobs: For new
secretary of state it is a 'dream come true' Resurrection of Carter foreign
policy set-up denied
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUREK MARTIN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT-ELECT Bill Clinton yesterday unveiled a foreign and security
policy team conspicuous for its experience and mainstream moderation. As
expected, the new secretary of state will be Mr Warren Christopher, 67, who
was number two at the state department in the Carter administration.
A former deputy attorney-general under President Johnson, he was an adviser
to Mr Clinton during the campaign and is currently director of the
transition operation.
Mr Clinton said he had doubted he would be able to persuade Mr Christopher,
a Los Angeles-based lawyer for most of the last decade, who also headed an
investigation into this year's riots in that city, to enter government
service again. Mr Christopher said his appointment was 'a dream come true'.
Mr Christopher immediately declared foreign policy was 'a continuum', and
that the new administration had every intention of pursuing existing
policies such as the humanitarian intervention in Somalia and the Middle
East peace process, now under strain as a result of Israel's determination
to deport Palestinian activists.
His deputy will be Mr Clifton Wharton, 56, son of the first black career
diplomat appointed a US ambassador. He is at present head of the teachers'
pension fund, the largest in the US, has run universities in New York and
Michigan, and is chairman of the philanthropic Rockefeller Foundation.
The national security team in the White House brings back together two men
who directed policy planning in the Carter state department, with Mr Anthony
Lake, 52, now a university professor, as principal adviser, and Mr Samuel
Berger, 47, a Washington lawyer universally known as Sandy, as deputy.
The new US ambassador to the United Nations will be Mrs Madeleine Albright,
a veteran of the Carter government and now a university professor in
Washington. Born in Czechoslovakia, she will enjoy Cabinet rank, a precedent
established by President Eisenhower but only intermittently pursued since.
On the security side, Mr Les Aspin, 54, the congressman from Wisconsin and
chairman of the House armed services committee since 1985, becomes secretary
of defence. He worked in the Pentagon as an adviser to Mr Robert McNamara,
but later came out against the Vietnam war.
Mr Aspin is an acknowledged expert on the defence budget and the adaptation
of the military establishment to civilian purposes. He pledged to maintain
'the superb quality of our forces and our technological edge'.
The Central Intelligence Agency will be run by Mr James Woolsey, 51,
under-secretary of the Navy in the Carter administration and a member of
President Reagan's delegation to the Start talks with the Soviet Union from
1983 to 1986. Like Mr Clinton and Mr Aspin, he went to Oxford University and
served on the staff of the Senate armed services committee.
Retired Admiral William Crowe, a former chairman of the joint chiefs of
staff and a close adviser to Mr Clinton during the presidential campaign,
will head the president's foreign intelligence advisory board in the White
House.
Mr Clinton vigorously denied that his foreign policy establishment was
merely a resurrection of President Carter's administration. He noted that Mr
Carter's had been the only Democratic government in the last 16 years, but
added: 'To say that this is a team of re-treads. . . is, I think, totally
unfair'.
The world was 'no longer a simple place with clear choices,' he stated, a
sentiment echoed by Mr Christopher. The end of the cold war, the
president-elect added, required 'bold new hands and the strength and courage
to advance our American values'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-689</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Seoul and Hanoi set up diplomatic ties
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SEOUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The establishment of diplomatic ties between Seoul and Hanoi yesterday
removes the main obstacle to expanding Korean investment in Vietnam, writes
John Burton in Seoul. Vietnam is the last country with which South Korea has
forged ties as part of President Roh Tae-woo's policy to normalise relations
with current and former socialist nations.
Seoul has already allowed Korean companies to make limited investments in
Vietnam and there are more than 30 Korean concerns with branch offices
there. Trade has expanded from Dollars 77m in 1988 to more than Dollars 440m
this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-690</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Bomb in tin of chocolates
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A 2lb bomb was hidden in a tin of chocolates given by a motorist to a
soldier at a checkpoint in Cookstown, Co Tyrone. The bomb was discovered and
defused when the soldier returned to base.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-691</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Win for council dustmen
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A decision by Michael Heseltine, taken when he was environment secretary, to
close the London borough of Haringey's own refuse collection service was
overturned by the High Court. The closure move came after allegations of
'anti-competitive behaviour' by the Labour controlled council in awarding
itself the contract. Heseltine rebuffs pit restart calls, Page 4
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-692</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Clinton names secretary of state
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
US president-elect Bill Clinton named lawyer Warren Christopher, his
transition chief, as secretary of state, Madeline Albright as UN ambassador
and Les Aspin as defence secretary.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-693</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / International Company News: Delta debt rating downgraded by
S&amp;P
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON and LESLIE CRAWFORD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SANTIAGO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DELTA Air Lines, the US carrier which last week slashed its dividend,
yesterday saw its debt ratings downgraded by Standard &amp; Poor's, the credit
information agency, which said its move was based on Delta's continued
heavy, albeit diminishing, losses.
S&amp;P cited the impact of a slowing European economy on Delta's efforts to cut
losses on the transatlantic routes it acquired from now-defunct Pan American
World Airways, and increasing expenses and debt leverage from the company's
requirement to implement a new accounting standard for retiree health
benefits.
It downgraded Delta's senior debt from Triple B to Triple B minus and its
commercial paper to A-3 from A-2.
Delta, which ranks with American Airlines and United Airlines as one of the
three largest US carriers, cut its dividend last week from 30 cents a share
to just 5 cents because of severe competition in the airline industry and
the problems of digesting the Pan-Am assets.
S&amp;P noted that Delta had occurred larger losses than any other US airline
over the past 12 months, in spite of the fact that its competitive exposure
to US carriers operating in bankruptcy and low-cost Southwest Airlines was
more limited than that of its two main rivals.
'While performance is improving on the acquired routes, a sluggish economy
in Germany, where Delta's Frankfurt hub is located, will slow the recovery
effort,' it added.
Corfo, the Chilean state holding company, plans to sell its 22.4 per cent
interest in Lan-Chile, the loss-making national airline partially privatised
in 1989, writes Leslie Crawford in Santiago.
British Airways has announced an interest in acquiring a stake in the
Chilean flag-carrier. Mr Robert Kay, BAs' general manager in Santiago, said
negotiations on a purchase were taking place.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-694</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Bush and Yeltsin discuss N-pact
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Presidents George Bush and Boris Yeltsin held their second telephone
conversation in two days on Monday to try to nail down a treaty making deep
cuts in strategic nuclear weapons, US official sources said yesterday,
Reuter reports from Washington.
'It's getting there. It's not a done deal yet but it's getting there,' one
official said of prospects for agreement on a new strategic arms reduction
treaty (Start-2) before Mr Bush leaves office on January 20.
Mr Yeltsin surprised Washington last week when he said a Start-2 agreement
was in hand and would be signed before Mr Bush hands over power to
President-elect Bill Clinton.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-695</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Instability continues as Collor hangs on
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRASLIA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SEASONAL cheer was notably absent among Brazilians yesterday, faced with the
unwelcome prospect of continued instability as a result of Monday night's
ploy by suspended President Fernando Collor to delay his impeachment by
sacking his lawyers.
Brazilians had expected that by Christmas Mr Collor would have been
definitively stripped of power, enabling Mr Itamar Franco, the acting
president, to formally take office and start giving some much-needed
direction to the economy. A long-talked about fiscal reform was due to have
been approved by the Congress so that next year the government could make
some attempt at balancing its budget.
However, the delay in the impeachment trial until December 29 or later means
the politicians will continue to be distracted from fiscal reform which now
cannot be voted till next year. Mr Franco's speech setting out economic
policy scheduled for today has been delayed until after the judgment.
Although there is little doubt that Mr Collor will be ousted eventually, Mr
Pedro Simon, the Senate leader of the acting government, explains: 'As an
acting president Itamar cannot announce definitive plans because he doesn't
know if he will be confirmed president.'
As a result of the uncertainty, monthly inflation is now pushing 27 per cent
and the black market dollar premium has reached 25 per cent.
The fear is that Mr Collor will try another manoeuvre to win more time in
the hope that Mr Franco's perceived incompetence and nationalist rhetoric
will inspire senators to wish for the return of Mr Collor. Mr Odacir Soares,
one of Mr Collor's few supporters in the Senate, says: 'Many senators are
now looking at Collor with more sympathy and we believe this tendency is
increasing.' One aide said Mr Collor might appeal to the international court
of human rights alleging that he was not being given a fair trial.
Mr Sidney Sanches, the head of the Supreme Court, who will preside over Mr
Collor's judgment, appears determined to prevent further delays beyond
December 29 and yesterday appointed Mr Inocencia Martires Coelho, a former
attorney general, to handle Mr Collor's defence. But Mr Mauro Benevides,
president of the Senate, admitted 'it will be very difficult to get a quorum
during the holiday period'.
In one positive development the Senate approved on Monday night the text of
an agreement with foreign creditors over Dollars 44bn commercial debt. The
majority was 42 to 2.
The termsheet, which was agreed in July, will now return to the advisory
committee of creditor banks for final review and selection of instruments,
and Brazil will increase its interest payments from 30 per cent to 50 per
cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-696</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Swiss expect record SFr3bn budget deficit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZURICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE rapidly deteriorating state of Swiss public finances was emphasised
yesterday with the publication of a forecast by the federal Finance Ministry
of a record budget deficit this year of SFr3bn (Dollars 2bn), 50 per cent
above last year's deficit and more than double the original forecast.
The governments of most Swiss cantons and the larger local authorities have
also plunged into deep deficits in the past two years because of the impact
of the recession on revenues and spending as well as higher borrowing costs.
By international standards Swiss public finances are still strong.
Outstanding debt of all three levels of government is about 35 per cent of
gross domestic product and their combined budget deficits are equivalent to
only 2 per cent of GDP.
However, economists have been expressing growing concern about the tendency
of governments at all levels to take on more spending responsibilities even
though the Swiss people, who have the final word on tax changes via
plebiscites, have tended to reject proposals for higher taxes.
The Finance Ministry said that federal spending would grow more than 7 per
cent this year to about SFr38bn, mainly because of higher outlays by various
ministries.
Meanwhile, revenues were growing at only about 4 per cent, and were expected
to end up to SFr1bn below the SFr31.9bn budget.
The higher budget deficit together with increased financing needs of the
unemployment insurance fund has forced federal government borrowing to rise
threefold this year to SFr9bn.
The ministry said last week it was projecting a higher than previously
forecast 1993 deficit of around SFr3bn. Mr Otto Stich, the finance minister,
estimated in October that the 1993 deficit would decline to SFr2.47bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-697</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Privatisation hailed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Czechoslovakia's first round of privatisations was hailed a success after
nearly 93 per cent of available shares were sold. Up for sale were a total
of 1,491 companies worth some 300 bn crowns (Dollars 10.7 bn). Hungary plans
more flotations, Page 3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-698</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Bush to Somalia
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Outgoing US president George Bush will visit US forces in Somalia over the
new year and see relief operations, the White House said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-699</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Survivors fly home
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Dozens of people who survived Monday's fatal air crash at Faro, southern
Portugal, flew home to the Netherlands. Experts investigating the accident
said it could have been caused by a freak downblast of wind as the Martinair
DC-10 came in to land.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-700</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / People: Non-executive directors
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Richard Cole-Hamilton, former chief executive of Clydesdale Bank and
vice-president of the Scottish Council Development and Industry, at STAKIS.
*****
Geoffrey Whalen deputy chairman and md of Peugeot Talbot Motor Co, at
COVENTRY BUILDING SOCIETY.
*****
Gavin Reed, group vice-chairman at Scottish &amp; Newcastle, at JOHN MENZIES.
*****
Michael Windsor, a non-executive director of BWI since its flotation in
1987, and formerly joint md of Vickers, as chairman at BARRY WEHMILLER
INTERNATIONAL.
*****
Jim Power has retired from UNICHEM.
*****
Jean Meynial, recently retired chairman of Arc Union Group, as deputy
chairman of LEND LEASE INTERNATIONAL.
*****
Christopher Dreyfuss at The TURKEY TRUST.
*****
Steve Shirley (below), founding director of the FI Group, at TANDEM
COMPUTERS Inc.
*****
Anthony James has retired from WELLCOME.
*****
Pierre Vinken is to be chairman of REED ELSEVIER which comes into being on
January 1. It will be managed by a board comprised of 12 executive directors
and eight non-executives drawn equally from the two parent companies. Peter
Davis (above) is to be chief executive and deputy chairman and will become
chairman on Vinken's retirement in 1995. Other members of the executive
committee are: Ian Irvine, Loek van Vollenhoven, and Nigel Stapleton.
*****
Richard Wiseman, formerly senior legal adviser for Shell International
Petroleum, has been appointed head of legal division and company secretary
of SHELL UK Ltd.
*****
Gordon Angell, who retired earlier this year as a director of BASF, has been
appointed executive chairman of Independent Fertilizers Solent, and as a
non-executive director of Gouldings Chemicals; both companies are part of
IAWS GROUP.
*****
Barry Marchini, director of information technology at Bass Leisure, has been
appointed md of Starpoint Electrics, part of BOWTHORPE.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-701</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Opposition backs Kenya poll charges
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL HOLMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NAIROBI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Kenya's opposition yesterday stepped up the row over allegations that the
government is using state funds for the election campaign of Kanu, the
ruling party, writes Michael Holman in Nairobi.
The charge has been denied, but FORD Kenya, one of the country's three main
opposition parties, returned to the attack, challenging the government to
publish a breakdown of central bank lending.
The party has accused the central bank of excessive lending to five banks
with government connections, which in turn allegedly on-lent to
organisations or individuals sympathetic to Kanu.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-702</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: DCC offer values Wardell Roberts at IPounds
17m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM COONE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DUBLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DCC, Dublin-based industrial holding group, has made a recommended bid for
Wardell Roberts, the Irish snackfood and healthfood distributor, just a week
after backing a IPounds 24m management buy-out of Printech, a printing
supplier to the computer industry.
The cash offer at 75p per share represents a 25 per cent premium over the
last dealt price of 60p and values Wardell at IPounds 17.2m.
DCC already holds a 29.9 per cent stake in the company. The buy-out vehicle
will be Oare, a DCC shelf company, and 20 per cent of its shares will be
held by existing managing shareholders in Wardell.
Guaranteed loan notes linked to the Dublin interbank rate (Dibor) are
available in lieu of cash.
Mr Jim Flavin, chief executive of DCC, said that the bid was part of DCC's
strategy to create 'a focused industrial and financial holding company'.
He said that DCC had built up cash reserves of IPounds 35m over the past 18
months 'and the time has come to invest that'.
Shares in both Printech and Wardell Roberts have been languishing and their
continued listing on the London and Dublin stock exchanges 'are not serving
shareholders' or the companies' interests in any way', he said.
He believes that both will show better profit performance as part of the
larger group, rather than as stand-alone second-line companies with little
market interest being shown in them.
Wardell Roberts joined the unlisted securities market in 1986, and obtained
a full listing in October 1991. Its pre-tax profits for the last financial
year were IPounds 2.4m on a turnover of IPounds 45.1m. Its share price has
fallen by half since the beginning of the year.
Three weeks ago DCC spent IPounds 4.9m in increasing its stake from 8.2 per
cent to 11 per cent in Fyffes, the UK and Irish fruit and vegetable
wholesaler, buying the additional 7.7m shares from the McCann family, which
sold them to repay borrowings.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-703</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Berlitz clears the way for Japanese bid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BERLITZ, the language school and publishing group that was once part of the
late Mr Robert Maxwell's empire, yesterday said it had resolved a number of
outstanding differences with the court-appointed administrators of the
Maxwell Communication Corporation (MCC).
The agreements should help clear the way for the planned takeover of Berlitz
by Fukutake, a Japanese publisher.
The Fukutake deal was contingent upon the resolution of disputes about
financial obligations among Berlitz; MCC, which is operating under US
bankruptcy proceedings; and Macmillan, the publishing subsidiary of MCC.
The issues that were settled yesterday include an agreement under which
Macmillan will transfer to Berlitz 180,000 shares of Berlitz preferred stock
it was holding.
In addition Berlitz will transfer to Macmillan a Dollars 64.6m Macmillan
promissory note it was holding. MCC will then release Berlitz from all
claims against the company. For its part, Berlitz will agree to reduce by
Dollars 58m to Dollars 71m the amount of its claims against MCC regarding
outstanding promissory notes. The companies have also agreed to clarify
certain tax agreements.
Berlitz said the Fukutake deal would be submitted to its shareholders in
January.
MCC has featured in the Berlitz saga because some 56.5 per cent of Berlitz
stock was pledged to banks last year as collateral for loans made to the
late Mr Robert Maxwell. These shares have been the subject of litigation.
When the Fukutake deal is completed Berlitz shareholders will end up with 33
per cent of the company and the Japanese buyer will own the majority 67 per
cent stake.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-704</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / UK Company News: Albrighton pays Pounds 3.2m for Tarmac
quarry arm
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER PEARSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALBRIGHTON, which over the past two years has made a series of disposals to
reduce indebtedness, yesterday announced an expansion of the group's chosen
field of operations - quarrying  - with the acquisition of the natural stone
products side of Tarmac Buildings Materials for Pounds 3.21m cash.
The sale by Tarmac takes the proceeds from its own disposal programme to
Pounds 130m for the year.
Mr Peter Woodman, Albrighton chairman and chief executive, said that the
natural dimensional stone industry in the UK had enjoyed a revival in the
past decade and that growth was expected to continue.
To pay for the acquisition, comprising five dimensional sandstone quarries
in Derbyshire and the north of England and two masonry processing plants,
Albrighton is to issue, by way of an open offer and placing, some 44.3m new
ordinary shares, at 12p each and on a 7-for-1 basis, to raise about Pounds
4.96m net.
In the six months to September 30, Albrighton reduced its pre-tax losses to
Pounds 62,000 (Pounds 347,000) on turnover down at Pounds 1.16m (Pounds
6.85m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-705</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Sindy to undergo facelift after angry legal spat with Barbie
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GUY DE JONQUIERES, Consumer Industries Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SINDY, once Britain's favourite doll, is to undergo plastic surgery to
settle a long-running international legal dispute with Barbie, her older and
more successful American rival.
Hasbro, manufacturer of Sindy, agreed yesterday to re-model her head to
distinguish her from Barbie, made by Mattel. The settlement was reached
shortly before a copyright battle between the two US companies was due to go
to the UK High Court next month.
The dispute began after Hasbro acquired the licence to Sindy from Pedigree,
the UK toy company, in 1986 and set about altering her appearance.
The previously demure tweed-clad Sindy suddenly acquired a more glamorous
face, while her body acquired shapely curves.
Mattel responded with a barrage of lawsuits, charging that Sindy had become
an imitation of Barbie.
Earlier this year, stocks of Sindy were seized after a French court ruled
that the doll violated Barbie's copyright. Mattel has also won cases against
Hasbro in Germany, Belgium and the Netherlands.
Barbie, who is sold in a variety of models and costumes, is believed to be
the most successful toy range of all time. Since she was launched 33 years
ago, more than 700m Barbie dolls have been sold in almost 70 countries, and
Mattel expects sales this year to be worth a record Dollars 1bn (Pounds
600m).
According to Mattel, a Barbie doll is sold every two seconds, and 98 per
cent of American girls between the ages of 3 and 11 own one at some point.
Sindy, born in 1961, has always sold mostly in Britain, where she had the
market to herself until the late 1970s. Today, her sales in Britain are
estimated to be three times greater than the roughly Pounds 8m achieved by
her rival.
Mattel said yesterday that it had agreed to drop all outstanding lawsuits
relating to Sindy and Barbie around the world and that the two companies
would pay their own legal costs.
Just how much difference Sindy's planned facelift will have on sales is
uncertain. According to Mr Barry Walker, deputy chairman of the British
Association of Toy Retailers: 'It's only crusty old blokes in toy showrooms
who care about these things. The kids don't notice.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-706</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / GEC Alsthom in HKDollars 20bn power plant equipment deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER and SIMON DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GEC ALSTHOM, the Anglo- French engineering group, and General Electric of
the US yesterday won one of the world's biggest power plant contracts with a
deal believed to be worth about HKDollars 20bn (Pounds 1.7bn) to supply
equipment for a power station in Hong Kong.
A consortium led by GEC Alsthom will supply plant for the 2,400MW first
phase of the Black Point combined cycle gas turbine power (CCGT) station. It
fought off a challenge from Siemens of Germany to win the deal.
Black Point is the world's biggest CCGT station to be announced this year,
and vies with a plant planned by Tokyo Electric Power as the world's biggest
CCGT station. CCGT uses gas and steam to provide power more efficiently and
cleanly than coal-fired stations.
The Hong Kong government yesterday gave formal approval for Black Point,
which will be Hong Kong's first power station fired by natural gas. Due to
start operating in 1996, it will have an eventual capacity of 6,000MW.
The deal caps a successful year for both GEC Alsthom and GE following their
co-operation on development of the 9FA gas turbine, the world's largest gas
turbine. Eight of these, built in France and the US, will be used at Black
Point in combination with US-built generators.
The contract underlines the growing importance of the Asian market for the
main western power equipment producers, and comes as the use of gas for
power generation is being questioned in the UK following the row over plans
to close 31 coal mines.
The consortium signed the deal with Castle Peak Power, which is 60 per cent
owned by Exxon Energy and 40 per cent owned by China Light and Power, the
monopoly supplier of electricity to Kowloon and the New Territories of Hong
Kong.
CLP said the project underlined the company's confidence in Hong Kong. China
is playing an integral part in the plant, which is to make use of a natural
gas field off Hainan Island.
The main plant supply contract is being financed through export credits from
France, the UK and the US and a commercial loan fully underwritten by a
group of international banks. The total financing package, which is expected
to exceed Dollars 2bn, was arranged by J. Henry Schroder Wagg and Wardley
Capital, with Societe Generale as lead manager for the French export credit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-707</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / The Lex Column: Aircraft orders
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Most industries would regard landing a Dollars 3.4bn order as a pleasant way
to end the year. However for Airbus, yesterday's agreement with Singapore
Airlines to supply 20 long-range jets can only be cold comfort. The market
for new airliners has been softening all year and two weeks ago Northwest
Airlines cancelled orders worth Dollars 3.5bn. Worldwide, more than 800
civil aircraft were delivered last year; the total may fall to 500 by 1994.
Boeing, Airbus and McDonnell Douglas are all reducing output, but further
cuts will be needed. By some estimates airlines are at present not using
between 10 and 15 per cent of their capacity. The parlous finances of many
carriers mean that more are likely to cancel orders. In addition, the status
of some planned purchases by the Irish leasing group GPA - which alone
accounts for 10 per cent of all aircraft currently on order - is uncertain.
Besides, companies which have placed orders recently want delivery in the
second half of the decade.
Military business used to protect some manufacturers from such cyclical
swings in the civil airliner market, but defence cuts are forcing aircraft
makers and their suppliers to transfer as much business as possible into the
civil area just as the market worsens. British Aerospace is one company
caught in this down draught, yet its shares have recently been supported by
a possible further large order from Saudi Arabia and a joint venture with
Taiwan. Either may bail out the company in the short term, but the
much-touted Airbus profits seem as far away as ever.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-708</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Pay at AA will be up 300% on Xmas day
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LISA WOOD, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EMPLOYEES OF the Auto-mobile Association working on Christmas day will
receive four times their normal pay rates, Incomes Data Services, the
independent research organisation, says.
Other companies provide a mix of higher pay and compensatory time off for
workers over the festive season, according to an IDS survey of practices
including holiday pay, compensation for working on public holidays,
restrictions on the timing of holidays and carrying over unused entitlement
from one year to the next.
IDS says many of those taking a break over the Christmas period are doing so
because part of their annual holiday must be taken at this time.
Many companies - including Rockware, Black &amp; Decker, Clarks Shoes, Michelin
and Wiggins Teape - require three days of holiday to be taken at Christmas
in addition to bank holidays. Others require longer holiday periods at
Christmas - eight days at Silentnight Beds, one week at Hotpoint and up to
five days at Fisons Pharmaceuticals.
Ford UK, which closes its plants over Christmas, is giving blue-collar
workers two extra days off because of the recession and falling demand.
Most companies are reluctant to allow employees to carry over unused
holidays into the following year and few companies permit employees to 'cash
in' unused days.
The Institute of Directors suggests in a survey that most British companies
are not making radical changes to their Christmas working patterns this
year.
The institute said more than half of companies would remain open for
business between Christmas and the new year - 64 per cent of manufacturing
companies planned to close plants, although 41 per cent of these would have
sales and marketing staff at work.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-709</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Income plan broker is fined Pounds 25,000
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FIMBRA, the insurance brokers' regulator, yesterday imposed a fine of Pounds
25,000, one of its biggest, on a broker that had specialised in risky 'home
income plans' for the elderly.
Such plans involve taking out a mortgage and using the proceeds to invest in
a bond that aims to pay the mortgage interest and provide an income on top.
The company, Aylesbury Associates of Bromley in Kent, has not traded since
July last year when its membership was suspended. It quoted pensioners
annual growth rates of between 15 per cent and 25 per cent, far in excess of
prevailing regulations. They were not achieved and many clients were forced
to sell their homes after the bonds fell in value.
Aylesbury was declared in default by the Investors Compensation Scheme in
March, and about 250 clients have applied for compensation.
More than Pounds 1.1m in compensation has been paid to 49 clients.
Aylesbury's Fimbra membership has been terminated.
Aylesbury had arranged re-mortgages with Cheltenham &amp; Gloucester building
society, whose customers were also directed to Aylesbury if they wanted to
borrow more money than was available under C&amp;G's own equity release loan.
The fine for Aylesbury follows fines of Pounds 10,000 on Acorn Finance and
Pounds 20,000 on Fisher Prew-Smith, which were also required to pay Fimbra's
costs - often more than the amount of the fine. Solicitors for clients of
Aylesbury doubted whether Fimbra's move would help investors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-710</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / Coal crisis imperils French connection: David Lascelles on
cross-Channel power in the grid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE SOLUTION canvassed for the coal crisis is to shut off the cross-Channel
cable that enables Electricite de France, the state-owned French utility, to
sell power into the UK grid.
The attraction is that French exports are equivalent, by the estimates of
British Coal, to between 6m and 7m tonnes of coal a year. That is the output
of about six or seven pits, or between 6,000 and 7,000 miners. Moreover, EdF
is widely thought to enjoy state subsidies that give it an unfair advantage
over UK sources of fuel, which have to operate unaided.
Mr Michael Heseltine, the trade and industry secretary, who is reviewing the
pit closures, has promised to look at the French interconnector. So he may
act to alter its role, although his scope for action is not as wide as the
coal lobby seems to believe.
The interconnector was opened in the early 1980s with a capacity of 2,000MW
 -about the size of two large power stations. The intention was to enable
the British and French grids to balance out peaks in demand. But EdF was
more aggressive than the Central Electricity Generating Board and by the
late 1980s the traffic was largely one-way.
When the UK electricity industry was privatised in 1990, EdF became a member
of the electricity pool - the market through which bulk power is sold in the
UK. It also negotiated individual contracts with all 12 of the regional
distribution companies in England and Wales, and one Scottish company.
Those arrangements expire in March, and there is pressure from the British
side to prevent EdF negotiating new ones. The Coalfield Communities
Campaign, one of the most active pro-coal lobby groups, demanded at a
Commons committee inquiry last month that base-load electricity imports be
stopped and the link be reduced to a peak balancing role. The campaign also
alleged that EdF was dumping electricity on the UK market.
Other lobbyists have called for the link to be used to export UK electricity
to France and beyond. Reversing the flow might create demand for an
additional 15m tonnes of coal, they argue.
EdF has begun a counter-offensive. Earlier this week, its head of European
sales, Mr Jean-Pierre Guery, was in London for talks. He said EdF intended
to go ahead with negotiations for new contracts and he rejected suggestions
that his company was able to sell electricity at subsidised prices.
One of his main arguments was that EdF's sales help keep UK electricity
prices down, so that cutting the link would only damage the consumer. Nor
would banning imports necessarily lead to more coal being burnt - the south
of England, where the French connection is made, depends heavily on
oil-fired stations.
Although the English grid draws on all power stations, there is a bottleneck
between the coal-fired stations in the north and the heaviest demand in the
south.
The regional companies are also keen to sign up with EdF because it widens
their source of supply. Mr Jim Ellis, chief executive of Seeboard, which has
an 80MW agreement with EdF, said last week he expected to negotiate new
contracts shortly.
The main question Mr Heseltine will have to address is whether the UK has
the right to ban imports. The EC's single market officially comes into being
in January and it would be hard for the UK to erect a barrier to
electricity, particularly since it has been one of the champions of a single
market in energy.
Mr Guery pointed out that the agreement creating the link gives EdF
contractual rights it would seek to protect. Mr Guery was not encouraging on
the prospect for UK electricity exports - he said UK generators were
unlikely to be able to price competitively in the French market. Nor could
they export through France to third countries because transit costs would be
too high.
But he did foresee the link resuming its balancing role eventually.
EdF seems intent on keeping the traffic one way, at least for the time
being, and there is little the government can do about it without triggering
a diplomatic incident.
One measure does seem likely, though. French electricity is not subject to
the UK's nuclear levy - the 10 per cent tax on electricity bills to pay for
decommissioning nuclear power stations. Critics say EdF can charge prices
that reflect the levy, but pocket the difference rather than hand it to the
UK Treasury.
Mr Guery says that does not happen. But the lure of subjecting French sales
to extra taxation is one Mr Heseltine will almost certainly not be able to
resist.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-711</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / German power challenge dropped
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
OVER 160 local authorities in east Germany yesterday agreed to drop a
constitutional challenge to the virtual monopoly of the main west German
utilities on generation and supply of electricity in the former communist
state.
An out-of-court settlement between the two sides means that the utilities,
headed by RWE, PreussenElektra and Bayernwerk, will be guaranteed 70 per
cent of the electricity market in east Germany for the next 20 years. The
local authorities have agreed to generate from their own power stations no
more than 30 per cent of the total requirement.
In return, the suppliers have agreed to protect jobs in the east German
brown-coal industry, which still employs some 80,000, and embark on new
investments valued at up to DM30bn (Pounds 12.3bn).
The local authorities will be allowed to choose whether to take over full
ownership and control of electricity and district heating supply and
distribution facilities on their territory, or cede the right in exchange
for up to 49 per cent of the shares in their regional electricity supply
organisation.
The deal could fall foul of EC competition rules. It is likely to mean
foreign electricity suppliers will be effectively excluded from access to
the east German market for the next 20 years, industry analysts say.
Foreign suppliers have shown an interest in the east German market,
including Electricite de France, Britain's PowerGen, National Power, and
Scottish Power. The German utilities have been attacked by German industry
as among Europe's most costly power suppliers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-712</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLWCDAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / French electricity generator to renew UK sales
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES, Resources Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ELECTRICITE DE FRANCE, the French state-owned utility, intends to go ahead
with new contracts to sell electricity to the UK next year in the face of
claims that French power is damaging the British coal industry.
Clarification of France's intentions came yesterday as Mr Michael Heseltine,
the trade and industry secretary, rejected pressure to reverse his pit
closure programme following the High Court ruling that it had been conducted
unlawfully.
Mr Jean-Pierre Guery, the head of European sales, said EdF would seek to
renew its membership of the UK electricity pool, the market for bulk
electricity, when it expired next April. It has already begun to negotiate
contracts with individual electricity companies.
EdF currently sells about 16.5tWh of electricity a year to the UK through a
cross-Channel link. This is equivalent to 5-6 per cent of electricity sales
in England and Wales. But British Coal claims that these sales are reducing
the potential market for UK-mined coal by 6m-7m tonnes a year, and costing
more than 6,000 miners' jobs.
The future of the 10-year-old cross-Channel link is one of the issues being
examined by Mr Heseltine in his energy review. Some MPs have called for the
link to be severed, or for changes to enable exports of UK electricity to
France.
Mr Guery questioned whether under EC rules the UK could block electricity
imports. Although EdF was willing to consider imports of UK electricity, he
doubted that there was any early prospect of this because UK prices were too
high.
EdF has been arguing in evidence to the UK government and the select
committee of MPs who are looking into the coal crisis that severance of the
link would damage consumers' interests by driving up prices. It also claims
that a cut in imports would not enlarge the market for coal. This is because
EdF's power supplies the south of England which is served mainly by
oil-fired power stations.
EdF has also rejected charges that it is subsidised. Though state-owned, it
says it is a free-standing commercial company which is expected to make a
profit, and provide in full for its liabilities.
In London, Mr Heseltine said that mining would not restart at the 10 pits
which the High Court ruled must be subjected to independent review before
they are closed. 'What the court was concerned about was the independence of
the consultation process that is under way, which is the subject of the
90-day procedure,' he said on BBC radio.
Labour presented 14 sackloads of petitions to 10 Downing Street demanding
that the original plan to close 31 pits be reversed.
Cross-Channel power, Page 4
Pit restart calls rebuffed, Page 4
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-713</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CL2A6AEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921223
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 DEC 92 / World News in Brief: Germany bans fourth group
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A fourth German neo-Nazi militant group, the 140-member Nationalist
Offensive, was banned as Germany continued cracking down on anti-foreigner
and anti-Semitic violence.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-714</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / Package holiday companies cut prices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP RAWSTORNE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   THE BIG three holiday tour operators
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Thomson, Owners Abroad and Airtours - are cutting the costs of summer
holidays next year in an attempt to stimulate sales in the recession-hit
market, Philip Rawstorne writes.
Thomson, the largest operator, is reducing the prices of more than 1m
holidays by Pounds 50m across a range of European and US resorts.
Bookings for summer 1993 are 10 per cent down at present and there is no
sign of the recession ending, according to the company.
Savings of up to Pounds 400 for a family of four are available in the
company's latest brochures, with guarantees of no surcharges.
Owners Abroad has made substantial reductions in its Enterprise, Falcon,
Martyn and Sunmed breaks. Enterprise holidays begin at Pounds 89 and there
are thousands of free child places. A family of four can save up to Pounds
426. Falcon's Florida programme has free child offers for the first time,
and there are savings of up to Pounds 105 a person in Martyn's Greece and
Cyprus programmes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-715</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / Late-running rise reaches BR staff
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CATHERINE MILTON, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRITISH RAIL has introduced a benefit for 4,900 signalling staff
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
32 years after they first claimed it.
Rail unions say it was 1960 when they first argued that senior signalling
staff should be paid extra for training their juniors, a task that was not
in their contracts.
According to the RMT union, BR refused to entertain the claim, saying
remuneration for training had been addressed in pay reviews occasioned by
technological change.
BR insisted, however, that the claim had been lodged only two years ago.
The RMT yesterday accepted BR's offer, noting that the claim had outlasted
three of its general secretaries, 17 transport secretaries and seven British
Rail chairmen.
Staff have settled for 15 per cent on top of basic pay for every shift
worked with a trainee. The RMT rail union calculates that staff will walk
away with between Pounds 4.40 and Pounds 6.80 a training day.
The RMT said: 'Christmas has come early, even if the settlement is late.'
The union will raise the question of backdating the allowance for those few
of the 15,000 or so signalling staff employed in 1960 who are still on the
payroll.
BR said: 'The claim was lodged in December 1990 and the final offer was
lodged in July this year. It seems curious that they should not have pursued
the claim if they really did lodge a claim in 1960.'
BR said there were many local agreements under which some signalling staff
were paid the allowance.
Editorial Comment, Page 10
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-716</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / US warns China on HK deals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
US commerce secretary Barbara Franklin told China yesterday not to
invalidate contracts in Hong Kong as part of Beijing's war-of-words on wider
democracy in the British colony's final five years, Reuter reports from Hong
Kong.
Washington would protect US companies if Beijing's promised voiding of
contracts stood to harm US interests after Hong Kong's transition to Chinese
sovereignty in 1997, Ms Franklin said.
'Recent statements by the Chinese have placed in doubt the continuity of
certain Hong Kong contracts signed prior to 1997,' she told the local
American Chamber of Commerce after a three-day visit to China.
China sparked a 17 per cent plunge in the Hong Kong stock market with
threats to disavow the Sino-British Joint Declaration on Hong Kong's
handover and to tear up Hong Kong contracts not to its liking after 1997.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-717</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / Rhone-Poulenc in plant agreement with Chinese
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RHONE-POULENC, France's leading chemicals group, has reached a co-operation
agreement with the Chinese government to build and operate two plants with
local partners, and to license technology there.
This is Rhone-Poulenc's first industrial investment in China, where it plans
to supply the fast-growing textiles industry with artifical fibres.
The largest plant, requiring an investment of up to FFr1bn (Pounds 120m) in
north-east China, is expected to start producing nylon salt (granulates
which turn into nylon when heated) in about three years, in partnership with
Sinopec, a Chinese state-owned group.
A smaller plant, to produce high-performance plastics, is scheduled to open
in two years near Shanghai, according to Mr Michel Maupu, Rhone-Poulenc's
vice-president in charge of fibres and polymers.
The licensing deal covers technology for producing nylon salt, to a
Chinese-owned company being set up in the central province of Henan for that
purpose.
The French group has been selling nylon salt to China for 18 years and now
exports FFr700m-worth annually there. It expects Chinese production of
synthetic fibres to grow from 1.65m tonnes in 1990 to 2.8m tonnes a year by
the end of the decade, as more textile and tyre production shifts to
low-labour-cost countries.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-718</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / Ten die in Kabul attack
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KABUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Three shells slammed into a crowded bazaar in Kabul yesterday, killing at
least 10 people and wounding 16, while delegates to an assembly to elect a
new Afghan president were meeting nearby, Reuter reports from Kabul.
It was not known who fired the shells but army officers reported clashes
around the city between government forces and fighters of the formerly
communist militia.
The attack was one of the worst since fighting last August between the army
and a maverick mujahideen party, when rockets and shells killed more than
2,500 people in Kabul.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-719</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / Collor trial delay as lawyers dismissed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRASLIA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Fernando Collor, Brazil's suspended president, sacked his lawyers last
night in a last-ditch attempt to delay his impeachment trial today.
The manoeuvre gives Mr Collor seven days' grace while a public defender is
appointed by Mr Sidney Sanches, head of the Supreme Court.
Mr Collor said the move had been prompted by 'the inexistence of conditions
for an impartial judgment', and that 'the office of the presidency would be
compromised if I or my representatives participated in such a manifestly
abnormal process'.
The announcement fell like a bombshell in the Senate, where final
preparations were under way for the judgment. The Senate had been expected
to vote overwhelmingly in favour of Mr Collor's impeachment, and for an
eight-year ban on his contesting public office, for 'crimes of
responsibility' allegedly linked to a massive corruption scandal.
A furious Mr Pedro Simon, leader of the acting government in the Senate,
said: 'This is the action of someone who has no defence'. Mr Caio Sercuilo,
a lawyer for the prosecution, claimed it was 'a fitting demonstration of the
moral weakness of the suspended president. The man who governed without
honour is leaving without honour'.
Representatives of the Brazilian Bar Association offered lawyers to
represent Mr Collor, which would enable the trial to go ahead today. But Mr
Sanches said that if Mr Collor did not appear today he would nominate a
lawyer and postpone the trial to December 29.
The delay means the government paralysis which has engulfed the country
since Mr Collor was accused of corruption will continue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-720</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Fresh demand for Sun
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A MIXTURE of takeover speculation, economic recovery hopes and reports that
the UK government has agreed to pay out for acts of terrorism drove the
composite insurance sector sharply higher.
The heaviest activity was in Sun Alliance, up 11 more at 355p on
above-average turnover of 7.6m shares.
There were hints that the recent burst of buying in Sun Alliance represented
one major fund management group purchasing large amounts of stock and that
one of the UK's biggest insurance groups had unloaded a big block of shares.
Specialists, however, said that the level of business over the past two
sessions indic-ated that a single buyer could have accumulated around 1 per
cent of Sun Alliance shares.
Commercial Union advanced 11 to 619p, General Accident 17 to 587p and
Guardian Royal 7 to 182p. Royal Insurance suffered from switching into the
other composites and closed 3 easier at 288p.
The Dollars 145m worth of asset sales by Lasmo, reducing its gearing by
around five points, delighted the market and helped the shares leap 9 to
151p on heavy turnover of 10m. Other active oil issues mirrored the latest
improvement in global crude oil prices.
Among the UK engineering stocks, TI jumped 17 to 311p after the sector
analyst at Credit Lyonnais recommended it as 'the quality stock in the
sector'.
British Aerospace moved ahead 10 to 177p on suggestions that it was on the
point of disclosing a joint venture with Taiwan Aerospace.
Suggestions in the market that Queens Moat Houses would maintain the final
dividend pushed the shares up 4 to 42p in active turnover. Forte, also busy,
climbed 8 to 180p.
The two classes of BT shares were among the worst performers in the Footsie
constituents after an Italian newspaper ran a story that BT was involved in
talks with Stet with a view to taking a stake of between 10 and 20 per cent
in the Italian state-owned telecoms group.
There was no official comment from BT on the story but telecoms specialists
were sceptical that any deal would materialise. 'BT has been unofficially
denying the story all day, and there seems to be no financial or strategic
benefits to BT,' was the view of one leading analyst.
BT shares settled 5 1/2 off at 390p on thin volume of 6.8m, while the
partly-paid weakened 5 to 285 1/2 p on 2.2m.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (195).
AMERICANS (11) American T &amp; T, Ameritech, Bell Atlantic, Echlin, Eaton,
General Elect., Lowe's, Rockwell, Southwestern Bell, Sun Inc., Varity, BANKS
(4) Bank Scot., Lloyds, NatWest, Royal Bk. Scot., BLDG MATERIALS (2)
Anglian, Wolseley, BUSINESS SERVS (5) Brit. Data Mngemt., Inchcape, Rolfe &amp;
Nolan, Salvesen, Serco, CHEMICALS (4) Allied Colloids, Croda, Euro. Colour,
Wolstenholme Rink, CONGLOMERATES (1) Wassall, CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRCN (1)
NSM, ELECTRONICS (8) Blick, Cray, Diploma, Eurotherm, Macro, Misys,
Multitone, Tunstall, ENG AEROSPACE (1) Smiths, ENG GENERAL (10) Barry
Wehmiller, Carclo, FKI, Halma, Powerscreen, Protean, Rotork, Siebe, VSEL
Constrm., Vosper, FOOD MANUF (2) Assoc. Brit. Foods, RHM, FOOD RETAILING (8)
ASDA, Argyll, Iceland Frozen, Kwik Save, Morrison (Wm), Do 5 1/4 pc Pf.,
Park, Sainsbury, HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (5) AAH, Bespak, Intercare, Mayborn,
Unichem, HOTELS &amp; LEIS (1) Manchester Utd., INSCE COMPOSITE (4) Amer. Intl.,
Domestic &amp; Gen., Royal, Sun Alliance, INSCE LIFE (6) Britannic, Legal &amp;
Gen., Refuge, Transatlantic, Do 6pc Pf., Utd. Friendly, INV TRUSTS (45)
MEDIA (14) Carlton Comms., Central ITV, Daily Mail A, Dorling Kindersley,
EMAP, Headline, Johnston Press, Reed, Reuters, SelecTV, TVS Ent. 7.4pc Pf.
'08, Telegraph, Utd. News., Watmoughs, METAL &amp; METAL FORMING (1) Johnson
Matthey, MISC (8) Airsprung Furn., BAT Inds., Bluebird Toys, Danka, Faber
Prest, Lincat, Norbain, Plantsbrook.
NEW LOWS (13).
BLDG MATERIALS (1) Needler, CHEMICALS (1) Anglo Utd., HOTELS &amp; LEIS (2)
Hi-Tec, Zetters, INV TRUSTS (1) German Smllr. Co's Wts., MEDIA (1) Home
Counties.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-721</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / London Stock Exchange: Footsie breaks through to new peak
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ANOTHER session of heavy demand for shares across the range of the London
stock market took the FT-SE Index through the 2,800 barrier to a new
all-time peak yesterday. At the close, the Footsie was 18 points up at
2,807.7, after breaking through the previous closing high of 2,792 in early
trading.
Once again, the market was featured by strong buying of the second-tier
stocks. The FT-SE Mid 250 Index outpaced the Footsie by a factor of two,
gaining 33.8, or 1.2 per cent, to 2,817.4.
Traders reported significant support from the institutions, and were borne
out by continued strength in Seaq-reported business at 831.4m shares,
compared with 940.4m on Friday, when retail, or customer, business was worth
Pounds 1.60bn.
Optimism for a revival in the UK economy next year was encouraged by a
report from the Birmingham Chamber of Industry and Commerce which indicated
'slow but steady' recovery in business in this important UK manufacturing
area.
The move into cyclical stocks, likely to benefit quickly from economic
recovery, was reflected in a subdued performance from the blue chip
defensive issues, which lagged behind the rest of the stock market
yesterday. A heavy programme of delayed deals in leading stocks was reported
after the official close.
A shortage of stock led to a strong advance in stock index futures, although
turnover remained thin.
Having opened at 2,818, selling from a leading independent house sent the
March contract on the FT-SE Index into retreat and it fell to a low for the
day of 2,809 at around 10.00am.
However, dealers moving to cover short positions led to a squeeze in March,
and it moved ahead for the rest of the session with demand particularly
strong in the last 90 minutes of trading. March ended at 2,848, up 33 from
Friday's close and around 22 points above its estimated fair value premium
of 19 to cash. Turnover, at around 6,000 lots, was poor.
Volume in the traded options was down from Friday's high figure but still
healthy at 33,811 contracts. The FT-SE 100 option traded 16,945, while a big
trade in Glaxo just before the close made it the most active stock option of
the day.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-722</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow recedes slightly after
Friday's gains
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
US SHARE prices ended little changed yesterday after investors consolidated
some of the big gains earned in last Friday's 'triple-witching' rally,
writes Patrick Harverson in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was down just 0.81 at
3,312.46, near its best level of the day. The Standard &amp; Poor's 500 lost
0.58 at 440.70, but the Nasdaq composite rose 1.17 to 662.46, another record
high.
Turnover on the New York SE was busy at 226m shares, and declines outscored
rises by 1,019 to 858.
The market's 44-point Dow advance on Friday was primarily the result of
buying related to the 'triple-witching' expiration of stock and stock-index
futures and options, so analysts expected prices to open easier yesterday.
The underlying mood of the market, however, remained optimistic, which
helped prices to pick up from early losses. Observers believe investors are
increasingly confident about the economy and the long-term prospects for
corporate earnings. This upbeat mood has fuelled the recent rally, and
although some institutions had already closed their books for the year, some
analysts were not ruling out further gains in the final days of the year.
IBM dropped a further Dollars 2 1/2 to Dollars 48 7/8 in turnover of almost
7.4m shares following the announcement that two retired executives were
being rehired to help Mr John Akers, IBM's chairman, run the computer group.
Time Warner firmed Dollars  3/8 to Dollars 29 1/4 in the wake of news that
Mr Steven Ross, the group's chairman, had died of cancer over the weekend,
and that eight senior directors would be leaving at the end of this year in
an apparent culmination of a long boardroom struggle at the entertainment
giant.
USAir dropped Dollars 1 1/4 to Dollars 11 3/4 as hopes faded that government
authorities would approve the proposed alliance between the carrier and
British Airways. A last-ditch attempt last weekend by Mr John Major, the UK
prime minister, to persuade President George Bush to give the green light
appeared to have failed.
National Health Laboratories plummeted Dollars 5 3/8 to Dollars 17 1/4 in
turnover of 4.8m shares after the company pleaded guilty to charges of
healthcare fraud and agreed to pay Dollars 110.4m to settle claims involving
clinical testing procedures and the Medicare programme.
On the American Stock Exchange, Ivax Corp plunged Dollars 5 7/8 to Dollars
29 in turnover of 1.5m shares after PaineWebber, the Wall Street broking
house, had downgraded the stock from 'buy' to 'attractive'.
On the Nasdaq market, Ross Cosmetics climbed Dollars 2 1/4 to Dollars 12
after reporting fiscal first-quarter income of 22 cents a share, up from 17
cents registered a year earlier.
Canada
TORONTO stocks ended softer, weighed down by losses in Canadian gold shares
and a round of profit-taking following last week's sharp gains.
The TSE 300 index shed 10 points to 3,310.4 and declining issues outnumbered
rises by 350 to 301 after volume of 42.1m shares valued at CDollars 358.4m.
The gold and silver share index, taking its cue from a USDollars 3 an ounce
retreat by bullion futures, dipped 101.6 to 5,225.7.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-723</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Continent starts Christmas
week in buoyant form
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BOURSES were mostly firmer at the start of the Christmas holiday week,
writes Our Markets Staff.
FRANKFURT hit a two-week high, the DAX index closing 23.54 or 1.6 per cent
higher at 1,515.58, but professionals were not happy about the foundations
for the rally. Turnover fell to DM3.9bn from Friday's DM10.4bn, the latter
inflated by the 'triple-witching' expiry of DTB options and futures
contracts.
Dealers said that the short-covering which took the DAX up by 1.1 per cent
on Friday was still a factor yesterday, since December contracts could still
be covered until 10 am.
The big rises came in stocks which have recently suffered the most. In
carmakers, Volkswagen rose DM6.40 to DM244.30, and Daimler by DM14.50 to
DM524 after last week's slump on unhappy progress reports. Construction
shares recovered after Friday's drop, with Hochtief up DM18 to DM928 and
Holzmann DM6 better at DM766.
PARIS ended just below the day's high, driven by futures-related buying and
window-dressing ahead of the year-end. The CAC-40 index closed up 26.17 or
1.5 per cent at 1,786.29 in turnover of FFr2.5bn.
Financial stocks were sought on hopes of a cut in interest rates. Paribas
added FFr9.70 to FFr359, Societe Generale rose FFr8 to FFr581 and UAP put on
FFr25.1 to FFr469.
Peugeot bucked the trend, losing FFr12 to FFr560 on reports that a UK buyer
had withdrawn from the market.
MILAN was lifted by strong insurers and telecoms as the Comit index added
3.19 to 428.87 in turnover estimated at close to Friday's L151.3bn.
A report in an Italian weekly that British Telecom was interested in buying
a stake of between 10 and 20 per cent in Stet got the market going, and the
shares were fixed L94 higher at L1,779.
A press report that the government was considering the partial
liberalisation of compulsory car insurance sent insurance stocks higher as
Generali rose L255 to L27,450 while Ras put on L315 to L18,500.
Sirti rose L399 to L7,899 on news that it had won a L40bn order in Romania.
AMSTERDAM was brighter with only Philips, down 40 cents at Fl 19.00, and
Royal Dutch, 90 cents lower at Fl 147.60, among major stocks going against
the trend. The CBS Tendency index advanced 0.9 to 104.4.
DSM rose Fl 2.80 to Fl 73.30 as it recovered some of last week's losses on
confirmation of lower fourth-quarter earnings. Heineken was Fl 2.00 stronger
at Fl 173.80 while Daf put on another 30 cents to Fl 7.70. Nedlloyd rose 20
cents to Fl 28.70 following news after Friday's close that the supervisory
board had asked Mr Torstein Hagen to vacate his seat.
STOCKHOLM extended Friday's rally, spearheaded by export-oriented companies.
The Affarsvarlden general index rose 21.1 or 2.3 per cent to 921.4 in
turnover of SKr920m. Astra accounted for SKr105m of the total, as its A
share added SKr17 to SKr750. were unchanged.
SKF bucked the trend, dropping SKr0.50 to SKr69.50 on worries that the
ball-bearing group faced possible downgradings by credit agencies after last
week's official forecast of a pre-tax loss after financial items of SKr1.8bn
in 1992.
ZURICH was mixed with the SMI index advancing 1.7 to 2,047.7. Nestle and
Roche weighed on sentiment with the former's bearers slipping SFr10 to
SFr1,125 and the latter's certificates down SFr20 at SFr4,060. But Roche
bearers closed up SFr50 at SFr5,750.
Ciba registered shares resisted the downward trend towards the end of the
session, closing SFr6 higher at SFr632.
MADRID's general index gained 2.85 to 218.51 on the back of strong financial
stocks.
COPENHAGEN's KFX index fell 0.57 to 76.48, as Baltica lost DKr23 to DKr185
on staff cuts in its banking unit. East Asiatic fell DKr5 to DKr79.50 after
failing to reach agreement on selling seven Plumrose meat preserve plants to
a Danish consortium.
VIENNA saw Universale going against the trend with a fall of Sch35 to
Sch760, but off the day's low of Sch745, on a foreign sell order. The ATX
index gained 6.13 to 722.9 with OMV recovering Sch11 to Sch578, after last
week's losses.
ISTANBUL's 75-share index closed 8.48 higher at 4,030.76 on demand for
cement stocks.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                        FT-SE ACTUARIES SHARE INDICES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
December 21                                         THE EUROPEAN SERIES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes               Open       10.30       11.00       12.00
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100       1057.19     1057.40     1057.77     1059.03
FT-SE Eurotrack 200       1140.90     1141.68     1142.72     1143.64
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes              13.00       14.00       15.00       Close
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100       1059.89     1059.78     1058.69     1059.21
FT-SE Eurotrack 200       1145.20     1145.37     1145.02     1145.44
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                       Dec 18    Dec 17    Dec 16    Dec 15    Dec 14
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100   1050.25   1034.41   1036.62   1038.14   1041.18
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1136.56   1119.02   1117.67   1115.23   1116.33
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
High/day: 100 - 1060.48; 200 - 1146.72
Low/day: 100 - 1056.57 200 - 1140.81
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-724</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: Corporate gloom fails to dent
optimistic mood
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN PITT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SPATE of bad corporate news, both in Europe and the US, failed to leave a
negative impression on the FT-Actuaries World Index last week, and there
were some strong performances, from Ireland and Singapore in particular. The
World index gained 1.6 per cent in local currency terms.
Even IBM's announcement of job cuts and a decision to take a Dollars 6bn
fourth-quarter charge to cover a restructuring programme, leaving the stock
at an 11-year low by the weekend, failed to dent sentiment in the US.
Instead, the talk at the round of pre-Christmas parties concentrated on the
US economic recovery, and even President-elect Bill Clinton's 'phone-in' on
the state of the nation could not stifle the mood of optimism.
Ireland came to the fore last week with a 5.8 per cent rise on sustained
expectations of a currency devaluation. Over the last quarter, the market
has risen some 7 per cent in local currency terms, compared with 0.8 per
cent in Germany and 1 per cent in France, but is 12 per cent down since the
start of the year.
Elsewhere in Europe, Sweden was a feature, helped by lower domestic interest
rates and a stronger dollar. Other Nordic markets lost ground, mainly on
year-end profit-taking.
Austria showed up as one of the week's worst performers following
Creditanstalt's warning that it planned a 6 per cent cut in its 1992
dividend, and a heavy fall in the share price of OMV, mainly on selling by
foreign institutions.
Oil issues in general had a dismal week, with Petrofina contributing largely
to Belgium's negative showing after news last Monday that the company would
be cutting its dividend by 50 per cent. In France, speculation that the
franc would be devalued put pressure on the market.
Among the Far Eastern markets, Singapore stood out as Hong Kong again
suffered from the 'China effect', this time as its neighbour launched a
thinly disguised attack on the Jardine Matheson Group.
Most analysts believe that Hong Kong will remain a volatile market right up
to the Legco vote in early February. Institutional investors have
consequently switched some of their funds away from Hong Kong to other
markets in the region, with Singapore seeing some benefit.
According to Kim Eng Securities, Singapore looks poised for a sustained
rally in 1993, particularly if the government decides to reduce corporate
tax significantly in the spring budget.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                         EUROPEAN EQUITIES TURNOVER
                  Monthly total in local currencies (bn)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Bourse               Aug        Sep        Oct        Nov       US
                    1992       1992       1992       1992   Dollars bn
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Belgium            41.38      42.76      47.56      43.93     1.34
France             64.52     134.26     108.08      92.39    17.07
Germany           101.72     109.19      98.85      92.20    57.84
Italy           6,039.60  10,808.00  17,112.00  24,248.80    17.40
Netherlands         9.80      14.41      14.00      11.70     6.53
Spain             317.47     578.78     687.70     619.31     5.12
Switzerland         9.01      13.40      11.78      11.60     8.07
UK                 26.68      45.30      39.76      39.57    59.82
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Volumes represent purchases and sales.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Italian data adjusted to include off-market trading. Some figures
may be revised.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: County NatWest WoodMac.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                          MARKETS IN PERSPECTIVE
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                 % change   % change in
               % change in local currency**      sterling** US Dollars**
             1 Week   4 Weeks   1 Year  Start of Start of     Start of
                                          1992     1992         1992
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Austria      -2.53    -6.06     -18.12   -16.16    -3.18      -18.99
Belgium      -0.02    -1.99      -0.43    -2.58   +12.83       -5.59
Denmark      -2.20    +1.24     -24.58   -24.14   -11.50      -25.96
Finland      -3.16    +8.16     +15.49   +13.29    +9.16       -8.66
France       -0.12    +1.89      +2.93    -0.40   +15.42       -3.43
Germany      +0.74    -3.41      -8.05    -8.40    +6.08      -11.24
Ireland      +5.88    +9.86     -12.51   -12.37    +1.02      -15.48
Italy        +0.73    -6.71     -11.42   -12.31   -14.33      -28.32
Netherlands  -0.47    +1.63      +4.47    +4.55   +21.19       +1.40
Norway       -2.54    +7.65      -9.38    -9.15    -3.83      -19.54
Spain        +1.77    +2.26      -6.87   -10.74    -7.36      -22.49
Sweden       +2.03    +6.76     +18.67   +14.68    +9.62       -8.28
Switzerland  +2.07    +7.70     +21.36   +18.74   +36.38      +14.11
UK           +3.01    +2.78     +16.04   +12.64   +12.64       -5.75
EUROPE       +1.62    +1.59      +6.03    +3.71   +11.07       -7.06
Australia    +1.36    +8.52      -6.34   -10.35    -2.53      -18.44
Hong Kong    -0.20   -11.74     +21.34   +18.25   +42.11      +18.91
Japan        +1.60    +5.34     -19.56   -20.49    -3.70      -19.42
Malaysia     +0.22    -2.20     +20.46   +17.29   +47.78      +23.65
New Zealand  -1.45    +4.96      +0.02    -7.39    +6.02      -11.28
Singapore    +3.14    +7.85      -0.74    -4.13   +13.17       -5.31
Canada       +1.38    +1.69      -2.07    -6.92    -0.94      -15.55
USA          +1.70    +3.20     +15.29    +5.99   +26.67       +5.99
Mexico       -0.47    +6.11     +27.15   +18.82   +38.50      +15.86
South Africa -0.92    +6.22     -10.59   -10.21   -29.62      -41.11
WORLD INDEX  +1.58    +3.18      +1.02    -3.24   +12.11       -6.19
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
** Based on December 18th 1992.   Copyright, The Financial Times
Limited, Goldman, Sachs &amp; Co., and County NatWest Securities
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-725</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Nikkei loses early gains
on profit-taking
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
REPORTS that additional pension funds would be invested in the stock market
encouraged early trading, but share prices closed marginally lower on
afternoon profit-taking by investment trusts, writes Emiko Terazono in
Tokyo.
The Nikkei average was finally 35.30 down at 17,645.44, after a morning high
of 17,787.56 and an afternoon low of 17,597.59. Tokkin, or specified money
trusts, were also seen placing sell orders.
Volume contracted to 250m shares from 320m. Declines led advances by 486 to
481, with 181 issues unchanged. The Topix index of all first section stocks,
however, gained 2.0 at 1,345.77, and in London the ISE/Nikkei 50 index edged
up 0.35 to 1,096.27.
Weaker futures prompted light arbitrage selling in the afternoon. Investors
offered little response to the government's budget draft for next fiscal
year to March 1994; this involved a 0.2 per cent rise in general account
spending to Y72,354.8bn, the smallest spending growth in six years.
Isuzu Motors, the most active issue of the day, rose Y27 to Y317 on reports
of a business tie-up with Honda. Investors focused on those reports rather
than news of Isuzu's withdrawal from passenger car products, announced at
the same time.
Hyogo Bank, the ailing regional bank, finished Y24 cheaper at Y586 on
profit-taking. Up last week on reports of aid from financial authorities,
Hyogo continued to rise in the morning but fell later on selling by dealers.
Some high-technology issues rose on hopes of an early US economic recovery,
Toshiba by Y5 to Y650 and Sony by Y50 to Y4,250. 'The worst of the news has
been discounted for electricals, and early buyers are coming in,' said Mr
Mike Jeremy, electronics analyst at BaringSecurities.
The Japan Securities Dealers Association suspended afternoon trading of Jax,
an import car dealer listed on the over-the-counter market, to allow
investors to confirm reports that Volkswagen, of Germany, had linked with
the company. Jax declined to comment. The company is currently the sole
distributor for Renault but is said to be terminating its agreement with the
French carmaker.
Yokohama Matsuzakaya, the department store which was rumoured to be targeted
by foreign speculators, dropped Y85 to Y490 on profit-taking.
In Osaka, the OSE average gained 27.91 at 19,117.68 in volume of 31.9m
shares.
Roundup
THE MAIN features in the region yesterday were Hong Kong and Taiwan.
HONG KONG gained as overseas bargain hunters sparked a surge of afternoon
buying. The Hang Seng index ended at 5,242.48, up 49.82, as turnover dropped
to HKDollars 1.85bn from Friday's HKDollars 3.04bn.
Jardine Matheson Holdings closed HKDollars 1.75 off at HKDollars 41, after
an early low of HKDollars 40.50. The most active stock was HSBC Holdings,
which rose 50 cents to HKDollars 52.50.
TAIWAN closed 2.2 per cent weaker after the ruling Nationalist party's poor
performance in Saturday's parliamentary elections, but bargain hunting
lifted prices off early lows.
The weighted index, which was down some 130 points at mid-morning, ended
81.90 off at 3,576.09 in TDollars 13.5bn turnover.
Brokers said the strong gains in the elections by the main opposition, the
Democratic Progressive party, had sparked fears of conflict in parliament
and worsening divisions within the ruling party.
AUSTRALIA was lifted to a 16-week high by strong buying of leading stocks,
in the wake of major gains on overseas markets. The All Ordinaries index
finished 21.4 ahead at 1,537.0, but off a high of 1,541.6, in turnover of
ADollars 351.8m.
BOMBAY rose as state-owned mutual funds bought into an illiquid market. The
BSE index added 65.21 at 2,542.10. It opened strongly but turned back on
profit-taking.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-726</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: European volume figures
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPEAN volume figures for November reveal a general decline in activity,
with the exception of Italy which continued a trend that began the month
before. However, while turnover there jumped by more than 41 per cent, most
of it came from domestic investors, says Mr James Cornish at County NatWest
Securities, which collates the data. By contrast, the Netherlands showed the
biggest fall, of some 16 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-727</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHANNESBURG was firmer in dull trading with the overall index 14 higher at
3,227. The industrial index gained 11 to 4,291 while the gold index advanced
1 to 836. De Beers rose R1 to R58.75 and Anglos added 50 cents to R86.25.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-728</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Franc fails to recover ground
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEITHER the US dollar nor the French franc made much headway against the
D-Mark yesterday, as trading on the foreign exchanges ground to a halt in
the run-up to Christmas, writes James Blitz.
After last week's dismal performance against the German currency, the French
franc briefly rose above the level of FFr3.41 to the D-Mark yesterday
morning, as short franc positions were unwound.
However, there was a spate of selling of the French currency at around
lunchtime, and the franc again fell back, to a close of FFr3.417, a touch
weaker on the day. The market continues to believe that the franc will come
under more concerted pressure in the new year, when traders will be starting
with fresh balance sheets.
The dollar gained ground against the D-Mark yesterday afternoon in Europe,
rising to a peak of DM1.5705. The US currency was mostly moved by technical
factors and there were no US economic indicators. It ended at DM1.5680,
firmer by  1/4 pfennig on the day. Traders thought that today's final
figures on third-quarter GDP would have scant effect on the market. In New
York the dollar finished slightly higher at DM1.5685.
Longer term prospects for the US currency remain unclear because of
lingering uncertainty about the scale of the economic upturn in the US.
Mr Jeremy Hawkins, senior economic adviser at Bank of America, also believes
that dollar trading remains range-bound because of the potential impact
European factors will have on the currency.
In the new year, for example, the dollar could gain safe haven status if
political problems in Russia intensify, or if there are systemic problems in
the European exchange rate mechanism. But a speculative attack on the French
franc could push the D-Mark's value upwards across European currencies and,
hence, against the dollar, too.
The inflation figures issued in recent days by the leading German lander do
not bode well for the cut in German official interest rates which could take
the steam out of the ERM tensions. The cost of living in the German state of
Bavaria climbed 0.2 per cent in the month to mid-December for a year-on-year
rise of 4.0 per cent. In the year to mid-November, prices were up 4.0 per
cent for all western Germany.
One other area of interest yesterday was the D-Mark/lira cross. The Italian
currency continued to suffer from political uncertainties and rising
expectations of a rate cut by the Bank of Italy.
The lira slid through the L900 support level in early trading, bottoming out
at L903 per D-Mark from a previous close of L898. But it later rallied to
finish almost unchanged at L898.1.
Sterling ended slightly higher against the D-Mark at DM2.4525 after a
previous close of DM2.4500. Against the dollar, the pound closed a shade
easier at Dollars 1.5645.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-729</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / Money Markets: European futures fall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FRENCH FRANC futures were a touch weaker yesterday as the French currency
failed to make much headway above the lows that were reached against the
D-Mark last week, writes James Blitz.
Trading was extremely quiet in European cash and futures markets at the
start of the Christmas week. In the sterling market, short-dated futures
were priced lower on rumours that there will be no further reductions in UK
base rates for some time.
In the French franc futures market, the March contract declined 3 basis
points to close at 90.49 after the currency failed to make much progress on
the foreign exchanges after an initial rally.
At this level, the market is saying that three-month money in France will be
at 9.51 per cent in the spring - substantially below the current figure of
12 1/4 per cent. The implication is that something will have to give in the
battle of the French franc.
Trading in German futures was quieter. The March contract moved up two basis
points to finish at 92.06, pricing in three-month money in late spring at
7.94 per cent.
In the cash market, German call money edged higher on Monday in line with
the decline in bank reserve levels. Traders quoted call money at 8.80-8.90
per cent, slightly higher than Friday's 8.80 per cent, and said that banks
were experiencing a drain of liquidity from this month's tax payments.
Short-dated sterling futures fell sharply yesterday following Sunday
newspaper reports that Mr John Major, the UK prime minister, had indicated
that he was averse to any more cuts in UK base rates for the time being.
The March contract fell 10 basis points in light trading to close at 93.27,
while the June contract dropped more sharply, by 11 basis points to end at
93.56.
The FT survey of city forecasters showing greater pessimism than the
government in forecasting inflation over the next two years also helped to
dampen sentiment.
The Bank of England forecast a shortage of Pounds 350m at the start of the
day, and later revised that to a flat position. There was late assistance of
Pounds 60m, suggesting that there were shortages somewhere in the banking
system after all. Three-month money finished virtually unchanged at around 7
3/16 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-730</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Coffee prices surge to fresh
13-month highs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BLACKWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WORLD COFFEE prices surged yesterday as New York's March arabica contract
pushed decisively through the 80 cents a lb barrier in heavy early trading.
Late yesterday the March contract was trading at 81.75 cents a lb, more than
2 cents ahead, with some observers looking for 85 cents ahead of the
Christmas break. In London, the March robusta contract closed at Dollars
1,067 a tonne - a 13-month peak.
Sentiment has turned bullish in the coffee markets on expectations of a
lower crop in Brazil and a tightness in Colombian exports. Brazilian exports
for 1992 are expected to be down 17 per cent at 16.3m bags (60 kg each), and
to fall further to 14.4m bags next year.
However, strong resistance to the 80 cents barrier halted a recent run of
prices. Once that level was breached, New York commission houses started
buying heavily. 'There has been no sign of origin selling today,' said one
London trader who would be 'very surprised' if the New York market fell back
below 80 cents.
Ms Judith Ganes, analyst with Merrill Lynch in New York, said the market had
made a 'very strong, very orderly move' through an important psychological
barrier. 'We could begin to see this market really pick up momentum,' she
added.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-731</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: French seek US allies against
Gatt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NANCY DUNNE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WHILE THE US and European Community governments find themselves often locked
in conflict over agriculture, a group of European farmers visiting in
Washington last week described a relationship with many American farmers
that was warm, supportive and united against farm trade reforms proposed in
the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.
'We are on a journey to improve communication and understanding,' said Mr
Michel Pierre of the France Confederation Paysanne. With farmers worldwide
caught in a downward spiral of lower prices and growing bankruptcies, 'it is
necessary to do something'.
What they were doing mostly in the US was talking - on radio and television,
to newspapers, congressmen and other farmers - about the need to reduce
production worldwide, about the need to preserve rural life in Europe.
Mr Alain Roux of the Federation des Producteurs de Lait gestured with a pat
of butter to explain the justice of 'dumping' surplus products.
'We think the European consumer, when he pays for a piece of butter, he has
to pay this level for the nutrient butter and the rest for maintaining rural
society,' he said. 'But if this butter is sold to Africa, this part -
maintaining rural life - it has not to be paid by Africa.'
It was little noticed that when French farmers launched protests against the
US-EC oilseeds deal, American farmers marched in their ranks. Members of the
American National Family Farm Coalition last month also met in France with
the newly formed SOS Paysans en Difficulties to help them organise suicide
hotlines, credit counseling services and debt restructuring plans.
The French farmers returned the visit last week, accompanied by one Dutch
dairyman. After attending the annual meeting of the National Farm Coalition
in Indianapolis, half the group was taken to visit farms in Vermont, and the
other half to Kentucky. In both places they created a stir in media
appearances.
Their language was different, but from Des Moines to Dijon there seemed to
be one unifying theme among hosts and guests alike: the free market was
scorned as 'an illusion' and supply management schemes - involving
production cuts to raise prices to a profitable level - were pronounced the
solution to the industry's difficulties.
Mr Arian Kamp, a 29-year-old dairyman who heads the Dutch Young Farmers'
Union, said it was the educated young European farmers 'with good ideas
about how to create better products' who were most at risk because they had
had to buy farms at a time of declining food prices.
'Every continent - every group of countries - must be able to build up a
kind of agriculture policy which makes possible that farmers within that
area are able to get the cost of production so they are able to able to
exist in rural life,' he said. 'We young farmers prefer supply management.
We want decisions made in Gatt about the volume of production.'
The international networking among farmers is likely to grow. Mr Mark
Ritchie, who accompanied the French farmers, is organising a US chapter of
the Farmers World Network, which promotes exchanges between farmers around
the world.
'Our problems are increasingly global so the solutions must be global too,'
said Mr Ritchie. 'We will have to consider the interests of the whole
planet, if we want to solve problems at home.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-732</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Guarded welcome for fish deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FISHERMEN ARE giving a guarded welcome to the deal on fish quotas and
fishing regulation for next year which the European Community fisheries
council agreed on Sunday.
For British fishermen in the North Sea the agreement means a near doubling
of the quota of haddock, while European Commission plans to impose a 190-day
tie-up on Britain were rejected.
Mr Bob Allen, chief executive of the Scottish Fishermen's Federation, said:
'We congratulate the ministers on getting the EC tie-up scheme out of the
picture but we do not accept the (British) government's approach'.
The 82 per cent increase in the British North Sea haddock quota from 42,640
tonnes to 77,620 tonnes was welcomed because of the value of this catch to
fishermen. Haddock stocks have recovered substantially after two bad years.
Herring catches in the North Sea will remain about the same, as will cod
allowances.
Mr John Gummer, the agriculture minister, hailed the outcome of the
fisheries council as 'a great victory for the countries of Europe over rigid
centralised bureaucracy'. This was because the ministers, over whom he
presided, had rejected the commission proposal to operate a blanket 190-day
ban on fishing by British boats.
Instead Britain will attempt to regulate its fishing effort through the
newly-passed Sea Fish (Conservation) Act, which gives the government power
to restrict the number of days a boat spends at sea by relating its activity
to its performance in 1991.
Fishermen will be given fishing days to match their days at sea in 1991 and
new allowances will take into account days at sea spent servicing oil rigs
or carrying out non-fishing work. They will not be subject to having to
spend consecutive days in port.
The government believes this will ensure access to fishing is allocated
fairly and that the supply of fish to the market will be more even, avoiding
the gluts which led to sharp price falls this year.
But the fishermen say they will continue their fight against the provisions
of the act. 'We will continue to wage war on the idea of limiting days at
sea,' Mr Allen said.
The fishermen still say they would prefer a much larger decommissioning
scheme than the one planned by the government, which involves spending
Pounds 25m over three years.
Commenting on fishermen's reactions, Mr Gummer said in Brussels: 'This
agreement means that the industry can continue to be structured so that
fishermen's incomes continue to keep ahead of inflation.
'We have to regulate the industry for conservation reasons. I am very aware
that a previously unregulated industry is now being restructured and we are
restraining the activities of natural hunters.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-733</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / World Commodities Prices: Market report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GOLD dived around Dollars 4 a troy ounce in thin afternoon trade on the
London bullion market after selling by a US trade house pushed the price
quickly down, hitting sell stops below Dollars 335 on Comex. Dealers said
the price free-fall meant players in New York had probably stood aside for a
few minutes to gauge what was happening. 'No-one wanted to bid ..So it moved
Dollars 2 in about 30 seconds for absolutely no reason,' one said. LME
metals moved generally higher as an early surge by COPPER set off short
covering across the board. But the pre-holiday markets were rather thin and
price movements were exaggerated, dealers said. Chinese buying and dealer
short covering gave an early boost to copper and there was also buying in
expectation of Comex making an early burst above resistance. But when New
York failed to follow through from its higher opening, the market turned
quiet. Last three-month copper business was at Dollars 2,257 a tonne, up
Dollars 27 from Friday. ZINC and ALUMINIUM also closed ahead.
Compiled from Reuters
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-734</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Russia to revamp diamond sector
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE RUSSIAN parliament yesterday approved a blueprint for reorganising the
country's diamond industry that could cause further damage to the country's
already troubled relationship with the De Beers cartel.
Among other things, the blueprint foresees the creation of a Federal Diamond
Centre which would give parliament ultimate control over the diamond
industry, including the country's international dealings.
Mr Leonid Gurevich, the deputy who steered the project through parliament,
has frequently complained about Russia's arrangements with De Beers, which
allows it to sell only 5 per cent of its rough diamonds independently of De
Beers. He has also said that the independent sales, stipulated by an
agreement that expires in 1995, are limited by the fact that they are held
in Moscow.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-735</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / World Commodities Prices: Tea
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
There were 4,400 packages for the day reports the Tea Brokers Association.
No landed auction. Offshore there was good general demand at firm rates. The
highest price realised this week was 163p cif for a Kenya pf. 1.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-736</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / Farmer's Viewpoint: Mr Boardman hopes for a season to be
jolly - Britain's only professional grower finds the holly business
profitable but risky
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID RICHARDSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LONG BEFORE the word diversification had any obvious relevance to farming, a
young friend of mine decided he would earn a bit of extra Christmas income
from selling sprigs of holly from the trees in the hedgerows on his farm. He
had cashed in on them modestly before when he had allowed gypsies to trim
his trees for a few pound notes. But this time, he decided he would retail
his crop in the local town and maximise his returns.
Previous experience had taught him that the berries on his holly trees were
particularly attractive to hungry birds. So, to deny them the opportunity of
ruining his enterprise by eating his profits, he went out with his pruning
shears while the trees were full of red berries in early November.
It happened to be a very good year and he was thrilled at the quantity of
full-berried holly he was able to cut. But there is no market for the stuff
until a couple of weeks before Christmas, so to protect it against predatory
birds he carefully carted it all down into the cellar of his old farmhouse.
For the following few chilly weeks he took enormous pleasure in watching
hordes of songbirds fluttering around his neighbours' holly trees. Every
berry they ate, he thought, would increase the value of his cellarful of
perfection. Indeed he spent many winter evenings calculating the size of the
windfall that would be his and working out how to spend it. Eventually, in
the middle of December, he judged the time was right to bring up the holly
and make a killing on the market. But when he went to collect it from its
hiding place he discovered to his horror that while he may have stopped the
birds from eating his berries he had forgotten about the mice in his cellar.
They had clearly enjoyed an early Christmas dinner and scoffed the lot.
Last week I visited a professional holly grower. Indeed he claims to be the
only one in Britain. His holly trees were an imaginative gift, in 1938, from
his late father. He has over 1,000 of them on 3 acres of his 200-acre
(80-hectare) fruit and arable farm and he can identify and name in excess of
100 different holly species that are growing there.
His name is Peter Boardman and his farm overlooks the valley of the Ant at
How Hill, one of the most beautiful spots in the Norfolk Broads.
Throughout his life he has studied holly in Britain and abroad. He has
propagated dozens of different varieties, both the plain green-leaved and
variegated, and many imported from other countries, in an experimental
corner of his farm near the house. He talks knowledgeably about them; about
the need for a few male, non-berry bearing trees in a plantation to
pollinate the females, which are the ones with berries, and the fact that it
takes 15 years for a holly tree to produce a viable amount of holly to cut
and market. Even then there is no guarantee that the trees will produce a
full-berried crop each year.
He too has to cut his vulnerable holly early to avoid problems with hungry
birds. But careful observation over many years has shown that only a few
varieties are attractive to them before Christmas, so these are always cut
first. And Mr Boardman's professional way to cut holly and keep it fresh and
bright until the market is ready for it is in a sealed, mouse-free cold
store.
Once Christmas spirit begins to flow, the red-berried sprigs are brought
out, packed in cardboard boxes (of the type usually used for chrysanthemums)
and sent off to wholesale markets around the country. Many go to the New
Covent Garden market at Nine Elms in London and to the new Spitalfields
market. Each box holds about 9 lb of holly in a good year. That is to say
when there are plenty of berries, for they are far heavier than the wood and
the leaves. Mr Boardman expects to receive something over Pounds 1 a lb from
the wholesaler and hopes to harvest a crop of about 1 tonne an acre.
But where does the compulsion to bring expensive, prickly vegetation into
our houses at Christmas time originate? Apparently it comes from a mixture
of pagan and Christian traditions and dates back, at least, to the druids.
They believed its evergreen characteristic meant that the sun never deserted
the holly tree and that it was a sacred plant. It was therefore their custom
to decorate their houses with holly so that woodland spirits might take
refuge in it from the rigours of winter.
On the other hand, some say that holly is a corruption of a Holy in
Christian terms. Moreover the German word for holly is Christdorn and it is
symbolic of the crown of thorns worn by Jesus at Calvary. The berries, the
legend goes, take their red colour from Christ's blood.
Some of the superstitions associated with holly, however, are rather more
secular. For instance, in some parts of England and Germany it is believed
that if rough, prickly holly is brought into a family house the husband will
dominate the home for the year ahead. If the holly has smooth leaves and few
prickles, however, the wife will rule.
Inevitably holly is claimed to have medicinal properties. 'A dozen ripe but
undried berries eaten in the morning', an ancient herbal states, 'will expel
wind and is good for colic'. And American Indians were said to make a kind
of purgative tea with the berries.
Even more horrific to contemplate was the recommendation that to be soundly
thrashed with holly branches was the finest possible cure for chilblains. At
least, I suspect, it would stop a sufferer complaining about them ever
again.
These days medicinal markets do not feature in Peter Boardman's budgets. He
restricts his holly sales to the Christmas period for harmless commemorative
wreaths and decoration. But is it profitable?
On the face of it a potential gross return of well over Pounds 2,000 an acre
seems attractive. But as Mr Boardman points out, it is high risk. For some
years there are no berries and therefore no sales. It is very
labour-intensive and the prickles make cutting rather uncomfortable work.
The market is entirely seasonal and a very short season at that and there is
a 15 year wait, following planting, before there is any return at all.
His greatest competition comes from what I will politely call itinerant
entrepreneurs, who strip and often damage trees, sometimes with permission
and sometimes without, in order to make a fast buck. But the fact that he
alone in the UK has a professional holly garden, and that a small one, is
eloquent testimony to the fact that there is not enough money in it to make
it a reliable farming diversification.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-737</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Iranian call for Opec output
cut gives oil market brief fillip
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OIL PRICES edged upwards yesterday in light trading in the run-up to
Christmas, only to slip back again later in the day to close unchanged on
the day. North Sea Brent crude for February delivery was at Dollars 18.55 a
barrel.
Prices got a brief fillip early in the day from reports in the Middle East
Economic Survey, which quoted Mr Gholamreza Aqazadeh, Iran's oil minister,
calling for a 2 per cent cut in output by the Organisation of Petroleum
Exporting Countries.
A 2 per cent cut in production would take Opec's ceiling to 24.09m barrels a
day from its present level of 24.58m b/d. But many market traders are
sceptical that members have even implemented the slight cutbacks required
under their latest agreement.
Traders at one international oil company said there was little physical
evidence of Opec cutbacks.
'Iran is talking up the oil price,' said Mr Fareed Mohammedi at the
Petroleum Finance Company in Washington, 'I can't see them getting anyone to
agree to a meeting before February'.
Oil prices have found some support in the past week after being extremely
weak since October, but traders believe that, if Opec members fail to cut
their production in the New Year, prices will continue to slide.
Russia and Kazakhstan are looking at plans to join together energy producing
states from the former Soviet Union in a 'mini Opec', the Reuter news agency
reported yesterday. The agreement was reached at the weekend in talks
between Mr Viktor Chernomydrin, Russian prime minister and Mr Nursultan
Nazarbayev, Kazakhstan's president.
Russia and Kazakhstan were reported last month to be interested in joining
Opec.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-738</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CLVB1AD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921222
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 DEC 92 / International Capital Markets: FT-SE Actuaries indices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The FT-SE 100, FT-SE Mid 250 and FT-SE Actuaries 350 indices and the FT-SE
Actuaries Industry Baskets are calculated by The International Stock
Exchange of the United Kingdom and Republic of Ireland Limited. The
International Stock Exchange of the United Kingdom and Republic of Ireland
Limited 1992. All rights reserved.
The FT-Actuaries All-Share Index is calculated by The Financial Times
Limited in conjunction with the Institute of Actuaries and the Faculty of
Actuaries. The Financial Times Limited 1992. All rights reserved.
The FT-SE 100, FT-SE Mid 250 and FT-SE Actuaries 350 indices, the FT-SE
Actuaries Industry Baskets and the FT-Actuaries All-Share Index are members
of the FT-SE Actuaries Share Indices series which are calculated in
accordance with a standard set of ground rules established by The Financial
Times Limited and London Stock Exchange in conjunction with the Institute of
Actuaries and the Faculty of Actuaries.
'FT-SE' and 'Footsie' are joint trade marks and service marks of the London
Stock Exchange and The Financial Times Limited.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
